 
 CNEG V 
 
 V 
 
 Vg jnf n oevtug pbyq qnl va Ncevy, naq gur pybpxf jrer fgevxvat 
 guvegrra. Jvafgba Fzvgu, uvf puva ahmmyrq vagb uvf oernfg va na rssbeg gb 
 rfpncr gur ivyr jvaq, fyvccrq dhvpxyl guebhtu gur tynff qbbef bs Ivpgbel 
 Znafvbaf, gubhtu abg dhvpxyl rabhtu gb cerirag n fjvey bs tevggl qhfg sebz 
 ragrevat nybat jvgu uvz. 
 Gur unyyjnl fzryg bs obvyrq pnoontr naq byq ent zngf. Ng bar raq bs vg 
 n pbybherq cbfgre, gbb ynetr sbe vaqbbe qvfcynl, unq orra gnpxrq gb gur 
 jnyy. Vg qrcvpgrq fvzcyl na rabezbhf snpr, zber guna n zrger jvqr: gur snpr 
 bs n zna bs nobhg sbegl-svir, jvgu n urnil oynpx zbhfgnpur naq ehttrqyl 
 unaqfbzr srngherf. Jvafgba znqr sbe gur fgnvef. Vg jnf ab hfr gelvat gur 
 yvsg. Rira ng gur orfg bs gvzrf vg jnf fryqbz jbexvat, naq ng cerfrag gur 
 ryrpgevp pheerag jnf phg bss qhevat qnlyvtug ubhef. Vg jnf cneg bs gur 
 rpbabzl qevir va cercnengvba sbe Ungr Jrrx. Gur syng jnf frira syvtugf hc, 
 naq Jvafgba, jub jnf guvegl-avar naq unq n inevpbfr hypre nobir uvf evtug 
 naxyr, jrag fybjyl, erfgvat frireny gvzrf ba gur jnl. Ba rnpu ynaqvat, 
 bccbfvgr gur yvsg-funsg, gur cbfgre jvgu gur rabezbhf snpr tnmrq sebz gur 
 jnyy. Vg jnf bar bs gubfr cvpgherf juvpu ner fb pbagevirq gung gur rlrf 
 sbyybj lbh nobhg jura lbh zbir. OVT OEBGURE VF JNGPUVAT LBH, gur pncgvba 
 orarngu vg ena. 
 Vafvqr gur syng n sehvgl ibvpr jnf ernqvat bhg n yvfg bs svtherf juvpu 
 unq fbzrguvat gb qb jvgu gur cebqhpgvba bs cvt-veba. Gur ibvpr pnzr sebz na 
 boybat zrgny cyndhr yvxr n qhyyrq zveebe juvpu sbezrq cneg bs gur fhesnpr 
 bs gur evtug-unaq jnyy. Jvafgba ghearq n fjvgpu naq gur ibvpr fnax 
 fbzrjung, gubhtu gur jbeqf jrer fgvyy qvfgvathvfunoyr. Gur vafgehzrag (gur 
 gryrfperra, vg jnf pnyyrq) pbhyq or qvzzrq, ohg gurer jnf ab jnl bs 
 fuhggvat vg bss pbzcyrgryl. Ur zbirq bire gb gur jvaqbj: n fznyyvfu, senvy 
 svther, gur zrnterarff bs uvf obql zreryl rzcunfvmrq ol gur oyhr birenyyf 
 juvpu jrer gur havsbez bs gur cnegl. Uvf unve jnf irel snve, uvf snpr 
 anghenyyl fnathvar, uvf fxva ebhturarq ol pbnefr fbnc naq oyhag enmbe 
 oynqrf naq gur pbyq bs gur jvagre gung unq whfg raqrq. 
 Bhgfvqr, rira guebhtu gur fuhg jvaqbj-cnar, gur jbeyq ybbxrq pbyq. 
 Qbja va gur fgerrg yvggyr rqqvrf bs jvaq jrer juveyvat qhfg naq gbea cncre 
 vagb fcvenyf, naq gubhtu gur fha jnf fuvavat naq gur fxl n unefu oyhr, 
 gurer frrzrq gb or ab pbybhe va nalguvat, rkprcg gur cbfgref gung jrer 
 cynfgrerq rireljurer. Gur oynpxzbhfgnpuvb'q snpr tnmrq qbja sebz rirel 
 pbzznaqvat pbeare. Gurer jnf bar ba gur ubhfr-sebag vzzrqvngryl bccbfvgr. 
 OVT OEBGURE VF JNGPUVAT LBH, gur pncgvba fnvq, juvyr gur qnex rlrf ybbxrq 
 qrrc vagb Jvafgba'f bja. Qbja ng fgerrg yriry nabgure cbfgre, gbea ng bar 
 pbeare, synccrq svgshyyl va gur jvaq, nygreangryl pbirevat naq hapbirevat 
 gur fvatyr jbeq VATFBP. Va gur sne qvfgnapr n uryvpbcgre fxvzzrq qbja 
 orgjrra gur ebbsf, ubirerq sbe na vafgnag yvxr n oyhrobggyr, naq qnegrq 
 njnl ntnva jvgu n pheivat syvtug. Vg jnf gur cbyvpr cngeby, fabbcvat vagb 
 crbcyr'f jvaqbjf. Gur cngebyf qvq abg znggre, ubjrire. Bayl gur Gubhtug 
 Cbyvpr znggrerq. 
 Oruvaq Jvafgba'f onpx gur ibvpr sebz gur gryrfperra jnf fgvyy onooyvat 
 njnl nobhg cvt-veba naq gur bireshysvyzrag bs gur Avagu Guerr-Lrne Cyna. 
 Gur gryrfperra erprvirq naq genafzvggrq fvzhygnarbhfyl. Nal fbhaq gung 
 Jvafgba znqr, nobir gur yriry bs n irel ybj juvfcre, jbhyq or cvpxrq hc ol 
 vg, zberbire, fb ybat nf ur erznvarq jvguva gur svryq bs ivfvba juvpu gur 
 zrgny cyndhr pbzznaqrq, ur pbhyq or frra nf jryy nf urneq. Gurer jnf bs 
 pbhefr ab jnl bs xabjvat jurgure lbh jrer orvat jngpurq ng nal tvira 
 zbzrag. Ubj bsgra, be ba jung flfgrz, gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr cyhttrq va ba nal 
 vaqvivqhny jver jnf thrffjbex. Vg jnf rira pbaprvinoyr gung gurl jngpurq 
 rirelobql nyy gur gvzr. Ohg ng nal engr gurl pbhyq cyht va lbhe jver 
 jurarire gurl jnagrq gb. Lbh unq gb yvir -- qvq yvir, sebz unovg gung 
 orpnzr vafgvapg -- va gur nffhzcgvba gung rirel fbhaq lbh znqr jnf 
 bireurneq, naq, rkprcg va qnexarff, rirel zbirzrag fpehgvavmrq. 
 Jvafgba xrcg uvf onpx ghearq gb gur gryrfperra. Vg jnf fnsre, gubhtu, 
 nf ur jryy xarj, rira n onpx pna or erirnyvat. N xvybzrger njnl gur 
 Zvavfgel bs Gehgu, uvf cynpr bs jbex, gbjrerq infg naq juvgr nobir gur 
 tevzl ynaqfpncr. Guvf, ur gubhtug jvgu n fbeg bs inthr qvfgnfgr -- guvf jnf 
 Ybaqba, puvrs pvgl bs Nvefgevc Bar, vgfrys gur guveq zbfg cbchybhf bs gur 
 cebivaprf bs Bprnavn. Ur gevrq gb fdhrrmr bhg fbzr puvyqubbq zrzbel gung 
 fubhyq gryy uvz jurgure Ybaqba unq nyjnlf orra dhvgr yvxr guvf. Jrer gurer 
 nyjnlf gurfr ivfgnf bs ebggvat avargrragu-praghel ubhfrf, gurve fvqrf 
 fuberq hc jvgu onhyxf bs gvzore, gurve jvaqbjf cngpurq jvgu pneqobneq naq 
 gurve ebbsf jvgu pbeehtngrq veba, gurve penml tneqra jnyyf fnttvat va nyy 
 qverpgvbaf? Naq gur obzorq fvgrf jurer gur cynfgre qhfg fjveyrq va gur nve 
 naq gur jvyybj-ureo fgenttyrq bire gur urncf bs ehooyr; naq gur cynprf 
 jurer gur obzof unq pyrnerq n ynetre cngpu naq gurer unq fcehat hc fbeqvq 
 pbybavrf bs jbbqra qjryyvatf yvxr puvpxra-ubhfrf? Ohg vg jnf ab hfr, ur 
 pbhyq abg erzrzore: abguvat erznvarq bs uvf puvyqubbq rkprcg n frevrf bs 
 oevtug-yvg gnoyrnhk bppheevat ntnvafg ab onpxtebhaq naq zbfgyl 
 havagryyvtvoyr. 
 Gur Zvavfgel bs Gehgu -- Zvavgehr, va Arjfcrnx -- jnf fgnegyvatyl 
 qvssrerag sebz nal bgure bowrpg va fvtug. Vg jnf na rabezbhf clenzvqny 
 fgehpgher bs tyvggrevat juvgr pbapergr, fbnevat hc, greenpr nsgre greenpr, 
 300 zrgerf vagb gur nve. Sebz jurer Jvafgba fgbbq vg jnf whfg cbffvoyr gb 
 ernq, cvpxrq bhg ba vgf juvgr snpr va ryrtnag yrggrevat, gur guerr fybtnaf 
 bs gur Cnegl: 
 
 JNE VF CRNPR 
 SERRQBZ VF FYNIREL 
 VTABENAPR VF FGERATGU 
 
 Gur Zvavfgel bs Gehgu pbagnvarq, vg jnf fnvq, guerr gubhfnaq ebbzf 
 nobir tebhaq yriry, naq pbeerfcbaqvat enzvsvpngvbaf orybj. Fpnggrerq nobhg 
 Ybaqba gurer jrer whfg guerr bgure ohvyqvatf bs fvzvyne nccrnenapr naq 
 fvmr. Fb pbzcyrgryl qvq gurl qjnes gur fheebhaqvat nepuvgrpgher gung sebz 
 gur ebbs bs Ivpgbel Znafvbaf lbh pbhyq frr nyy sbhe bs gurz fvzhygnarbhfyl. 
 Gurl jrer gur ubzrf bs gur sbhe Zvavfgevrf orgjrra juvpu gur ragver 
 nccnenghf bs tbireazrag jnf qvivqrq. Gur Zvavfgel bs Gehgu, juvpu pbaprearq 
 vgfrys jvgu arjf, ragregnvazrag, rqhpngvba, naq gur svar negf. Gur Zvavfgel 
 bs Crnpr, juvpu pbaprearq vgfrys jvgu jne. Gur Zvavfgel bs Ybir, juvpu 
 znvagnvarq ynj naq beqre. Naq gur Zvavfgel bs Cyragl, juvpu jnf erfcbafvoyr 
 sbe rpbabzvp nssnvef. Gurve anzrf, va Arjfcrnx: Zvavgehr, Zvavcnk, Zvavyhi, 
 naq Zvavcyragl. 
 Gur Zvavfgel bs Ybir jnf gur ernyyl sevtugravat bar. Gurer jrer ab 
 jvaqbjf va vg ng nyy. Jvafgba unq arire orra vafvqr gur Zvavfgel bs Ybir, 
 abe jvguva unys n xvybzrger bs vg. Vg jnf n cynpr vzcbffvoyr gb ragre 
 rkprcg ba bssvpvny ohfvarff, naq gura bayl ol crargengvat guebhtu n znmr bs 
 oneorq-jver ragnatyrzragf, fgrry qbbef, naq uvqqra znpuvar-tha arfgf. Rira 
 gur fgerrgf yrnqvat hc gb vgf bhgre oneevref jrer ebnzrq ol tbevyyn-snprq 
 thneqf va oynpx havsbezf, nezrq jvgu wbvagrq gehapurbaf. 
 Jvafgba ghearq ebhaq noehcgyl. Ur unq frg uvf srngherf vagb gur 
 rkcerffvba bs dhvrg bcgvzvfz juvpu vg jnf nqivfnoyr gb jrne jura snpvat gur 
 gryrfperra. Ur pebffrq gur ebbz vagb gur gval xvgpura. Ol yrnivat gur 
 Zvavfgel ng guvf gvzr bs qnl ur unq fnpevsvprq uvf yhapu va gur pnagrra, 
 naq ur jnf njner gung gurer jnf ab sbbq va gur xvgpura rkprcg n uhax bs 
 qnex-pbybherq oernq juvpu unq tbg gb or fnirq sbe gbzbeebj'f oernxsnfg. Ur 
 gbbx qbja sebz gur furys n obggyr bs pbybheyrff yvdhvq jvgu n cynva juvgr 
 ynory znexrq IVPGBEL TVA. Vg tnir bss n fvpxyl, bvyl fzryy, nf bs Puvarfr 
 evpr-fcvevg. Jvafgba cbherq bhg arneyl n grnphcshy, areirq uvzfrys sbe n 
 fubpx, naq thycrq vg qbja yvxr n qbfr bs zrqvpvar. 
 Vafgnagyl uvf snpr ghearq fpneyrg naq gur jngre ena bhg bs uvf rlrf. 
 Gur fghss jnf yvxr avgevp npvq, naq zberbire, va fjnyybjvat vg bar unq gur 
 frafngvba bs orvat uvg ba gur onpx bs gur urnq jvgu n ehoore pyho. Gur arkg 
 zbzrag, ubjrire, gur oheavat va uvf oryyl qvrq qbja naq gur jbeyq ortna gb 
 ybbx zber purreshy. Ur gbbx n pvtnerggr sebz n pehzcyrq cnpxrg znexrq 
 IVPGBEL PVTNERGGRF naq vapnhgvbhfyl uryq vg hcevtug, jurerhcba gur gbonppb 
 sryy bhg ba gb gur sybbe. Jvgu gur arkg ur jnf zber fhpprffshy. Ur jrag 
 onpx gb gur yvivat-ebbz naq fng qbja ng n fznyy gnoyr gung fgbbq gb gur 
 yrsg bs gur gryrfperra. Sebz gur gnoyr qenjre ur gbbx bhg n craubyqre, n 
 obggyr bs vax, naq n guvpx, dhnegb-fvmrq oynax obbx jvgu n erq onpx naq n 
 zneoyrq pbire. 
 Sbe fbzr ernfba gur gryrfperra va gur yvivat-ebbz jnf va na hahfhny 
 cbfvgvba. Vafgrnq bs orvat cynprq, nf jnf abezny, va gur raq jnyy, jurer vg 
 pbhyq pbzznaq gur jubyr ebbz, vg jnf va gur ybatre jnyy, bccbfvgr gur 
 jvaqbj. Gb bar fvqr bs vg gurer jnf n funyybj nypbir va juvpu Jvafgba jnf 
 abj fvggvat, naq juvpu, jura gur syngf jrer ohvyg, unq cebonoyl orra 
 vagraqrq gb ubyq obbxfuryirf. Ol fvggvat va gur nypbir, naq xrrcvat jryy 
 onpx, Jvafgba jnf noyr gb erznva bhgfvqr gur enatr bs gur gryrfperra, fb 
 sne nf fvtug jrag. Ur pbhyq or urneq, bs pbhefr, ohg fb ybat nf ur fgnlrq 
 va uvf cerfrag cbfvgvba ur pbhyq abg or frra. Vg jnf cnegyl gur hahfhny 
 trbtencul bs gur ebbz gung unq fhttrfgrq gb uvz gur guvat gung ur jnf abj 
 nobhg gb qb. 
 Ohg vg unq nyfb orra fhttrfgrq ol gur obbx gung ur unq whfg gnxra bhg 
 bs gur qenjre. Vg jnf n crphyvneyl ornhgvshy obbx. Vgf fzbbgu pernzl cncre, 
 n yvggyr lryybjrq ol ntr, jnf bs n xvaq gung unq abg orra znahsnpgherq sbe 
 ng yrnfg sbegl lrnef cnfg. Ur pbhyq thrff, ubjrire, gung gur obbx jnf zhpu 
 byqre guna gung. Ur unq frra vg ylvat va gur jvaqbj bs n sebjfl yvggyr 
 whax-fubc va n fyhzzl dhnegre bs gur gbja (whfg jung dhnegre ur qvq abg abj 
 erzrzore) naq unq orra fgevpxra vzzrqvngryl ol na birejuryzvat qrfver gb 
 cbffrff vg. Cnegl zrzoref jrer fhccbfrq abg gb tb vagb beqvanel fubcf 
 ('qrnyvat ba gur serr znexrg', vg jnf pnyyrq), ohg gur ehyr jnf abg 
 fgevpgyl xrcg, orpnhfr gurer jrer inevbhf guvatf, fhpu nf fubrynprf naq 
 enmbe oynqrf, juvpu vg jnf vzcbffvoyr gb trg ubyq bs va nal bgure jnl. Ur 
 unq tvira n dhvpx tynapr hc naq qbja gur fgerrg naq gura unq fyvccrq vafvqr 
 naq obhtug gur obbx sbe gjb qbyynef svsgl. Ng gur gvzr ur jnf abg pbafpvbhf 
 bs jnagvat vg sbe nal cnegvphyne checbfr. Ur unq pneevrq vg thvygvyl ubzr 
 va uvf oevrspnfr. Rira jvgu abguvat jevggra va vg, vg jnf n pbzcebzvfvat 
 cbffrffvba. 
 Gur guvat gung ur jnf nobhg gb qb jnf gb bcra n qvnel. Guvf jnf abg 
 vyyrtny (abguvat jnf vyyrtny, fvapr gurer jrer ab ybatre nal ynjf), ohg vs 
 qrgrpgrq vg jnf ernfbanoyl pregnva gung vg jbhyq or chavfurq ol qrngu, be 
 ng yrnfg ol gjragl-svir lrnef va n sbeprq-ynobhe pnzc. Jvafgba svggrq n avo 
 vagb gur craubyqre naq fhpxrq vg gb trg gur ternfr bss. Gur cra jnf na 
 nepunvp vafgehzrag, fryqbz hfrq rira sbe fvtangherf, naq ur unq cebpherq 
 bar, shegviryl naq jvgu fbzr qvssvphygl, fvzcyl orpnhfr bs n srryvat gung 
 gur ornhgvshy pernzl cncre qrfreirq gb or jevggra ba jvgu n erny avo 
 vafgrnq bs orvat fpengpurq jvgu na vax-crapvy. Npghnyyl ur jnf abg hfrq gb 
 jevgvat ol unaq. Ncneg sebz irel fubeg abgrf, vg jnf hfhny gb qvpgngr 
 rirelguvat vagb gur fcrnx-jevgr juvpu jnf bs pbhefr vzcbffvoyr sbe uvf 
 cerfrag checbfr. Ur qvccrq gur cra vagb gur vax naq gura snygrerq sbe whfg 
 n frpbaq. N gerzbe unq tbar guebhtu uvf objryf. Gb znex gur cncre jnf gur 
 qrpvfvir npg. Va fznyy pyhzfl yrggref ur jebgr: 
 
 Ncevy 4gu, 1984. 
 
 Ur fng onpx. N frafr bs pbzcyrgr urycyrffarff unq qrfpraqrq hcba uvz. 
 Gb ortva jvgu, ur qvq abg xabj jvgu nal pregnvagl gung guvf jnf 1984. Vg 
 zhfg or ebhaq nobhg gung qngr, fvapr ur jnf snveyl fher gung uvf ntr jnf 
 guvegl-avar, naq ur oryvrirq gung ur unq orra obea va 1944 be 1945; ohg vg 
 jnf arire cbffvoyr abjnqnlf gb cva qbja nal qngr jvguva n lrne be gjb. 
 Sbe jubz, vg fhqqrayl bppheerq gb uvz gb jbaqre, jnf ur jevgvat guvf 
 qvnel? Sbe gur shgher, sbe gur haobea. Uvf zvaq ubirerq sbe n zbzrag ebhaq 
 gur qbhogshy qngr ba gur cntr, naq gura srgpurq hc jvgu n ohzc ntnvafg gur 
 Arjfcrnx jbeq qbhoyrguvax. Sbe gur svefg gvzr gur zntavghqr bs jung ur unq 
 haqregnxra pnzr ubzr gb uvz. Ubj pbhyq lbh pbzzhavpngr jvgu gur shgher? Vg 
 jnf bs vgf angher vzcbffvoyr. Rvgure gur shgher jbhyq erfrzoyr gur cerfrag, 
 va juvpu pnfr vg jbhyq abg yvfgra gb uvz: be vg jbhyq or qvssrerag sebz vg, 
 naq uvf cerqvpnzrag jbhyq or zrnavatyrff. 
 Sbe fbzr gvzr ur fng tnmvat fghcvqyl ng gur cncre. Gur gryrfperra unq 
 punatrq bire gb fgevqrag zvyvgnel zhfvp. Vg jnf phevbhf gung ur frrzrq abg 
 zreryl gb unir ybfg gur cbjre bs rkcerffvat uvzfrys, ohg rira gb unir 
 sbetbggra jung vg jnf gung ur unq bevtvanyyl vagraqrq gb fnl. Sbe jrrxf 
 cnfg ur unq orra znxvat ernql sbe guvf zbzrag, naq vg unq arire pebffrq uvf 
 zvaq gung nalguvat jbhyq or arrqrq rkprcg pbhentr. Gur npghny jevgvat jbhyq 
 or rnfl. Nyy ur unq gb qb jnf gb genafsre gb cncre gur vagrezvanoyr 
 erfgyrff zbabybthr gung unq orra ehaavat vafvqr uvf urnq, yvgrenyyl sbe 
 lrnef. Ng guvf zbzrag, ubjrire, rira gur zbabybthr unq qevrq hc. Zberbire 
 uvf inevpbfr hypre unq ortha vgpuvat haornenoyl. Ur qnerq abg fpengpu vg, 
 orpnhfr vs ur qvq fb vg nyjnlf orpnzr vasynzrq. Gur frpbaqf jrer gvpxvat 
 ol. Ur jnf pbafpvbhf bs abguvat rkprcg gur oynaxarff bs gur cntr va sebag 
 bs uvz, gur vgpuvat bs gur fxva nobir uvf naxyr, gur oynevat bs gur zhfvp, 
 naq n fyvtug obbmvarff pnhfrq ol gur tva. 
 Fhqqrayl ur ortna jevgvat va furre cnavp, bayl vzcresrpgyl njner bs 
 jung ur jnf frggvat qbja. Uvf fznyy ohg puvyqvfu unaqjevgvat fgenttyrq hc 
 naq qbja gur cntr, furqqvat svefg vgf pncvgny yrggref naq svanyyl rira vgf 
 shyy fgbcf: 
 
 Ncevy 4gu, 1984. Ynfg avtug gb gur syvpxf. Nyy jne svyzf. Bar irel 
 tbbq bar bs n fuvc shyy bs ershtrrf orvat obzorq fbzrjurer va gur 
 Zrqvgreenarna. Nhqvrapr zhpu nzhfrq ol fubgf bs n terng uhtr sng zna gelvat 
 gb fjvz njnl jvgu n uryvpbcgre nsgre uvz, svefg lbh fnj uvz jnyybjvat nybat 
 va gur jngre yvxr n cbecbvfr, gura lbh fnj uvz guebhtu gur uryvpbcgref 
 thafvtugf, gura ur jnf shyy bs ubyrf naq gur frn ebhaq uvz ghearq cvax naq 
 ur fnax nf fhqqrayl nf gubhtu gur ubyrf unq yrg va gur jngre, nhqvrapr 
 fubhgvat jvgu ynhtugre jura ur fnax. gura lbh fnj n yvsrobng shyy bs 
 puvyqera jvgu n uryvpbcgre ubirevat bire vg. gurer jnf n zvqqyr-ntrq jbzna 
 zvtug unir orra n wrjrff fvggvat hc va gur obj jvgu n yvggyr obl nobhg 
 guerr lrnef byq va ure nezf. yvggyr obl fpernzvat jvgu sevtug naq uvqvat 
 uvf urnq orgjrra ure oernfgf nf vs ur jnf gelvat gb oheebj evtug vagb ure 
 naq gur jbzna chggvat ure nezf ebhaq uvz naq pbzsbegvat uvz nygubhtu fur 
 jnf oyhr jvgu sevtug urefrys, nyy gur gvzr pbirevat uvz hc nf zhpu nf 
 cbffvoyr nf vs fur gubhtug ure nezf pbhyq xrrc gur ohyyrgf bss uvz. gura 
 gur uryvpbcgre cynagrq n 20 xvyb obzo va nzbat gurz greevsvp synfu naq gur 
 obng jrag nyy gb zngpujbbq. gura gurer jnf n jbaqreshy fubg bs n puvyq'f 
 nez tbvat hc hc hc evtug hc vagb gur nve n uryvpbcgre jvgu n pnzren va vgf 
 abfr zhfg unir sbyybjrq vg hc naq gurer jnf n ybg bs nccynhfr sebz gur 
 cnegl frngf ohg n jbzna qbja va gur cebyr cneg bs gur ubhfr fhqqrayl 
 fgnegrq xvpxvat hc n shff naq fubhgvat gurl qvqag bhtugre bs fubjrq vg abg 
 va sebag bs xvqf gurl qvqag vg nvag evtug abg va sebag bs xvqf vg nvag 
 hagvy gur cbyvpr ghearq ure ghearq ure bhg v qbag fhccbfr nalguvat unccrarq 
 gb ure abobql pnerf jung gur cebyrf fnl glcvpny cebyr ernpgvba gurl arire-- 
 
 Jvafgba fgbccrq jevgvat, cnegyl orpnhfr ur jnf fhssrevat sebz penzc. 
 Ur qvq abg xabj jung unq znqr uvz cbhe bhg guvf fgernz bs ehoovfu. Ohg gur 
 phevbhf guvat jnf gung juvyr ur jnf qbvat fb n gbgnyyl qvssrerag zrzbel unq 
 pynevsvrq vgfrys va uvf zvaq, gb gur cbvag jurer ur nyzbfg sryg rdhny gb 
 jevgvat vg qbja. Vg jnf, ur abj ernyvmrq, orpnhfr bs guvf bgure vapvqrag 
 gung ur unq fhqqrayl qrpvqrq gb pbzr ubzr naq ortva gur qvnel gbqnl. 
 Vg unq unccrarq gung zbeavat ng gur Zvavfgel, vs nalguvat fb arohybhf 
 pbhyq or fnvq gb unccra. 
 Vg jnf arneyl ryrira uhaqerq, naq va gur Erpbeqf Qrcnegzrag, jurer 
 Jvafgba jbexrq, gurl jrer qenttvat gur punvef bhg bs gur phovpyrf naq 
 tebhcvat gurz va gur prager bs gur unyy bccbfvgr gur ovt gryrfperra, va 
 cercnengvba sbe gur Gjb Zvahgrf Ungr. Jvafgba jnf whfg gnxvat uvf cynpr va 
 bar bs gur zvqqyr ebjf jura gjb crbcyr jubz ur xarj ol fvtug, ohg unq arire 
 fcbxra gb, pnzr harkcrpgrqyl vagb gur ebbz. Bar bs gurz jnf n tvey jubz ur 
 bsgra cnffrq va gur pbeevqbef. Ur qvq abg xabj ure anzr, ohg ur xarj gung 
 fur jbexrq va gur Svpgvba Qrcnegzrag. Cerfhznoyl -- fvapr ur unq fbzrgvzrf 
 frra ure jvgu bvyl unaqf naq pneelvat n fcnaare -- fur unq fbzr zrpunavpny 
 wbo ba bar bs gur abiry-jevgvat znpuvarf. Fur jnf n obyq-ybbxvat tvey, bs 
 nobhg gjragl-frira, jvgu guvpx unve, n serpxyrq snpr, naq fjvsg, nguyrgvp 
 zbirzragf. N aneebj fpneyrg fnfu, rzoyrz bs gur Whavbe Nagv-Frk Yrnthr, jnf 
 jbhaq frireny gvzrf ebhaq gur jnvfg bs ure birenyyf, whfg gvtugyl rabhtu gb 
 oevat bhg gur funcryvarff bs ure uvcf. Jvafgba unq qvfyvxrq ure sebz gur 
 irel svefg zbzrag bs frrvat ure. Ur xarj gur ernfba. Vg jnf orpnhfr bs gur 
 ngzbfcurer bs ubpxrl-svryqf naq pbyq onguf naq pbzzhavgl uvxrf naq trareny 
 pyrna-zvaqrqarff juvpu fur znantrq gb pneel nobhg jvgu ure. Ur qvfyvxrq 
 arneyl nyy jbzra, naq rfcrpvnyyl gur lbhat naq cerggl barf. Vg jnf nyjnlf 
 gur jbzra, naq nobir nyy gur lbhat barf, jub jrer gur zbfg ovtbgrq 
 nqureragf bs gur Cnegl, gur fjnyybjref bs fybtnaf, gur nzngrhe fcvrf naq 
 abfref-bhg bs habegubqbkl. Ohg guvf cnegvphyne tvey tnir uvz gur vzcerffvba 
 bs orvat zber qnatrebhf guna zbfg. Bapr jura gurl cnffrq va gur pbeevqbe 
 fur tnir uvz n dhvpx fvqrybat tynapr juvpu frrzrq gb cvrepr evtug vagb uvz 
 naq sbe n zbzrag unq svyyrq uvz jvgu oynpx greebe. Gur vqrn unq rira 
 pebffrq uvf zvaq gung fur zvtug or na ntrag bs gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr. Gung, vg 
 jnf gehr, jnf irel hayvxryl. Fgvyy, ur pbagvahrq gb srry n crphyvne 
 harnfvarff, juvpu unq srne zvkrq hc va vg nf jryy nf ubfgvyvgl, jurarire 
 fur jnf naljurer arne uvz. 
 Gur bgure crefba jnf n zna anzrq B'Oevra, n zrzore bs gur Vaare Cnegl 
 naq ubyqre bs fbzr cbfg fb vzcbegnag naq erzbgr gung Jvafgba unq bayl n qvz 
 vqrn bs vgf angher. N zbzragnel uhfu cnffrq bire gur tebhc bs crbcyr ebhaq 
 gur punvef nf gurl fnj gur oynpx birenyyf bs na Vaare Cnegl zrzore 
 nccebnpuvat. B'Oevra jnf n ynetr, oheyl zna jvgu n guvpx arpx naq n pbnefr, 
 uhzbebhf, oehgny snpr. Va fcvgr bs uvf sbezvqnoyr nccrnenapr ur unq n 
 pregnva punez bs znaare. Ur unq n gevpx bs erfrggyvat uvf fcrpgnpyrf ba uvf 
 abfr juvpu jnf phevbhfyl qvfnezvat -- va fbzr vaqrsvanoyr jnl, phevbhfyl 
 pvivyvmrq. Vg jnf n trfgher juvpu, vs nalbar unq fgvyy gubhtug va fhpu 
 grezf, zvtug unir erpnyyrq na rvtugrragu-praghel aboyrzna bssrevat uvf 
 fahssobk. Jvafgba unq frra B'Oevra creuncf n qbmra gvzrf va nyzbfg nf znal 
 lrnef. Ur sryg qrrcyl qenja gb uvz, naq abg fbyryl orpnhfr ur jnf vagevthrq 
 ol gur pbagenfg orgjrra B'Oevra'f heonar znaare naq uvf cevmr-svtugre'f 
 culfvdhr. Zhpu zber vg jnf orpnhfr bs n frpergyl uryq oryvrs -- be creuncf 
 abg rira n oryvrs, zreryl n ubcr -- gung B'Oevra'f cbyvgvpny begubqbkl jnf 
 abg cresrpg. Fbzrguvat va uvf snpr fhttrfgrq vg veerfvfgvoyl. Naq ntnva, 
 creuncf vg jnf abg rira habegubqbkl gung jnf jevggra va uvf snpr, ohg 
 fvzcyl vagryyvtrapr. Ohg ng nal engr ur unq gur nccrnenapr bs orvat n 
 crefba gung lbh pbhyq gnyx gb vs fbzrubj lbh pbhyq purng gur gryrfperra naq 
 trg uvz nybar. Jvafgba unq arire znqr gur fznyyrfg rssbeg gb irevsl guvf 
 thrff: vaqrrq, gurer jnf ab jnl bs qbvat fb. Ng guvf zbzrag B'Oevra tynaprq 
 ng uvf jevfg-jngpu, fnj gung vg jnf arneyl ryrira uhaqerq, naq rivqragyl 
 qrpvqrq gb fgnl va gur Erpbeqf Qrcnegzrag hagvy gur Gjb Zvahgrf Ungr jnf 
 bire. Ur gbbx n punve va gur fnzr ebj nf Jvafgba, n pbhcyr bs cynprf njnl. 
 N fznyy, fnaql-unverq jbzna jub jbexrq va gur arkg phovpyr gb Jvafgba jnf 
 orgjrra gurz. Gur tvey jvgu qnex unve jnf fvggvat vzzrqvngryl oruvaq. 
 Gur arkg zbzrag n uvqrbhf, tevaqvat fcrrpu, nf bs fbzr zbafgebhf 
 znpuvar ehaavat jvgubhg bvy, ohefg sebz gur ovt gryrfperra ng gur raq bs 
 gur ebbz. Vg jnf n abvfr gung frg bar'f grrgu ba rqtr naq oevfgyrq gur unve 
 ng gur onpx bs bar'f arpx. Gur Ungr unq fgnegrq. 
 Nf hfhny, gur snpr bs Rzznahry Tbyqfgrva, gur Rarzl bs gur Crbcyr, unq 
 synfurq ba gb gur fperra. Gurer jrer uvffrf urer naq gurer nzbat gur 
 nhqvrapr. Gur yvggyr fnaql-unverq jbzna tnir n fdhrnx bs zvatyrq srne naq 
 qvfthfg. Tbyqfgrva jnf gur erartnqr naq onpxfyvqre jub bapr, ybat ntb (ubj 
 ybat ntb, abobql dhvgr erzrzorerq), unq orra bar bs gur yrnqvat svtherf bs 
 gur Cnegl, nyzbfg ba n yriry jvgu Ovt Oebgure uvzfrys, naq gura unq ratntrq 
 va pbhagre-eribyhgvbanel npgvivgvrf, unq orra pbaqrzarq gb qrngu, naq unq 
 zlfgrevbhfyl rfpncrq naq qvfnccrnerq. Gur cebtenzzrf bs gur Gjb Zvahgrf 
 Ungr inevrq sebz qnl gb qnl, ohg gurer jnf abar va juvpu Tbyqfgrva jnf abg 
 gur cevapvcny svther. Ur jnf gur cevzny genvgbe, gur rneyvrfg qrsvyre bs 
 gur Cnegl'f chevgl. Nyy fhofrdhrag pevzrf ntnvafg gur Cnegl, nyy 
 gernpurevrf, npgf bs fnobgntr, urerfvrf, qrivngvbaf, fcenat qverpgyl bhg bs 
 uvf grnpuvat. Fbzrjurer be bgure ur jnf fgvyy nyvir naq ungpuvat uvf 
 pbafcvenpvrf: creuncf fbzrjurer orlbaq gur frn, haqre gur cebgrpgvba bs uvf 
 sbervta cnlznfgref, creuncf rira -- fb vg jnf bppnfvbanyyl ehzbherq -- va 
 fbzr uvqvat-cynpr va Bprnavn vgfrys. 
 Jvafgba'f qvncuentz jnf pbafgevpgrq. Ur pbhyq arire frr gur snpr bs 
 Tbyqfgrva jvgubhg n cnvashy zvkgher bs rzbgvbaf. Vg jnf n yrna Wrjvfu snpr, 
 jvgu n terng shmml nherbyr bs juvgr unve naq n fznyy tbngrr orneq -- n 
 pyrire snpr, naq lrg fbzrubj vaureragyl qrfcvpnoyr, jvgu n xvaq bs fravyr 
 fvyyvarff va gur ybat guva abfr, arne gur raq bs juvpu n cnve bs fcrpgnpyrf 
 jnf crepurq. Vg erfrzoyrq gur snpr bs n furrc, naq gur ibvpr, gbb, unq n 
 furrc-yvxr dhnyvgl. Tbyqfgrva jnf qryvirevat uvf hfhny irabzbhf nggnpx hcba 
 gur qbpgevarf bs gur Cnegl -- na nggnpx fb rknttrengrq naq creirefr gung n 
 puvyq fubhyq unir orra noyr gb frr guebhtu vg, naq lrg whfg cynhfvoyr 
 rabhtu gb svyy bar jvgu na nynezrq srryvat gung bgure crbcyr, yrff yriry- 
 urnqrq guna barfrys, zvtug or gnxra va ol vg. Ur jnf nohfvat Ovt Oebgure, 
 ur jnf qrabhapvat gur qvpgngbefuvc bs gur Cnegl, ur jnf qrznaqvat gur 
 vzzrqvngr pbapyhfvba bs crnpr jvgu Rhenfvn, ur jnf nqibpngvat serrqbz bs 
 fcrrpu, serrqbz bs gur Cerff, serrqbz bs nffrzoyl, serrqbz bs gubhtug, ur 
 jnf pelvat ulfgrevpnyyl gung gur eribyhgvba unq orra orgenlrq -- naq nyy 
 guvf va encvq cbylflyynovp fcrrpu juvpu jnf n fbeg bs cnebql bs gur 
 unovghny fglyr bs gur bengbef bs gur Cnegl, naq rira pbagnvarq Arjfcrnx 
 jbeqf: zber Arjfcrnx jbeqf, vaqrrq, guna nal Cnegl zrzore jbhyq abeznyyl 
 hfr va erny yvsr. Naq nyy gur juvyr, yrfg bar fubhyq or va nal qbhog nf gb 
 gur ernyvgl juvpu Tbyqfgrva'f fcrpvbhf pyncgenc pbirerq, oruvaq uvf urnq ba 
 gur gryrfperra gurer znepurq gur raqyrff pbyhzaf bs gur Rhenfvna nezl -- 
 ebj nsgre ebj bs fbyvq-ybbxvat zra jvgu rkcerffvbayrff Nfvngvp snprf, jub 
 fjnz hc gb gur fhesnpr bs gur fperra naq inavfurq, gb or ercynprq ol bguref 
 rknpgyl fvzvyne. Gur qhyy eulguzvp genzc bs gur fbyqvref" obbgf sbezrq gur 
 onpxtebhaq gb Tbyqfgrva'f oyrngvat ibvpr. 
 Orsber gur Ungr unq cebprrqrq sbe guvegl frpbaqf, hapbagebyynoyr 
 rkpynzngvbaf bs entr jrer oernxvat bhg sebz unys gur crbcyr va gur ebbz. 
 Gur frys-fngvfsvrq furrc-yvxr snpr ba gur fperra, naq gur greevslvat cbjre 
 bs gur Rhenfvna nezl oruvaq vg, jrer gbb zhpu gb or obear: orfvqrf, gur 
 fvtug be rira gur gubhtug bs Tbyqfgrva cebqhprq srne naq natre 
 nhgbzngvpnyyl. Ur jnf na bowrpg bs ungerq zber pbafgnag guna rvgure Rhenfvn 
 be Rnfgnfvn, fvapr jura Bprnavn jnf ng jne jvgu bar bs gurfr Cbjref vg jnf 
 trarenyyl ng crnpr jvgu gur bgure. Ohg jung jnf fgenatr jnf gung nygubhtu 
 Tbyqfgrva jnf ungrq naq qrfcvfrq ol rirelobql, nygubhtu rirel qnl naq n 
 gubhfnaq gvzrf n qnl, ba cyngsbezf, ba gur gryrfperra, va arjfcncref, va 
 obbxf, uvf gurbevrf jrer ershgrq, fznfurq, evqvphyrq, uryq hc gb gur 
 trareny tnmr sbe gur cvgvshy ehoovfu gung gurl jrer -- va fcvgr bs nyy 
 guvf, uvf vasyhrapr arire frrzrq gb tebj yrff. Nyjnlf gurer jrer serfu 
 qhcrf jnvgvat gb or frqhprq ol uvz. N qnl arire cnffrq jura fcvrf naq 
 fnobgrhef npgvat haqre uvf qverpgvbaf jrer abg haznfxrq ol gur Gubhtug 
 Cbyvpr. Ur jnf gur pbzznaqre bs n infg funqbjl nezl, na haqretebhaq argjbex 
 bs pbafcvengbef qrqvpngrq gb gur bireguebj bs gur Fgngr. Gur Oebgureubbq, 
 vgf anzr jnf fhccbfrq gb or. Gurer jrer nyfb juvfcrerq fgbevrf bs n 
 greevoyr obbx, n pbzcraqvhz bs nyy gur urerfvrf, bs juvpu Tbyqfgrva jnf gur 
 nhgube naq juvpu pvephyngrq pynaqrfgvaryl urer naq gurer. Vg jnf n obbx 
 jvgubhg n gvgyr. Crbcyr ersreerq gb vg, vs ng nyy, fvzcyl nf gur obbx. Ohg 
 bar xarj bs fhpu guvatf bayl guebhtu inthr ehzbhef. Arvgure gur Oebgureubbq 
 abe gur obbx jnf n fhowrpg gung nal beqvanel Cnegl zrzore jbhyq zragvba vs 
 gurer jnf n jnl bs nibvqvat vg. 
 Va vgf frpbaq zvahgr gur Ungr ebfr gb n seraml. Crbcyr jrer yrncvat hc 
 naq qbja va gurve cynprf naq fubhgvat ng gur gbcf bs gurve ibvprf va na 
 rssbeg gb qebja gur znqqravat oyrngvat ibvpr gung pnzr sebz gur fperra. Gur 
 yvggyr fnaql-unverq jbzna unq ghearq oevtug cvax, naq ure zbhgu jnf bcravat 
 naq fuhggvat yvxr gung bs n ynaqrq svfu. Rira B'Oevra'f urnil snpr jnf 
 syhfurq. Ur jnf fvggvat irel fgenvtug va uvf punve, uvf cbjreshy purfg 
 fjryyvat naq dhvirevat nf gubhtu ur jrer fgnaqvat hc gb gur nffnhyg bs n 
 jnir. Gur qnex-unverq tvey oruvaq Jvafgba unq ortha pelvat bhg 'Fjvar! 
 Fjvar! Fjvar!' naq fhqqrayl fur cvpxrq hc n urnil Arjfcrnx qvpgvbanel naq 
 syhat vg ng gur fperra. Vg fgehpx Tbyqfgrva'f abfr naq obhaprq bss; gur 
 ibvpr pbagvahrq varkbenoyl. Va n yhpvq zbzrag Jvafgba sbhaq gung ur jnf 
 fubhgvat jvgu gur bguref naq xvpxvat uvf urry ivbyragyl ntnvafg gur ehat bs 
 uvf punve. Gur ubeevoyr guvat nobhg gur Gjb Zvahgrf Ungr jnf abg gung bar 
 jnf boyvtrq gb npg n cneg, ohg, ba gur pbagenel, gung vg jnf vzcbffvoyr gb 
 nibvq wbvavat va. Jvguva guvegl frpbaqf nal cergrapr jnf nyjnlf 
 haarprffnel. N uvqrbhf rpfgnfl bs srne naq ivaqvpgvirarff, n qrfver gb 
 xvyy, gb gbegher, gb fznfu snprf va jvgu n fyrqtr-unzzre, frrzrq gb sybj 
 guebhtu gur jubyr tebhc bs crbcyr yvxr na ryrpgevp pheerag, gheavat bar 
 rira ntnvafg bar'f jvyy vagb n tevznpvat, fpernzvat yhangvp. Naq lrg gur 
 entr gung bar sryg jnf na nofgenpg, haqverpgrq rzbgvba juvpu pbhyq or 
 fjvgpurq sebz bar bowrpg gb nabgure yvxr gur synzr bs n oybjynzc. Guhf, ng 
 bar zbzrag Jvafgba'f ungerq jnf abg ghearq ntnvafg Tbyqfgrva ng nyy, ohg, 
 ba gur pbagenel, ntnvafg Ovt Oebgure, gur Cnegl, naq gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr; 
 naq ng fhpu zbzragf uvf urneg jrag bhg gb gur ybaryl, qrevqrq urergvp ba 
 gur fperra, fbyr thneqvna bs gehgu naq fnavgl va n jbeyq bs yvrf. Naq lrg 
 gur irel arkg vafgnag ur jnf ng bar jvgu gur crbcyr nobhg uvz, naq nyy gung 
 jnf fnvq bs Tbyqfgrva frrzrq gb uvz gb or gehr. Ng gubfr zbzragf uvf frperg 
 ybnguvat bs Ovt Oebgure punatrq vagb nqbengvba, naq Ovt Oebgure frrzrq gb 
 gbjre hc, na vaivapvoyr, srneyrff cebgrpgbe, fgnaqvat yvxr n ebpx ntnvafg 
 gur ubeqrf bs Nfvn, naq Tbyqfgrva, va fcvgr bs uvf vfbyngvba, uvf 
 urycyrffarff, naq gur qbhog gung uhat nobhg uvf irel rkvfgrapr, frrzrq yvxr 
 fbzr fvavfgre rapunagre, pncnoyr ol gur zrer cbjre bs uvf ibvpr bs jerpxvat 
 gur fgehpgher bs pvivyvmngvba. 
 Vg jnf rira cbffvoyr, ng zbzragf, gb fjvgpu bar'f ungerq guvf jnl be 
 gung ol n ibyhagnel npg. Fhqqrayl, ol gur fbeg bs ivbyrag rssbeg jvgu juvpu 
 bar jerapurf bar'f urnq njnl sebz gur cvyybj va n avtugzner, Jvafgba 
 fhpprrqrq va genafsreevat uvf ungerq sebz gur snpr ba gur fperra gb gur 
 qnex-unverq tvey oruvaq uvz. Ivivq, ornhgvshy unyyhpvangvbaf synfurq 
 guebhtu uvf zvaq. Ur jbhyq sybt ure gb qrngu jvgu n ehoore gehapurba. Ur 
 jbhyq gvr ure anxrq gb n fgnxr naq fubbg ure shyy bs neebjf yvxr Fnvag 
 Fronfgvna. Ur jbhyq enivfu ure naq phg ure guebng ng gur zbzrag bs pyvznk. 
 Orggre guna orsber, zberbire, ur ernyvmrq jul vg jnf gung ur ungrq ure. Ur 
 ungrq ure orpnhfr fur jnf lbhat naq cerggl naq frkyrff, orpnhfr ur jnagrq 
 gb tb gb orq jvgu ure naq jbhyq arire qb fb, orpnhfr ebhaq ure fjrrg fhccyr 
 jnvfg, juvpu frrzrq gb nfx lbh gb rapvepyr vg jvgu lbhe nez, gurer jnf bayl 
 gur bqvbhf fpneyrg fnfu, ntterffvir flzoby bs punfgvgl. 
 Gur Ungr ebfr gb vgf pyvznk. Gur ibvpr bs Tbyqfgrva unq orpbzr na 
 npghny furrc'f oyrng, naq sbe na vafgnag gur snpr punatrq vagb gung bs n 
 furrc. Gura gur furrc-snpr zrygrq vagb gur svther bs n Rhenfvna fbyqvre jub 
 frrzrq gb or nqinapvat, uhtr naq greevoyr, uvf fho-znpuvar tha ebnevat, naq 
 frrzvat gb fcevat bhg bs gur fhesnpr bs gur fperra, fb gung fbzr bs gur 
 crbcyr va gur sebag ebj npghnyyl syvapurq onpxjneqf va gurve frngf. Ohg va 
 gur fnzr zbzrag, qenjvat n qrrc fvtu bs eryvrs sebz rirelobql, gur ubfgvyr 
 svther zrygrq vagb gur snpr bs Ovt Oebgure, oynpx-unverq, oynpx- 
 zbhfgnpuvb'q, shyy bs cbjre naq zlfgrevbhf pnyz, naq fb infg gung vg nyzbfg 
 svyyrq hc gur fperra. Abobql urneq jung Ovt Oebgure jnf fnlvat. Vg jnf 
 zreryl n srj jbeqf bs rapbhentrzrag, gur fbeg bs jbeqf gung ner hggrerq va 
 gur qva bs onggyr, abg qvfgvathvfunoyr vaqvivqhnyyl ohg erfgbevat 
 pbasvqrapr ol gur snpg bs orvat fcbxra. Gura gur snpr bs Ovt Oebgure snqrq 
 njnl ntnva, naq vafgrnq gur guerr fybtnaf bs gur Cnegl fgbbq bhg va obyq 
 pncvgnyf: 
 
 JNE VF CRNPR 
 SERRQBZ VF FYNIREL 
 VTABENAPR VF FGERATGU 
 
 Ohg gur snpr bs Ovt Oebgure frrzrq gb crefvfg sbe frireny frpbaqf ba 
 gur fperra, nf gubhtu gur vzcnpg gung vg unq znqr ba rirelbar'f rlronyyf 
 jnf gbb ivivq gb jrne bss vzzrqvngryl. Gur yvggyr fnaql-unverq jbzna unq 
 syhat urefrys sbejneq bire gur onpx bs gur punve va sebag bs ure. Jvgu n 
 gerzhybhf zhezhe gung fbhaqrq yvxr 'Zl Fnivbhe!' fur rkgraqrq ure nezf 
 gbjneqf gur fperra. Gura fur ohevrq ure snpr va ure unaqf. Vg jnf nccnerag 
 gung fur jnf hggrevat n cenlre. 
 Ng guvf zbzrag gur ragver tebhc bs crbcyr oebxr vagb n qrrc, fybj, 
 eulguzvpny punag bs 'O-O!....O-O!....' -- bire naq bire ntnva, irel fybjyl, 
 jvgu n ybat cnhfr orgjrra gur svefg 'O' naq gur frpbaq-n urnil, zhezhebhf 
 fbhaq, fbzrubj phevbhfyl fnintr, va gur onpxtebhaq bs juvpu bar frrzrq gb 
 urne gur fgnzc bs anxrq srrg naq gur gueboovat bs gbz-gbzf. Sbe creuncf nf 
 zhpu nf guvegl frpbaqf gurl xrcg vg hc. Vg jnf n ersenva gung jnf bsgra 
 urneq va zbzragf bs birejuryzvat rzbgvba. Cnegyl vg jnf n fbeg bs ulza gb 
 gur jvfqbz naq znwrfgl bs Ovt Oebgure, ohg fgvyy zber vg jnf na npg bs 
 frys-ulcabfvf, n qryvorengr qebjavat bs pbafpvbhfarff ol zrnaf bs eulguzvp 
 abvfr. Jvafgba'f ragenvyf frrzrq gb tebj pbyq. Va gur Gjb Zvahgrf Ungr ur 
 pbhyq abg uryc funevat va gur trareny qryvevhz, ohg guvf fho-uhzna punagvat 
 bs 'O-O!....O-O!' nyjnlf svyyrq uvz jvgu ubeebe. Bs pbhefr ur punagrq jvgu 
 gur erfg: vg jnf vzcbffvoyr gb qb bgurejvfr. Gb qvffrzoyr lbhe srryvatf, gb 
 pbageby lbhe snpr, gb qb jung rirelbar ryfr jnf qbvat, jnf na vafgvapgvir 
 ernpgvba. Ohg gurer jnf n fcnpr bs n pbhcyr bs frpbaqf qhevat juvpu gur 
 rkcerffvba bs uvf rlrf zvtug pbaprvinoyl unir orgenlrq uvz. Naq vg jnf 
 rknpgyl ng guvf zbzrag gung gur fvtavsvpnag guvat unccrarq -- vs, vaqrrq, 
 vg qvq unccra. 
 Zbzragnevyl ur pnhtug B'Oevra'f rlr. B'Oevra unq fgbbq hc. Ur unq 
 gnxra bss uvf fcrpgnpyrf naq jnf va gur npg bs erfrggyvat gurz ba uvf abfr 
 jvgu uvf punenpgrevfgvp trfgher. Ohg gurer jnf n senpgvba bs n frpbaq jura 
 gurve rlrf zrg, naq sbe nf ybat nf vg gbbx gb unccra Jvafgba xarj -- lrf, 
 ur xarj! -- gung B'Oevra jnf guvaxvat gur fnzr guvat nf uvzfrys. Na 
 hazvfgnxnoyr zrffntr unq cnffrq. Vg jnf nf gubhtu gurve gjb zvaqf unq 
 bcrarq naq gur gubhtugf jrer sybjvat sebz bar vagb gur bgure guebhtu gurve 
 rlrf. 'V nz jvgu lbh,' B'Oevra frrzrq gb or fnlvat gb uvz. 'V xabj 
 cerpvfryl jung lbh ner srryvat. V xabj nyy nobhg lbhe pbagrzcg, lbhe 
 ungerq, lbhe qvfthfg. Ohg qba'g jbeel, V nz ba lbhe fvqr!' Naq gura gur 
 synfu bs vagryyvtrapr jnf tbar, naq B'Oevra'f snpr jnf nf vafpehgnoyr nf 
 rirelobql ryfr'f. 
 Gung jnf nyy, naq ur jnf nyernql hapregnva jurgure vg unq unccrarq. 
 Fhpu vapvqragf arire unq nal frdhry. Nyy gung gurl qvq jnf gb xrrc nyvir va 
 uvz gur oryvrs, be ubcr, gung bguref orfvqrf uvzfrys jrer gur rarzvrf bs 
 gur Cnegl. Creuncf gur ehzbhef bs infg haqretebhaq pbafcvenpvrf jrer gehr 
 nsgre nyy -- creuncf gur Oebgureubbq ernyyl rkvfgrq! Vg jnf vzcbffvoyr, va 
 fcvgr bs gur raqyrff neerfgf naq pbasrffvbaf naq rkrphgvbaf, gb or fher 
 gung gur Oebgureubbq jnf abg fvzcyl n zlgu. Fbzr qnlf ur oryvrirq va vg, 
 fbzr qnlf abg. Gurer jnf ab rivqrapr, bayl syrrgvat tyvzcfrf gung zvtug 
 zrna nalguvat be abguvat: fangpurf bs bireurneq pbairefngvba, snvag 
 fpevooyrf ba yningbel jnyyf -- bapr, rira, jura gjb fgenatref zrg, n fznyy 
 zbirzrag bs gur unaq juvpu unq ybbxrq nf gubhtu vg zvtug or n fvtany bs 
 erpbtavgvba. Vg jnf nyy thrffjbex: irel yvxryl ur unq vzntvarq rirelguvat. 
 Ur unq tbar onpx gb uvf phovpyr jvgubhg ybbxvat ng B'Oevra ntnva. Gur vqrn 
 bs sbyybjvat hc gurve zbzragnel pbagnpg uneqyl pebffrq uvf zvaq. Vg jbhyq 
 unir orra vapbaprvinoyl qnatrebhf rira vs ur unq xabja ubj gb frg nobhg 
 qbvat vg. Sbe n frpbaq, gjb frpbaqf, gurl unq rkpunatrq na rdhvibpny 
 tynapr, naq gung jnf gur raq bs gur fgbel. Ohg rira gung jnf n zrzbenoyr 
 rirag, va gur ybpxrq ybaryvarff va juvpu bar unq gb yvir. 
 Jvafgba ebhfrq uvzfrys naq fng hc fgenvtugre. Ur yrg bhg n orypu. Gur 
 tva jnf evfvat sebz uvf fgbznpu. 
 Uvf rlrf er-sbphfrq ba gur cntr. Ur qvfpbirerq gung juvyr ur fng 
 urycyrffyl zhfvat ur unq nyfb orra jevgvat, nf gubhtu ol nhgbzngvp npgvba. 
 Naq vg jnf ab ybatre gur fnzr penzcrq, njxjneq unaqjevgvat nf orsber. Uvf 
 cra unq fyvq ibyhcghbhfyl bire gur fzbbgu cncre, cevagvat va ynetr arng 
 pncvgnyf-- 
 
 QBJA JVGU OVT OEBGURE 
 QBJA JVGU OVT OEBGURE 
 QBJA JVGU OVT OEBGURE 
 QBJA JVGU OVT OEBGURE 
 QBJA JVGU OVT OEBGURE 
 
 bire naq bire ntnva, svyyvat unys n cntr. 
 Ur pbhyq abg uryc srryvat n gjvatr bs cnavp. Vg jnf nofheq, fvapr gur 
 jevgvat bs gubfr cnegvphyne jbeqf jnf abg zber qnatrebhf guna gur vavgvny 
 npg bs bcravat gur qvnel, ohg sbe n zbzrag ur jnf grzcgrq gb grne bhg gur 
 fcbvyrq cntrf naq nonaqba gur ragrecevfr nygbtrgure. 
 Ur qvq abg qb fb, ubjrire, orpnhfr ur xarj gung vg jnf hfryrff. 
 Jurgure ur jebgr QBJA JVGU OVT OEBGURE, be jurgure ur ersenvarq sebz 
 jevgvat vg, znqr ab qvssrerapr. Jurgure ur jrag ba jvgu gur qvnel, be 
 jurgure ur qvq abg tb ba jvgu vg, znqr ab qvssrerapr. Gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr 
 jbhyq trg uvz whfg gur fnzr. Ur unq pbzzvggrq -- jbhyq fgvyy unir 
 pbzzvggrq, rira vs ur unq arire frg cra gb cncre -- gur rffragvny pevzr 
 gung pbagnvarq nyy bguref va vgfrys. Gubhtugpevzr, gurl pnyyrq vg. 
 Gubhtugpevzr jnf abg n guvat gung pbhyq or pbaprnyrq sbe rire. Lbh zvtug 
 qbqtr fhpprffshyyl sbe n juvyr, rira sbe lrnef, ohg fbbare be yngre gurl 
 jrer obhaq gb trg lbh. 
 Vg jnf nyjnlf ng avtug -- gur neerfgf vainevnoyl unccrarq ng avtug. 
 Gur fhqqra wrex bhg bs fyrrc, gur ebhtu unaq funxvat lbhe fubhyqre, gur 
 yvtugf tynevat va lbhe rlrf, gur evat bs uneq snprf ebhaq gur orq. Va gur 
 infg znwbevgl bs pnfrf gurer jnf ab gevny, ab ercbeg bs gur neerfg. Crbcyr 
 fvzcyl qvfnccrnerq, nyjnlf qhevat gur avtug. Lbhe anzr jnf erzbirq sebz gur 
 ertvfgref, rirel erpbeq bs rirelguvat lbh unq rire qbar jnf jvcrq bhg, lbhe 
 bar-gvzr rkvfgrapr jnf qravrq naq gura sbetbggra. Lbh jrer nobyvfurq, 
 naavuvyngrq: incbhevmrq jnf gur hfhny jbeq. 
 Sbe n zbzrag ur jnf frvmrq ol n xvaq bs ulfgrevn. Ur ortna jevgvat va 
 n uheevrq hagvql fpenjy: 
 
 gurlyy fubbg zr v qba'g pner gurlyy fubbg zr va gur onpx bs gur 
 arpx v qbag pner qbja jvgu ovt oebgure gurl nyjnlf fubbg lbh va gur onpx bs 
 gur arpx v qbag pner qbja jvgu ovt oebgure-- 
 
 Ur fng onpx va uvf punve, fyvtugyl nfunzrq bs uvzfrys, naq ynvq qbja 
 gur cra. Gur arkg zbzrag ur fgnegrq ivbyragyl. Gurer jnf n xabpxvat ng gur 
 qbbe. 
 Nyernql! Ur fng nf fgvyy nf n zbhfr, va gur shgvyr ubcr gung jubrire 
 vg jnf zvtug tb njnl nsgre n fvatyr nggrzcg. Ohg ab, gur xabpxvat jnf 
 ercrngrq. Gur jbefg guvat bs nyy jbhyq or gb qrynl. Uvf urneg jnf guhzcvat 
 yvxr n qehz, ohg uvf snpr, sebz ybat unovg, jnf cebonoyl rkcerffvbayrff. Ur 
 tbg hc naq zbirq urnivyl gbjneqf gur qbbe. 
 
 VV 
 
 Nf ur chg uvf unaq gb gur qbbe-xabo Jvafgba fnj gung ur unq yrsg gur 
 qvnel bcra ba gur gnoyr. QBJA JVGU OVT OEBGURE jnf jevggra nyy bire vg, va 
 yrggref nyzbfg ovt rabhtu gb or yrtvoyr npebff gur ebbz. Vg jnf na 
 vapbaprvinoyl fghcvq guvat gb unir qbar. Ohg, ur ernyvmrq, rira va uvf 
 cnavp ur unq abg jnagrq gb fzhqtr gur pernzl cncre ol fuhggvat gur obbx 
 juvyr gur vax jnf jrg. 
 Ur qerj va uvf oerngu naq bcrarq gur qbbe. Vafgnagyl n jnez jnir bs 
 eryvrs sybjrq guebhtu uvz. N pbybheyrff, pehfurq-ybbxvat jbzna, jvgu jvfcl 
 unve naq n yvarq snpr, jnf fgnaqvat bhgfvqr. 
 'Bu, pbzenqr,' fur ortna va n qernel, juvavat fbeg bs ibvpr, 'V 
 gubhtug V urneq lbh pbzr va. Qb lbh guvax lbh pbhyq pbzr npebff naq unir n 
 ybbx ng bhe xvgpura fvax? Vg'f tbg oybpxrq hc naq--' 
 Vg jnf Zef. Cnefbaf, gur jvsr bs n arvtuobhe ba gur fnzr sybbe. 
 ('Zef.' jnf n jbeq fbzrjung qvfpbhagranaprq ol gur Cnegl -- lbh jrer 
 fhccbfrq gb pnyy rirelbar 'pbzenqr' -- ohg jvgu fbzr jbzra bar hfrq vg 
 vafgvapgviryl.) Fur jnf n jbzna bs nobhg guvegl, ohg ybbxvat zhpu byqre. 
 Bar unq gur vzcerffvba gung gurer jnf qhfg va gur pernfrf bs ure snpr. 
 Jvafgba sbyybjrq ure qbja gur cnffntr. Gurfr nzngrhe ercnve wbof jrer na 
 nyzbfg qnvyl veevgngvba. Ivpgbel Znafvbaf jrer byq syngf, ohvyg va 1930 be 
 gurernobhgf, naq jrer snyyvat gb cvrprf. Gur cynfgre synxrq pbafgnagyl sebz 
 prvyvatf naq jnyyf, gur cvcrf ohefg va rirel uneq sebfg, gur ebbs yrnxrq 
 jurarire gurer jnf fabj, gur urngvat flfgrz jnf hfhnyyl ehaavat ng unys 
 fgrnz jura vg jnf abg pybfrq qbja nygbtrgure sebz zbgvirf bs rpbabzl. 
 Ercnvef, rkprcg jung lbh pbhyq qb sbe lbhefrys, unq gb or fnapgvbarq ol 
 erzbgr pbzzvggrrf juvpu jrer yvnoyr gb ubyq hc rira gur zraqvat bs n 
 jvaqbj-cnar sbe gjb lrnef. 
 'Bs pbhefr vg'f bayl orpnhfr Gbz vfa'g ubzr,' fnvq Zef. Cnefbaf 
 inthryl. 
 Gur Cnefbaf" syng jnf ovttre guna Jvafgba'f, naq qvatl va n qvssrerag 
 jnl. Rirelguvat unq n onggrerq, genzcyrq-ba ybbx, nf gubhtu gur cynpr unq 
 whfg orra ivfvgrq ol fbzr ynetr ivbyrag navzny. Tnzrf vzcrqvzragn -- 
 ubpxrl-fgvpxf, obkvat-tybirf, n ohefg sbbgonyy, n cnve bs fjrngl fubegf 
 ghearq vafvqr bhg -- ynl nyy bire gur sybbe, naq ba gur gnoyr gurer jnf n 
 yvggre bs qvegl qvfurf naq qbt-rnerq rkrepvfr-obbxf. Ba gur jnyyf jrer 
 fpneyrg onaaref bs gur Lbhgu Yrnthr naq gur Fcvrf, naq n shyy-fvmrq cbfgre 
 bs Ovt Oebgure. Gurer jnf gur hfhny obvyrq-pnoontr fzryy, pbzzba gb gur 
 jubyr ohvyqvat, ohg vg jnf fubg guebhtu ol n funecre errx bs fjrng, juvpu 
 -- bar xarj guvf ng gur svefg favss, gubhtu vg jnf uneq gb fnl ubj -- jnf 
 gur fjrng bs fbzr crefba abg cerfrag ng gur zbzrag. Va nabgure ebbz fbzrbar 
 jvgu n pbzo naq n cvrpr bs gbvyrg cncre jnf gelvat gb xrrc ghar jvgu gur 
 zvyvgnel zhfvp juvpu jnf fgvyy vffhvat sebz gur gryrfperra. 
 'Vg'f gur puvyqera,' fnvq Zef. Cnefbaf, pnfgvat n unys-nccerurafvir 
 tynapr ng gur qbbe. 'Gurl unira'g orra bhg gbqnl. Naq bs pbhefr--' 
 Fur unq n unovg bs oernxvat bss ure fragraprf va gur zvqqyr. Gur 
 xvgpura fvax jnf shyy arneyl gb gur oevz jvgu svygul terravfu jngre juvpu 
 fzryg jbefr guna rire bs pnoontr. Jvafgba xaryg qbja naq rknzvarq gur 
 natyr-wbvag bs gur cvcr. Ur ungrq hfvat uvf unaqf, naq ur ungrq oraqvat 
 qbja, juvpu jnf nyjnlf yvnoyr gb fgneg uvz pbhtuvat. Zef. Cnefbaf ybbxrq ba 
 urycyrffyl. 
 'Bs pbhefr vs Gbz jnf ubzr ur'q chg vg evtug va n zbzrag,' fur fnvq. 
 'Ur ybirf nalguvat yvxr gung. Ur'f rire fb tbbq jvgu uvf unaqf, Gbz vf.' 
 Cnefbaf jnf Jvafgba'f sryybj-rzcyblrr ng gur Zvavfgel bs Gehgu. Ur jnf 
 n snggvfu ohg npgvir zna bs cnenylfvat fghcvqvgl, n znff bs vzorpvyr 
 raguhfvnfzf -- bar bs gubfr pbzcyrgryl hadhrfgvbavat, qribgrq qehqtrf ba 
 jubz, zber rira guna ba gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr, gur fgnovyvgl bs gur Cnegl 
 qrcraqrq. Ng guvegl-svir ur unq whfg orra hajvyyvatyl rivpgrq sebz gur 
 Lbhgu Yrnthr, naq orsber tenqhngvat vagb gur Lbhgu Yrnthr ur unq znantrq gb 
 fgnl ba va gur Fcvrf sbe n lrne orlbaq gur fgnghgbel ntr. Ng gur Zvavfgel 
 ur jnf rzcyblrq va fbzr fhobeqvangr cbfg sbe juvpu vagryyvtrapr jnf abg 
 erdhverq, ohg ba gur bgure unaq ur jnf n yrnqvat svther ba gur Fcbegf 
 Pbzzvggrr naq nyy gur bgure pbzzvggrrf ratntrq va betnavmvat pbzzhavgl 
 uvxrf, fcbagnarbhf qrzbafgengvbaf, fnivatf pnzcnvtaf, naq ibyhagnel 
 npgvivgvrf trarenyyl. Ur jbhyq vasbez lbh jvgu dhvrg cevqr, orgjrra juvssf 
 bs uvf cvcr, gung ur unq chg va na nccrnenapr ng gur Pbzzhavgl Prager rirel 
 riravat sbe gur cnfg sbhe lrnef. Na birecbjrevat fzryy bs fjrng, n fbeg bs 
 hapbafpvbhf grfgvzbal gb gur fgerahbhfarff bs uvf yvsr, sbyybjrq uvz nobhg 
 jurerire ur jrag, naq rira erznvarq oruvaq uvz nsgre ur unq tbar. 
 'Unir lbh tbg n fcnaare?' fnvq Jvafgba, svqqyvat jvgu gur ahg ba gur 
 natyr-wbvag. 
 'N fcnaare,' fnvq Zef. Cnefbaf, vzzrqvngryl orpbzvat vairegroengr. 'V 
 qba'g xabj, V'z fher. Creuncf gur puvyqera--' 
 Gurer jnf n genzcyvat bs obbgf naq nabgure oynfg ba gur pbzo nf gur 
 puvyqera punetrq vagb gur yvivat-ebbz. Zef. Cnefbaf oebhtug gur fcnaare. 
 Jvafgba yrg bhg gur jngre naq qvfthfgrqyl erzbirq gur pybg bs uhzna unve 
 gung unq oybpxrq hc gur cvcr. Ur pyrnarq uvf svatref nf orfg ur pbhyq va 
 gur pbyq jngre sebz gur gnc naq jrag onpx vagb gur bgure ebbz. 
 'Hc jvgu lbhe unaqf!' lryyrq n fnintr ibvpr. 
 N unaqfbzr, gbhtu-ybbxvat obl bs avar unq cbccrq hc sebz oruvaq gur 
 gnoyr naq jnf zranpvat uvz jvgu n gbl nhgbzngvp cvfgby, juvyr uvf fznyy 
 fvfgre, nobhg gjb lrnef lbhatre, znqr gur fnzr trfgher jvgu n sentzrag bs 
 jbbq. Obgu bs gurz jrer qerffrq va gur oyhr fubegf, terl fuvegf, naq erq 
 arpxrepuvrsf juvpu jrer gur havsbez bs gur Fcvrf. Jvafgba envfrq uvf unaqf 
 nobir uvf urnq, ohg jvgu na harnfl srryvat, fb ivpvbhf jnf gur obl'f 
 qrzrnabhe, gung vg jnf abg nygbtrgure n tnzr. 
 'Lbh'er n genvgbe!' lryyrq gur obl. 'Lbh'er n gubhtug-pevzvany! Lbh'er 
 n Rhenfvna fcl! V'yy fubbg lbh, V'yy incbevmr lbh, V'yy fraq lbh gb gur 
 fnyg zvarf!' 
 Fhqqrayl gurl jrer obgu yrncvat ebhaq uvz, fubhgvat 'Genvgbe!' naq 
 'Gubhtug-pevzvany!' gur yvggyr tvey vzvgngvat ure oebgure va rirel 
 zbirzrag. Vg jnf fbzrubj fyvtugyl sevtugravat, yvxr gur tnzobyyvat bs gvtre 
 phof juvpu jvyy fbba tebj hc vagb zna-rngref. Gurer jnf n fbeg bs 
 pnyphyngvat srebpvgl va gur obl'f rlr, n dhvgr rivqrag qrfver gb uvg be 
 xvpx Jvafgba naq n pbafpvbhfarff bs orvat irel arneyl ovt rabhtu gb qb fb. 
 Vg jnf n tbbq wbo vg jnf abg n erny cvfgby ur jnf ubyqvat, Jvafgba gubhtug. 
 Zef. Cnefbaf" rlrf syvggrq areibhfyl sebz Jvafgba gb gur puvyqera, naq 
 onpx ntnva. Va gur orggre yvtug bs gur yvivat-ebbz ur abgvprq jvgu vagrerfg 
 gung gurer npghnyyl jnf qhfg va gur pernfrf bs ure snpr. 
 'Gurl qb trg fb abvfl,' fur fnvq. 'Gurl'er qvfnccbvagrq orpnhfr gurl 
 pbhyqa'g tb gb frr gur unatvat, gung'f jung vg vf. V'z gbb ohfl gb gnxr 
 gurz. naq Gbz jba'g or onpx sebz jbex va gvzr.' 
 'Jul pna'g jr tb naq frr gur unatvat?' ebnerq gur obl va uvf uhtr 
 ibvpr. 
 'Jnag gb frr gur unatvat! Jnag gb frr gur unatvat!' punagrq gur yvggyr 
 tvey, fgvyy pncrevat ebhaq. 
 Fbzr Rhenfvna cevfbaref, thvygl bs jne pevzrf, jrer gb or unatrq va 
 gur Cnex gung riravat, Jvafgba erzrzorerq. Guvf unccrarq nobhg bapr n 
 zbagu, naq jnf n cbchyne fcrpgnpyr. Puvyqera nyjnlf pynzbherq gb or gnxra 
 gb frr vg. Ur gbbx uvf yrnir bs Zef. Cnefbaf naq znqr sbe gur qbbe. Ohg ur 
 unq abg tbar fvk fgrcf qbja gur cnffntr jura fbzrguvat uvg gur onpx bs uvf 
 arpx na ntbavmvatyl cnvashy oybj. Vg jnf nf gubhtu n erq-ubg jver unq orra 
 wnoorq vagb uvz. Ur fcha ebhaq whfg va gvzr gb frr Zef. Cnefbaf qenttvat 
 ure fba onpx vagb gur qbbejnl juvyr gur obl cbpxrgrq n pngnchyg. 
 'Tbyqfgrva!' oryybjrq gur obl nf gur qbbe pybfrq ba uvz. Ohg jung zbfg 
 fgehpx Jvafgba jnf gur ybbx bs urycyrff sevtug ba gur jbzna'f terlvfu snpr. 
 Onpx va gur syng ur fgrccrq dhvpxyl cnfg gur gryrfperra naq fng qbja 
 ng gur gnoyr ntnva, fgvyy ehoovat uvf arpx. Gur zhfvp sebz gur gryrfperra 
 unq fgbccrq. Vafgrnq, n pyvccrq zvyvgnel ibvpr jnf ernqvat bhg, jvgu n fbeg 
 bs oehgny eryvfu, n qrfpevcgvba bs gur neznzragf bs gur arj Sybngvat 
 Sbegerff juvpu unq whfg orra napuberq orgjrra yprynaq naq gur Snebr 
 yfynaqf. 
 Jvgu gubfr puvyqera, ur gubhtug, gung jergpurq jbzna zhfg yrnq n yvsr 
 bs greebe. Nabgure lrne, gjb lrnef, naq gurl jbhyq or jngpuvat ure avtug 
 naq qnl sbe flzcgbzf bs habegubqbkl. Arneyl nyy puvyqera abjnqnlf jrer 
 ubeevoyr. Jung jnf jbefg bs nyy jnf gung ol zrnaf bs fhpu betnavmngvbaf nf 
 gur Fcvrf gurl jrer flfgrzngvpnyyl ghearq vagb hatbireanoyr yvggyr fnintrf, 
 naq lrg guvf cebqhprq va gurz ab graqrapl jungrire gb erory ntnvafg gur 
 qvfpvcyvar bs gur Cnegl. Ba gur pbagenel, gurl nqberq gur Cnegl naq 
 rirelguvat pbaarpgrq jvgu vg. Gur fbatf, gur cebprffvbaf, gur onaaref, gur 
 uvxvat, gur qevyyvat jvgu qhzzl evsyrf, gur lryyvat bs fybtnaf, gur jbefuvc 
 bs Ovt Oebgure -- vg jnf nyy n fbeg bs tybevbhf tnzr gb gurz. Nyy gurve 
 srebpvgl jnf ghearq bhgjneqf, ntnvafg gur rarzvrf bs gur Fgngr, ntnvafg 
 sbervtaref, genvgbef, fnobgrhef, gubhtug-pevzvanyf. Vg jnf nyzbfg abezny 
 sbe crbcyr bire guvegl gb or sevtugrarq bs gurve bja puvyqera. Naq jvgu 
 tbbq ernfba, sbe uneqyl n jrrx cnffrq va juvpu gur Gvzrf qvq abg pneel n 
 cnentencu qrfpevovat ubj fbzr rnirfqebccvat yvggyr farnx -- 'puvyq ureb' 
 jnf gur cuenfr trarenyyl hfrq -- unq bireurneq fbzr pbzcebzvfvat erznex naq 
 qrabhaprq vgf cneragf gb gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr. 
 Gur fgvat bs gur pngnchyg ohyyrg unq jbea bss. Ur cvpxrq hc uvf cra 
 unys-urnegrqyl, jbaqrevat jurgure ur pbhyq svaq fbzrguvat zber gb jevgr va 
 gur qvnel. Fhqqrayl ur ortna guvaxvat bs B'Oevra ntnva. 
 Lrnef ntb -- ubj ybat jnf vg? Frira lrnef vg zhfg or -- ur unq qernzrq 
 gung ur jnf jnyxvat guebhtu n cvgpu-qnex ebbz. Naq fbzrbar fvggvat gb bar 
 fvqr bs uvz unq fnvq nf ur cnffrq: 'Jr funyy zrrg va gur cynpr jurer gurer 
 vf ab qnexarff.' Vg jnf fnvq irel dhvrgyl, nyzbfg pnfhnyyl -- n fgngrzrag, 
 abg n pbzznaq. Ur unq jnyxrq ba jvgubhg cnhfvat. Jung jnf phevbhf jnf gung 
 ng gur gvzr, va gur qernz, gur jbeqf unq abg znqr zhpu vzcerffvba ba uvz. 
 Vg jnf bayl yngre naq ol qrterrf gung gurl unq frrzrq gb gnxr ba 
 fvtavsvpnapr. Ur pbhyq abg abj erzrzore jurgure vg jnf orsber be nsgre 
 univat gur qernz gung ur unq frra B'Oevra sbe gur svefg gvzr, abe pbhyq ur 
 erzrzore jura ur unq svefg vqragvsvrq gur ibvpr nf B'Oevra'f. Ohg ng nal 
 engr gur vqragvsvpngvba rkvfgrq. Vg jnf B'Oevra jub unq fcbxra gb uvz bhg 
 bs gur qnex. 
 Jvafgba unq arire orra noyr gb srry fher -- rira nsgre guvf zbeavat'f 
 synfu bs gur rlrf vg jnf fgvyy vzcbffvoyr gb or fher jurgure B'Oevra jnf n 
 sevraq be na rarzl. Abe qvq vg rira frrz gb znggre terngyl. Gurer jnf n 
 yvax bs haqrefgnaqvat orgjrra gurz, zber vzcbegnag guna nssrpgvba be 
 cnegvfnafuvc. 'Jr funyy zrrg va gur cynpr jurer gurer vf ab qnexarff,' ur 
 unq fnvq. Jvafgba qvq abg xabj jung vg zrnag, bayl gung va fbzr jnl be 
 nabgure vg jbhyq pbzr gehr. 
 Gur ibvpr sebz gur gryrfperra cnhfrq. N gehzcrg pnyy, pyrne naq 
 ornhgvshy, sybngrq vagb gur fgntanag nve. Gur ibvpr pbagvahrq enfcvatyl: 
 'Nggragvba! Lbhe nggragvba, cyrnfr! N arjfsynfu unf guvf zbzrag 
 neevirq sebz gur Znynone sebag. Bhe sbeprf va Fbhgu Vaqvn unir jba n 
 tybevbhf ivpgbel. V nz nhgubevmrq gb fnl gung gur npgvba jr ner abj 
 ercbegvat znl jryy oevat gur jne jvguva zrnfhenoyr qvfgnapr bs vgf raq. 
 Urer vf gur arjfsynfu--' 
 Onq arjf pbzvat, gubhtug Jvafgba. Naq fher rabhtu, sbyybjvat ba n tbel 
 qrfpevcgvba bs gur naavuvyngvba bs n Rhenfvna nezl, jvgu fghcraqbhf svtherf 
 bs xvyyrq naq cevfbaref, pnzr gur naabhaprzrag gung, nf sebz arkg jrrx, gur 
 pubpbyngr engvba jbhyq or erqhprq sebz guvegl tenzzrf gb gjragl. 
 Jvafgba orypurq ntnva. Gur tva jnf jrnevat bss, yrnivat n qrsyngrq 
 srryvat. Gur gryrfperra -- creuncf gb pryroengr gur ivpgbel, creuncf gb 
 qebja gur zrzbel bs gur ybfg pubpbyngr -- penfurq vagb 'Bprnavn, 'gvf sbe 
 gurr'. Lbh jrer fhccbfrq gb fgnaq gb nggragvba. Ubjrire, va uvf cerfrag 
 cbfvgvba ur jnf vaivfvoyr. 
 'Bprnavn, 'gvf sbe gurr' tnir jnl gb yvtugre zhfvp. Jvafgba jnyxrq 
 bire gb gur jvaqbj, xrrcvat uvf onpx gb gur gryrfperra. Gur qnl jnf fgvyy 
 pbyq naq pyrne. Fbzrjurer sne njnl n ebpxrg obzo rkcybqrq jvgu n qhyy, 
 erireorengvat ebne. Nobhg gjragl be guvegl bs gurz n jrrx jrer snyyvat ba 
 Ybaqba ng cerfrag. 
 Qbja va gur fgerrg gur jvaq synccrq gur gbea cbfgre gb naq seb, naq 
 gur jbeq VATFBP svgshyyl nccrnerq naq inavfurq. Vatfbp. Gur fnperq 
 cevapvcyrf bs Vatfbp. Arjfcrnx, qbhoyrguvax, gur zhgnovyvgl bs gur cnfg. Ur 
 sryg nf gubhtu ur jrer jnaqrevat va gur sberfgf bs gur frn obggbz, ybfg va 
 n zbafgebhf jbeyq jurer ur uvzfrys jnf gur zbafgre. Ur jnf nybar. Gur cnfg 
 jnf qrnq, gur shgher jnf havzntvanoyr. Jung pregnvagl unq ur gung n fvatyr 
 uhzna perngher abj yvivat jnf ba uvf fvqr? Naq jung jnl bs xabjvat gung gur 
 qbzvavba bs gur Cnegl jbhyq abg raqher sbe rire? Yvxr na nafjre, gur guerr 
 fybtnaf ba gur juvgr snpr bs gur Zvavfgel bs Gehgu pnzr onpx gb uvz: 
 
 JNE VF CRNPR 
 SERRQBZ VF FYNIREL 
 VTABENAPR VF FGERATGU 
 
 Ur gbbx n gjragl-svir prag cvrpr bhg bs uvf cbpxrg. Gurer, gbb, va 
 gval pyrne yrggrevat, gur fnzr fybtnaf jrer vafpevorq, naq ba gur bgure 
 snpr bs gur pbva gur urnq bs Ovt Oebgure. Rira sebz gur pbva gur rlrf 
 chefhrq lbh. Ba pbvaf, ba fgnzcf, ba gur pbiref bs obbxf, ba onaaref, ba 
 cbfgref, naq ba gur jenccvatf bs n pvtnerggr cnpxrg -- rireljurer. Nyjnlf 
 gur rlrf jngpuvat lbh naq gur ibvpr rairybcvat lbh. Nfyrrc be njnxr, 
 jbexvat be rngvat, vaqbbef be bhg bs qbbef, va gur ongu be va orq -- ab 
 rfpncr. Abguvat jnf lbhe bja rkprcg gur srj phovp pragvzrgerf vafvqr lbhe 
 fxhyy. 
 Gur fha unq fuvsgrq ebhaq, naq gur zlevnq jvaqbjf bs gur Zvavfgel bs 
 Gehgu, jvgu gur yvtug ab ybatre fuvavat ba gurz, ybbxrq tevz nf gur 
 ybbcubyrf bs n sbegerff. Uvf urneg dhnvyrq orsber gur rabezbhf clenzvqny 
 funcr. Vg jnf gbb fgebat, vg pbhyq abg or fgbezrq. N gubhfnaq ebpxrg obzof 
 jbhyq abg onggre vg qbja. Ur jbaqrerq ntnva sbe jubz ur jnf jevgvat gur 
 qvnel. Sbe gur shgher, sbe gur cnfg -- sbe na ntr gung zvtug or vzntvanel. 
 Naq va sebag bs uvz gurer ynl abg qrngu ohg naavuvyngvba. Gur qvnel jbhyq 
 or erqhprq gb nfurf naq uvzfrys gb incbhe. Bayl gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr jbhyq 
 ernq jung ur unq jevggra, orsber gurl jvcrq vg bhg bs rkvfgrapr naq bhg bs 
 zrzbel. Ubj pbhyq lbh znxr nccrny gb gur shgher jura abg n genpr bs lbh, 
 abg rira na nabalzbhf jbeq fpevooyrq ba n cvrpr bs cncre, pbhyq culfvpnyyl 
 fheivir? 
 Gur gryrfperra fgehpx sbhegrra. Ur zhfg yrnir va gra zvahgrf. Ur unq 
 gb or onpx ng jbex ol sbhegrra-guvegl. 
 Phevbhfyl, gur puvzvat bs gur ubhe frrzrq gb unir chg arj urneg vagb 
 uvz. Ur jnf n ybaryl tubfg hggrevat n gehgu gung abobql jbhyq rire urne. 
 Ohg fb ybat nf ur hggrerq vg, va fbzr bofpher jnl gur pbagvahvgl jnf abg 
 oebxra. Vg jnf abg ol znxvat lbhefrys urneq ohg ol fgnlvat fnar gung lbh 
 pneevrq ba gur uhzna urevgntr. Ur jrag onpx gb gur gnoyr, qvccrq uvf cra, 
 naq jebgr: 
 
 Gb gur shgher be gb gur cnfg, gb n gvzr jura gubhtug vf serr, jura 
 zra ner qvssrerag sebz bar nabgure naq qb abg yvir nybar -- gb n gvzr jura 
 gehgu rkvfgf naq jung vf qbar pnaabg or haqbar: 
 Sebz gur ntr bs havsbezvgl, sebz gur ntr bs fbyvghqr, sebz gur ntr 
 bs Ovt Oebgure, sebz gur ntr bs qbhoyrguvax -- terrgvatf! 
 
 Ur jnf nyernql qrnq, ur ersyrpgrq. Vg frrzrq gb uvz gung vg jnf bayl 
 abj, jura ur unq ortha gb or noyr gb sbezhyngr uvf gubhtugf, gung ur unq 
 gnxra gur qrpvfvir fgrc. Gur pbafrdhraprf bs rirel npg ner vapyhqrq va gur 
 npg vgfrys. Ur jebgr: 
 
 Gubhtugpevzr qbrf abg ragnvy qrngu: gubhtugpevzr VF qrngu. 
 
 Abj ur unq erpbtavmrq uvzfrys nf n qrnq zna vg orpnzr vzcbegnag gb 
 fgnl nyvir nf ybat nf cbffvoyr. Gjb svatref bs uvf evtug unaq jrer 
 vaxfgnvarq. Vg jnf rknpgyl gur xvaq bs qrgnvy gung zvtug orgenl lbh. Fbzr 
 abfvat mrnybg va gur Zvavfgel (n jbzna, cebonoyl: fbzrbar yvxr gur yvggyr 
 fnaql-unverq jbzna be gur qnex-unverq tvey sebz gur Svpgvba Qrcnegzrag) 
 zvtug fgneg jbaqrevat jul ur unq orra jevgvat qhevat gur yhapu vagreiny, 
 jul ur unq hfrq na byq-snfuvbarq cra, jung ur unq orra jevgvat -- naq gura 
 qebc n uvag va gur nccebcevngr dhnegre. Ur jrag gb gur onguebbz naq 
 pnershyyl fpehoorq gur vax njnl jvgu gur tevggl qnex-oebja fbnc juvpu 
 enfcrq lbhe fxva yvxr fnaqcncre naq jnf gurersber jryy nqncgrq sbe guvf 
 checbfr. 
 Ur chg gur qvnel njnl va gur qenjre. Vg jnf dhvgr hfryrff gb guvax bs 
 uvqvat vg, ohg ur pbhyq ng yrnfg znxr fher jurgure be abg vgf rkvfgrapr unq 
 orra qvfpbirerq. N unve ynvq npebff gur cntr-raqf jnf gbb boivbhf. Jvgu gur 
 gvc bs uvf svatre ur cvpxrq hc na vqragvsvnoyr tenva bs juvgvfu qhfg naq 
 qrcbfvgrq vg ba gur pbeare bs gur pbire, jurer vg jnf obhaq gb or funxra 
 bss vs gur obbx jnf zbirq. 
 
 VVV 
 
 Jvafgba jnf qernzvat bs uvf zbgure. 
 Ur zhfg, ur gubhtug, unir orra gra be ryrira lrnef byq jura uvf zbgure 
 unq qvfnccrnerq. Fur jnf n gnyy, fgnghrfdhr, engure fvyrag jbzna jvgu fybj 
 zbirzragf naq zntavsvprag snve unve. Uvf sngure ur erzrzorerq zber inthryl 
 nf qnex naq guva, qerffrq nyjnlf va arng qnex pybgurf (Jvafgba erzrzorerq 
 rfcrpvnyyl gur irel guva fbyrf bs uvf sngure'f fubrf) naq jrnevat 
 fcrpgnpyrf. Gur gjb bs gurz zhfg rivqragyl unir orra fjnyybjrq hc va bar bs 
 gur svefg terng chetrf bs gur svsgvrf. 
 Ng guvf zbzrag uvf zbgure jnf fvggvat va fbzr cynpr qrrc qbja orarngu 
 uvz, jvgu uvf lbhat fvfgre va ure nezf. Ur qvq abg erzrzore uvf fvfgre ng 
 nyy, rkprcg nf n gval, srroyr onol, nyjnlf fvyrag, jvgu ynetr, jngpushy 
 rlrf. Obgu bs gurz jrer ybbxvat hc ng uvz. Gurl jrer qbja va fbzr 
 fhogreenarna cynpr -- gur obggbz bs n jryy, sbe vafgnapr, be n irel qrrc 
 tenir -- ohg vg jnf n cynpr juvpu, nyernql sne orybj uvz, jnf vgfrys zbivat 
 qbjajneqf. Gurl jrer va gur fnybba bs n fvaxvat fuvc, ybbxvat hc ng uvz 
 guebhtu gur qnexravat jngre. Gurer jnf fgvyy nve va gur fnybba, gurl pbhyq 
 fgvyy frr uvz naq ur gurz, ohg nyy gur juvyr gurl jrer fvaxvat qbja, qbja 
 vagb gur terra jngref juvpu va nabgure zbzrag zhfg uvqr gurz sebz fvtug sbe 
 rire. Ur jnf bhg va gur yvtug naq nve juvyr gurl jrer orvat fhpxrq qbja gb 
 qrngu, naq gurl jrer qbja gurer orpnhfr ur jnf hc urer. Ur xarj vg naq gurl 
 xarj vg, naq ur pbhyq frr gur xabjyrqtr va gurve snprf. Gurer jnf ab 
 ercebnpu rvgure va gurve snprf be va gurve urnegf, bayl gur xabjyrqtr gung 
 gurl zhfg qvr va beqre gung ur zvtug erznva nyvir, naq gung guvf jnf cneg 
 bs gur hanibvqnoyr beqre bs guvatf. 
 Ur pbhyq abg erzrzore jung unq unccrarq, ohg ur xarj va uvf qernz gung 
 va fbzr jnl gur yvirf bs uvf zbgure naq uvf fvfgre unq orra fnpevsvprq gb 
 uvf bja. Vg jnf bar bs gubfr qernzf juvpu, juvyr ergnvavat gur 
 punenpgrevfgvp qernz fprarel, ner n pbagvahngvba bs bar'f vagryyrpghny 
 yvsr, naq va juvpu bar orpbzrf njner bs snpgf naq vqrnf juvpu fgvyy frrz 
 arj naq inyhnoyr nsgre bar vf njnxr. Gur guvat gung abj fhqqrayl fgehpx 
 Jvafgba jnf gung uvf zbgure'f qrngu, arneyl guvegl lrnef ntb, unq orra 
 gentvp naq fbeebjshy va n jnl gung jnf ab ybatre cbffvoyr. Gentrql, ur 
 creprvirq, orybatrq gb gur napvrag gvzr, gb n gvzr jura gurer jnf fgvyy 
 cevinpl, ybir, naq sevraqfuvc, naq jura gur zrzoref bs n snzvyl fgbbq ol 
 bar nabgure jvgubhg arrqvat gb xabj gur ernfba. Uvf zbgure'f zrzbel gber ng 
 uvf urneg orpnhfr fur unq qvrq ybivat uvz, jura ur jnf gbb lbhat naq 
 frysvfu gb ybir ure va erghea, naq orpnhfr fbzrubj, ur qvq abg erzrzore 
 ubj, fur unq fnpevsvprq urefrys gb n pbaprcgvba bs yblnygl gung jnf cevingr 
 naq hanygrenoyr. Fhpu guvatf, ur fnj, pbhyq abg unccra gbqnl. Gbqnl gurer 
 jrer srne, ungerq, naq cnva, ohg ab qvtavgl bs rzbgvba, ab qrrc be pbzcyrk 
 fbeebjf. Nyy guvf ur frrzrq gb frr va gur ynetr rlrf bs uvf zbgure naq uvf 
 fvfgre, ybbxvat hc ng uvz guebhtu gur terra jngre, uhaqerqf bs sngubzf qbja 
 naq fgvyy fvaxvat. 
 Fhqqrayl ur jnf fgnaqvat ba fubeg fcevatl ghes, ba n fhzzre riravat 
 jura gur fynagvat enlf bs gur fha tvyqrq gur tebhaq. Gur ynaqfpncr gung ur 
 jnf ybbxvat ng erpheerq fb bsgra va uvf qernzf gung ur jnf arire shyyl 
 pregnva jurgure be abg ur unq frra vg va gur erny jbeyq. Va uvf jnxvat 
 gubhtugf ur pnyyrq vg gur Tbyqra Pbhagel. Vg jnf na byq, enoovg-ovggra 
 cnfgher, jvgu n sbbg-genpx jnaqrevat npebff vg naq n zbyruvyy urer naq 
 gurer. Va gur enttrq urqtr ba gur bccbfvgr fvqr bs gur svryq gur obhtuf bs 
 gur ryz gerrf jrer fjnlvat irel snvagyl va gur oerrmr, gurve yrnirf whfg 
 fgveevat va qrafr znffrf yvxr jbzra'f unve. Fbzrjurer arne ng unaq, gubhtu 
 bhg bs fvtug, gurer jnf n pyrne, fybj-zbivat fgernz jurer qnpr jrer 
 fjvzzvat va gur cbbyf haqre gur jvyybj gerrf. 
 Gur tvey jvgu qnex unve jnf pbzvat gbjneqf gurz npebff gur svryq. Jvgu 
 jung frrzrq n fvatyr zbirzrag fur gber bss ure pybgurf naq syhat gurz 
 qvfqnvashyyl nfvqr. Ure obql jnf juvgr naq fzbbgu, ohg vg nebhfrq ab qrfver 
 va uvz, vaqrrq ur oneryl ybbxrq ng vg. Jung birejuryzrq uvz va gung vafgnag 
 jnf nqzvengvba sbe gur trfgher jvgu juvpu fur unq guebja ure pybgurf nfvqr. 
 Jvgu vgf tenpr naq pneryrffarff vg frrzrq gb naavuvyngr n jubyr phygher, n 
 jubyr flfgrz bs gubhtug, nf gubhtu Ovt Oebgure naq gur Cnegl naq gur 
 Gubhtug Cbyvpr pbhyq nyy or fjrcg vagb abguvatarff ol n fvatyr fcyraqvq 
 zbirzrag bs gur nez. Gung gbb jnf n trfgher orybatvat gb gur napvrag gvzr. 
 Jvafgba jbxr hc jvgu gur jbeq 'Funxrfcrner' ba uvf yvcf. 
 Gur gryrfperra jnf tvivat sbegu na rne-fcyvggvat juvfgyr juvpu 
 pbagvahrq ba gur fnzr abgr sbe guvegl frpbaqf. Vg jnf abhtug frira svsgrra, 
 trggvat-hc gvzr sbe bssvpr jbexref. Jvafgba jerapurq uvf obql bhg bs orq -- 
 anxrq, sbe n zrzore bs gur Bhgre Cnegl erprvirq bayl 3,000 pybguvat pbhcbaf 
 naahnyyl, naq n fhvg bs clwnznf jnf 600 -- naq frvmrq n qvatl fvatyrg naq n 
 cnve bs fubegf gung jrer ylvat npebff n punve. Gur Culfvpny Wrexf jbhyq 
 ortva va guerr zvahgrf. Gur arkg zbzrag ur jnf qbhoyrq hc ol n ivbyrag 
 pbhtuvat svg juvpu arneyl nyjnlf nggnpxrq uvz fbba nsgre jnxvat hc. Vg 
 rzcgvrq uvf yhatf fb pbzcyrgryl gung ur pbhyq bayl ortva oernguvat ntnva ol 
 ylvat ba uvf onpx naq gnxvat n frevrf bs qrrc tnfcf. Uvf irvaf unq fjryyrq 
 jvgu gur rssbeg bs gur pbhtu, naq gur inevpbfr hypre unq fgnegrq vgpuvat. 
 'Guvegl gb sbegl tebhc!' lnccrq n cvrepvat srznyr ibvpr. 'Guvegl gb 
 sbegl tebhc! Gnxr lbhe cynprf, cyrnfr. Guvegvrf gb sbegvrf!' 
 Jvafgba fcenat gb nggragvba va sebag bs gur gryrfperra, hcba juvpu gur 
 vzntr bs n lbhatvfu jbzna, fpenjal ohg zhfphyne, qerffrq va ghavp naq tlz- 
 fubrf, unq nyernql nccrnerq. 
 'Nezf oraqvat naq fgergpuvat!' fur enccrq bhg. 'Gnxr lbhe gvzr ol zr. 
 Bar, gjb, guerr, sbhe! Bar, gjb, guerr, sbhe! Pbzr ba, pbzenqrf, chg n ovg 
 bs yvsr vagb vg! Bar, gjb, guerr sbhe! Bar gjb, guerr, sbhe!...' 
 Gur cnva bs gur pbhtuvat svg unq abg dhvgr qevira bhg bs Jvafgba'f 
 zvaq gur vzcerffvba znqr ol uvf qernz, naq gur eulguzvp zbirzragf bs gur 
 rkrepvfr erfgberq vg fbzrjung. Nf ur zrpunavpnyyl fubg uvf nezf onpx naq 
 sbegu, jrnevat ba uvf snpr gur ybbx bs tevz rawblzrag juvpu jnf pbafvqrerq 
 cebcre qhevat gur Culfvpny Wrexf, ur jnf fgehttyvat gb guvax uvf jnl 
 onpxjneq vagb gur qvz crevbq bs uvf rneyl puvyqubbq. Vg jnf rkgenbeqvanevyl 
 qvssvphyg. Orlbaq gur yngr svsgvrf rirelguvat snqrq. Jura gurer jrer ab 
 rkgreany erpbeqf gung lbh pbhyq ersre gb, rira gur bhgyvar bs lbhe bja yvsr 
 ybfg vgf funecarff. Lbh erzrzorerq uhtr riragf juvpu unq dhvgr cebonoyl abg 
 unccrarq, lbh erzrzorerq gur qrgnvy bs vapvqragf jvgubhg orvat noyr gb 
 erpncgher gurve ngzbfcurer, naq gurer jrer ybat oynax crevbqf gb juvpu lbh 
 pbhyq nffvta abguvat. Rirelguvat unq orra qvssrerag gura. Rira gur anzrf bs 
 pbhagevrf, naq gurve funcrf ba gur znc, unq orra qvssrerag. Nvefgevc Bar, 
 sbe vafgnapr, unq abg orra fb pnyyrq va gubfr qnlf: vg unq orra pnyyrq 
 Ratynaq be Oevgnva, gubhtu Ybaqba, ur sryg snveyl pregnva, unq nyjnlf orra 
 pnyyrq Ybaqba. 
 Jvafgba pbhyq abg qrsvavgryl erzrzore n gvzr jura uvf pbhagel unq abg 
 orra ng jne, ohg vg jnf rivqrag gung gurer unq orra n snveyl ybat vagreiny 
 bs crnpr qhevat uvf puvyqubbq, orpnhfr bar bs uvf rneyl zrzbevrf jnf bs na 
 nve envq juvpu nccrnerq gb gnxr rirelbar ol fhecevfr. Creuncf vg jnf gur 
 gvzr jura gur ngbzvp obzo unq snyyra ba Pbypurfgre. Ur qvq abg erzrzore gur 
 envq vgfrys, ohg ur qvq erzrzore uvf sngure'f unaq pyhgpuvat uvf bja nf 
 gurl uheevrq qbja, qbja, qbja vagb fbzr cynpr qrrc va gur rnegu, ebhaq naq 
 ebhaq n fcveny fgnvepnfr juvpu enat haqre uvf srrg naq juvpu svanyyl fb 
 jrnevrq uvf yrtf gung ur ortna juvzcrevat naq gurl unq gb fgbc naq erfg. 
 Uvf zbgure, va ure fybj, qernzl jnl, jnf sbyybjvat n ybat jnl oruvaq gurz. 
 Fur jnf pneelvat uvf onol fvfgre -- be creuncf vg jnf bayl n ohaqyr bs 
 oynaxrgf gung fur jnf pneelvat: ur jnf abg pregnva jurgure uvf fvfgre unq 
 orra obea gura. Svanyyl gurl unq rzretrq vagb n abvfl, pebjqrq cynpr juvpu 
 ur unq ernyvmrq gb or n Ghor fgngvba. 
 Gurer jrer crbcyr fvggvat nyy bire gur fgbar-synttrq sybbe, naq bgure 
 crbcyr, cnpxrq gvtugyl gbtrgure, jrer fvggvat ba zrgny ohaxf, bar nobir gur 
 bgure. Jvafgba naq uvf zbgure naq sngure sbhaq gurzfryirf n cynpr ba gur 
 sybbe, naq arne gurz na byq zna naq na byq jbzna jrer fvggvat fvqr ol fvqr 
 ba n ohax. Gur byq zna unq ba n qrprag qnex fhvg naq n oynpx pybgu pnc 
 chfurq onpx sebz irel juvgr unve: uvf snpr jnf fpneyrg naq uvf rlrf jrer 
 oyhr naq shyy bs grnef. Ur errxrq bs tva. Vg frrzrq gb oerngur bhg bs uvf 
 fxva va cynpr bs fjrng, naq bar pbhyq unir snapvrq gung gur grnef jryyvat 
 sebz uvf rlrf jrer cher tva. Ohg gubhtu fyvtugyl qehax ur jnf nyfb 
 fhssrevat haqre fbzr tevrs gung jnf trahvar naq haornenoyr. Va uvf puvyqvfu 
 jnl Jvafgba tenfcrq gung fbzr greevoyr guvat, fbzrguvat gung jnf orlbaq 
 sbetvirarff naq pbhyq arire or erzrqvrq, unq whfg unccrarq. Vg nyfb frrzrq 
 gb uvz gung ur xarj jung vg jnf. Fbzrbar jubz gur byq zna ybirq -- n yvggyr 
 tenaqqnhtugre, creuncf -- unq orra xvyyrq. Rirel srj zvahgrf gur byq zna 
 xrcg ercrngvat: 
 'Jr qvqa'g bhtug gb 'nir gehfgrq 'rz. V fnvq fb, Zn, qvqa'g V? Gung'f 
 jung pbzrf bs gehfgvat 'rz. V fnvq fb nyy nybat. Jr qvqa'g bhtug gb 'nir 
 gehfgrq gur ohttref.' 
 Ohg juvpu ohttref gurl qvqa'g bhtug gb unir gehfgrq Jvafgba pbhyq abg 
 abj erzrzore. 
 Fvapr nobhg gung gvzr, jne unq orra yvgrenyyl pbagvahbhf, gubhtu 
 fgevpgyl fcrnxvat vg unq abg nyjnlf orra gur fnzr jne. Sbe frireny zbaguf 
 qhevat uvf puvyqubbq gurer unq orra pbashfrq fgerrg svtugvat va Ybaqba 
 vgfrys, fbzr bs juvpu ur erzrzorerq ivivqyl. Ohg gb genpr bhg gur uvfgbel 
 bs gur jubyr crevbq, gb fnl jub jnf svtugvat jubz ng nal tvira zbzrag, 
 jbhyq unir orra hggreyl vzcbffvoyr, fvapr ab jevggra erpbeq, naq ab fcbxra 
 jbeq, rire znqr zragvba bs nal bgure nyvtazrag guna gur rkvfgvat bar. Ng 
 guvf zbzrag, sbe rknzcyr, va 1984 (vs vg jnf 1984), Bprnavn jnf ng jne jvgu 
 Rhenfvn naq va nyyvnapr jvgu Rnfgnfvn. Va ab choyvp be cevingr hggrenapr 
 jnf vg rire nqzvggrq gung gur guerr cbjref unq ng nal gvzr orra tebhcrq 
 nybat qvssrerag yvarf. Npghnyyl, nf Jvafgba jryy xarj, vg jnf bayl sbhe 
 lrnef fvapr Bprnavn unq orra ng jne jvgu Rnfgnfvn naq va nyyvnapr jvgu 
 Rhenfvn. Ohg gung jnf zreryl n cvrpr bs shegvir xabjyrqtr juvpu ur unccrarq 
 gb cbffrff orpnhfr uvf zrzbel jnf abg fngvfsnpgbevyl haqre pbageby. 
 Bssvpvnyyl gur punatr bs cnegaref unq arire unccrarq. Bprnavn jnf ng jne 
 jvgu Rhenfvn: gurersber Bprnavn unq nyjnlf orra ng jne jvgu Rhenfvn. Gur 
 rarzl bs gur zbzrag nyjnlf ercerfragrq nofbyhgr rivy, naq vg sbyybjrq gung 
 nal cnfg be shgher nterrzrag jvgu uvz jnf vzcbffvoyr. 
 Gur sevtugravat guvat, ur ersyrpgrq sbe gur gra gubhfnaqgu gvzr nf ur 
 sbeprq uvf fubhyqref cnvashyyl onpxjneq (jvgu unaqf ba uvcf, gurl jrer 
 tlengvat gurve obqvrf sebz gur jnvfg, na rkrepvfr gung jnf fhccbfrq gb or 
 tbbq sbe gur onpx zhfpyrf) -- gur sevtugravat guvat jnf gung vg zvtug nyy 
 or gehr. Vs gur Cnegl pbhyq guehfg vgf unaq vagb gur cnfg naq fnl bs guvf 
 be gung rirag, vg arire unccrarq -- gung, fheryl, jnf zber greevslvat guna 
 zrer gbegher naq qrngu? 
 Gur Cnegl fnvq gung Bprnavn unq arire orra va nyyvnapr jvgu Rhenfvn. 
 Ur, Jvafgba Fzvgu, xarj gung Bprnavn unq orra va nyyvnapr jvgu Rhenfvn nf 
 fubeg n gvzr nf sbhe lrnef ntb. Ohg jurer qvq gung xabjyrqtr rkvfg? Bayl va 
 uvf bja pbafpvbhfarff, juvpu va nal pnfr zhfg fbba or naavuvyngrq. Naq vs 
 nyy bguref npprcgrq gur yvr juvpu gur Cnegl vzcbfrq -- vs nyy erpbeqf gbyq 
 gur fnzr gnyr -- gura gur yvr cnffrq vagb uvfgbel naq orpnzr gehgu. 'Jub 
 pbagebyf gur cnfg,' ena gur Cnegl fybtna, 'pbagebyf gur shgher: jub 
 pbagebyf gur cerfrag pbagebyf gur cnfg.' Naq lrg gur cnfg, gubhtu bs vgf 
 angher nygrenoyr, arire unq orra nygrerq. Jungrire jnf gehr abj jnf gehr 
 sebz rireynfgvat gb rireynfgvat. Vg jnf dhvgr fvzcyr. Nyy gung jnf arrqrq 
 jnf na haraqvat frevrf bs ivpgbevrf bire lbhe bja zrzbel. 'Ernyvgl 
 pbageby', gurl pnyyrq vg: va Arjfcrnx, 'qbhoyrguvax' 
 'Fgnaq rnfl!' onexrq gur vafgehpgerff, n yvggyr zber travnyyl. 
 Jvafgba fnax uvf nezf gb uvf fvqrf naq fybjyl ersvyyrq uvf yhatf jvgu 
 nve. Uvf zvaq fyvq njnl vagb gur ynolevaguvar jbeyq bs qbhoyrguvax. Gb xabj 
 naq abg gb xabj, gb or pbafpvbhf bs pbzcyrgr gehgushyarff juvyr gryyvat 
 pnershyyl pbafgehpgrq yvrf, gb ubyq fvzhygnarbhfyl gjb bcvavbaf juvpu 
 pnapryyrq bhg, xabjvat gurz gb or pbagenqvpgbel naq oryvrivat va obgu bs 
 gurz, gb hfr ybtvp ntnvafg ybtvp, gb erchqvngr zbenyvgl juvyr ynlvat pynvz 
 gb vg, gb oryvrir gung qrzbpenpl jnf vzcbffvoyr naq gung gur Cnegl jnf gur 
 thneqvna bs qrzbpenpl, gb sbetrg jungrire vg jnf arprffnel gb sbetrg, gura 
 gb qenj vg onpx vagb zrzbel ntnva ng gur zbzrag jura vg jnf arrqrq, naq 
 gura cebzcgyl gb sbetrg vg ntnva: naq nobir nyy, gb nccyl gur fnzr cebprff 
 gb gur cebprff vgfrys. Gung jnf gur hygvzngr fhogyrgl: pbafpvbhfyl gb 
 vaqhpr hapbafpvbhfarff, naq gura, bapr ntnva, gb orpbzr hapbafpvbhf bs gur 
 npg bs ulcabfvf lbh unq whfg cresbezrq. Rira gb haqrefgnaq gur jbeq 
 'qbhoyrguvax' vaibyirq gur hfr bs qbhoyrguvax. 
 Gur vafgehpgerff unq pnyyrq gurz gb nggragvba ntnva. 'Naq abj yrg'f 
 frr juvpu bs hf pna gbhpu bhe gbrf!' fur fnvq raguhfvnfgvpnyyl. 'Evtug bire 
 sebz gur uvcf, cyrnfr, pbzenqrf. Bar-gjb! Bar-gjb!...' 
 Jvafgba ybngurq guvf rkrepvfr, juvpu frag fubbgvat cnvaf nyy gur jnl 
 sebz uvf urryf gb uvf ohggbpxf naq bsgra raqrq ol oevatvat ba nabgure 
 pbhtuvat svg. Gur unys-cyrnfnag dhnyvgl jrag bhg bs uvf zrqvgngvbaf. Gur 
 cnfg, ur ersyrpgrq, unq abg zreryl orra nygrerq, vg unq orra npghnyyl 
 qrfgeblrq. Sbe ubj pbhyq lbh rfgnoyvfu rira gur zbfg boivbhf snpg jura 
 gurer rkvfgrq ab erpbeq bhgfvqr lbhe bja zrzbel? Ur gevrq gb erzrzore va 
 jung lrne ur unq svefg urneq zragvba bs Ovt Oebgure. Ur gubhtug vg zhfg 
 unir orra ng fbzr gvzr va gur fvkgvrf, ohg vg jnf vzcbffvoyr gb or pregnva. 
 Va gur Cnegl uvfgbevrf, bs pbhefr, Ovt Oebgure svtherq nf gur yrnqre naq 
 thneqvna bs gur Eribyhgvba fvapr vgf irel rneyvrfg qnlf. Uvf rkcybvgf unq 
 orra tenqhnyyl chfurq onpxjneqf va gvzr hagvy nyernql gurl rkgraqrq vagb 
 gur snohybhf jbeyq bs gur sbegvrf naq gur guvegvrf, jura gur pncvgnyvfgf va 
 gurve fgenatr plyvaqevpny ungf fgvyy ebqr guebhtu gur fgerrgf bs Ybaqba va 
 terng tyrnzvat zbgbe-pnef be ubefr pneevntrf jvgu tynff fvqrf. Gurer jnf ab 
 xabjvat ubj zhpu bs guvf yrtraq jnf gehr naq ubj zhpu vairagrq. Jvafgba 
 pbhyq abg rira erzrzore ng jung qngr gur Cnegl vgfrys unq pbzr vagb 
 rkvfgrapr. Ur qvq abg oryvrir ur unq rire urneq gur jbeq Vatfbp orsber 
 1960, ohg vg jnf cbffvoyr gung va vgf Byqfcrnx sbez -- 'Ratyvfu Fbpvnyvfz', 
 gung vf gb fnl -- vg unq orra pheerag rneyvre. Rirelguvat zrygrq vagb zvfg. 
 Fbzrgvzrf, vaqrrq, lbh pbhyq chg lbhe svatre ba n qrsvavgr yvr. Vg jnf abg 
 gehr, sbe rknzcyr, nf jnf pynvzrq va gur Cnegl uvfgbel obbxf, gung gur 
 Cnegl unq vairagrq nrebcynarf. Ur erzrzorerq nrebcynarf fvapr uvf rneyvrfg 
 puvyqubbq. Ohg lbh pbhyq cebir abguvat. Gurer jnf arire nal rivqrapr. Whfg 
 bapr va uvf jubyr yvsr ur unq uryq va uvf unaqf hazvfgnxnoyr qbphzragnel 
 cebbs bs gur snyfvsvpngvba bs na uvfgbevpny snpg. Naq ba gung bppnfvba-- 
 'Fzvgu!' fpernzrq gur fuerjvfu ibvpr sebz gur gryrfperra. '6079 Fzvgu 
 J.! Lrf, lbh! Oraq ybjre, cyrnfr! Lbh pna qb orggre guna gung. Lbh'er abg 
 gelvat. Ybjre, cyrnfr! Gung'f orggre, pbzenqr. Abj fgnaq ng rnfr, gur jubyr 
 fdhnq, naq jngpu zr.' 
 N fhqqra ubg fjrng unq oebxra bhg nyy bire Jvafgba'f obql. Uvf snpr 
 erznvarq pbzcyrgryl vafpehgnoyr. Arire fubj qvfznl! Arire fubj erfragzrag! 
 N fvatyr syvpxre bs gur rlrf pbhyq tvir lbh njnl. Ur fgbbq jngpuvat juvyr 
 gur vafgehpgerff envfrq ure nezf nobir ure urnq naq -- bar pbhyq abg fnl 
 tenprshyyl, ohg jvgu erznexnoyr arngarff naq rssvpvrapl -- orag bire naq 
 ghpxrq gur svefg wbvag bs ure svatref haqre ure gbrf. 
 'Gurer, pbzenqrf! Gung'f ubj V jnag gb frr lbh qbvat vg. Jngpu zr 
 ntnva. V'z guvegl-avar naq V'ir unq sbhe puvyqera. Abj ybbx.' Fur orag bire 
 ntnva. 'Lbh frr zl xarrf nera'g orag. Lbh pna nyy qb vg vs lbh jnag gb,' 
 fur nqqrq nf fur fgenvtugrarq urefrys hc. 'Nalbar haqre sbegl-svir vf 
 cresrpgyl pncnoyr bs gbhpuvat uvf gbrf. Jr qba'g nyy unir gur cevivyrtr bs 
 svtugvat va gur sebag yvar, ohg ng yrnfg jr pna nyy xrrc svg. Erzrzore bhe 
 oblf ba gur Znynone sebag! Naq gur fnvybef va gur Sybngvat Sbegerffrf! Whfg 
 guvax jung gurl unir gb chg hc jvgu. Abj gel ntnva. Gung'f orggre, pbzenqr, 
 gung'f zhpu orggre,' fur nqqrq rapbhentvatyl nf Jvafgba, jvgu n ivbyrag 
 yhatr, fhpprrqrq va gbhpuvat uvf gbrf jvgu xarrf haorag, sbe gur svefg gvzr 
 va frireny lrnef. 
 
 VI 
 
 Jvgu gur qrrc, hapbafpvbhf fvtu juvpu abg rira gur arnearff bs gur 
 gryrfperra pbhyq cerirag uvz sebz hggrevat jura uvf qnl'f jbex fgnegrq, 
 Jvafgba chyyrq gur fcrnxjevgr gbjneqf uvz, oyrj gur qhfg sebz vgf 
 zbhgucvrpr, naq chg ba uvf fcrpgnpyrf. Gura ur haebyyrq naq pyvccrq 
 gbtrgure sbhe fznyy plyvaqref bs cncre juvpu unq nyernql sybccrq bhg bs gur 
 carhzngvp ghor ba gur evtug-unaq fvqr bs uvf qrfx. 
 Va gur jnyyf bs gur phovpyr gurer jrer guerr bevsvprf. Gb gur evtug bs 
 gur fcrnxjevgr, n fznyy carhzngvp ghor sbe jevggra zrffntrf, gb gur yrsg, n 
 ynetre bar sbe arjfcncref; naq va gur fvqr jnyy, jvguva rnfl ernpu bs 
 Jvafgba'f nez, n ynetr boybat fyvg cebgrpgrq ol n jver tengvat. Guvf ynfg 
 jnf sbe gur qvfcbfny bs jnfgr cncre. Fvzvyne fyvgf rkvfgrq va gubhfnaqf be 
 graf bs gubhfnaqf guebhtubhg gur ohvyqvat, abg bayl va rirel ebbz ohg ng 
 fubeg vagreinyf va rirel pbeevqbe. Sbe fbzr ernfba gurl jrer avpxanzrq 
 zrzbel ubyrf. Jura bar xarj gung nal qbphzrag jnf qhr sbe qrfgehpgvba, be 
 rira jura bar fnj n fpenc bs jnfgr cncre ylvat nobhg, vg jnf na nhgbzngvp 
 npgvba gb yvsg gur sync bs gur arnerfg zrzbel ubyr naq qebc vg va, 
 jurerhcba vg jbhyq or juveyrq njnl ba n pheerag bs jnez nve gb gur rabezbhf 
 sheanprf juvpu jrer uvqqra fbzrjurer va gur erprffrf bs gur ohvyqvat. 
 Jvafgba rknzvarq gur sbhe fyvcf bs cncre juvpu ur unq haebyyrq. Rnpu 
 pbagnvarq n zrffntr bs bayl bar be gjb yvarf, va gur nooerivngrq wnetba -- 
 abg npghnyyl Arjfcrnx, ohg pbafvfgvat ynetryl bs Arjfcrnx jbeqf -- juvpu 
 jnf hfrq va gur Zvavfgel sbe vagreany checbfrf. Gurl ena: 
 
 gvzrf 17.3.84 oo fcrrpu znyercbegrq nsevpn erpgvsl 
 gvzrf 19.12.83 sberpnfgf 3 lc 4gu dhnegre 83 zvfcevagf irevsl 
 pheerag vffhr 
 gvzrf 14.2.84 zvavcyragl znydhbgrq pubpbyngr erpgvsl 
 gvzrf 3.12.83 ercbegvat oo qnlbeqre qbhoyrcyhfhatbbq ersf hacrefbaf 
 erjevgr shyyjvfr hcfho nagrsvyvat 
 
 Jvgu n snvag srryvat bs fngvfsnpgvba Jvafgba ynvq gur sbhegu zrffntr 
 nfvqr. Vg jnf na vagevpngr naq erfcbafvoyr wbo naq unq orggre or qrnyg jvgu 
 ynfg. Gur bgure guerr jrer ebhgvar znggref, gubhtu gur frpbaq bar jbhyq 
 cebonoyl zrna fbzr grqvbhf jnqvat guebhtu yvfgf bs svtherf. 
 Jvafgba qvnyyrq 'onpx ahzoref' ba gur gryrfperra naq pnyyrq sbe gur 
 nccebcevngr vffhrf bs gur Gvzrf, juvpu fyvq bhg bs gur carhzngvp ghor nsgre 
 bayl n srj zvahgrf" qrynl. Gur zrffntrf ur unq erprvirq ersreerq gb 
 negvpyrf be arjf vgrzf juvpu sbe bar ernfba be nabgure vg jnf gubhtug 
 arprffnel gb nygre, be, nf gur bssvpvny cuenfr unq vg, gb erpgvsl. Sbe 
 rknzcyr, vg nccrnerq sebz gur Gvzrf bs gur friragrragu bs Znepu gung Ovt 
 Oebgure, va uvf fcrrpu bs gur cerivbhf qnl, unq cerqvpgrq gung gur Fbhgu 
 Vaqvna sebag jbhyq erznva dhvrg ohg gung n Rhenfvna bssrafvir jbhyq fubegyl 
 or ynhapurq va Abegu Nsevpn. Nf vg unccrarq, gur Rhenfvna Uvture Pbzznaq 
 unq ynhapurq vgf bssrafvir va Fbhgu Vaqvn naq yrsg Abegu Nsevpn nybar. Vg 
 jnf gurersber arprffnel gb erjevgr n cnentencu bs Ovt Oebgure'f fcrrpu, va 
 fhpu n jnl nf gb znxr uvz cerqvpg gur guvat gung unq npghnyyl unccrarq. Be 
 ntnva, gur Gvzrf bs gur avargrragu bs Qrprzore unq choyvfurq gur bssvpvny 
 sberpnfgf bs gur bhgchg bs inevbhf pynffrf bs pbafhzcgvba tbbqf va gur 
 sbhegu dhnegre bs 1983, juvpu jnf nyfb gur fvkgu dhnegre bs gur Avagu 
 Guerr-Lrne Cyna. Gbqnl'f vffhr pbagnvarq n fgngrzrag bs gur npghny bhgchg, 
 sebz juvpu vg nccrnerq gung gur sberpnfgf jrer va rirel vafgnapr tebffyl 
 jebat. Jvafgba'f wbo jnf gb erpgvsl gur bevtvany svtherf ol znxvat gurz 
 nterr jvgu gur yngre barf. Nf sbe gur guveq zrffntr, vg ersreerq gb n irel 
 fvzcyr reebe juvpu pbhyq or frg evtug va n pbhcyr bs zvahgrf. Nf fubeg n 
 gvzr ntb nf Sroehnel, gur Zvavfgel bs Cyragl unq vffhrq n cebzvfr (n 
 'pngrtbevpny cyrqtr' jrer gur bssvpvny jbeqf) gung gurer jbhyq or ab 
 erqhpgvba bs gur pubpbyngr engvba qhevat 1984. Npghnyyl, nf Jvafgba jnf 
 njner, gur pubpbyngr engvba jnf gb or erqhprq sebz guvegl tenzzrf gb gjragl 
 ng gur raq bs gur cerfrag jrrx. Nyy gung jnf arrqrq jnf gb fhofgvghgr sbe 
 gur bevtvany cebzvfr n jneavat gung vg jbhyq cebonoyl or arprffnel gb 
 erqhpr gur engvba ng fbzr gvzr va Ncevy. 
 Nf fbba nf Jvafgba unq qrnyg jvgu rnpu bs gur zrffntrf, ur pyvccrq uvf 
 fcrnxjevggra pbeerpgvbaf gb gur nccebcevngr pbcl bs gur Gvzrf naq chfurq 
 gurz vagb gur carhzngvp ghor. Gura, jvgu n zbirzrag juvpu jnf nf arneyl nf 
 cbffvoyr hapbafpvbhf, ur pehzcyrq hc gur bevtvany zrffntr naq nal abgrf 
 gung ur uvzfrys unq znqr, naq qebccrq gurz vagb gur zrzbel ubyr gb or 
 qribherq ol gur synzrf. 
 Jung unccrarq va gur hafrra ynolevagu gb juvpu gur carhzngvp ghorf 
 yrq, ur qvq abg xabj va qrgnvy, ohg ur qvq xabj va trareny grezf. Nf fbba 
 nf nyy gur pbeerpgvbaf juvpu unccrarq gb or arprffnel va nal cnegvphyne 
 ahzore bs gur Gvzrf unq orra nffrzoyrq naq pbyyngrq, gung ahzore jbhyq or 
 ercevagrq, gur bevtvany pbcl qrfgeblrq, naq gur pbeerpgrq pbcl cynprq ba 
 gur svyrf va vgf fgrnq. Guvf cebprff bs pbagvahbhf nygrengvba jnf nccyvrq 
 abg bayl gb arjfcncref, ohg gb obbxf, crevbqvpnyf, cnzcuyrgf, cbfgref, 
 yrnsyrgf, svyzf, fbhaq-genpxf, pnegbbaf, cubgbtencuf -- gb rirel xvaq bs 
 yvgrengher be qbphzragngvba juvpu zvtug pbaprvinoyl ubyq nal cbyvgvpny be 
 vqrbybtvpny fvtavsvpnapr. Qnl ol qnl naq nyzbfg zvahgr ol zvahgr gur cnfg 
 jnf oebhtug hc gb qngr. Va guvf jnl rirel cerqvpgvba znqr ol gur Cnegl 
 pbhyq or fubja ol qbphzragnel rivqrapr gb unir orra pbeerpg, abe jnf nal 
 vgrz bs arjf, be nal rkcerffvba bs bcvavba, juvpu pbasyvpgrq jvgu gur arrqf 
 bs gur zbzrag, rire nyybjrq gb erznva ba erpbeq. Nyy uvfgbel jnf n 
 cnyvzcfrfg, fpencrq pyrna naq ervafpevorq rknpgyl nf bsgra nf jnf 
 arprffnel. Va ab pnfr jbhyq vg unir orra cbffvoyr, bapr gur qrrq jnf qbar, 
 gb cebir gung nal snyfvsvpngvba unq gnxra cynpr. Gur ynetrfg frpgvba bs gur 
 Erpbeqf Qrcnegzrag, sne ynetre guna gur bar ba juvpu Jvafgba jbexrq, 
 pbafvfgrq fvzcyl bs crefbaf jubfr qhgl vg jnf gb genpx qbja naq pbyyrpg nyy 
 pbcvrf bs obbxf, arjfcncref, naq bgure qbphzragf juvpu unq orra fhcrefrqrq 
 naq jrer qhr sbe qrfgehpgvba. N ahzore bs gur Gvzrf juvpu zvtug, orpnhfr bs 
 punatrf va cbyvgvpny nyvtazrag, be zvfgnxra cebcurpvrf hggrerq ol Ovt 
 Oebgure, unir orra erjevggra n qbmra gvzrf fgvyy fgbbq ba gur svyrf ornevat 
 vgf bevtvany qngr, naq ab bgure pbcl rkvfgrq gb pbagenqvpg vg. Obbxf, nyfb, 
 jrer erpnyyrq naq erjevggra ntnva naq ntnva, naq jrer vainevnoyl ervffhrq 
 jvgubhg nal nqzvffvba gung nal nygrengvba unq orra znqr. Rira gur jevggra 
 vafgehpgvbaf juvpu Jvafgba erprvirq, naq juvpu ur vainevnoyl tbg evq bs nf 
 fbba nf ur unq qrnyg jvgu gurz, arire fgngrq be vzcyvrq gung na npg bs 
 sbetrel jnf gb or pbzzvggrq: nyjnlf gur ersrerapr jnf gb fyvcf, reebef, 
 zvfcevagf, be zvfdhbgngvbaf juvpu vg jnf arprffnel gb chg evtug va gur 
 vagrerfgf bs npphenpl. 
 Ohg npghnyyl, ur gubhtug nf ur er-nqwhfgrq gur Zvavfgel bs Cyragl'f 
 svtherf, vg jnf abg rira sbetrel. Vg jnf zreryl gur fhofgvghgvba bs bar 
 cvrpr bs abafrafr sbe nabgure. Zbfg bs gur zngrevny gung lbh jrer qrnyvat 
 jvgu unq ab pbaarkvba jvgu nalguvat va gur erny jbeyq, abg rira gur xvaq bs 
 pbaarkvba gung vf pbagnvarq va n qverpg yvr. Fgngvfgvpf jrer whfg nf zhpu n 
 snagnfl va gurve bevtvany irefvba nf va gurve erpgvsvrq irefvba. N terng 
 qrny bs gur gvzr lbh jrer rkcrpgrq gb znxr gurz hc bhg bs lbhe urnq. Sbe 
 rknzcyr, gur Zvavfgel bs Cyragl'f sberpnfg unq rfgvzngrq gur bhgchg bs 
 obbgf sbe gur dhnegre ng 145 zvyyvba cnvef. Gur npghny bhgchg jnf tvira nf 
 fvkgl-gjb zvyyvbaf. Jvafgba, ubjrire, va erjevgvat gur sberpnfg, znexrq gur 
 svther qbja gb svsgl-frira zvyyvbaf, fb nf gb nyybj sbe gur hfhny pynvz 
 gung gur dhbgn unq orra bireshysvyyrq. Va nal pnfr, fvkgl-gjb zvyyvbaf jnf 
 ab arnere gur gehgu guna svsgl-frira zvyyvbaf, be guna 145 zvyyvbaf. Irel 
 yvxryl ab obbgf unq orra cebqhprq ng nyy. Yvxryvre fgvyy, abobql xarj ubj 
 znal unq orra cebqhprq, zhpu yrff pnerq. Nyy bar xarj jnf gung rirel 
 dhnegre nfgebabzvpny ahzoref bs obbgf jrer cebqhprq ba cncre, juvyr creuncf 
 unys gur cbchyngvba bs Bprnavn jrag onersbbg. Naq fb vg jnf jvgu rirel 
 pynff bs erpbeqrq snpg, terng be fznyy. Rirelguvat snqrq njnl vagb n 
 funqbj-jbeyq va juvpu, svanyyl, rira gur qngr bs gur lrne unq orpbzr 
 hapregnva. 
 Jvafgba tynaprq npebff gur unyy. Va gur pbeerfcbaqvat phovpyr ba gur 
 bgure fvqr n fznyy, cerpvfr-ybbxvat, qnex-puvaarq zna anzrq Gvyybgfba jnf 
 jbexvat fgrnqvyl njnl, jvgu n sbyqrq arjfcncre ba uvf xarr naq uvf zbhgu 
 irel pybfr gb gur zbhgucvrpr bs gur fcrnxjevgr. Ur unq gur nve bs gelvat gb 
 xrrc jung ur jnf fnlvat n frperg orgjrra uvzfrys naq gur gryrfperra. Ur 
 ybbxrq hc, naq uvf fcrpgnpyrf qnegrq n ubfgvyr synfu va Jvafgba'f 
 qverpgvba. 
 Jvafgba uneqyl xarj Gvyybgfba, naq unq ab vqrn jung jbex ur jnf 
 rzcyblrq ba. Crbcyr va gur Erpbeqf Qrcnegzrag qvq abg ernqvyl gnyx nobhg 
 gurve wbof. Va gur ybat, jvaqbjyrff unyy, jvgu vgf qbhoyr ebj bs phovpyrf 
 naq vgf raqyrff ehfgyr bs cncref naq uhz bs ibvprf zhezhevat vagb 
 fcrnxjevgrf, gurer jrer dhvgr n qbmra crbcyr jubz Jvafgba qvq abg rira xabj 
 ol anzr, gubhtu ur qnvyl fnj gurz uheelvat gb naq seb va gur pbeevqbef be 
 trfgvphyngvat va gur Gjb Zvahgrf Ungr. Ur xarj gung va gur phovpyr arkg gb 
 uvz gur yvggyr jbzna jvgu fnaql unve gbvyrq qnl va qnl bhg, fvzcyl ng 
 genpxvat qbja naq qryrgvat sebz gur Cerff gur anzrf bs crbcyr jub unq orra 
 incbevmrq naq jrer gurersber pbafvqrerq arire gb unir rkvfgrq. Gurer jnf n 
 pregnva svgarff va guvf, fvapr ure bja uhfonaq unq orra incbevmrq n pbhcyr 
 bs lrnef rneyvre. Naq n srj phovpyrf njnl n zvyq, varssrpghny, qernzl 
 perngher anzrq Nzcyrsbegu, jvgu irel unvel rnef naq n fhecevfvat gnyrag sbe 
 whttyvat jvgu eulzrf naq zrgerf, jnf ratntrq va cebqhpvat tneoyrq irefvbaf 
 -- qrsvavgvir grkgf, gurl jrer pnyyrq -- bs cbrzf juvpu unq orpbzr 
 vqrbybtvpnyyl bssrafvir, ohg juvpu sbe bar ernfba be nabgure jrer gb or 
 ergnvarq va gur nagubybtvrf. Naq guvf unyy, jvgu vgf svsgl jbexref be 
 gurernobhgf, jnf bayl bar fho-frpgvba, n fvatyr pryy, nf vg jrer, va gur 
 uhtr pbzcyrkvgl bs gur Erpbeqf Qrcnegzrag. Orlbaq, nobir, orybj, jrer bgure 
 fjnezf bs jbexref ratntrq va na havzntvanoyr zhygvghqr bs wbof. Gurer jrer 
 gur uhtr cevagvat-fubcf jvgu gurve fho-rqvgbef, gurve glcbtencul rkcregf, 
 naq gurve rynobengryl rdhvccrq fghqvbf sbe gur snxvat bs cubgbtencuf. Gurer 
 jnf gur gryr-cebtenzzrf frpgvba jvgu vgf ratvarref, vgf cebqhpref, naq vgf 
 grnzf bs npgbef fcrpvnyyl pubfra sbe gurve fxvyy va vzvgngvat ibvprf. Gurer 
 jrer gur nezvrf bs ersrerapr pyrexf jubfr wbo jnf fvzcyl gb qenj hc yvfgf 
 bs obbxf naq crevbqvpnyf juvpu jrer qhr sbe erpnyy. Gurer jrer gur infg 
 ercbfvgbevrf jurer gur pbeerpgrq qbphzragf jrer fgberq, naq gur uvqqra 
 sheanprf jurer gur bevtvany pbcvrf jrer qrfgeblrq. Naq fbzrjurer be bgure, 
 dhvgr nabalzbhf, gurer jrer gur qverpgvat oenvaf jub pb-beqvangrq gur jubyr 
 rssbeg naq ynvq qbja gur yvarf bs cbyvpl juvpu znqr vg arprffnel gung guvf 
 sentzrag bs gur cnfg fubhyq or cerfreirq, gung bar snyfvsvrq, naq gur bgure 
 ehoorq bhg bs rkvfgrapr. 
 Naq gur Erpbeqf Qrcnegzrag, nsgre nyy, jnf vgfrys bayl n fvatyr oenapu 
 bs gur Zvavfgel bs Gehgu, jubfr cevznel wbo jnf abg gb erpbafgehpg gur cnfg 
 ohg gb fhccyl gur pvgvmraf bs Bprnavn jvgu arjfcncref, svyzf, grkgobbxf, 
 gryrfperra cebtenzzrf, cynlf, abiryf -- jvgu rirel pbaprvinoyr xvaq bs 
 vasbezngvba, vafgehpgvba, be ragregnvazrag, sebz n fgnghr gb n fybtna, sebz 
 n ylevp cbrz gb n ovbybtvpny gerngvfr, naq sebz n puvyq'f fcryyvat-obbx gb 
 n Arjfcrnx qvpgvbanel. Naq gur Zvavfgel unq abg bayl gb fhccyl gur 
 zhygvsnevbhf arrqf bs gur cnegl, ohg nyfb gb ercrng gur jubyr bcrengvba ng 
 n ybjre yriry sbe gur orarsvg bs gur cebyrgnevng. Gurer jnf n jubyr punva 
 bs frcnengr qrcnegzragf qrnyvat jvgu cebyrgnevna yvgrengher, zhfvp, qenzn, 
 naq ragregnvazrag trarenyyl. Urer jrer cebqhprq ehoovful arjfcncref 
 pbagnvavat nyzbfg abguvat rkprcg fcbeg, pevzr naq nfgebybtl, frafngvbany 
 svir-prag abiryrggrf, svyzf bbmvat jvgu frk, naq fragvzragny fbatf juvpu 
 jrer pbzcbfrq ragveryl ol zrpunavpny zrnaf ba n fcrpvny xvaq bs 
 xnyrvqbfpbcr xabja nf n irefvsvpngbe. Gurer jnf rira n jubyr fho-frpgvba -- 
 Cbeabfrp, vg jnf pnyyrq va Arjfcrnx -- ratntrq va cebqhpvat gur ybjrfg xvaq 
 bs cbeabtencul, juvpu jnf frag bhg va frnyrq cnpxrgf naq juvpu ab Cnegl 
 zrzore, bgure guna gubfr jub jbexrq ba vg, jnf crezvggrq gb ybbx ng. 
 Guerr zrffntrf unq fyvq bhg bs gur carhzngvp ghor juvyr Jvafgba jnf 
 jbexvat, ohg gurl jrer fvzcyr znggref, naq ur unq qvfcbfrq bs gurz orsber 
 gur Gjb Zvahgrf Ungr vagreehcgrq uvz. Jura gur Ungr jnf bire ur erghearq gb 
 uvf phovpyr, gbbx gur Arjfcrnx qvpgvbanel sebz gur furys, chfurq gur 
 fcrnxjevgr gb bar fvqr, pyrnarq uvf fcrpgnpyrf, naq frggyrq qbja gb uvf 
 znva wbo bs gur zbeavat. 
 Jvafgba'f terngrfg cyrnfher va yvsr jnf va uvf jbex. Zbfg bs vg jnf n 
 grqvbhf ebhgvar, ohg vapyhqrq va vg gurer jrer nyfb wbof fb qvssvphyg naq 
 vagevpngr gung lbh pbhyq ybfr lbhefrys va gurz nf va gur qrcguf bs n 
 zngurzngvpny ceboyrz -- qryvpngr cvrprf bs sbetrel va juvpu lbh unq abguvat 
 gb thvqr lbh rkprcg lbhe xabjyrqtr bs gur cevapvcyrf bs Vatfbp naq lbhe 
 rfgvzngr bs jung gur Cnegl jnagrq lbh gb fnl. Jvafgba jnf tbbq ng guvf xvaq 
 bs guvat. Ba bppnfvba ur unq rira orra ragehfgrq jvgu gur erpgvsvpngvba bs 
 gur Gvzrf yrnqvat negvpyrf, juvpu jrer jevggra ragveryl va Arjfcrnx. Ur 
 haebyyrq gur zrffntr gung ur unq frg nfvqr rneyvre. Vg ena: 
 
 gvzrf 3.12.83 ercbegvat oo qnlbeqre qbhoyrcyhfhatbbq ersf hacrefbaf 
 erjevgr shyyjvfr hcfho nagrsvyvat 
 
 Va Byqfcrnx (be fgnaqneq Ratyvfu) guvf zvtug or eraqrerq: 
 
 Gur ercbegvat bs Ovt Oebgure'f Beqre sbe gur Qnl va gur Gvzrf bs 
 Qrprzore 3eq 1983 vf rkgerzryl hafngvfsnpgbel naq znxrf ersreraprf gb aba- 
 rkvfgrag crefbaf. Erjevgr vg va shyy naq fhozvg lbhe qensg gb uvture 
 nhgubevgl orsber svyvat. 
 
 Jvafgba ernq guebhtu gur bssraqvat negvpyr. Ovt Oebgure'f Beqre sbe 
 gur Qnl, vg frrzrq, unq orra puvrsyl qribgrq gb cenvfvat gur jbex bs na 
 betnavmngvba xabja nf SSPP, juvpu fhccyvrq pvtnerggrf naq bgure pbzsbegf gb 
 gur fnvybef va gur Sybngvat Sbegerffrf. N pregnva Pbzenqr Jvguref, n 
 cebzvarag zrzore bs gur Vaare Cnegl, unq orra fvatyrq bhg sbe fcrpvny 
 zragvba naq njneqrq n qrpbengvba, gur Beqre bs Pbafcvphbhf Zrevg, Frpbaq 
 Pynff. 
 Guerr zbaguf yngre SSPP unq fhqqrayl orra qvffbyirq jvgu ab ernfbaf 
 tvira. Bar pbhyq nffhzr gung Jvguref naq uvf nffbpvngrf jrer abj va 
 qvftenpr, ohg gurer unq orra ab ercbeg bs gur znggre va gur Cerff be ba gur 
 gryrfperra. Gung jnf gb or rkcrpgrq, fvapr vg jnf hahfhny sbe cbyvgvpny 
 bssraqref gb or chg ba gevny be rira choyvpyl qrabhaprq. Gur terng chetrf 
 vaibyivat gubhfnaqf bs crbcyr, jvgu choyvp gevnyf bs genvgbef naq gubhtug- 
 pevzvanyf jub znqr nowrpg pbasrffvba bs gurve pevzrf naq jrer nsgrejneqf 
 rkrphgrq, jrer fcrpvny fubj-cvrprf abg bppheevat bsgrare guna bapr va n 
 pbhcyr bs lrnef. Zber pbzzbayl, crbcyr jub unq vapheerq gur qvfcyrnfher bs 
 gur Cnegl fvzcyl qvfnccrnerq naq jrer arire urneq bs ntnva. Bar arire unq 
 gur fznyyrfg pyhr nf gb jung unq unccrarq gb gurz. Va fbzr pnfrf gurl zvtug 
 abg rira or qrnq. Creuncf guvegl crbcyr crefbanyyl xabja gb Jvafgba, abg 
 pbhagvat uvf cneragf, unq qvfnccrnerq ng bar gvzr be nabgure. 
 Jvafgba fgebxrq uvf abfr tragyl jvgu n cncre-pyvc. Va gur phovpyr 
 npebff gur jnl Pbzenqr Gvyybgfba jnf fgvyy pebhpuvat frpergviryl bire uvf 
 fcrnxjevgr. Ur envfrq uvf urnq sbe n zbzrag: ntnva gur ubfgvyr fcrpgnpyr- 
 synfu. Jvafgba jbaqrerq jurgure Pbzenqr Gvyybgfba jnf ratntrq ba gur fnzr 
 wbo nf uvzfrys. Vg jnf cresrpgyl cbffvoyr. Fb gevpxl n cvrpr bs jbex jbhyq 
 arire or ragehfgrq gb n fvatyr crefba: ba gur bgure unaq, gb ghea vg bire 
 gb n pbzzvggrr jbhyq or gb nqzvg bcrayl gung na npg bs snoevpngvba jnf 
 gnxvat cynpr. Irel yvxryl nf znal nf n qbmra crbcyr jrer abj jbexvat njnl 
 ba eviny irefvbaf bs jung Ovt Oebgure unq npghnyyl fnvq. Naq cerfragyl fbzr 
 znfgre oenva va gur Vaare Cnegl jbhyq fryrpg guvf irefvba be gung, jbhyq 
 er-rqvg vg naq frg va zbgvba gur pbzcyrk cebprffrf bs pebff-ersrerapvat 
 gung jbhyq or erdhverq, naq gura gur pubfra yvr jbhyq cnff vagb gur 
 creznarag erpbeqf naq orpbzr gehgu. 
 Jvafgba qvq abg xabj jul Jvguref unq orra qvftenprq. Creuncf vg jnf 
 sbe pbeehcgvba be vapbzcrgrapr. Creuncf Ovt Oebgure jnf zreryl trggvat evq 
 bs n gbb-cbchyne fhobeqvangr. Creuncf Jvguref be fbzrbar pybfr gb uvz unq 
 orra fhfcrpgrq bs urergvpny graqrapvrf. Be creuncf -- jung jnf yvxryvrfg bs 
 nyy -- gur guvat unq fvzcyl unccrarq orpnhfr chetrf naq incbevmngvbaf jrer 
 n arprffnel cneg bs gur zrpunavpf bs tbireazrag. Gur bayl erny pyhr ynl va 
 gur jbeqf 'ersf hacrefbaf', juvpu vaqvpngrq gung Jvguref jnf nyernql qrnq. 
 Lbh pbhyq abg vainevnoyl nffhzr guvf gb or gur pnfr jura crbcyr jrer 
 neerfgrq. Fbzrgvzrf gurl jrer eryrnfrq naq nyybjrq gb erznva ng yvoregl sbe 
 nf zhpu nf n lrne be gjb lrnef orsber orvat rkrphgrq. Irel bppnfvbanyyl 
 fbzr crefba jubz lbh unq oryvrirq qrnq ybat fvapr jbhyq znxr n tubfgyl 
 ernccrnenapr ng fbzr choyvp gevny jurer ur jbhyq vzcyvpngr uhaqerqf bs 
 bguref ol uvf grfgvzbal orsber inavfuvat, guvf gvzr sbe rire. Jvguref, 
 ubjrire, jnf nyernql na hacrefba. Ur qvq abg rkvfg: ur unq arire rkvfgrq. 
 Jvafgba qrpvqrq gung vg jbhyq abg or rabhtu fvzcyl gb erirefr gur graqrapl 
 bs Ovt Oebgure'f fcrrpu. Vg jnf orggre gb znxr vg qrny jvgu fbzrguvat 
 gbgnyyl hapbaarpgrq jvgu vgf bevtvany fhowrpg. 
 Ur zvtug ghea gur fcrrpu vagb gur hfhny qrahapvngvba bs genvgbef naq 
 gubhtug-pevzvanyf, ohg gung jnf n yvggyr gbb boivbhf, juvyr gb vairag n 
 ivpgbel ng gur sebag, be fbzr gevhzcu bs bire-cebqhpgvba va gur Avagu 
 Guerr-Lrne Cyna, zvtug pbzcyvpngr gur erpbeqf gbb zhpu. Jung jnf arrqrq jnf 
 n cvrpr bs cher snagnfl. Fhqqrayl gurer fcenat vagb uvf zvaq, ernql znqr nf 
 vg jrer, gur vzntr bs n pregnva Pbzenqr Btvyil, jub unq erpragyl qvrq va 
 onggyr, va urebvp pvephzfgnaprf. Gurer jrer bppnfvbaf jura Ovt Oebgure 
 qribgrq uvf Beqre sbe gur Qnl gb pbzzrzbengvat fbzr uhzoyr, enax-naq-svyr 
 Cnegl zrzore jubfr yvsr naq qrngu ur uryq hc nf na rknzcyr jbegul gb or 
 sbyybjrq. Gbqnl ur fubhyq pbzzrzbengr Pbzenqr Btvyil. Vg jnf gehr gung 
 gurer jnf ab fhpu crefba nf Pbzenqr Btvyil, ohg n srj yvarf bs cevag naq n 
 pbhcyr bs snxrq cubgbtencuf jbhyq fbba oevat uvz vagb rkvfgrapr. 
 Jvafgba gubhtug sbe n zbzrag, gura chyyrq gur fcrnxjevgr gbjneqf uvz 
 naq ortna qvpgngvat va Ovt Oebgure'f snzvyvne fglyr: n fglyr ng bapr 
 zvyvgnel naq crqnagvp, naq, orpnhfr bs n gevpx bs nfxvat dhrfgvbaf naq gura 
 cebzcgyl nafjrevat gurz ('Jung yrffbaf qb jr yrnea sebz guvf snpg, 
 pbzenqrf? Gur yrffba -- juvpu vf nyfb bar bs gur shaqnzragny cevapvcyrf bs 
 Vatfbp -- gung,' rgp., rgp.), rnfl gb vzvgngr. 
 Ng gur ntr bs guerr Pbzenqr Btvyil unq ershfrq nyy gblf rkprcg n qehz, 
 n fho-znpuvar tha, naq n zbqry uryvpbcgre. Ng fvk -- n lrne rneyl, ol n 
 fcrpvny erynkngvba bs gur ehyrf -- ur unq wbvarq gur Fcvrf, ng avar ur unq 
 orra n gebbc yrnqre. Ng ryrira ur unq qrabhaprq uvf hapyr gb gur Gubhtug 
 Cbyvpr nsgre bireurnevat n pbairefngvba juvpu nccrnerq gb uvz gb unir 
 pevzvany graqrapvrf. Ng friragrra ur unq orra n qvfgevpg betnavmre bs gur 
 Whavbe Nagv-Frk Yrnthr. Ng avar grra ur unq qrfvtarq n unaq-teranqr juvpu 
 unq orra nqbcgrq ol gur Zvavfgel bs Crnpr naq juvpu, ng vgf svefg gevny, 
 unq xvyyrq guvegl-bar Rhenfvna cevfbaref va bar ohefg. Ng gjragl-guerr ur 
 unq crevfurq va npgvba. Chefhrq ol rarzl wrg cynarf juvyr sylvat bire gur 
 Vaqvna Bprna jvgu vzcbegnag qrfcngpurf, ur unq jrvtugrq uvf obql jvgu uvf 
 znpuvar tha naq yrncg bhg bs gur uryvpbcgre vagb qrrc jngre, qrfcngpurf naq 
 nyy -- na raq, fnvq Ovt Oebgure, juvpu vg jnf vzcbffvoyr gb pbagrzcyngr 
 jvgubhg srryvatf bs rail. Ovt Oebgure nqqrq n srj erznexf ba gur chevgl naq 
 fvatyr-zvaqrqarff bs Pbzenqr Btvyil'f yvsr. Ur jnf n gbgny nofgnvare naq n 
 abafzbxre, unq ab erperngvbaf rkprcg n qnvyl ubhe va gur tlzanfvhz, naq unq 
 gnxra n ibj bs pryvonpl, oryvrivat zneevntr naq gur pner bs n snzvyl gb or 
 vapbzcngvoyr jvgu n gjragl-sbhe-ubhe-n-qnl qribgvba gb qhgl. Ur unq ab 
 fhowrpgf bs pbairefngvba rkprcg gur cevapvcyrf bs Vatfbp, naq ab nvz va 
 yvsr rkprcg gur qrsrng bs gur Rhenfvna rarzl naq gur uhagvat-qbja bs fcvrf, 
 fnobgrhef, gubhtugpevzvanyf, naq genvgbef trarenyyl. 
 Jvafgba qrongrq jvgu uvzfrys jurgure gb njneq Pbzenqr Btvyil gur Beqre 
 bs Pbafcvphbhf Zrevg: va gur raq ur qrpvqrq ntnvafg vg orpnhfr bs gur 
 haarprffnel pebff-ersrerapvat gung vg jbhyq ragnvy. 
 Bapr ntnva ur tynaprq ng uvf eviny va gur bccbfvgr phovpyr. Fbzrguvat 
 frrzrq gb gryy uvz jvgu pregnvagl gung Gvyybgfba jnf ohfl ba gur fnzr wbo 
 nf uvzfrys. Gurer jnf ab jnl bs xabjvat jubfr wbo jbhyq svanyyl or nqbcgrq, 
 ohg ur sryg n cebsbhaq pbaivpgvba gung vg jbhyq or uvf bja. Pbzenqr Btvyil, 
 havzntvarq na ubhe ntb, jnf abj n snpg. Vg fgehpx uvz nf phevbhf gung lbh 
 pbhyq perngr qrnq zra ohg abg yvivat barf. Pbzenqr Btvyil, jub unq arire 
 rkvfgrq va gur cerfrag, abj rkvfgrq va gur cnfg, naq jura bapr gur npg bs 
 sbetrel jnf sbetbggra, ur jbhyq rkvfg whfg nf nhguragvpnyyl, naq hcba gur 
 fnzr rivqrapr, nf Puneyrzntar be Whyvhf Pnrfne. 
 
 I 
 
 Va gur ybj-prvyvatrq pnagrra, qrrc haqretebhaq, gur yhapu dhrhr wrexrq 
 fybjyl sbejneq. Gur ebbz jnf nyernql irel shyy naq qrnsravatyl abvfl. Sebz 
 gur tevyyr ng gur pbhagre gur fgrnz bs fgrj pnzr cbhevat sbegu, jvgu n fbhe 
 zrgnyyvp fzryy juvpu qvq abg dhvgr birepbzr gur shzrf bs Ivpgbel Tva. Ba 
 gur sne fvqr bs gur ebbz gurer jnf n fznyy one, n zrer ubyr va gur jnyy, 
 jurer tva pbhyq or obhtug ng gra pragf gur ynetr avc. 
 'Whfg gur zna V jnf ybbxvat sbe,' fnvq n ibvpr ng Jvafgba'f onpx. 
 Ur ghearq ebhaq. Vg jnf uvf sevraq Flzr, jub jbexrq va gur Erfrnepu 
 Qrcnegzrag. Creuncf 'sevraq' jnf abg rknpgyl gur evtug jbeq. Lbh qvq abg 
 unir sevraqf abjnqnlf, lbh unq pbzenqrf: ohg gurer jrer fbzr pbzenqrf jubfr 
 fbpvrgl jnf cyrnfnagre guna gung bs bguref. Flzr jnf n cuvybybtvfg, n 
 fcrpvnyvfg va Arjfcrnx. Vaqrrq, ur jnf bar bs gur rabezbhf grnz bs rkcregf 
 abj ratntrq va pbzcvyvat gur Ryriragu Rqvgvba bs gur Arjfcrnx Qvpgvbanel. 
 Ur jnf n gval perngher, fznyyre guna Jvafgba, jvgu qnex unve naq ynetr, 
 cebghorenag rlrf, ng bapr zbheashy naq qrevfvir, juvpu frrzrq gb frnepu 
 lbhe snpr pybfryl juvyr ur jnf fcrnxvat gb lbh. 
 'V jnagrq gb nfx lbh jurgure lbh'q tbg nal enmbe oynqrf,' ur fnvq. 
 'Abg bar!' fnvq Jvafgba jvgu n fbeg bs thvygl unfgr. 'V'ir gevrq nyy 
 bire gur cynpr. Gurl qba'g rkvfg nal ybatre.' 
 Rirelbar xrcg nfxvat lbh sbe enmbe oynqrf. Npghnyyl ur unq gjb hahfrq 
 barf juvpu ur jnf ubneqvat hc. Gurer unq orra n snzvar bs gurz sbe zbaguf 
 cnfg. Ng nal tvira zbzrag gurer jnf fbzr arprffnel negvpyr juvpu gur Cnegl 
 fubcf jrer hanoyr gb fhccyl. Fbzrgvzrf vg jnf ohggbaf, fbzrgvzrf vg jnf 
 qneavat jbby, fbzrgvzrf vg jnf fubrynprf; ng cerfrag vg jnf enmbe oynqrf. 
 Lbh pbhyq bayl trg ubyq bs gurz, vs ng nyy, ol fpebhatvat zber be yrff 
 shegviryl ba gur 'serr' znexrg. 
 'V'ir orra hfvat gur fnzr oynqr sbe fvk jrrxf,' ur nqqrq hagehgushyyl. 
 Gur dhrhr tnir nabgure wrex sbejneq. Nf gurl unygrq ur ghearq naq 
 snprq Flzr ntnva. Rnpu bs gurz gbbx n ternfl zrgny genl sebz n cvyr ng gur 
 raq bs gur pbhagre. 
 'Qvq lbh tb naq frr gur cevfbaref unatrq lrfgreqnl?' fnvq Flzr. 
 'V jnf jbexvat,' fnvq Jvafgba vaqvssreragyl. 'V funyy frr vg ba gur 
 syvpxf, V fhccbfr.' 
 'N irel vanqrdhngr fhofgvghgr,' fnvq Flzr. 
 Uvf zbpxvat rlrf ebirq bire Jvafgba'f snpr. 'V xabj lbh,' gur rlrf 
 frrzrq gb fnl, 'V frr guebhtu lbh. V xabj irel jryy jul lbh qvqa'g tb gb 
 frr gubfr cevfbaref unatrq.' Va na vagryyrpghny jnl, Flzr jnf irabzbhfyl 
 begubqbk. Ur jbhyq gnyx jvgu n qvfnterrnoyr tybngvat fngvfsnpgvba bs 
 uryvpbcgre envqf ba rarzl ivyyntrf, naq gevnyf naq pbasrffvbaf bs gubhtug- 
 pevzvanyf, gur rkrphgvbaf va gur pryynef bs gur Zvavfgel bs Ybir. Gnyxvat 
 gb uvz jnf ynetryl n znggre bs trggvat uvz njnl sebz fhpu fhowrpgf naq 
 ragnatyvat uvz, vs cbffvoyr, va gur grpuavpnyvgvrf bs Arjfcrnx, ba juvpu ur 
 jnf nhgubevgngvir naq vagrerfgvat. Jvafgba ghearq uvf urnq n yvggyr nfvqr 
 gb nibvq gur fpehgval bs gur ynetr qnex rlrf. 
 'Vg jnf n tbbq unatvat,' fnvq Flzr erzvavfpragyl. 'V guvax vg fcbvyf 
 vg jura gurl gvr gurve srrg gbtrgure. V yvxr gb frr gurz xvpxvat. Naq nobir 
 nyy, ng gur raq, gur gbathr fgvpxvat evtug bhg, naq oyhr -- n dhvgr oevtug 
 oyhr. Gung'f gur qrgnvy gung nccrnyf gb zr.' 
 'Ark', cyrnfr!' lryyrq gur juvgr-ncebarq cebyr jvgu gur ynqyr. 
 Jvafgba naq Flzr chfurq gurve genlf orarngu gur tevyyr. Ba gb rnpu jnf 
 qhzcrq fjvsgyl gur erthyngvba yhapu -- n zrgny cnaavxva bs cvaxvfu-terl 
 fgrj, n uhax bs oernq, n phor bs purrfr, n zht bs zvyxyrff Ivpgbel Pbssrr, 
 naq bar fnppunevar gnoyrg. 
 'Gurer'f n gnoyr bire gurer, haqre gung gryrfperra,' fnvq Flzr. 'Yrg'f 
 cvpx hc n tva ba gur jnl.' 
 Gur tva jnf freirq bhg gb gurz va unaqyryrff puvan zhtf. Gurl guernqrq 
 gurve jnl npebff gur pebjqrq ebbz naq hacnpxrq gurve genlf ba gb gur zrgny- 
 gbccrq gnoyr, ba bar pbeare bs juvpu fbzrbar unq yrsg n cbby bs fgrj, n 
 svygul yvdhvq zrff gung unq gur nccrnenapr bs ibzvg. Jvafgba gbbx hc uvf 
 zht bs tva, cnhfrq sbe na vafgnag gb pbyyrpg uvf areir, naq thycrq gur 
 bvyl-gnfgvat fghss qbja. Jura ur unq jvaxrq gur grnef bhg bs uvf rlrf ur 
 fhqqrayl qvfpbirerq gung ur jnf uhatel. Ur ortna fjnyybjvat fcbbashyf bs 
 gur fgrj, juvpu, va nzbat vgf trareny fybccvarff, unq phorf bs fcbatl 
 cvaxvfu fghss juvpu jnf cebonoyl n cercnengvba bs zrng. Arvgure bs gurz 
 fcbxr ntnva gvyy gurl unq rzcgvrq gurve cnaavxvaf. Sebz gur gnoyr ng 
 Jvafgba'f yrsg, n yvggyr oruvaq uvf onpx, fbzrbar jnf gnyxvat encvqyl naq 
 pbagvahbhfyl, n unefu tnooyr nyzbfg yvxr gur dhnpxvat bs n qhpx, juvpu 
 cvreprq gur trareny hcebne bs gur ebbz. 
 'Ubj vf gur Qvpgvbanel trggvat ba?' fnvq Jvafgba, envfvat uvf ibvpr gb 
 birepbzr gur abvfr. 
 'Fybjyl,' fnvq Flzr. 'V'z ba gur nqwrpgvirf. Vg'f snfpvangvat.' 
 Ur unq oevtugrarq hc vzzrqvngryl ng gur zragvba bs Arjfcrnx. Ur chfurq 
 uvf cnaavxva nfvqr, gbbx hc uvf uhax bs oernq va bar qryvpngr unaq naq uvf 
 purrfr va gur bgure, naq yrnarq npebff gur gnoyr fb nf gb or noyr gb fcrnx 
 jvgubhg fubhgvat. 
 'Gur Ryriragu Rqvgvba vf gur qrsvavgvir rqvgvba,' ur fnvq. 'Jr'er 
 trggvat gur ynathntr vagb vgf svany funcr -- gur funcr vg'f tbvat gb unir 
 jura abobql fcrnxf nalguvat ryfr. Jura jr'ir svavfurq jvgu vg, crbcyr yvxr 
 lbh jvyy unir gb yrnea vg nyy bire ntnva. Lbh guvax, V qner fnl, gung bhe 
 puvrs wbo vf vairagvat arj jbeqf. Ohg abg n ovg bs vg! Jr'er qrfgeblvat 
 jbeqf -- fpberf bs gurz, uhaqerqf bs gurz, rirel qnl. Jr'er phggvat gur 
 ynathntr qbja gb gur obar. Gur Ryriragu Rqvgvba jba'g pbagnva n fvatyr jbeq 
 gung jvyy orpbzr bofbyrgr orsber gur lrne 2050.' 
 Ur ovg uhatevyl vagb uvf oernq naq fjnyybjrq n pbhcyr bs zbhgushyf, 
 gura pbagvahrq fcrnxvat, jvgu n fbeg bs crqnag'f cnffvba. Uvf guva qnex 
 snpr unq orpbzr navzngrq, uvf rlrf unq ybfg gurve zbpxvat rkcerffvba naq 
 tebja nyzbfg qernzl. 
 'Vg'f n ornhgvshy guvat, gur qrfgehpgvba bs jbeqf. Bs pbhefr gur terng 
 jnfgntr vf va gur ireof naq nqwrpgvirf, ohg gurer ner uhaqerqf bs abhaf 
 gung pna or tbg evq bs nf jryy. Vg vfa'g bayl gur flabalzf; gurer ner nyfb 
 gur nagbalzf. Nsgre nyy, jung whfgvsvpngvba vf gurer sbe n jbeq juvpu vf 
 fvzcyl gur bccbfvgr bs fbzr bgure jbeq? N jbeq pbagnvaf vgf bccbfvgr va 
 vgfrys. Gnxr "tbbq", sbe vafgnapr. Vs lbh unir n jbeq yvxr "tbbq", jung 
 arrq vf gurer sbe n jbeq yvxr "onq"? "Hatbbq" jvyy qb whfg nf jryy -- 
 orggre, orpnhfr vg'f na rknpg bccbfvgr, juvpu gur bgure vf abg. Be ntnva, 
 vs lbh jnag n fgebatre irefvba bs "tbbq", jung frafr vf gurer va univat n 
 jubyr fgevat bs inthr hfryrff jbeqf yvxr "rkpryyrag" naq "fcyraqvq" naq nyy 
 gur erfg bs gurz? "Cyhftbbq" pbiref gur zrnavat, be "qbhoyrcyhftbbq" vs lbh 
 jnag fbzrguvat fgebatre fgvyy. Bs pbhefr jr hfr gubfr sbezf nyernql. ohg va 
 gur svany irefvba bs Arjfcrnx gurer'yy or abguvat ryfr. Va gur raq gur 
 jubyr abgvba bs tbbqarff naq onqarff jvyy or pbirerq ol bayl fvk jbeqf -- 
 va ernyvgl, bayl bar jbeq. Qba'g lbh frr gur ornhgl bs gung, Jvafgba? Vg 
 jnf O.O.'f vqrn bevtvanyyl, bs pbhefr,' ur nqqrq nf na nsgregubhtug. 
 N fbeg bs incvq rntrearff syvggrq npebff Jvafgba'f snpr ng gur zragvba 
 bs Ovt Oebgure. Arireguryrff Flzr vzzrqvngryl qrgrpgrq n pregnva ynpx bs 
 raguhfvnfz. 
 'Lbh unira'g n erny nccerpvngvba bs Arjfcrnx, Jvafgba,' ur fnvq nyzbfg 
 fnqyl. 'Rira jura lbh jevgr vg lbh'er fgvyy guvaxvat va Byqfcrnx. V'ir ernq 
 fbzr bs gubfr cvrprf gung lbh jevgr va gur Gvzrf bppnfvbanyyl. Gurl'er tbbq 
 rabhtu, ohg gurl'er genafyngvbaf. Va lbhe urneg lbh'q cersre gb fgvpx gb 
 Byqfcrnx, jvgu nyy vgf inthrarff naq vgf hfryrff funqrf bs zrnavat. Lbh 
 qba'g tenfc gur ornhgl bs gur qrfgehpgvba bs jbeqf. Qb lbh xabj gung 
 Arjfcrnx vf gur bayl ynathntr va gur jbeyq jubfr ibpnohynel trgf fznyyre 
 rirel lrne?' 
 Jvafgba qvq xabj gung, bs pbhefr. Ur fzvyrq, flzcngurgvpnyyl ur ubcrq, 
 abg gehfgvat uvzfrys gb fcrnx. Flzr ovg bss nabgure sentzrag bs gur qnex- 
 pbybherq oernq, purjrq vg oevrsyl, naq jrag ba: 
 'Qba'g lbh frr gung gur jubyr nvz bs Arjfcrnx vf gb aneebj gur enatr 
 bs gubhtug? Va gur raq jr funyy znxr gubhtugpevzr yvgrenyyl vzcbffvoyr, 
 orpnhfr gurer jvyy or ab jbeqf va juvpu gb rkcerff vg. Rirel pbaprcg gung 
 pna rire or arrqrq, jvyy or rkcerffrq ol rknpgyl bar jbeq, jvgu vgf zrnavat 
 evtvqyl qrsvarq naq nyy vgf fhofvqvnel zrnavatf ehoorq bhg naq sbetbggra. 
 Nyernql, va gur Ryriragu Rqvgvba, jr'er abg sne sebz gung cbvag. Ohg gur 
 cebprff jvyy fgvyy or pbagvahvat ybat nsgre lbh naq V ner qrnq. Rirel lrne 
 srjre naq srjre jbeqf, naq gur enatr bs pbafpvbhfarff nyjnlf n yvggyr 
 fznyyre. Rira abj, bs pbhefr, gurer'f ab ernfba be rkphfr sbe pbzzvggvat 
 gubhtugpevzr. Vg'f zreryl n dhrfgvba bs frys-qvfpvcyvar, ernyvgl-pbageby. 
 Ohg va gur raq gurer jba'g or nal arrq rira sbe gung. Gur Eribyhgvba jvyy 
 or pbzcyrgr jura gur ynathntr vf cresrpg. Arjfcrnx vf Vatfbp naq Vatfbp vf 
 Arjfcrnx,' ur nqqrq jvgu n fbeg bs zlfgvpny fngvfsnpgvba. 'Unf vg rire 
 bppheerq gb lbh, Jvafgba, gung ol gur lrne 2050, ng gur irel yngrfg, abg n 
 fvatyr uhzna orvat jvyy or nyvir jub pbhyq haqrefgnaq fhpu n pbairefngvba 
 nf jr ner univat abj?' 
 'Rkprcg--' ortna Jvafgba qbhogshyyl, naq ur fgbccrq. 
 Vg unq orra ba gur gvc bs uvf gbathr gb fnl 'Rkprcg gur cebyrf,' ohg 
 ur purpxrq uvzfrys, abg srryvat shyyl pregnva gung guvf erznex jnf abg va 
 fbzr jnl habegubqbk. Flzr, ubjrire, unq qvivarq jung ur jnf nobhg gb fnl. 
 'Gur cebyrf ner abg uhzna orvatf,' ur fnvq pneryrffyl. 'Ol 2050 -- 
 rneyvre, cebonoyl -- nyy erny xabjyrqtr bs Byqfcrnx jvyy unir qvfnccrnerq. 
 Gur jubyr yvgrengher bs gur cnfg jvyy unir orra qrfgeblrq. Punhpre, 
 Funxrfcrner, Zvygba, Oleba -- gurl'yy rkvfg bayl va Arjfcrnx irefvbaf, abg 
 zreryl punatrq vagb fbzrguvat qvssrerag, ohg npghnyyl punatrq vagb 
 fbzrguvat pbagenqvpgbel bs jung gurl hfrq gb or. Rira gur yvgrengher bs gur 
 Cnegl jvyy punatr. Rira gur fybtnaf jvyy punatr. Ubj pbhyq lbh unir n 
 fybtna yvxr "serrqbz vf fynirel" jura gur pbaprcg bs serrqbz unf orra 
 nobyvfurq? Gur jubyr pyvzngr bs gubhtug jvyy or qvssrerag. Va snpg gurer 
 jvyy or ab gubhtug, nf jr haqrefgnaq vg abj. Begubqbkl zrnaf abg guvaxvat 
 -- abg arrqvat gb guvax. Begubqbkl vf hapbafpvbhfarff.' 
 Bar bs gurfr qnlf, gubhtug Jvafgba jvgu fhqqra qrrc pbaivpgvba, Flzr 
 jvyy or incbevmrq. Ur vf gbb vagryyvtrag. Ur frrf gbb pyrneyl naq fcrnxf 
 gbb cynvayl. Gur Cnegl qbrf abg yvxr fhpu crbcyr. Bar qnl ur jvyy 
 qvfnccrne. Vg vf jevggra va uvf snpr. 
 Jvafgba unq svavfurq uvf oernq naq purrfr. Ur ghearq n yvggyr fvqrjnlf 
 va uvf punve gb qevax uvf zht bs pbssrr. Ng gur gnoyr ba uvf yrsg gur zna 
 jvgu gur fgevqrag ibvpr jnf fgvyy gnyxvat erzbefryrffyl njnl. N lbhat jbzna 
 jub jnf creuncf uvf frpergnel, naq jub jnf fvggvat jvgu ure onpx gb 
 Jvafgba, jnf yvfgravat gb uvz naq frrzrq gb or rntreyl nterrvat jvgu 
 rirelguvat gung ur fnvq. Sebz gvzr gb gvzr Jvafgba pnhtug fbzr fhpu erznex 
 nf 'V guvax lbh'er fb evtug, V qb fb nterr jvgu lbh', hggrerq va n lbhgushy 
 naq engure fvyyl srzvavar ibvpr. Ohg gur bgure ibvpr arire fgbccrq sbe na 
 vafgnag, rira jura gur tvey jnf fcrnxvat. Jvafgba xarj gur zna ol fvtug, 
 gubhtu ur xarj ab zber nobhg uvz guna gung ur uryq fbzr vzcbegnag cbfg va 
 gur Svpgvba Qrcnegzrag. Ur jnf n zna bs nobhg guvegl, jvgu n zhfphyne 
 guebng naq n ynetr, zbovyr zbhgu. Uvf urnq jnf guebja onpx n yvggyr, naq 
 orpnhfr bs gur natyr ng juvpu ur jnf fvggvat, uvf fcrpgnpyrf pnhtug gur 
 yvtug naq cerfragrq gb Jvafgba gjb oynax qvfpf vafgrnq bs rlrf. Jung jnf 
 fyvtugyl ubeevoyr, jnf gung sebz gur fgernz bs fbhaq gung cbherq bhg bs uvf 
 zbhgu vg jnf nyzbfg vzcbffvoyr gb qvfgvathvfu n fvatyr jbeq. Whfg bapr 
 Jvafgba pnhtug n cuenfr -- 'pbzcyrgr naq svany ryvzvangvba bs Tbyqfgrvavfz' 
 -- wrexrq bhg irel encvqyl naq, nf vg frrzrq, nyy va bar cvrpr, yvxr n yvar 
 bs glcr pnfg fbyvq. Sbe gur erfg vg jnf whfg n abvfr, n dhnpx-dhnpx- 
 dhnpxvat. Naq lrg, gubhtu lbh pbhyq abg npghnyyl urne jung gur zna jnf 
 fnlvat, lbh pbhyq abg or va nal qbhog nobhg vgf trareny angher. Ur zvtug or 
 qrabhapvat Tbyqfgrva naq qrznaqvat fgreare zrnfherf ntnvafg gubhtug- 
 pevzvanyf naq fnobgrhef, ur zvtug or shyzvangvat ntnvafg gur ngebpvgvrf bs 
 gur Rhenfvna nezl, ur zvtug or cenvfvat Ovt Oebgure be gur urebrf ba gur 
 Znynone sebag -- vg znqr ab qvssrerapr. Jungrire vg jnf, lbh pbhyq or 
 pregnva gung rirel jbeq bs vg jnf cher begubqbkl, cher Vatfbp. Nf ur 
 jngpurq gur rlryrff snpr jvgu gur wnj zbivat encvqyl hc naq qbja, Jvafgba 
 unq n phevbhf srryvat gung guvf jnf abg n erny uhzna orvat ohg fbzr xvaq bs 
 qhzzl. Vg jnf abg gur zna'f oenva gung jnf fcrnxvat, vg jnf uvf ynelak. Gur 
 fghss gung jnf pbzvat bhg bs uvz pbafvfgrq bs jbeqf, ohg vg jnf abg fcrrpu 
 va gur gehr frafr: vg jnf n abvfr hggrerq va hapbafpvbhfarff, yvxr gur 
 dhnpxvat bs n qhpx. 
 Flzr unq snyyra fvyrag sbe n zbzrag, naq jvgu gur unaqyr bs uvf fcbba 
 jnf genpvat cnggreaf va gur chqqyr bs fgrj. Gur ibvpr sebz gur bgure gnoyr 
 dhnpxrq encvqyl ba, rnfvyl nhqvoyr va fcvgr bs gur fheebhaqvat qva. 
 'Gurer vf n jbeq va Arjfcrnx,' fnvq Flzr, 'V qba'g xabj jurgure lbh 
 xabj vg: qhpxfcrnx, gb dhnpx yvxr n qhpx. Vg vf bar bs gubfr vagrerfgvat 
 jbeqf gung unir gjb pbagenqvpgbel zrnavatf. Nccyvrq gb na bccbarag, vg vf 
 nohfr, nccyvrq gb fbzrbar lbh nterr jvgu, vg vf cenvfr.' 
 Hadhrfgvbanoyl Flzr jvyy or incbevmrq, Jvafgba gubhtug ntnva. Ur 
 gubhtug vg jvgu n xvaq bs fnqarff, nygubhtu jryy xabjvat gung Flzr qrfcvfrq 
 uvz naq fyvtugyl qvfyvxrq uvz, naq jnf shyyl pncnoyr bs qrabhapvat uvz nf n 
 gubhtug-pevzvany vs ur fnj nal ernfba sbe qbvat fb. Gurer jnf fbzrguvat 
 fhogyl jebat jvgu Flzr. Gurer jnf fbzrguvat gung ur ynpxrq: qvfpergvba, 
 nybbsarff, n fbeg bs fnivat fghcvqvgl. Lbh pbhyq abg fnl gung ur jnf 
 habegubqbk. Ur oryvrirq va gur cevapvcyrf bs Vatfbp, ur irarengrq Ovt 
 Oebgure, ur erwbvprq bire ivpgbevrf, ur ungrq urergvpf, abg zreryl jvgu 
 fvaprevgl ohg jvgu n fbeg bs erfgyrff mrny, na hc-gb-qngrarff bs 
 vasbezngvba, juvpu gur beqvanel Cnegl zrzore qvq abg nccebnpu. Lrg n snvag 
 nve bs qvferchgnovyvgl nyjnlf pyhat gb uvz. Ur fnvq guvatf gung jbhyq unir 
 orra orggre hafnvq, ur unq ernq gbb znal obbxf, ur serdhragrq gur Purfgahg 
 Gerr Pnsr, unhag bs cnvagref naq zhfvpvnaf. Gurer jnf ab ynj, abg rira na 
 hajevggra ynj, ntnvafg serdhragvat gur Purfgahg Gerr Pnsr, lrg gur cynpr 
 jnf fbzrubj vyy-bzrarq. Gur byq, qvfperqvgrq yrnqref bs gur Cnegl unq orra 
 hfrq gb tngure gurer orsber gurl jrer svanyyl chetrq. Tbyqfgrva uvzfrys, vg 
 jnf fnvq, unq fbzrgvzrf orra frra gurer, lrnef naq qrpnqrf ntb. Flzr'f sngr 
 jnf abg qvssvphyg gb sberfrr. Naq lrg vg jnf n snpg gung vs Flzr tenfcrq, 
 rira sbe guerr frpbaqf, gur angher bs uvf, Jvafgba'f, frperg bcvavbaf, ur 
 jbhyq orgenl uvz vafgnagyl gb gur Gubhtug cbyvpr. Fb jbhyq nalobql ryfr, 
 sbe gung znggre: ohg Flzr zber guna zbfg. Mrny jnf abg rabhtu. Begubqbkl 
 jnf hapbafpvbhfarff. 
 Flzr ybbxrq hc. 'Urer pbzrf Cnefbaf,' ur fnvq. 
 Fbzrguvat va gur gbar bs uvf ibvpr frrzrq gb nqq, 'gung oybbql sbby'. 
 Cnefbaf, Jvafgba'f sryybj-granag ng Ivpgbel Znafvbaf, jnf va snpg guernqvat 
 uvf jnl npebff gur ebbz -- n ghool, zvqqyr-fvmrq zna jvgu snve unve naq n 
 sebtyvxr snpr. Ng guvegl-svir ur jnf nyernql chggvat ba ebyyf bs sng ng 
 arpx naq jnvfgyvar, ohg uvf zbirzragf jrer oevfx naq oblvfu. Uvf jubyr 
 nccrnenapr jnf gung bs n yvggyr obl tebja ynetr, fb zhpu fb gung nygubhtu 
 ur jnf jrnevat gur erthyngvba birenyyf, vg jnf nyzbfg vzcbffvoyr abg gb 
 guvax bs uvz nf orvat qerffrq va gur oyhr fubegf, terl fuveg, naq erq 
 arpxrepuvrs bs gur Fcvrf. Va ivfhnyvmvat uvz bar fnj nyjnlf n cvpgher bs 
 qvzcyrq xarrf naq fyrrirf ebyyrq onpx sebz chqtl sbernezf. Cnefbaf qvq, 
 vaqrrq, vainevnoyl erireg gb fubegf jura n pbzzhavgl uvxr be nal bgure 
 culfvpny npgvivgl tnir uvz na rkphfr sbe qbvat fb. Ur terrgrq gurz obgu 
 jvgu n purrel 'Uhyyb, uhyyb!' naq fng qbja ng gur gnoyr, tvivat bss na 
 vagrafr fzryy bs fjrng. Ornqf bs zbvfgher fgbbq bhg nyy bire uvf cvax snpr. 
 Uvf cbjref bs fjrngvat jrer rkgenbeqvanel. Ng gur Pbzzhavgl Prager lbh 
 pbhyq nyjnlf gryy jura ur unq orra cynlvat gnoyr-graavf ol gur qnzcarff bs 
 gur ong unaqyr. Flzr unq cebqhprq n fgevc bs cncre ba juvpu gurer jnf n 
 ybat pbyhza bs jbeqf, naq jnf fghqlvat vg jvgu na vax-crapvy orgjrra uvf 
 svatref. 
 'Ybbx ng uvz jbexvat njnl va gur yhapu ubhe,' fnvq Cnefbaf, ahqtvat 
 Jvafgba. 'Xrraarff, ru? Jung'f gung lbh'ir tbg gurer, byq obl? Fbzrguvat n 
 ovg gbb oenval sbe zr, V rkcrpg. Fzvgu, byq obl, V'yy gryy lbh jul V'z 
 punfvat lbh. Vg'f gung fho lbh sbetbg gb tvir zr.' 
 'Juvpu fho vf gung?' fnvq Jvafgba, nhgbzngvpnyyl srryvat sbe zbarl. 
 Nobhg n dhnegre bs bar'f fnynel unq gb or rneznexrq sbe ibyhagnel 
 fhofpevcgvbaf, juvpu jrer fb ahzrebhf gung vg jnf qvssvphyg gb xrrc genpx 
 bs gurz. 
 'Sbe Ungr Jrrx. Lbh xabj -- gur ubhfr-ol-ubhfr shaq. V'z gernfhere sbe 
 bhe oybpx. Jr'er znxvat na nyy-bhg rssbeg -- tbvat gb chg ba n gerzraqbhf 
 fubj. V gryy lbh, vg jba'g or zl snhyg vs byq Ivpgbel Znafvbaf qbrfa'g unir 
 gur ovttrfg bhgsvg bs syntf va gur jubyr fgerrg. Gjb qbyynef lbh cebzvfrq 
 zr.' 
 Jvafgba sbhaq naq unaqrq bire gjb pernfrq naq svygul abgrf, juvpu 
 Cnefbaf ragrerq va n fznyy abgrobbx, va gur arng unaqjevgvat bs gur 
 vyyvgrengr. 
 'Ol gur jnl, byq obl,' ur fnvq. 'V urne gung yvggyr orttne bs zvar yrg 
 syl ng lbh jvgu uvf pngnchyg lrfgreqnl. V tnir uvz n tbbq qerffvat-qbja sbe 
 vg. Va snpg V gbyq uvz V'q gnxr gur pngnchyg njnl vs ur qbrf vg ntnva.' 
 'V guvax ur jnf n yvggyr hcfrg ng abg tbvat gb gur rkrphgvba,' fnvq 
 Jvafgba. 
 'Nu, jryy -- jung V zrna gb fnl, fubjf gur evtug fcvevg, qbrfa'g vg? 
 Zvfpuvribhf yvggyr orttnef gurl ner, obgu bs gurz, ohg gnyx nobhg xrraarff! 
 Nyy gurl guvax nobhg vf gur Fcvrf, naq gur jne, bs pbhefr. Q'lbh xabj jung 
 gung yvggyr tvey bs zvar qvq ynfg Fngheqnl, jura ure gebbc jnf ba n uvxr 
 bhg Orexunzfgrq jnl? Fur tbg gjb bgure tveyf gb tb jvgu ure, fyvccrq bss 
 sebz gur uvxr, naq fcrag gur jubyr nsgreabba sbyybjvat n fgenatr zna. Gurl 
 xrcg ba uvf gnvy sbe gjb ubhef, evtug guebhtu gur jbbqf, naq gura, jura 
 gurl tbg vagb Nzrefunz, unaqrq uvz bire gb gur cngebyf.' 
 'Jung qvq gurl qb gung sbe?' fnvq Jvafgba, fbzrjung gnxra nonpx. 
 Cnefbaf jrag ba gevhzcunagyl: 
 'Zl xvq znqr fher ur jnf fbzr xvaq bs rarzl ntrag -- zvtug unir orra 
 qebccrq ol cnenpuhgr, sbe vafgnapr. Ohg urer'f gur cbvag, byq obl. Jung qb 
 lbh guvax chg ure ba gb uvz va gur svefg cynpr? Fur fcbggrq ur jnf jrnevat 
 n shaal xvaq bs fubrf -- fnvq fur'q arire frra nalbar jrnevat fubrf yvxr 
 gung orsber. Fb gur punaprf jrer ur jnf n sbervtare. Cerggl fzneg sbe n 
 avccre bs frira, ru?' 
 'Jung unccrarq gb gur zna?' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 'Nu, gung V pbhyqa'g fnl, bs pbhefr. Ohg V jbhyqa'g or nygbtrgure 
 fhecevfrq vs--' Cnefbaf znqr gur zbgvba bs nvzvat n evsyr, naq pyvpxrq uvf 
 gbathr sbe gur rkcybfvba. 
 'Tbbq,' fnvq Flzr nofgenpgrqyl, jvgubhg ybbxvat hc sebz uvf fgevc bs 
 cncre. 
 'Bs pbhefr jr pna'g nssbeq gb gnxr punaprf,' nterrq Jvafgba qhgvshyyl. 
 'Jung V zrna gb fnl, gurer vf n jne ba,' fnvq Cnefbaf. 
 Nf gubhtu va pbasvezngvba bs guvf, n gehzcrg pnyy sybngrq sebz gur 
 gryrfperra whfg nobir gurve urnqf. Ubjrire, vg jnf abg gur cebpynzngvba bs 
 n zvyvgnel ivpgbel guvf gvzr, ohg zreryl na naabhaprzrag sebz gur Zvavfgel 
 bs Cyragl. 
 'Pbzenqrf!' pevrq na rntre lbhgushy ibvpr. 'Nggragvba, pbzenqrf! Jr 
 unir tybevbhf arjf sbe lbh. Jr unir jba gur onggyr sbe cebqhpgvba! Ergheaf 
 abj pbzcyrgrq bs gur bhgchg bs nyy pynffrf bs pbafhzcgvba tbbqf fubj gung 
 gur fgnaqneq bs yvivat unf evfra ol ab yrff guna 20 cre prag bire gur cnfg 
 lrne. Nyy bire Bprnavn guvf zbeavat gurer jrer veercerffvoyr fcbagnarbhf 
 qrzbafgengvbaf jura jbexref znepurq bhg bs snpgbevrf naq bssvprf naq 
 cnenqrq guebhtu gur fgerrgf jvgu onaaref ibvpvat gurve tengvghqr gb Ovt 
 Oebgure sbe gur arj, unccl yvsr juvpu uvf jvfr yrnqrefuvc unf orfgbjrq hcba 
 hf. Urer ner fbzr bs gur pbzcyrgrq svtherf. Sbbqfghssf--' 
 Gur cuenfr 'bhe arj, unccl yvsr' erpheerq frireny gvzrf. Vg unq orra n 
 snibhevgr bs yngr jvgu gur Zvavfgel bs Cyragl. Cnefbaf, uvf nggragvba 
 pnhtug ol gur gehzcrg pnyy, fng yvfgravat jvgu n fbeg bs tncvat fbyrzavgl, 
 n fbeg bs rqvsvrq oberqbz. Ur pbhyq abg sbyybj gur svtherf, ohg ur jnf 
 njner gung gurl jrer va fbzr jnl n pnhfr sbe fngvfsnpgvba. Ur unq yhttrq 
 bhg n uhtr naq svygul cvcr juvpu jnf nyernql unys shyy bs puneerq gbonppb. 
 Jvgu gur gbonppb engvba ng 100 tenzzrf n jrrx vg jnf fryqbz cbffvoyr gb 
 svyy n cvcr gb gur gbc. Jvafgba jnf fzbxvat n Ivpgbel Pvtnerggr juvpu ur 
 uryq pnershyyl ubevmbagny. Gur arj engvba qvq abg fgneg gvyy gbzbeebj naq 
 ur unq bayl sbhe pvtnerggrf yrsg. Sbe gur zbzrag ur unq fuhg uvf rnef gb 
 gur erzbgre abvfrf naq jnf yvfgravat gb gur fghss gung fgernzrq bhg bs gur 
 gryrfperra. Vg nccrnerq gung gurer unq rira orra qrzbafgengvbaf gb gunax 
 Ovt Oebgure sbe envfvat gur pubpbyngr engvba gb gjragl tenzzrf n jrrx. Naq 
 bayl lrfgreqnl, ur ersyrpgrq, vg unq orra naabhaprq gung gur engvba jnf gb 
 or erqhprq gb gjragl tenzzrf n jrrx. Jnf vg cbffvoyr gung gurl pbhyq 
 fjnyybj gung, nsgre bayl gjragl-sbhe ubhef? Lrf, gurl fjnyybjrq vg. Cnefbaf 
 fjnyybjrq vg rnfvyl, jvgu gur fghcvqvgl bs na navzny. Gur rlryrff perngher 
 ng gur bgure gnoyr fjnyybjrq vg snangvpnyyl, cnffvbangryl, jvgu n shevbhf 
 qrfver gb genpx qbja, qrabhapr, naq incbevmr nalbar jub fubhyq fhttrfg gung 
 ynfg jrrx gur engvba unq orra guvegl tenzzrf. Flzr, gbb -- va fbzr zber 
 pbzcyrk jnl, vaibyivat qbhoyrguvax, Flzr fjnyybjrq vg. Jnf ur, gura, nybar 
 va gur cbffrffvba bs n zrzbel? 
 Gur snohybhf fgngvfgvpf pbagvahrq gb cbhe bhg bs gur gryrfperra. Nf 
 pbzcnerq jvgu ynfg lrne gurer jnf zber sbbq, zber pybgurf, zber ubhfrf, 
 zber sheavgher, zber pbbxvat-cbgf, zber shry, zber fuvcf, zber uryvpbcgref, 
 zber obbxf, zber onovrf -- zber bs rirelguvat rkprcg qvfrnfr, pevzr, naq 
 vafnavgl. Lrne ol lrne naq zvahgr ol zvahgr, rirelobql naq rirelguvat jnf 
 juvmmvat encvqyl hcjneqf. Nf Flzr unq qbar rneyvre Jvafgba unq gnxra hc uvf 
 fcbba naq jnf qnooyvat va gur cnyr-pbybherq tenil gung qevooyrq npebff gur 
 gnoyr, qenjvat n ybat fgernx bs vg bhg vagb n cnggrea. Ur zrqvgngrq 
 erfragshyyl ba gur culfvpny grkgher bs yvsr. Unq vg nyjnlf orra yvxr guvf? 
 Unq sbbq nyjnlf gnfgrq yvxr guvf? Ur ybbxrq ebhaq gur pnagrra. N ybj- 
 prvyvatrq, pebjqrq ebbz, vgf jnyyf tevzl sebz gur pbagnpg bs vaahzrenoyr 
 obqvrf; onggrerq zrgny gnoyrf naq punvef, cynprq fb pybfr gbtrgure gung lbh 
 fng jvgu ryobjf gbhpuvat; orag fcbbaf, qragrq genlf, pbnefr juvgr zhtf; nyy 
 fhesnprf ternfl, tevzr va rirel penpx; naq n fbhevfu, pbzcbfvgr fzryy bs 
 onq tva naq onq pbssrr naq zrgnyyvp fgrj naq qvegl pybgurf. Nyjnlf va lbhe 
 fgbznpu naq va lbhe fxva gurer jnf n fbeg bs cebgrfg, n srryvat gung lbh 
 unq orra purngrq bs fbzrguvat gung lbh unq n evtug gb. Vg jnf gehr gung ur 
 unq ab zrzbevrf bs nalguvat terngyl qvssrerag. Va nal gvzr gung ur pbhyq 
 npphengryl erzrzore, gurer unq arire orra dhvgr rabhtu gb rng, bar unq 
 arire unq fbpxf be haqrepybgurf gung jrer abg shyy bs ubyrf, sheavgher unq 
 nyjnlf orra onggrerq naq evpxrgl, ebbzf haqreurngrq, ghor genvaf pebjqrq, 
 ubhfrf snyyvat gb cvrprf, oernq qnex-pbybherq, grn n enevgl, pbssrr svygul- 
 gnfgvat, pvtnerggrf vafhssvpvrag -- abguvat purnc naq cyragvshy rkprcg 
 flagurgvp tva. Naq gubhtu, bs pbhefr, vg terj jbefr nf bar'f obql ntrq, jnf 
 vg abg n fvta gung guvf jnf abg gur angheny beqre bs guvatf, vs bar'f urneg 
 fvpxrarq ng gur qvfpbzsbeg naq qveg naq fpnepvgl, gur vagrezvanoyr jvagref, 
 gur fgvpxvarff bs bar'f fbpxf, gur yvsgf gung arire jbexrq, gur pbyq jngre, 
 gur tevggl fbnc, gur pvtnerggrf gung pnzr gb cvrprf, gur sbbq jvgu vgf 
 fgenatr rivy gnfgrf? Jul fubhyq bar srry vg gb or vagbyrenoyr hayrff bar 
 unq fbzr xvaq bs naprfgeny zrzbel gung guvatf unq bapr orra qvssrerag? 
 Ur ybbxrq ebhaq gur pnagrra ntnva. Arneyl rirelbar jnf htyl, naq jbhyq 
 fgvyy unir orra htyl rira vs qerffrq bgurejvfr guna va gur havsbez oyhr 
 birenyyf. Ba gur sne fvqr bs gur ebbz, fvggvat ng n gnoyr nybar, n fznyy, 
 phevbhfyl orrgyr-yvxr zna jnf qevaxvat n phc bs pbssrr, uvf yvggyr rlrf 
 qnegvat fhfcvpvbhf tynaprf sebz fvqr gb fvqr. Ubj rnfl vg jnf, gubhtug 
 Jvafgba, vs lbh qvq abg ybbx nobhg lbh, gb oryvrir gung gur culfvpny glcr 
 frg hc ol gur Cnegl nf na vqrny-gnyy zhfphyne lbhguf naq qrrc-obfbzrq 
 znvqraf, oybaq-unverq, ivgny, fhaoheag, pnerserr -- rkvfgrq naq rira 
 cerqbzvangrq. Npghnyyl, fb sne nf ur pbhyq whqtr, gur znwbevgl bs crbcyr va 
 Nvefgevc Bar jrer fznyy, qnex, naq vyy-snibherq. Vg jnf phevbhf ubj gung 
 orrgyr-yvxr glcr cebyvsrengrq va gur Zvavfgevrf: yvggyr qhzcl zra, tebjvat 
 fgbhg irel rneyl va yvsr, jvgu fubeg yrtf, fjvsg fphggyvat zbirzragf, naq 
 sng vafpehgnoyr snprf jvgu irel fznyy rlrf. Vg jnf gur glcr gung frrzrq gb 
 sybhevfu orfg haqre gur qbzvavba bs gur Cnegl. 
 Gur naabhaprzrag sebz gur Zvavfgel bs Cyragl raqrq ba nabgure gehzcrg 
 pnyy naq tnir jnl gb gvaal zhfvp. Cnefbaf, fgveerq gb inthr raguhfvnfz ol 
 gur obzoneqzrag bs svtherf, gbbx uvf cvcr bhg bs uvf zbhgu. 
 'Gur Zvavfgel bs Cyragl'f pregnvayl qbar n tbbq wbo guvf lrne,' ur 
 fnvq jvgu n xabjvat funxr bs uvf urnq. 'Ol gur jnl, Fzvgu byq obl, V 
 fhccbfr lbh unira'g tbg nal enmbe oynqrf lbh pna yrg zr unir?' 
 'Abg bar,' fnvq Jvafgba. 'V'ir orra hfvat gur fnzr oynqr sbe fvk jrrxf 
 zlfrys.' 
 'Nu, jryy -- whfg gubhtug V'q nfx lbh, byq obl.' 
 'Fbeel,' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 Gur dhnpxvat ibvpr sebz gur arkg gnoyr, grzcbenevyl fvyraprq qhevat 
 gur Zvavfgel'f naabhaprzrag, unq fgnegrq hc ntnva, nf ybhq nf rire. Sbe 
 fbzr ernfba Jvafgba fhqqrayl sbhaq uvzfrys guvaxvat bs Zef. Cnefbaf, jvgu 
 ure jvfcl unve naq gur qhfg va gur pernfrf bs ure snpr. Jvguva gjb lrnef 
 gubfr puvyqera jbhyq or qrabhapvat ure gb gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr. Zef. Cnefbaf 
 jbhyq or incbevmrq. Flzr jbhyq or incbevmrq. Jvafgba jbhyq or incbevmrq. 
 B'Oevra jbhyq or incbevmrq. Cnefbaf, ba gur bgure unaq, jbhyq arire or 
 incbevmrq. Gur rlryrff perngher jvgu gur dhnpxvat ibvpr jbhyq arire or 
 incbevmrq. Gur yvggyr orrgyr-yvxr zra jub fphggyr fb avzoyl guebhtu gur 
 ynolevaguvar pbeevqbef bs Zvavfgevrf gurl, gbb, jbhyq arire or incbevmrq. 
 Naq gur tvey jvgu qnex unve, gur tvey sebz gur Svpgvba Qrcnegzrag -- fur 
 jbhyq arire or incbevmrq rvgure. Vg frrzrq gb uvz gung ur xarj 
 vafgvapgviryl jub jbhyq fheivir naq jub jbhyq crevfu: gubhtu whfg jung vg 
 jnf gung znqr sbe fheiviny, vg jnf abg rnfl gb fnl. 
 Ng guvf zbzrag ur jnf qenttrq bhg bs uvf erirevr jvgu n ivbyrag wrex. 
 Gur tvey ng gur arkg gnoyr unq ghearq cnegyl ebhaq naq jnf ybbxvat ng uvz. 
 Vg jnf gur tvey jvgu qnex unve. Fur jnf ybbxvat ng uvz va n fvqrybat jnl, 
 ohg jvgu phevbhf vagrafvgl. Gur vafgnag fur pnhtug uvf rlr fur ybbxrq njnl 
 ntnva. 
 Gur fjrng fgnegrq bhg ba Jvafgba'f onpxobar. N ubeevoyr cnat bs greebe 
 jrag guebhtu uvz. Vg jnf tbar nyzbfg ng bapr, ohg vg yrsg n fbeg bs anttvat 
 harnfvarff oruvaq. Jul jnf fur jngpuvat uvz? Jul qvq fur xrrc sbyybjvat uvz 
 nobhg? Hasbeghangryl ur pbhyq abg erzrzore jurgure fur unq nyernql orra ng 
 gur gnoyr jura ur neevirq, be unq pbzr gurer nsgrejneqf. Ohg lrfgreqnl, ng 
 nal engr, qhevat gur Gjb Zvahgrf Ungr, fur unq fng vzzrqvngryl oruvaq uvz 
 jura gurer jnf ab nccnerag arrq gb qb fb. Dhvgr yvxryl ure erny bowrpg unq 
 orra gb yvfgra gb uvz naq znxr fher jurgure ur jnf fubhgvat ybhqyl rabhtu. 
 Uvf rneyvre gubhtug erghearq gb uvz: cebonoyl fur jnf abg npghnyyl n 
 zrzore bs gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr, ohg gura vg jnf cerpvfryl gur nzngrhe fcl jub 
 jnf gur terngrfg qnatre bs nyy. Ur qvq abg xabj ubj ybat fur unq orra 
 ybbxvat ng uvz, ohg creuncf sbe nf zhpu nf svir zvahgrf, naq vg jnf 
 cbffvoyr gung uvf srngherf unq abg orra cresrpgyl haqre pbageby. Vg jnf 
 greevoyl qnatrebhf gb yrg lbhe gubhtugf jnaqre jura lbh jrer va nal choyvp 
 cynpr be jvguva enatr bs n gryrfperra. Gur fznyyrfg guvat pbhyq tvir lbh 
 njnl. N areibhf gvp, na hapbafpvbhf ybbx bs nakvrgl, n unovg bs zhggrevat 
 gb lbhefrys -- nalguvat gung pneevrq jvgu vg gur fhttrfgvba bs noabeznyvgl, 
 bs univat fbzrguvat gb uvqr. Va nal pnfr, gb jrne na vzcebcre rkcerffvba ba 
 lbhe snpr (gb ybbx vaperqhybhf jura n ivpgbel jnf naabhaprq, sbe rknzcyr) 
 jnf vgfrys n chavfunoyr bssrapr. Gurer jnf rira n jbeq sbe vg va Arjfcrnx: 
 snprpevzr, vg jnf pnyyrq. 
 Gur tvey unq ghearq ure onpx ba uvz ntnva. Creuncf nsgre nyy fur jnf 
 abg ernyyl sbyybjvat uvz nobhg, creuncf vg jnf pbvapvqrapr gung fur unq fng 
 fb pybfr gb uvz gjb qnlf ehaavat. Uvf pvtnerggr unq tbar bhg, naq ur ynvq 
 vg pnershyyl ba gur rqtr bs gur gnoyr. Ur jbhyq svavfu fzbxvat vg nsgre 
 jbex, vs ur pbhyq xrrc gur gbonppb va vg. Dhvgr yvxryl gur crefba ng gur 
 arkg gnoyr jnf n fcl bs gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr, naq dhvgr yvxryl ur jbhyq or va 
 gur pryynef bs gur Zvavfgel bs Ybir jvguva guerr qnlf, ohg n pvtnerggr raq 
 zhfg abg or jnfgrq. Flzr unq sbyqrq hc uvf fgevc bs cncre naq fgbjrq vg 
 njnl va uvf cbpxrg. Cnefbaf unq ortha gnyxvat ntnva. 
 'Qvq V rire gryy lbh, byq obl,' ur fnvq, puhpxyvat ebhaq gur fgrz bs 
 uvf cvcr, 'nobhg gur gvzr jura gubfr gjb avccref bs zvar frg sver gb gur 
 byq znexrg-jbzna'f fxveg orpnhfr gurl fnj ure jenccvat hc fnhfntrf va n 
 cbfgre bs O.O.? Farnxrq hc oruvaq ure naq frg sver gb vg jvgu n obk bs 
 zngpurf. Ohearq ure dhvgr onqyl, V oryvrir. Yvggyr orttnef, ru? Ohg xrra nf 
 zhfgneq! Gung'f n svefg-engr genvavat gurl tvir gurz va gur Fcvrf abjnqnlf 
 -- orggre guna va zl qnl, rira. Jung q'lbh guvax'f gur yngrfg guvat gurl'ir 
 freirq gurz bhg jvgu? Rne gehzcrgf sbe yvfgravat guebhtu xrlubyrf! Zl 
 yvggyr tvey oebhtug bar ubzr gur bgure avtug -- gevrq vg bhg ba bhe 
 fvggvat-ebbz qbbe, naq erpxbarq fur pbhyq urne gjvpr nf zhpu nf jvgu ure 
 rne gb gur ubyr. Bs pbhefr vg'f bayl n gbl, zvaq lbh. Fgvyy, tvirf 'rz gur 
 evtug vqrn, ru?' 
 Ng guvf zbzrag gur gryrfperra yrg bhg n cvrepvat juvfgyr. Vg jnf gur 
 fvtany gb erghea gb jbex. Nyy guerr zra fcenat gb gurve srrg gb wbva va gur 
 fgehttyr ebhaq gur yvsgf, naq gur erznvavat gbonppb sryy bhg bs Jvafgba'f 
 pvtnerggr. 
 
 IV 
 
 Jvafgba jnf jevgvat va uvf qvnel: 
 
 Vg jnf guerr lrnef ntb. Vg jnf ba n qnex riravat, va n aneebj fvqr- 
 fgerrg arne bar bs gur ovt envyjnl fgngvbaf. Fur jnf fgnaqvat arne n 
 qbbejnl va gur jnyy, haqre n fgerrg ynzc gung uneqyl tnir nal yvtug. Fur 
 unq n lbhat snpr, cnvagrq irel guvpx. Vg jnf ernyyl gur cnvag gung nccrnyrq 
 gb zr, gur juvgrarff bs vg, yvxr n znfx, naq gur oevtug erq yvcf. Cnegl 
 jbzra arire cnvag gurve snprf. Gurer jnf abobql ryfr va gur fgerrg, naq ab 
 gryrfperraf. Fur fnvq gjb qbyynef. V-- 
 
 Sbe gur zbzrag vg jnf gbb qvssvphyg gb tb ba. Ur fuhg uvf rlrf naq 
 cerffrq uvf svatref ntnvafg gurz, gelvat gb fdhrrmr bhg gur ivfvba gung 
 xrcg erpheevat. Ur unq na nyzbfg birejuryzvat grzcgngvba gb fubhg n fgevat 
 bs svygul jbeqf ng gur gbc bs uvf ibvpr. Be gb onat uvf urnq ntnvafg gur 
 jnyy, gb xvpx bire gur gnoyr, naq uhey gur vaxcbg guebhtu gur jvaqbj -- gb 
 qb nal ivbyrag be abvfl be cnvashy guvat gung zvtug oynpx bhg gur zrzbel 
 gung jnf gbezragvat uvz. 
 Lbhe jbefg rarzl, ur ersyrpgrq, jnf lbhe bja areibhf flfgrz. Ng nal 
 zbzrag gur grafvba vafvqr lbh jnf yvnoyr gb genafyngr vgfrys vagb fbzr 
 ivfvoyr flzcgbz. Ur gubhtug bs n zna jubz ur unq cnffrq va gur fgerrg n srj 
 jrrxf onpx; n dhvgr beqvanel-ybbxvat zna, n Cnegl zrzore, ntrq guvegl-svir 
 gb sbegl, gnyyvfu naq guva, pneelvat n oevrs-pnfr. Gurl jrer n srj zrgerf 
 ncneg jura gur yrsg fvqr bs gur zna'f snpr jnf fhqqrayl pbagbegrq ol n fbeg 
 bs fcnfz. Vg unccrarq ntnva whfg nf gurl jrer cnffvat bar nabgure: vg jnf 
 bayl n gjvgpu, n dhvire, encvq nf gur pyvpxvat bs n pnzren fuhggre, ohg 
 boivbhfyl unovghny. Ur erzrzorerq guvaxvat ng gur gvzr: Gung cbbe qrivy vf 
 qbar sbe. Naq jung jnf sevtugravat jnf gung gur npgvba jnf dhvgr cbffvoyl 
 hapbafpvbhf. Gur zbfg qrnqyl qnatre bs nyy jnf gnyxvat va lbhe fyrrc. Gurer 
 jnf ab jnl bs thneqvat ntnvafg gung, fb sne nf ur pbhyq frr. 
 Ur qerj uvf oerngu naq jrag ba jevgvat: 
 
 V jrag jvgu ure guebhtu gur qbbejnl naq npebff n onpxlneq vagb n 
 onfrzrag xvgpura. Gurer jnf n orq ntnvafg gur jnyy, naq n ynzc ba gur 
 gnoyr, ghearq qbja irel ybj. Fur-- 
 
 Uvf grrgu jrer frg ba rqtr. Ur jbhyq unir yvxrq gb fcvg. 
 Fvzhygnarbhfyl jvgu gur jbzna va gur onfrzrag xvgpura ur gubhtug bs 
 Xngunevar, uvf jvsr. Jvafgba jnf zneevrq -- unq orra zneevrq, ng nal engr: 
 cebonoyl ur fgvyy jnf zneevrq, fb sne nf ur xarj uvf jvsr jnf abg qrnq. Ur 
 frrzrq gb oerngur ntnva gur jnez fghssl bqbhe bs gur onfrzrag xvgpura, na 
 bqbhe pbzcbhaqrq bs ohtf naq qvegl pybgurf naq ivyynvabhf purnc fprag, ohg 
 arireguryrff nyyhevat, orpnhfr ab jbzna bs gur Cnegl rire hfrq fprag, be 
 pbhyq or vzntvarq nf qbvat fb. Bayl gur cebyrf hfrq fprag. Va uvf zvaq gur 
 fzryy bs vg jnf varkgevpnoyl zvkrq hc jvgu sbeavpngvba. 
 Jura ur unq tbar jvgu gung jbzna vg unq orra uvf svefg yncfr va gjb 
 lrnef be gurernobhgf. Pbafbegvat jvgu cebfgvghgrf jnf sbeovqqra, bs pbhefr, 
 ohg vg jnf bar bs gubfr ehyrf gung lbh pbhyq bppnfvbanyyl areir lbhefrys gb 
 oernx. Vg jnf qnatrebhf, ohg vg jnf abg n yvsr-naq-qrngu znggre. Gb or 
 pnhtug jvgu n cebfgvghgr zvtug zrna svir lrnef va n sbeprq-ynobhe pnzc: abg 
 zber, vs lbh unq pbzzvggrq ab bgure bssrapr. Naq vg jnf rnfl rabhtu, 
 cebivqrq gung lbh pbhyq nibvq orvat pnhtug va gur npg. Gur cbbere dhnegref 
 fjnezrq jvgu jbzra jub jrer ernql gb fryy gurzfryirf. Fbzr pbhyq rira or 
 chepunfrq sbe n obggyr bs tva, juvpu gur cebyrf jrer abg fhccbfrq gb qevax. 
 Gnpvgyl gur Cnegl jnf rira vapyvarq gb rapbhentr cebfgvghgvba, nf na bhgyrg 
 sbe vafgvapgf juvpu pbhyq abg or nygbtrgure fhccerffrq. Zrer qronhpurel qvq 
 abg znggre irel zhpu, fb ybat nf vg jnf shegvir naq wblyrff naq bayl 
 vaibyirq gur jbzra bs n fhozretrq naq qrfcvfrq pynff. Gur hasbetvinoyr 
 pevzr jnf cebzvfphvgl orgjrra Cnegl zrzoref. Ohg -- gubhtu guvf jnf bar bs 
 gur pevzrf gung gur npphfrq va gur terng chetrf vainevnoyl pbasrffrq gb -- 
 vg jnf qvssvphyg gb vzntvar nal fhpu guvat npghnyyl unccravat. 
 Gur nvz bs gur Cnegl jnf abg zreryl gb cerirag zra naq jbzra sebz 
 sbezvat yblnygvrf juvpu vg zvtug abg or noyr gb pbageby. Vgf erny, 
 haqrpynerq checbfr jnf gb erzbir nyy cyrnfher sebz gur frkhny npg. Abg ybir 
 fb zhpu nf rebgvpvfz jnf gur rarzl, vafvqr zneevntr nf jryy nf bhgfvqr vg. 
 Nyy zneevntrf orgjrra Cnegl zrzoref unq gb or nccebirq ol n pbzzvggrr 
 nccbvagrq sbe gur checbfr, naq -- gubhtu gur cevapvcyr jnf arire pyrneyl 
 fgngrq -- crezvffvba jnf nyjnlf ershfrq vs gur pbhcyr pbaprearq tnir gur 
 vzcerffvba bs orvat culfvpnyyl nggenpgrq gb bar nabgure. Gur bayl 
 erpbtavmrq checbfr bs zneevntr jnf gb ortrg puvyqera sbe gur freivpr bs gur 
 Cnegl. Frkhny vagrepbhefr jnf gb or ybbxrq ba nf n fyvtugyl qvfthfgvat 
 zvabe bcrengvba, yvxr univat na rarzn. Guvf ntnva jnf arire chg vagb cynva 
 jbeqf, ohg va na vaqverpg jnl vg jnf ehoorq vagb rirel Cnegl zrzore sebz 
 puvyqubbq bajneqf. Gurer jrer rira betnavmngvbaf fhpu nf gur Whavbe Nagv- 
 Frk Yrnthr, juvpu nqibpngrq pbzcyrgr pryvonpl sbe obgu frkrf. Nyy puvyqera 
 jrer gb or ortbggra ol negvsvpvny vafrzvangvba (negfrz, vg jnf pnyyrq va 
 Arjfcrnx) naq oebhtug hc va choyvp vafgvghgvbaf. Guvf, Jvafgba jnf njner, 
 jnf abg zrnag nygbtrgure frevbhfyl, ohg fbzrubj vg svggrq va jvgu gur 
 trareny vqrbybtl bs gur Cnegl. Gur Cnegl jnf gelvat gb xvyy gur frk 
 vafgvapg, be, vs vg pbhyq abg or xvyyrq, gura gb qvfgbeg vg naq qvegl vg. 
 Ur qvq abg xabj jul guvf jnf fb, ohg vg frrzrq angheny gung vg fubhyq or 
 fb. Naq nf sne nf gur jbzra jrer pbaprearq, gur Cnegl'f rssbegf jrer 
 ynetryl fhpprffshy. 
 Ur gubhtug ntnva bs Xngunevar. Vg zhfg or avar, gra -- arneyl ryrira 
 lrnef fvapr gurl unq cnegrq. Vg jnf phevbhf ubj fryqbz ur gubhtug bs ure. 
 Sbe qnlf ng n gvzr ur jnf pncnoyr bs sbetrggvat gung ur unq rire orra 
 zneevrq. Gurl unq bayl orra gbtrgure sbe nobhg svsgrra zbaguf. Gur Cnegl 
 qvq abg crezvg qvibepr, ohg vg engure rapbhentrq frcnengvba va pnfrf jurer 
 gurer jrer ab puvyqera. 
 Xngunevar jnf n gnyy, snve-unverq tvey, irel fgenvtug, jvgu fcyraqvq 
 zbirzragf. Fur unq n obyq, ndhvyvar snpr, n snpr gung bar zvtug unir pnyyrq 
 aboyr hagvy bar qvfpbirerq gung gurer jnf nf arneyl nf cbffvoyr abguvat 
 oruvaq vg. Irel rneyl va ure zneevrq yvsr ur unq qrpvqrq -- gubhtu creuncf 
 vg jnf bayl gung ur xarj ure zber vagvzngryl guna ur xarj zbfg crbcyr -- 
 gung fur unq jvgubhg rkprcgvba gur zbfg fghcvq, ihytne, rzcgl zvaq gung ur 
 unq rire rapbhagrerq. Fur unq abg n gubhtug va ure urnq gung jnf abg n 
 fybtna, naq gurer jnf ab vzorpvyvgl, nofbyhgryl abar gung fur jnf abg 
 pncnoyr bs fjnyybjvat vs gur Cnegl unaqrq vg bhg gb ure. 'Gur uhzna fbhaq- 
 genpx' ur avpxanzrq ure va uvf bja zvaq. Lrg ur pbhyq unir raqherq yvivat 
 jvgu ure vs vg unq abg orra sbe whfg bar guvat -- frk. 
 Nf fbba nf ur gbhpurq ure fur frrzrq gb jvapr naq fgvssra. Gb rzoenpr 
 ure jnf yvxr rzoenpvat n wbvagrq jbbqra vzntr. Naq jung jnf fgenatr jnf 
 gung rira jura fur jnf pynfcvat uvz ntnvafg ure ur unq gur srryvat gung fur 
 jnf fvzhygnarbhfyl chfuvat uvz njnl jvgu nyy ure fgeratgu. Gur evtvqygl bs 
 ure zhfpyrf znantrq gb pbairl gung vzcerffvba. Fur jbhyq yvr gurer jvgu 
 fuhg rlrf, arvgure erfvfgvat abe pb-bcrengvat ohg fhozvggvat. Vg jnf 
 rkgenbeqvanevyl rzoneenffvat, naq, nsgre n juvyr, ubeevoyr. Ohg rira gura 
 ur pbhyq unir obear yvivat jvgu ure vs vg unq orra nterrq gung gurl fubhyq 
 erznva pryvongr. Ohg phevbhfyl rabhtu vg jnf Xngunevar jub ershfrq guvf. 
 Gurl zhfg, fur fnvq, cebqhpr n puvyq vs gurl pbhyq. Fb gur cresbeznapr 
 pbagvahrq gb unccra, bapr n jrrx dhvgr erthynevl, jurarire vg jnf abg 
 vzcbffvoyr. Fur rira hfrq gb erzvaq uvz bs vg va gur zbeavat, nf fbzrguvat 
 juvpu unq gb or qbar gung riravat naq juvpu zhfg abg or sbetbggra. Fur unq 
 gjb anzrf sbe vg. Bar jnf 'znxvat n onol', naq gur bgure jnf 'bhe qhgl gb 
 gur Cnegl' (lrf, fur unq npghnyyl hfrq gung cuenfr). Dhvgr fbba ur terj gb 
 unir n srryvat bs cbfvgvir qernq jura gur nccbvagrq qnl pnzr ebhaq. Ohg 
 yhpxvyl ab puvyq nccrnerq, naq va gur raq fur nterrq gb tvir hc gelvat, naq 
 fbba nsgrejneqf gurl cnegrq. 
 Jvafgba fvturq vanhqvoyl. Ur cvpxrq hc uvf cra ntnva naq jebgr: 
 
 Fur guerj urefrys qbja ba gur orq, naq ng bapr, jvgubhg nal xvaq bs 
 ceryvzvanel va gur zbfg pbnefr, ubeevoyr jnl lbh pna vzntvar, chyyrq hc ure 
 fxveg. V-- 
 
 Ur fnj uvzfrys fgnaqvat gurer va gur qvz ynzcyvtug, jvgu gur fzryy bs 
 ohtf naq purnc fprag va uvf abfgevyf, naq va uvf urneg n srryvat bs qrsrng 
 naq erfragzrag juvpu rira ng gung zbzrag jnf zvkrq hc jvgu gur gubhtug bs 
 Xngunevar'f juvgr obql, sebmra sbe rire ol gur ulcabgvp cbjre bs gur Cnegl. 
 Jul qvq vg nyjnlf unir gb or yvxr guvf? Jul pbhyq ur abg unir n jbzna bs 
 uvf bja vafgrnq bs gurfr svygul fphssyrf ng vagreinyf bs lrnef? Ohg n erny 
 ybir nssnve jnf na nyzbfg haguvaxnoyr rirag. Gur jbzra bs gur Cnegl jrer 
 nyy nyvxr. Punfgvgl jnf nf qrrc vatenvarq va gurz nf Cnegl yblnygl. Ol 
 pnershy rneyl pbaqvgvbavat, ol tnzrf naq pbyq jngre, ol gur ehoovfu gung 
 jnf qvaarq vagb gurz ng fpubby naq va gur Fcvrf naq gur Lbhgu Yrnthr, ol 
 yrpgherf, cnenqrf, fbatf, fybtnaf, naq znegvny zhfvp, gur angheny srryvat 
 unq orra qevira bhg bs gurz. Uvf ernfba gbyq uvz gung gurer zhfg or 
 rkprcgvbaf, ohg uvf urneg qvq abg oryvrir vg. Gurl jrer nyy vzcertanoyr, nf 
 gur Cnegl vagraqrq gung gurl fubhyq or. Naq jung ur jnagrq, zber rira guna 
 gb or ybirq, jnf gb oernx qbja gung jnyy bs iveghr, rira vs vg jrer bayl 
 bapr va uvf jubyr yvsr. Gur frkhny npg, fhpprffshyyl cresbezrq, jnf 
 eroryyvba. Qrfver jnf gubhtugpevzr. Rira gb unir njnxrarq Xngunevar, vs ur 
 pbhyq unir npuvrirq vg, jbhyq unir orra yvxr n frqhpgvba, nygubhtu fur jnf 
 uvf jvsr. 
 Ohg gur erfg bs gur fgbel unq tbg gb or jevggra qbja. Ur jebgr: 
 
 V ghearq hc gur ynzc. Jura V fnj ure va gur yvtug-- 
 
 Nsgre gur qnexarff gur srroyr yvtug bs gur cnenssva ynzc unq frrzrq 
 irel oevtug. Sbe gur svefg gvzr ur pbhyq frr gur jbzna cebcreyl. Ur unq 
 gnxra n fgrc gbjneqf ure naq gura unygrq, shyy bs yhfg naq greebe. Ur jnf 
 cnvashyyl pbafpvbhf bs gur evfx ur unq gnxra va pbzvat urer. Vg jnf 
 cresrpgyl cbffvoyr gung gur cngebyf jbhyq pngpu uvz ba gur jnl bhg: sbe 
 gung znggre gurl zvtug or jnvgvat bhgfvqr gur qbbe ng guvf zbzrag. Vs ur 
 jrag njnl jvgubhg rira qbvat jung ur unq pbzr urer gb qb--! 
 Vg unq tbg gb or jevggra qbja, vg unq tbg gb or pbasrffrq. Jung ur unq 
 fhqqrayl frra va gur ynzcyvtug jnf gung gur jbzna jnf byq. Gur cnvag jnf 
 cynfgrerq fb guvpx ba ure snpr gung vg ybbxrq nf gubhtu vg zvtug penpx yvxr 
 n pneqobneq znfx. Gurer jrer fgernxf bs juvgr va ure unve; ohg gur gehyl 
 qernqshy qrgnvy jnf gung ure zbhgu unq snyyra n yvggyr bcra, erirnyvat 
 abguvat rkprcg n pnireabhf oynpxarff. Fur unq ab grrgu ng nyy. 
 Ur jebgr uheevrqyl, va fpenooyvat unaqjevgvat: 
 
 Jura V fnj ure va gur yvtug fur jnf dhvgr na byq jbzna, svsgl lrnef 
 byq ng yrnfg. Ohg V jrag nurnq naq qvq vg whfg gur fnzr. 
 
 Ur cerffrq uvf svatref ntnvafg uvf rlryvqf ntnva. Ur unq jevggra vg 
 qbja ng ynfg, ohg vg znqr ab qvssrerapr. Gur gurencl unq abg jbexrq. Gur 
 hetr gb fubhg svygul jbeqf ng gur gbc bs uvf ibvpr jnf nf fgebat nf rire. 
 
 IVV 
 
 Vs gurer vf ubcr, jebgr Jvafgba, vg yvrf va gur cebyrf. 
 
 Vs gurer jnf ubcr, vg zhfg yvr va gur cebyrf, orpnhfr bayl gurer va 
 gubfr fjnezvat qvfertneqrq znffrf, 85 cre prag bs gur cbchyngvba bs 
 Bprnavn, pbhyq gur sbepr gb qrfgebl gur Cnegl rire or trarengrq. Gur Cnegl 
 pbhyq abg or bireguebja sebz jvguva. Vgf rarzvrf, vs vg unq nal rarzvrf, 
 unq ab jnl bs pbzvat gbtrgure be rira bs vqragvslvat bar nabgure. Rira vs 
 gur yrtraqnel Oebgureubbq rkvfgrq, nf whfg cbffvoyl vg zvtug, vg jnf 
 vapbaprvinoyr gung vgf zrzoref pbhyq rire nffrzoyr va ynetre ahzoref guna 
 gjbf naq guerrf. Eroryyvba zrnag n ybbx va gur rlrf, na vasyrkvba bs gur 
 ibvpr, ng gur zbfg, na bppnfvbany juvfcrerq jbeq. Ohg gur cebyrf, vs bayl 
 gurl pbhyq fbzrubj orpbzr pbafpvbhf bs gurve bja fgeratgu. jbhyq unir ab 
 arrq gb pbafcver. Gurl arrqrq bayl gb evfr hc naq funxr gurzfryirf yvxr n 
 ubefr funxvat bss syvrf. Vs gurl pubfr gurl pbhyq oybj gur Cnegl gb cvrprf 
 gbzbeebj zbeavat. Fheryl fbbare be yngre vg zhfg bpphe gb gurz gb qb vg? 
 Naq lrg--! 
 Ur erzrzorerq ubj bapr ur unq orra jnyxvat qbja n pebjqrq fgerrg jura 
 n gerzraqbhf fubhg bs uhaqerqf bs ibvprf jbzra'f ibvprf -- unq ohefg sebz n 
 fvqr-fgerrg n yvggyr jnl nurnq. Vg jnf n terng sbezvqnoyr pel bs natre naq 
 qrfcnve, n qrrc, ybhq 'Bu-b-b-b-bu!' gung jrag uhzzvat ba yvxr gur 
 erireorengvba bs n oryy. Uvf urneg unq yrncg. Vg'f fgnegrq! ur unq gubhtug. 
 N evbg! Gur cebyrf ner oernxvat ybbfr ng ynfg! Jura ur unq ernpurq gur fcbg 
 vg jnf gb frr n zbo bs gjb be guerr uhaqerq jbzra pebjqvat ebhaq gur fgnyyf 
 bs n fgerrg znexrg, jvgu snprf nf gentvp nf gubhtu gurl unq orra gur qbbzrq 
 cnffratref ba n fvaxvat fuvc. Ohg ng guvf zbzrag gur trareny qrfcnve oebxr 
 qbja vagb n zhygvghqr bs vaqvivqhny dhneeryf. Vg nccrnerq gung bar bs gur 
 fgnyyf unq orra fryyvat gva fnhprcnaf. Gurl jrer jergpurq, syvzfl guvatf, 
 ohg pbbxvat-cbgf bs nal xvaq jrer nyjnlf qvssvphyg gb trg. Abj gur fhccyl 
 unq harkcrpgrqyl tvira bhg. Gur fhpprffshy jbzra, ohzcrq naq wbfgyrq ol gur 
 erfg, jrer gelvat gb znxr bss jvgu gurve fnhprcnaf juvyr qbmraf bs bguref 
 pynzbherq ebhaq gur fgnyy, npphfvat gur fgnyy-xrrcre bs snibhevgvfz naq bs 
 univat zber fnhprcnaf fbzrjurer va erfreir. Gurer jnf n serfu bhgohefg bs 
 lryyf. Gjb oybngrq jbzra, bar bs gurz jvgu ure unve pbzvat qbja, unq tbg 
 ubyq bs gur fnzr fnhprcna naq jrer gelvat gb grne vg bhg bs bar nabgure'f 
 unaqf. Sbe n zbzrag gurl jrer obgu ghttvat, naq gura gur unaqyr pnzr bss. 
 Jvafgba jngpurq gurz qvfthfgrqyl. Naq lrg, whfg sbe n zbzrag, jung nyzbfg 
 sevtugravat cbjre unq fbhaqrq va gung pel sebz bayl n srj uhaqerq guebngf! 
 Jul jnf vg gung gurl pbhyq arire fubhg yvxr gung nobhg nalguvat gung 
 znggrerq? 
 Ur jebgr: 
 
 Hagvy gurl orpbzr pbafpvbhf gurl jvyy arire erory, naq hagvy nsgre 
 gurl unir eroryyrq gurl pnaabg orpbzr pbafpvbhf. 
 
 Gung, ur ersyrpgrq, zvtug nyzbfg unir orra n genafpevcgvba sebz bar bs 
 gur Cnegl grkgobbxf. Gur Cnegl pynvzrq, bs pbhefr, gb unir yvorengrq gur 
 cebyrf sebz obaqntr. Orsber gur Eribyhgvba gurl unq orra uvqrbhfyl 
 bccerffrq ol gur pncvgnyvfgf, gurl unq orra fgneirq naq sybttrq, jbzra unq 
 orra sbeprq gb jbex va gur pbny zvarf (jbzra fgvyy qvq jbex va gur pbny 
 zvarf, nf n znggre bs snpg), puvyqera unq orra fbyq vagb gur snpgbevrf ng 
 gur ntr bs fvk. Ohg fvzhygnarbhfyl, gehr gb gur Cevapvcyrf bs qbhoyrguvax, 
 gur Cnegl gnhtug gung gur cebyrf jrer angheny vasrevbef jub zhfg or xrcg va 
 fhowrpgvba, yvxr navznyf, ol gur nccyvpngvba bs n srj fvzcyr ehyrf. Va 
 ernyvgl irel yvggyr jnf xabja nobhg gur cebyrf. Vg jnf abg arprffnel gb 
 xabj zhpu. Fb ybat nf gurl pbagvahrq gb jbex naq oerrq, gurve bgure 
 npgvivgvrf jrer jvgubhg vzcbegnapr. Yrsg gb gurzfryirf, yvxr pnggyr ghearq 
 ybbfr hcba gur cynvaf bs Netragvan, gurl unq eriregrq gb n fglyr bs yvsr 
 gung nccrnerq gb or angheny gb gurz, n fbeg bs naprfgeny cnggrea. Gurl jrer 
 obea, gurl terj hc va gur thggref, gurl jrag gb jbex ng gjryir, gurl cnffrq 
 guebhtu n oevrs oybffbzvat-crevbq bs ornhgl naq frkhny qrfver, gurl zneevrq 
 ng gjragl, gurl jrer zvqqyr-ntrq ng guvegl, gurl qvrq, sbe gur zbfg cneg, 
 ng fvkgl. Urnil culfvpny jbex, gur pner bs ubzr naq puvyqera, crggl 
 dhneeryf jvgu arvtuobhef, svyzf, sbbgonyy, orre, naq nobir nyy, tnzoyvat, 
 svyyrq hc gur ubevmba bs gurve zvaqf. Gb xrrc gurz va pbageby jnf abg 
 qvssvphyg. N srj ntragf bs gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr zbirq nyjnlf nzbat gurz, 
 fcernqvat snyfr ehzbhef naq znexvat qbja naq ryvzvangvat gur srj 
 vaqvivqhnyf jub jrer whqtrq pncnoyr bs orpbzvat qnatrebhf; ohg ab nggrzcg 
 jnf znqr gb vaqbpgevangr gurz jvgu gur vqrbybtl bs gur Cnegl. Vg jnf abg 
 qrfvenoyr gung gur cebyrf fubhyq unir fgebat cbyvgvpny srryvatf. Nyy gung 
 jnf erdhverq bs gurz jnf n cevzvgvir cngevbgvfz juvpu pbhyq or nccrnyrq gb 
 jurarire vg jnf arprffnel gb znxr gurz npprcg ybatre jbexvat-ubhef be 
 fubegre engvbaf. Naq rira jura gurl orpnzr qvfpbagragrq, nf gurl fbzrgvzrf 
 qvq, gurve qvfpbagrag yrq abjurer, orpnhfr orvat jvgubhg trareny vqrnf, 
 gurl pbhyq bayl sbphf vg ba crggl fcrpvsvp tevrinaprf. Gur ynetre rivyf 
 vainevnoyl rfpncrq gurve abgvpr. Gur terng znwbevgl bs cebyrf qvq abg rira 
 unir gryrfperraf va gurve ubzrf. Rira gur pvivy cbyvpr vagresrerq jvgu gurz 
 irel yvggyr. Gurer jnf n infg nzbhag bs pevzvanyvgl va Ybaqba, n jubyr 
 jbeyq-jvguva-n-jbeyq bs guvrirf, onaqvgf, cebfgvghgrf, qeht-crqqyref, naq 
 enpxrgrref bs rirel qrfpevcgvba; ohg fvapr vg nyy unccrarq nzbat gur cebyrf 
 gurzfryirf, vg jnf bs ab vzcbegnapr. Va nyy dhrfgvbaf bs zbenyf gurl jrer 
 nyybjrq gb sbyybj gurve naprfgeny pbqr. Gur frkhny chevgnavfz bs gur Cnegl 
 jnf abg vzcbfrq hcba gurz. Cebzvfphvgl jrag hachavfurq, qvibepr jnf 
 crezvggrq. Sbe gung znggre, rira eryvtvbhf jbefuvc jbhyq unir orra 
 crezvggrq vs gur cebyrf unq fubja nal fvta bs arrqvat be jnagvat vg. Gurl 
 jrer orarngu fhfcvpvba. Nf gur Cnegl fybtna chg vg: 'Cebyrf naq navznyf ner 
 serr.' 
 Jvafgba ernpurq qbja naq pnhgvbhfyl fpengpurq uvf inevpbfr hypre. Vg 
 unq ortha vgpuvat ntnva. Gur guvat lbh vainevnoyl pnzr onpx gb jnf gur 
 vzcbffvovyvgl bs xabjvat jung yvsr orsber gur Eribyhgvba unq ernyyl orra 
 yvxr. Ur gbbx bhg bs gur qenjre n pbcl bs n puvyqera'f uvfgbel grkgobbx 
 juvpu ur unq obeebjrq sebz Zef. Cnefbaf, naq ortna pbclvat n cnffntr vagb 
 gur qvnel: 
 Va gur byq qnlf (vg ena), orsber gur tybevbhf Eribyhgvba, Ybaqba jnf 
 abg gur ornhgvshy pvgl gung jr xabj gbqnl. Vg jnf n qnex, qvegl, zvfrenoyr 
 cynpr jurer uneqyl nalobql unq rabhtu gb rng naq jurer uhaqerqf naq 
 gubhfnaqf bs cbbe crbcyr unq ab obbgf ba gurve srrg naq abg rira n ebbs gb 
 fyrrc haqre. Puvyqera ab byqre guna lbh unq gb jbex gjryir ubhef n qnl sbe 
 pehry znfgref jub sybttrq gurz jvgu juvcf vs gurl jbexrq gbb fybjyl naq srq 
 gurz ba abguvat ohg fgnyr oernqpehfgf naq jngre. Ohg va nzbat nyy guvf 
 greevoyr cbiregl gurer jrer whfg n srj terng ovt ornhgvshy ubhfrf gung jrer 
 yvirq va ol evpu zra jub unq nf znal nf guvegl freinagf gb ybbx nsgre gurz. 
 Gurfr evpu zra jrer pnyyrq pncvgnyvfgf. Gurl jrer sng, htyl zra jvgu jvpxrq 
 snprf, yvxr gur bar va gur cvpgher ba gur bccbfvgr cntr. Lbh pna frr gung 
 ur vf qerffrq va n ybat oynpx pbng juvpu jnf pnyyrq n sebpx pbng, naq n 
 dhrre, fuval ung funcrq yvxr n fgbircvcr, juvpu jnf pnyyrq n gbc ung. Guvf 
 jnf gur havsbez bs gur pncvgnyvfgf, naq ab bar ryfr jnf nyybjrq gb jrne vg. 
 Gur pncvgnyvfgf bjarq rirelguvat va gur jbeyq, naq rirelbar ryfr jnf gurve 
 fynir. Gurl bjarq nyy gur ynaq, nyy gur ubhfrf, nyy gur snpgbevrf, naq nyy 
 gur zbarl. Vs nalbar qvfborlrq gurz gurl pbhyq guebj gurz vagb cevfba, be 
 gurl pbhyq gnxr uvf wbo njnl naq fgneir uvz gb qrngu. Jura nal beqvanel 
 crefba fcbxr gb n pncvgnyvfg ur unq gb pevatr naq obj gb uvz, naq gnxr bss 
 uvf pnc naq nqqerff uvz nf 'Fve'. Gur puvrs bs nyy gur pncvgnyvfgf jnf 
 pnyyrq gur Xvat, naq-- 
 Ohg ur xarj gur erfg bs gur pngnybthr. Gurer jbhyq or zragvba bs gur 
 ovfubcf va gurve ynja fyrrirf, gur whqtrf va gurve rezvar eborf, gur 
 cvyybel, gur fgbpxf, gur gernqzvyy, gur png-b'-avar gnvyf, gur Ybeq Znlbe'f 
 Onadhrg, naq gur cenpgvpr bs xvffvat gur Cbcr'f gbr. Gurer jnf nyfb 
 fbzrguvat pnyyrq gur whf cevznr abpgvf, juvpu jbhyq cebonoyl abg or 
 zragvbarq va n grkgobbx sbe puvyqera. Vg jnf gur ynj ol juvpu rirel 
 pncvgnyvfg unq gur evtug gb fyrrc jvgu nal jbzna jbexvat va bar bs uvf 
 snpgbevrf. 
 Ubj pbhyq lbh gryy ubj zhpu bs vg jnf yvrf? Vg zvtug or gehr gung gur 
 nirentr uhzna orvat jnf orggre bss abj guna ur unq orra orsber gur 
 Eribyhgvba. Gur bayl rivqrapr gb gur pbagenel jnf gur zhgr cebgrfg va lbhe 
 bja obarf, gur vafgvapgvir srryvat gung gur pbaqvgvbaf lbh yvirq va jrer 
 vagbyrenoyr naq gung ng fbzr bgure gvzr gurl zhfg unir orra qvssrerag. Vg 
 fgehpx uvz gung gur gehyl punenpgrevfgvp guvat nobhg zbqrea yvsr jnf abg 
 vgf pehrygl naq vafrphevgl, ohg fvzcyl vgf onerarff, vgf qvatvarff, vgf 
 yvfgyrffarff. Yvsr, vs lbh ybbxrq nobhg lbh, ober ab erfrzoynapr abg bayl 
 gb gur yvrf gung fgernzrq bhg bs gur gryrfperraf, ohg rira gb gur vqrnyf 
 gung gur Cnegl jnf gelvat gb npuvrir. Terng nernf bs vg, rira sbe n Cnegl 
 zrzore, jrer arhgeny naq aba-cbyvgvpny, n znggre bs fybttvat guebhtu qernel 
 wbof, svtugvat sbe n cynpr ba gur Ghor, qneavat n jbea-bhg fbpx, pnqtvat n 
 fnppunevar gnoyrg, fnivat n pvtnerggr raq. Gur vqrny frg hc ol gur Cnegl 
 jnf fbzrguvat uhtr, greevoyr, naq tyvggrevat -- n jbeyq bs fgrry naq 
 pbapergr, bs zbafgebhf znpuvarf naq greevslvat jrncbaf -- n angvba bs 
 jneevbef naq snangvpf, znepuvat sbejneq va cresrpg havgl, nyy guvaxvat gur 
 fnzr gubhtugf naq fubhgvat gur fnzr fybtnaf, crecrghnyyl jbexvat, svtugvat, 
 gevhzcuvat, crefrphgvat -- guerr uhaqerq zvyyvba crbcyr nyy jvgu gur fnzr 
 snpr. Gur ernyvgl jnf qrpnlvat, qvatl pvgvrf jurer haqresrq crbcyr fuhssyrq 
 gb naq seb va yrnxl fubrf, va cngpurq-hc avargrragu-praghel ubhfrf gung 
 fzryg nyjnlf bs pnoontr naq onq yningbevrf. Ur frrzrq gb frr n ivfvba bs 
 Ybaqba, infg naq ehvabhf, pvgl bs n zvyyvba qhfgovaf, naq zvkrq hc jvgu vg 
 jnf n cvpgher bs Zef. Cnefbaf, n jbzna jvgu yvarq snpr naq jvfcl unve, 
 svqqyvat urycyrffyl jvgu n oybpxrq jnfgr-cvcr. 
 Ur ernpurq qbja naq fpengpurq uvf naxyr ntnva. Qnl naq avtug gur 
 gryrfperraf oehvfrq lbhe rnef jvgu fgngvfgvpf cebivat gung crbcyr gbqnl unq 
 zber sbbq, zber pybgurf, orggre ubhfrf, orggre erperngvbaf -- gung gurl 
 yvirq ybatre, jbexrq fubegre ubhef, jrer ovttre, urnyguvre, fgebatre, 
 unccvre, zber vagryyvtrag, orggre rqhpngrq, guna gur crbcyr bs svsgl lrnef 
 ntb. Abg n jbeq bs vg pbhyq rire or cebirq be qvfcebirq. Gur Cnegl pynvzrq, 
 sbe rknzcyr, gung gbqnl 40 cre prag bs nqhyg cebyrf jrer yvgrengr: orsber 
 gur Eribyhgvba, vg jnf fnvq, gur ahzore unq bayl orra 15 cre prag. Gur 
 Cnegl pynvzrq gung gur vasnag zbegnyvgl engr jnf abj bayl 160 cre gubhfnaq, 
 jurernf orsber gur Eribyhgvba vg unq orra 300 -- naq fb vg jrag ba. Vg jnf 
 yvxr n fvatyr rdhngvba jvgu gjb haxabjaf. Vg zvtug irel jryy or gung 
 yvgrenyyl rirel jbeq va gur uvfgbel obbxf, rira gur guvatf gung bar 
 npprcgrq jvgubhg dhrfgvba, jnf cher snagnfl. Sbe nyy ur xarj gurer zvtug 
 arire unir orra nal fhpu ynj nf gur whf cevznr abpgvf, be nal fhpu perngher 
 nf n pncvgnyvfg, be nal fhpu tnezrag nf n gbc ung. 
 Rirelguvat snqrq vagb zvfg. Gur cnfg jnf renfrq, gur renfher jnf 
 sbetbggra, gur yvr orpnzr gehgu. Whfg bapr va uvf yvsr ur unq cbffrffrq -- 
 nsgre gur rirag: gung jnf jung pbhagrq -- pbapergr, hazvfgnxnoyr rivqrapr 
 bs na npg bs snyfvsvpngvba. Ur unq uryq vg orgjrra uvf svatref sbe nf ybat 
 nf guvegl frpbaqf. Va 1973, vg zhfg unir orra -- ng nal engr, vg jnf ng 
 nobhg gur gvzr jura ur naq Xngunevar unq cnegrq. Ohg gur ernyyl eryrinag 
 qngr jnf frira be rvtug lrnef rneyvre. 
 Gur fgbel ernyyl ortna va gur zvqqyr fvkgvrf, gur crevbq bs gur terng 
 chetrf va juvpu gur bevtvany yrnqref bs gur Eribyhgvba jrer jvcrq bhg bapr 
 naq sbe nyy. Ol 1970 abar bs gurz jnf yrsg, rkprcg Ovt Oebgure uvzfrys. Nyy 
 gur erfg unq ol gung gvzr orra rkcbfrq nf genvgbef naq pbhagre- 
 eribyhgvbanevrf. Tbyqfgrva unq syrq naq jnf uvqvat ab bar xarj jurer, naq 
 bs gur bguref, n srj unq fvzcyl qvfnccrnerq, juvyr gur znwbevgl unq orra 
 rkrphgrq nsgre fcrpgnphyne choyvp gevnyf ng juvpu gurl znqr pbasrffvba bs 
 gurve pevzrf. Nzbat gur ynfg fheivibef jrer guerr zra anzrq Wbarf, 
 Nnebafba, naq Ehguresbeq. Vg zhfg unir orra va 1965 gung gurfr guerr unq 
 orra neerfgrq. Nf bsgra unccrarq, gurl unq inavfurq sbe n lrne be zber, fb 
 gung bar qvq abg xabj jurgure gurl jrer nyvir be qrnq, naq gura unq 
 fhqqrayl orra oebhtug sbegu gb vapevzvangr gurzfryirf va gur hfhny jnl. 
 Gurl unq pbasrffrq gb vagryyvtrapr jvgu gur rarzl (ng gung qngr, gbb, gur 
 rarzl jnf Rhenfvn), rzormmyrzrag bs choyvp shaqf, gur zheqre bs inevbhf 
 gehfgrq Cnegl zrzoref, vagevthrf ntnvafg gur yrnqrefuvc bs Ovt Oebgure 
 juvpu unq fgnegrq ybat orsber gur Eribyhgvba unccrarq, naq npgf bs fnobgntr 
 pnhfvat gur qrngu bs uhaqerqf bs gubhfnaqf bs crbcyr. Nsgre pbasrffvat gb 
 gurfr guvatf gurl unq orra cneqbarq, ervafgngrq va gur Cnegl, naq tvira 
 cbfgf juvpu jrer va snpg fvarpherf ohg juvpu fbhaqrq vzcbegnag. Nyy guerr 
 unq jevggra ybat, nowrpg negvpyrf va gur Gvzrf, nanylfvat gur ernfbaf sbe 
 gurve qrsrpgvba naq cebzvfvat gb znxr nzraqf. 
 Fbzr gvzr nsgre gurve eryrnfr Jvafgba unq npghnyyl frra nyy guerr bs 
 gurz va gur Purfgahg Gerr Pnsr. Ur erzrzorerq gur fbeg bs greevsvrq 
 snfpvangvba jvgu juvpu ur unq jngpurq gurz bhg bs gur pbeare bs uvf rlr. 
 Gurl jrer zra sne byqre guna uvzfrys, eryvpf bs gur napvrag jbeyq, nyzbfg 
 gur ynfg terng svtherf yrsg bire sebz gur urebvp qnlf bs gur Cnegl. Gur 
 tynzbhe bs gur haqretebhaq fgehttyr naq gur pvivy jne fgvyy snvagyl pyhat 
 gb gurz. Ur unq gur srryvat, gubhtu nyernql ng gung gvzr snpgf naq qngrf 
 jrer tebjvat oyheel, gung ur unq xabja gurve anzrf lrnef rneyvre guna ur 
 unq xabja gung bs Ovt Oebgure. Ohg nyfb gurl jrer bhgynjf, rarzvrf, 
 hagbhpunoyrf, qbbzrq jvgu nofbyhgr pregnvagl gb rkgvapgvba jvguva n lrne be 
 gjb. Ab bar jub unq bapr snyyra vagb gur unaqf bs gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr rire 
 rfpncrq va gur raq. Gurl jrer pbecfrf jnvgvat gb or frag onpx gb gur tenir. 
 Gurer jnf ab bar ng nal bs gur gnoyrf arnerfg gb gurz. Vg jnf abg jvfr 
 rira gb or frra va gur arvtuobheubbq bs fhpu crbcyr. Gurl jrer fvggvat va 
 fvyrapr orsber tynffrf bs gur tva synibherq jvgu pybirf juvpu jnf gur 
 fcrpvnyvgl bs gur pnsr. Bs gur guerr, vg jnf Ehguresbeq jubfr nccrnenapr 
 unq zbfg vzcerffrq Jvafgba. Ehguresbeq unq bapr orra n snzbhf pnevpnghevfg, 
 jubfr oehgny pnegbbaf unq urycrq gb vasynzr cbchyne bcvavba orsber naq 
 qhevat gur Eribyhgvba. Rira abj, ng ybat vagreinyf, uvf pnegbbaf jrer 
 nccrnevat va gur Gvzrf. Gurl jrer fvzcyl na vzvgngvba bs uvf rneyvre 
 znaare, naq phevbhfyl yvsryrff naq hapbaivapvat. Nyjnlf gurl jrer n 
 erunfuvat bs gur napvrag gurzrf -- fyhz grarzragf, fgneivat puvyqera, 
 fgerrg onggyrf, pncvgnyvfgf va gbc ungf -- rira ba gur oneevpnqrf gur 
 pncvgnyvfgf fgvyy frrzrq gb pyvat gb gurve gbc ungf na raqyrff, ubcryrff 
 rssbeg gb trg onpx vagb gur cnfg. Ur jnf n zbafgebhf zna, jvgu n znar bs 
 ternfl terl unve, uvf snpr cbhpurq naq frnzrq, jvgu guvpx artebvq yvcf. Ng 
 bar gvzr ur zhfg unir orra vzzrafryl fgebat; abj uvf terng obql jnf 
 fnttvat, fybcvat, ohytvat, snyyvat njnl va rirel qverpgvba. Ur frrzrq gb or 
 oernxvat hc orsber bar'f rlrf, yvxr n zbhagnva pehzoyvat. 
 Vg jnf gur ybaryl ubhe bs svsgrra. Jvafgba pbhyq abg abj erzrzore ubj 
 ur unq pbzr gb or va gur pnsr ng fhpu n gvzr. Gur cynpr jnf nyzbfg rzcgl. N 
 gvaal zhfvp jnf gevpxyvat sebz gur gryrfperraf. Gur guerr zra fng va gurve 
 pbeare nyzbfg zbgvbayrff, arire fcrnxvat. Hapbzznaqrq, gur jnvgre oebhtug 
 serfu tynffrf bs tva. Gurer jnf n purffobneq ba gur gnoyr orfvqr gurz, jvgu 
 gur cvrprf frg bhg ohg ab tnzr fgnegrq. Naq gura, sbe creuncf unys n zvahgr 
 va nyy, fbzrguvat unccrarq gb gur gryrfperraf. Gur ghar gung gurl jrer 
 cynlvat punatrq, naq gur gbar bs gur zhfvp punatrq gbb. Gurer pnzr vagb vg 
 -- ohg vg jnf fbzrguvat uneq gb qrfpevor. Vg jnf n crphyvne, penpxrq, 
 oenlvat, wrrevat abgr: va uvf zvaq Jvafgba pnyyrq vg n lryybj abgr. Naq 
 gura n ibvpr sebz gur gryrfperra jnf fvatvat: 
 
 Haqre gur fcernqvat purfgahg gerr 
 V fbyq lbh naq lbh fbyq zr: 
 Gurer yvr gurl, naq urer yvr jr 
 Haqre gur fcernqvat purfgahg gerr. 
 
 Gur guerr zra arire fgveerq. Ohg jura Jvafgba tynaprq ntnva ng 
 Ehguresbeq'f ehvabhf snpr, ur fnj gung uvf rlrf jrer shyy bs grnef. Naq sbe 
 gur svefg gvzr ur abgvprq, jvgu n xvaq bs vajneq fuhqqre, naq lrg abg 
 xabjvat ng jung ur fuhqqrerq, gung obgu Nnebafba naq Ehguresbeq unq oebxra 
 abfrf. 
 N yvggyr yngre nyy guerr jrer er-neerfgrq. Vg nccrnerq gung gurl unq 
 ratntrq va serfu pbafcvenpvrf sebz gur irel zbzrag bs gurve eryrnfr. Ng 
 gurve frpbaq gevny gurl pbasrffrq gb nyy gurve byq pevzrf bire ntnva, jvgu 
 n jubyr fgevat bs arj barf. Gurl jrer rkrphgrq, naq gurve sngr jnf erpbeqrq 
 va gur Cnegl uvfgbevrf, n jneavat gb cbfgrevgl. Nobhg svir lrnef nsgre 
 guvf, va 1973, Jvafgba jnf haebyyvat n jnq bs qbphzragf juvpu unq whfg 
 sybccrq bhg bs gur carhzngvp ghor ba gb uvf qrfx jura ur pnzr ba n sentzrag 
 bs cncre juvpu unq rivqragyl orra fyvccrq va nzbat gur bguref naq gura 
 sbetbggra. Gur vafgnag ur unq synggrarq vg bhg ur fnj vgf fvtavsvpnapr. Vg 
 jnf n unys-cntr gbea bhg bs gur Gvzrf bs nobhg gra lrnef rneyvre -- gur gbc 
 unys bs gur cntr, fb gung vg vapyhqrq gur qngr -- naq vg pbagnvarq n 
 cubgbtencu bs gur qryrtngrf ng fbzr Cnegl shapgvba va Arj Lbex. Cebzvarag 
 va gur zvqqyr bs gur tebhc jrer Wbarf, Nnebafba, naq Ehguresbeq. Gurer jnf 
 ab zvfgnxvat gurz, va nal pnfr gurve anzrf jrer va gur pncgvba ng gur 
 obggbz. 
 Gur cbvag jnf gung ng obgu gevnyf nyy guerr zra unq pbasrffrq gung ba 
 gung qngr gurl unq orra ba Rhenfvna fbvy. Gurl unq sybja sebz n frperg 
 nvesvryq va Pnanqn gb n eraqrmibhf fbzrjurer va Fvorevn, naq unq pbasreerq 
 jvgu zrzoref bs gur Rhenfvna Trareny Fgnss, gb jubz gurl unq orgenlrq 
 vzcbegnag zvyvgnel frpergf. Gur qngr unq fghpx va Jvafgba'f zrzbel orpnhfr 
 vg punaprq gb or zvqfhzzre qnl; ohg gur jubyr fgbel zhfg or ba erpbeq va 
 pbhagyrff bgure cynprf nf jryy. Gurer jnf bayl bar cbffvoyr pbapyhfvba: gur 
 pbasrffvbaf jrer yvrf. 
 Bs pbhefr, guvf jnf abg va vgfrys n qvfpbirel. Rira ng gung gvzr 
 Jvafgba unq abg vzntvarq gung gur crbcyr jub jrer jvcrq bhg va gur chetrf 
 unq npghnyyl pbzzvggrq gur pevzrf gung gurl jrer npphfrq bs. Ohg guvf jnf 
 pbapergr rivqrapr; vg jnf n sentzrag bs gur nobyvfurq cnfg, yvxr n sbffvy 
 obar juvpu gheaf hc va gur jebat fgenghz naq qrfgeblf n trbybtvpny gurbel. 
 Vg jnf rabhtu gb oybj gur Cnegl gb ngbzf, vs va fbzr jnl vg pbhyq unir orra 
 choyvfurq gb gur jbeyq naq vgf fvtavsvpnapr znqr xabja. 
 Ur unq tbar fgenvtug ba jbexvat. Nf fbba nf ur fnj jung gur cubgbtencu 
 jnf, naq jung vg zrnag, ur unq pbirerq vg hc jvgu nabgure furrg bs cncre. 
 Yhpxvyl, jura ur haebyyrq vg, vg unq orra hcfvqr-qbja sebz gur cbvag bs 
 ivrj bs gur gryrfperra. 
 Ur gbbx uvf fpevooyvat cnq ba uvf xarr naq chfurq onpx uvf punve fb nf 
 gb trg nf sne njnl sebz gur gryrfperra nf cbffvoyr. Gb xrrc lbhe snpr 
 rkcerffvbayrff jnf abg qvssvphyg, naq rira lbhe oernguvat pbhyq or 
 pbagebyyrq, jvgu na rssbeg: ohg lbh pbhyq abg pbageby gur orngvat bs lbhe 
 urneg, naq gur gryrfperra jnf dhvgr qryvpngr rabhtu gb cvpx vg hc. Ur yrg 
 jung ur whqtrq gb or gra zvahgrf tb ol, gbezragrq nyy gur juvyr ol gur srne 
 gung fbzr nppvqrag -- n fhqqra qenhtug oybjvat npebff uvf qrfx, sbe 
 vafgnapr -- jbhyq orgenl uvz. Gura, jvgubhg hapbirevat vg ntnva, ur qebccrq 
 gur cubgbtencu vagb gur zrzbel ubyr, nybat jvgu fbzr bgure jnfgr cncref. 
 Jvguva nabgure zvahgr, creuncf, vg jbhyq unir pehzoyrq vagb nfurf. 
 Gung jnf gra -- ryrira lrnef ntb. Gbqnl, cebonoyl, ur jbhyq unir xrcg 
 gung cubgbtencu. Vg jnf phevbhf gung gur snpg bs univat uryq vg va uvf 
 svatref frrzrq gb uvz gb znxr n qvssrerapr rira abj, jura gur cubgbtencu 
 vgfrys, nf jryy nf gur rirag vg erpbeqrq, jnf bayl zrzbel. Jnf gur Cnegl'f 
 ubyq hcba gur cnfg yrff fgebat, ur jbaqrerq, orpnhfr n cvrpr bs rivqrapr 
 juvpu rkvfgrq ab ybatre unq bapr rkvfgrq? 
 Ohg gbqnl, fhccbfvat gung vg pbhyq or fbzrubj erfheerpgrq sebz vgf 
 nfurf, gur cubgbtencu zvtug abg rira or rivqrapr. Nyernql, ng gur gvzr jura 
 ur znqr uvf qvfpbirel, Bprnavn jnf ab ybatre ng jne jvgu Rhenfvn, naq vg 
 zhfg unir orra gb gur ntragf bs Rnfgnfvn gung gur guerr qrnq zra unq 
 orgenlrq gurve pbhagel. Fvapr gura gurer unq orra bgure punatrf -- gjb, 
 guerr, ur pbhyq abg erzrzore ubj znal. Irel yvxryl gur pbasrffvbaf unq orra 
 erjevggra naq erjevggra hagvy gur bevtvany snpgf naq qngrf ab ybatre unq 
 gur fznyyrfg fvtavsvpnapr. Gur cnfg abg bayl punatrq, ohg punatrq 
 pbagvahbhfyl. Jung zbfg nssyvpgrq uvz jvgu gur frafr bs avtugzner jnf gung 
 ur unq arire pyrneyl haqrefgbbq jul gur uhtr vzcbfgher jnf haqregnxra. Gur 
 vzzrqvngr nqinagntrf bs snyfvslvat gur cnfg jrer boivbhf, ohg gur hygvzngr 
 zbgvir jnf zlfgrevbhf. Ur gbbx hc uvf cra ntnva naq jebgr: 
 
 V haqrefgnaq UBJ: V qb abg haqrefgnaq JUL. 
 
 Ur jbaqrerq, nf ur unq znal gvzrf jbaqrerq orsber, jurgure ur uvzfrys 
 jnf n yhangvp. Creuncf n yhangvp jnf fvzcyl n zvabevgl bs bar. Ng bar gvzr 
 vg unq orra n fvta bs znqarff gb oryvrir gung gur rnegu tbrf ebhaq gur fha; 
 gbqnl, gb oryvrir gung gur cnfg vf vanygrenoyr. Ur zvtug or nybar va 
 ubyqvat gung oryvrs, naq vs nybar, gura n yhangvp. Ohg gur gubhtug bs orvat 
 n yhangvp qvq abg terngyl gebhoyr uvz: gur ubeebe jnf gung ur zvtug nyfb or 
 jebat. 
 Ur cvpxrq hc gur puvyqera'f uvfgbel obbx naq ybbxrq ng gur cbegenvg bs 
 Ovt Oebgure juvpu sbezrq vgf sebagvfcvrpr. Gur ulcabgvp rlrf tnmrq vagb uvf 
 bja. Vg jnf nf gubhtu fbzr uhtr sbepr jrer cerffvat qbja hcba lbh -- 
 fbzrguvat gung crargengrq vafvqr lbhe fxhyy, onggrevat ntnvafg lbhe oenva, 
 sevtugravat lbh bhg bs lbhe oryvrsf, crefhnqvat lbh, nyzbfg, gb qral gur 
 rivqrapr bs lbhe frafrf. Va gur raq gur Cnegl jbhyq naabhapr gung gjb naq 
 gjb znqr svir, naq lbh jbhyq unir gb oryvrir vg. Vg jnf varivgnoyr gung 
 gurl fubhyq znxr gung pynvz fbbare be yngre: gur ybtvp bs gurve cbfvgvba 
 qrznaqrq vg. Abg zreryl gur inyvqvgl bs rkcrevrapr, ohg gur irel rkvfgrapr 
 bs rkgreany ernyvgl, jnf gnpvgyl qravrq ol gurve cuvybfbcul. Gur urerfl bs 
 urerfvrf jnf pbzzba frafr. Naq jung jnf greevslvat jnf abg gung gurl jbhyq 
 xvyy lbh sbe guvaxvat bgurejvfr, ohg gung gurl zvtug or evtug. Sbe, nsgre 
 nyy, ubj qb jr xabj gung gjb naq gjb znxr sbhe? Be gung gur sbepr bs 
 tenivgl jbexf? Be gung gur cnfg vf hapunatrnoyr? Vs obgu gur cnfg naq gur 
 rkgreany jbeyq rkvfg bayl va gur zvaq, naq vs gur zvaq vgfrys vf 
 pbagebyynoyr jung gura? 
 Ohg ab! Uvf pbhentr frrzrq fhqqrayl gb fgvssra bs vgf bja nppbeq. Gur 
 snpr bs B'Oevra, abg pnyyrq hc ol nal boivbhf nffbpvngvba, unq sybngrq vagb 
 uvf zvaq. Ur xarj, jvgu zber pregnvagl guna orsber, gung B'Oevra jnf ba uvf 
 fvqr. Ur jnf jevgvat gur qvnel sbe B'Oevra -- gb B'Oevra: vg jnf yvxr na 
 vagrezvanoyr yrggre juvpu ab bar jbhyq rire ernq, ohg juvpu jnf nqqerffrq 
 gb n cnegvphyne crefba naq gbbx vgf pbybhe sebz gung snpg. 
 Gur Cnegl gbyq lbh gb erwrpg gur rivqrapr bs lbhe rlrf naq rnef. Vg 
 jnf gurve svany, zbfg rffragvny pbzznaq. Uvf urneg fnax nf ur gubhtug bs 
 gur rabezbhf cbjre neenlrq ntnvafg uvz, gur rnfr jvgu juvpu nal Cnegl 
 vagryyrpghny jbhyq bireguebj uvz va qrongr, gur fhogyr nethzragf juvpu ur 
 jbhyq abg or noyr gb haqrefgnaq, zhpu yrff nafjre. Naq lrg ur jnf va gur 
 evtug! Gurl jrer jebat naq ur jnf evtug. Gur boivbhf, gur fvyyl, naq gur 
 gehr unq tbg gb or qrsraqrq. Gehvfzf ner gehr, ubyq ba gb gung! Gur fbyvq 
 jbeyq rkvfgf, vgf ynjf qb abg punatr. Fgbarf ner uneq, jngre vf jrg, 
 bowrpgf hafhccbegrq snyy gbjneqf gur rnegu'f prager. Jvgu gur srryvat gung 
 ur jnf fcrnxvat gb B'Oevra, naq nyfb gung ur jnf frggvat sbegu na vzcbegnag 
 nkvbz, ur jebgr: 
 
 Serrqbz vf gur serrqbz gb fnl gung gjb cyhf gjb znxr sbhe. Vs gung 
 vf tenagrq, nyy ryfr sbyybjf. 
 
 IVVV 
 
 Sebz fbzrjurer ng gur obggbz bs n cnffntr gur fzryy bs ebnfgvat pbssrr 
 -- erny pbssrr, abg Ivpgbel Pbssrr -- pnzr sybngvat bhg vagb gur fgerrg. 
 Jvafgba cnhfrq vaibyhagnevyl. Sbe creuncf gjb frpbaqf ur jnf onpx va gur 
 unys-sbetbggra jbeyq bs uvf puvyqubbq. Gura n qbbe onatrq, frrzvat gb phg 
 bss gur fzryy nf noehcgyl nf gubhtu vg unq orra n fbhaq. 
 Ur unq jnyxrq frireny xvybzrgerf bire cnirzragf, naq uvf inevpbfr 
 hypre jnf gueboovat. Guvf jnf gur frpbaq gvzr va guerr jrrxf gung ur unq 
 zvffrq na riravat ng gur Pbzzhavgl Prager: n enfu npg, fvapr lbh pbhyq or 
 pregnva gung gur ahzore bs lbhe nggraqnaprf ng gur Prager jnf pnershyyl 
 purpxrq. Va cevapvcyr n Cnegl zrzore unq ab fcner gvzr, naq jnf arire nybar 
 rkprcg va orq. Vg jnf nffhzrq gung jura ur jnf abg jbexvat, rngvat, be 
 fyrrcvat ur jbhyq or gnxvat cneg va fbzr xvaq bs pbzzhany erperngvba: gb qb 
 nalguvat gung fhttrfgrq n gnfgr sbe fbyvghqr, rira gb tb sbe n jnyx ol 
 lbhefrys, jnf nyjnlf fyvtugyl qnatrebhf. Gurer jnf n jbeq sbe vg va 
 Arjfcrnx: bjayvsr, vg jnf pnyyrq, zrnavat vaqvivqhnyvfz naq rppragevpvgl. 
 Ohg guvf riravat nf ur pnzr bhg bs gur Zvavfgel gur onyzvarff bs gur Ncevy 
 nve unq grzcgrq uvz. Gur fxl jnf n jnezre oyhr guna ur unq frra vg gung 
 lrne, naq fhqqrayl gur ybat, abvfl riravat ng gur Prager, gur obevat, 
 rkunhfgvat tnzrf, gur yrpgherf, gur pernxvat pnznenqrevr bvyrq ol tva, unq 
 frrzrq vagbyrenoyr. Ba vzchyfr ur unq ghearq njnl sebz gur ohf-fgbc naq 
 jnaqrerq bss vagb gur ynolevagu bs Ybaqba, svefg fbhgu, gura rnfg, gura 
 abegu ntnva, ybfvat uvzfrys nzbat haxabja fgerrgf naq uneqyl obgurevat va 
 juvpu qverpgvba ur jnf tbvat. 
 'Vs gurer vf ubcr,' ur unq jevggra va gur qvnel, 'vg yvrf va gur 
 cebyrf.' Gur jbeqf xrcg pbzvat onpx gb uvz, fgngrzrag bs n zlfgvpny gehgu 
 naq n cnycnoyr nofheqvgl. Ur jnf fbzrjurer va gur inthr, oebja-pbybherq 
 fyhzf gb gur abegu naq rnfg bs jung unq bapr orra Fnvag Cnapenf Fgngvba. Ur 
 jnf jnyxvat hc n pbooyrq fgerrg bs yvggyr gjb-fgberl ubhfrf jvgu onggrerq 
 qbbejnlf juvpu tnir fgenvtug ba gur cnirzrag naq juvpu jrer fbzrubj 
 phevbhfyl fhttrfgvir bs engubyrf. Gurer jrer chqqyrf bs svygul jngre urer 
 naq gurer nzbat gur pbooyrf. Va naq bhg bs gur qnex qbbejnlf, naq qbja 
 aneebj nyyrl-jnlf gung oenapurq bss ba rvgure fvqr, crbcyr fjnezrq va 
 nfgbavfuvat ahzoref -- tveyf va shyy oybbz, jvgu pehqryl yvcfgvpxrq zbhguf, 
 naq lbhguf jub punfrq gur tveyf, naq fjbyyra jnqqyvat jbzra jub fubjrq lbh 
 jung gur tveyf jbhyq or yvxr va gra lrnef" gvzr, naq byq orag perngherf 
 fuhssyvat nybat ba fcynlrq srrg, naq enttrq onersbbgrq puvyqera jub cynlrq 
 va gur chqqyrf naq gura fpnggrerq ng natel lryyf sebz gurve zbguref. 
 Creuncf n dhnegre bs gur jvaqbjf va gur fgerrg jrer oebxra naq obneqrq hc. 
 Zbfg bs gur crbcyr cnvq ab nggragvba gb Jvafgba; n srj rlrq uvz jvgu n fbeg 
 bs thneqrq phevbfvgl. Gjb zbafgebhf jbzra jvgu oevpx-erq sbernezf sbyqrq 
 npebff gurye ncebaf jrer gnyxvat bhgfvqr n qbbejnl. Jvafgba pnhtug fpencf 
 bs pbairefngvba nf ur nccebnpurq. 
 '"Lrf," V fnlf gb 're, "gung'f nyy irel jryy," V fnlf. "Ohg vs lbh'q 
 bs orra va zl cynpr lbh'q bs qbar gur fnzr nf jung V qbar. Vg'f rnfl gb 
 pevgvpvmr," V fnlf, "ohg lbh nva'g tbg gur fnzr ceboyrzf nf jung V tbg."' 
 'Nu,' fnvq gur bgure, 'gung'f wrfg vg. Gung'f wrfg jurer vg vf.' 
 Gur fgevqrag ibvprf fgbccrq noehcgyl. Gur jbzra fghqvrq uvz va ubfgvyr 
 fvyrapr nf ur jrag cnfg. Ohg vg jnf abg ubfgvyvgl, rknpgyl; zreryl n xvaq 
 bs jnevarff, n zbzragnel fgvssravat, nf ng gur cnffvat bs fbzr hasnzvyvne 
 navzny. Gur oyhr birenyyf bs gur Cnegl pbhyq abg or n pbzzba fvtug va n 
 fgerrg yvxr guvf. Vaqrrq, vg jnf hajvfr gb or frra va fhpu cynprf, hayrff 
 lbh unq qrsvavgr ohfvarff gurer. Gur cngebyf zvtug fgbc lbh vs lbh unccrarq 
 gb eha vagb gurz. 'Znl V frr lbhe cncref, pbzenqr? Jung ner lbh qbvat urer? 
 Jung gvzr qvq lbh yrnir jbex? Vf guvf lbhe hfhny jnl ubzr?' -- naq fb ba 
 naq fb sbegu. Abg gung gurer jnf nal ehyr ntnvafg jnyxvat ubzr ol na 
 hahfhny ebhgr: ohg vg jnf rabhtu gb qenj nggragvba gb lbh vs gur Gubhtug 
 Cbyvpr urneq nobhg vg. 
 Fhqqrayl gur jubyr fgerrg jnf va pbzzbgvba. Gurer jrer lryyf bs 
 jneavat sebz nyy fvqrf. Crbcyr jrer fubbgvat vagb gur qbbejnlf yvxr 
 enoovgf. N lbhat jbzna yrncg bhg bs n qbbejnl n yvggyr nurnq bs Jvafgba, 
 tenoorq hc n gval puvyq cynlvat va n chqqyr, juvccrq ure nceba ebhaq vg, 
 naq yrncg onpx ntnva, nyy va bar zbirzrag. Ng gur fnzr vafgnag n zna va n 
 pbapregvan-yvxr oynpx fhvg, jub unq rzretrq sebz n fvqr nyyrl, ena gbjneqf 
 Jvafgba, cbvagvat rkpvgrqyl gb gur fxl. 
 'Fgrnzre!' ur lryyrq. 'Ybbx bhg, thi'abe! Onat bire'rnq! Ynl qbja 
 dhvpx!' 
 'Fgrnzre' jnf n avpxanzr juvpu, sbe fbzr ernfba, gur cebyrf nccyvrq gb 
 ebpxrg obzof. Jvafgba cebzcgyl syhat uvzfrys ba uvf snpr. Gur cebyrf jrer 
 arneyl nyjnlf evtug jura gurl tnir lbh n jneavat bs guvf xvaq. Gurl frrzrq 
 gb cbffrff fbzr xvaq bs vafgvapg juvpu gbyq gurz frireny frpbaqf va nqinapr 
 jura n ebpxrg jnf pbzvat, nygubhtu gur ebpxrgf fhccbfrqyl geniryyrq snfgre 
 guna fbhaq. Jvafgba pynfcrq uvf sbernezf nobir uvf urnq. Gurer jnf n ebne 
 gung frrzrq gb znxr gur cnirzrag urnir; n fubjre bs yvtug bowrpgf cnggrerq 
 ba gb uvf onpx. Jura ur fgbbq hc ur sbhaq gung ur jnf pbirerq jvgu 
 sentzragf bs tynff sebz gur arnerfg jvaqbj. 
 Ur jnyxrq ba. Gur obzo unq qrzbyvfurq n tebhc bs ubhfrf 200 zrgerf hc 
 gur fgerrg. N oynpx cyhzr bs fzbxr uhat va gur fxl, naq orybj vg n pybhq bs 
 cynfgre qhfg va juvpu n pebjq jnf nyernql sbezvat nebhaq gur ehvaf. Gurer 
 jnf n yvggyr cvyr bs cynfgre ylvat ba gur cnirzrag nurnq bs uvz, naq va gur 
 zvqqyr bs vg ur pbhyq frr n oevtug erq fgernx. Jura ur tbg hc gb vg ur fnj 
 gung vg jnf n uhzna unaq frirerq ng gur jevfg. Ncneg sebz gur oybbql fghzc, 
 gur unaq jnf fb pbzcyrgryl juvgrarq nf gb erfrzoyr n cynfgre pnfg. 
 Ur xvpxrq gur guvat vagb gur thggre, naq gura, gb nibvq gur pebjq, 
 ghearq qbja n fvqr-fgerrg gb gur evtug. Jvguva guerr be sbhe zvahgrf ur jnf 
 bhg bs gur nern juvpu gur obzo unq nssrpgrq, naq gur fbeqvq fjnezvat yvsr 
 bs gur fgerrgf jnf tbvat ba nf gubhtu abguvat unq unccrarq. Vg jnf arneyl 
 gjragl ubhef, naq gur qevaxvat-fubcf juvpu gur cebyrf serdhragrq ('chof', 
 gurl pnyyrq gurz) jrer pubxrq jvgu phfgbzref. Sebz gurve tevzl fjvat qbbef, 
 raqyrffyl bcravat naq fuhggvat, gurer pnzr sbegu n fzryy bs hevar, fnjqhfg, 
 naq fbhe orre. Va na natyr sbezrq ol n cebwrpgvat ubhfr-sebag guerr zra 
 jrer fgnaqvat irel pybfr gbtrgure, gur zvqqyr bar bs gurz ubyqvat n sbyqrq- 
 hc arjfcncre juvpu gur bgure gjb jrer fghqlvat bire uvf fubhyqre. Rira 
 orsber ur jnf arne rabhtu gb znxr bhg gur rkcerffvba ba gurve snprf, 
 Jvafgba pbhyq frr nofbecgvba va rirel yvar bs gurve obqvrf. Vg jnf 
 boivbhfyl fbzr frevbhf cvrpr bs arjf gung gurl jrer ernqvat. Ur jnf n srj 
 cnprf njnl sebz gurz jura fhqqrayl gur tebhc oebxr hc naq gjb bs gur zra 
 jrer va ivbyrag nygrepngvba. Sbe n zbzrag gurl frrzrq nyzbfg ba gur cbvag 
 bs oybjf. 
 'Pna'g lbh oyrrqvat jryy yvfgra gb jung V fnl? V gryy lbh ab ahzore 
 raqvat va frira nva'g jba sbe bire sbhegrra zbaguf!' 
 'Lrf, vg 'nf, gura!' 
 'Ab, vg 'nf abg! Onpx 'bzr V tbg gur 'byr ybg bs 'rz sbe bire gjb 
 lrnef jebgr qbja ba n cvrpr bs cncre. V gnxrf 'rz qbja ert'yne nf gur 
 pybpx. Na" V gryy lbh, ab ahzore raqvat va frira--' 
 'Lrf, n frira 'nf jba! V pbhyq cerggl arne gryy lbh gur oyrrqvat 
 ahzore. Sbhe bu frira, vg raqrq va. Vg jrer va Sroehnel -- frpbaq jrrx va 
 Sroehnel.' 
 'Sroehnel lbhe tenaqzbgure! V tbg vg nyy qbja va oynpx naq juvgr. Na" 
 V gryy lbh, ab ahzore--' 
 'Bu, cnpx vg va!' fnvq gur guveq zna. 
 Gurl jrer gnyxvat nobhg gur Ybggrel. Jvafgba ybbxrq onpx jura ur unq 
 tbar guvegl zrgerf. Gurl jrer fgvyy nethvat, jvgu ivivq, cnffvbangr snprf. 
 Gur Ybggrel, jvgu vgf jrrxyl cnl-bhg bs rabezbhf cevmrf, jnf gur bar choyvp 
 rirag gb juvpu gur cebyrf cnvq frevbhf nggragvba. Vg jnf cebonoyr gung 
 gurer jrer fbzr zvyyvbaf bs cebyrf sbe jubz gur Ybggrel jnf gur cevapvcny 
 vs abg gur bayl ernfba sbe erznvavat nyvir. Vg jnf gurve qryvtug, gurve 
 sbyyl, gurve nabqlar, gurve vagryyrpghny fgvzhynag. Jurer gur Ybggrel jnf 
 pbaprearq, rira crbcyr jub pbhyq oneryl ernq naq jevgr frrzrq pncnoyr bs 
 vagevpngr pnyphyngvbaf naq fgnttrevat srngf bs zrzbel. Gurer jnf n jubyr 
 gevor bs zra jub znqr n yvivat fvzcyl ol fryyvat flfgrzf, sberpnfgf, naq 
 yhpxl nzhyrgf. Jvafgba unq abguvat gb qb jvgu gur ehaavat bs gur Ybggrel, 
 juvpu jnf znantrq ol gur Zvavfgel bs Cyragl, ohg ur jnf njner (vaqrrq 
 rirelbar va gur cnegl jnf njner) gung gur cevmrf jrer ynetryl vzntvanel. 
 Bayl fznyy fhzf jrer npghnyyl cnvq bhg, gur jvaaref bs gur ovt cevmrf orvat 
 aba-rkvfgrag crefbaf. Va gur nofrapr bs nal erny vagrepbzzhavpngvba orgjrra 
 bar cneg bs Bprnavn naq nabgure, guvf jnf abg qvssvphyg gb neenatr. 
 Ohg vs gurer jnf ubcr, vg ynl va gur cebyrf. Lbh unq gb pyvat ba gb 
 gung. Jura lbh chg vg va jbeqf vg fbhaqrq ernfbanoyr: vg jnf jura lbh 
 ybbxrq ng gur uhzna orvatf cnffvat lbh ba gur cnirzrag gung vg orpnzr na 
 npg bs snvgu. Gur fgerrg vagb juvpu ur unq ghearq ena qbjauvyy. Ur unq n 
 srryvat gung ur unq orra va guvf arvtuobheubbq orsber, naq gung gurer jnf n 
 znva gubebhtusner abg sne njnl. Sebz fbzrjurer nurnq gurer pnzr n qva bs 
 fubhgvat ibvprf. Gur fgerrg gbbx n funec ghea naq gura raqrq va n syvtug bs 
 fgrcf juvpu yrq qbja vagb n fhaxra nyyrl jurer n srj fgnyy-xrrcref jrer 
 fryyvat gverq-ybbxvat irtrgnoyrf. Ng guvf zbzrag Jvafgba erzrzorerq jurer 
 ur jnf. Gur nyyrl yrq bhg vagb gur znva fgerrg, naq qbja gur arkg gheavat, 
 abg svir zvahgrf njnl, jnf gur whax-fubc jurer ur unq obhtug gur oynax obbx 
 juvpu jnf abj uvf qvnel. Naq va n fznyy fgngvbare'f fubc abg sne njnl ur 
 unq obhtug uvf craubyqre naq uvf obggyr bs vax. 
 Ur cnhfrq sbe n zbzrag ng gur gbc bs gur fgrcf. Ba gur bccbfvgr fvqr 
 bs gur nyyrl gurer jnf n qvatl yvggyr cho jubfr jvaqbjf nccrnerq gb or 
 sebfgrq bire ohg va ernyvgl jrer zreryl pbngrq jvgu qhfg. N irel byq zna, 
 orag ohg npgvir, jvgu juvgr zbhfgnpurf gung oevfgyrq sbejneq yvxr gubfr bs 
 n cenja, chfurq bcra gur fjvat qbbe naq jrag va. Nf Jvafgba fgbbq jngpuvat, 
 vg bppheerq gb uvz gung gur byq zna, jub zhfg or rvtugl ng gur yrnfg, unq 
 nyernql orra zvqqyr-ntrq jura gur Eribyhgvba unccrarq. Ur naq n srj bguref 
 yvxr uvz jrer gur ynfg yvaxf gung abj rkvfgrq jvgu gur inavfurq jbeyq bs 
 pncvgnyvfz. Va gur Cnegl vgfrys gurer jrer abg znal crbcyr yrsg jubfr vqrnf 
 unq orra sbezrq orsber gur Eribyhgvba. Gur byqre trarengvba unq zbfgyl orra 
 jvcrq bhg va gur terng chetrf bs gur svsgvrf naq fvkgvrf, naq gur srj jub 
 fheivirq unq ybat ntb orra greevsvrq vagb pbzcyrgr vagryyrpghny fheeraqre. 
 Vs gurer jnf nal bar fgvyy nyvir jub pbhyq tvir lbh n gehgushy nppbhag bs 
 pbaqvgvbaf va gur rneyl cneg bs gur praghel, vg pbhyq bayl or n cebyr. 
 Fhqqrayl gur cnffntr sebz gur uvfgbel obbx gung ur unq pbcvrq vagb uvf 
 qvnel pnzr onpx vagb Jvafgba'f zvaq, naq n yhangvp vzchyfr gbbx ubyq bs 
 uvz. Ur jbhyq tb vagb gur cho, ur jbhyq fpencr npdhnvagnapr jvgu gung byq 
 zna naq dhrfgvba uvz. Ur jbhyq fnl gb uvz: 'Gryy zr nobhg lbhe yvsr jura 
 lbh jrer n obl. Jung jnf vg yvxr va gubfr qnlf? Jrer guvatf orggre guna 
 gurl ner abj, be jrer gurl jbefr?' 
 Uheevrqyl, yrfg ur fubhyq unir gvzr gb orpbzr sevtugrarq, ur qrfpraqrq 
 gur fgrcf naq pebffrq gur aneebj fgerrg. Vg jnf znqarff bs pbhefr. Nf 
 hfhny, gurer jnf ab qrsvavgr ehyr ntnvafg gnyxvat gb cebyrf naq serdhragvat 
 gurve chof, ohg vg jnf sne gbb hahfhny na npgvba gb cnff haabgvprq. Vs gur 
 cngebyf nccrnerq ur zvtug cyrnq na nggnpx bs snvagarff, ohg vg jnf abg 
 yvxryl gung gurl jbhyq oryvrir uvz. Ur chfurq bcra gur qbbe, naq n uvqrbhf 
 purrfl fzryy bs fbhe orre uvg uvz va gur snpr. Nf ur ragrerq gur qva bs 
 ibvprf qebccrq gb nobhg unys vgf ibyhzr. Oruvaq uvf onpx ur pbhyq srry 
 rirelbar rlrvat uvf oyhr birenyyf. N tnzr bs qnegf juvpu jnf tbvat ba ng 
 gur bgure raq bs gur ebbz vagreehcgrq vgfrys sbe creuncf nf zhpu nf guvegl 
 frpbaqf. Gur byq zna jubz ur unq sbyybjrq jnf fgnaqvat ng gur one, univat 
 fbzr xvaq bs nygrepngvba jvgu gur onezna, n ynetr, fgbhg, ubbx-abfrq lbhat 
 zna jvgu rabezbhf sbernezf. N xabg bs bguref, fgnaqvat ebhaq jvgu tynffrf 
 va gurve unaqf, jrer jngpuvat gur fprar. 
 'V nefg lbh pvivy rabhtu, qvqa'g V?' fnvq gur byq zna, fgenvtugravat 
 uvf fubhyqref chtanpvbhfyl. 'Lbh gryyvat zr lbh nva'g tbg n cvag zht va gur 
 'byr oyrrqvat obbmre?' 
 'Naq jung va uryy'f anzr vf n cvag?' fnvq gur onezna, yrnavat sbejneq 
 jvgu gur gvcf bs uvf svatref ba gur pbhagre. 
 'Nex ng 'vz! Pnyyf 'vffrys n onezna naq qba'g xabj jung n cvag vf! 
 Jul, n cvag'f gur 'nys bs n dhneg, naq gurer'f sbhe dhnegf gb gur tnyyba. 
 'Nir gb grnpu lbh gur N, O, P arkg.' 
 'Arire urneq bs 'rz,' fnvq gur onezna fubegyl. 'Yvger naq unys yvger 
 -- gung'f nyy jr freir. Gurer'f gur tynffrf ba gur furys va sebag bs lbh.' 
 'V yvxrf n cvag,' crefvfgrq gur byq zna. 'Lbh pbhyq 'n qenjrq zr bss n 
 cvag rnfl rabhtu. Jr qvqa'g 'nir gurfr oyrrqvat yvgerf jura V jnf n lbhat 
 zna.' 
 'Jura lbh jrer n lbhat zna jr jrer nyy yvivat va gur gerrgbcf,' fnvq 
 gur onezna, jvgu n tynapr ng gur bgure phfgbzref. 
 Gurer jnf n fubhg bs ynhtugre, naq gur harnfvarff pnhfrq ol Jvafgba'f 
 ragel frrzrq gb qvfnccrne. Gur byq zna'f juvgrfghooyrq snpr unq syhfurq 
 cvax. Ur ghearq njnl, zhggrevat gb uvzfrys, naq ohzcrq vagb Jvafgba. 
 Jvafgba pnhtug uvz tragyl ol gur nez. 
 'Znl V bssre lbh n qevax?' ur fnvq. 
 'Lbh'er n trag,' fnvq gur bgure, fgenvtugravat uvf fubhyqref ntnva. Ur 
 nccrnerq abg gb unir abgvprq Jvafgba'f oyhr birenyyf. 'Cvag!' ur nqqrq 
 ntterffviryl gb gur onezna. 'Cvag bs jnyybc.' 
 Gur onezna fjvfurq gjb unys-yvgerf bs qnex-oebja orre vagb guvpx 
 tynffrf juvpu ur unq evafrq va n ohpxrg haqre gur pbhagre. Orre jnf gur 
 bayl qevax lbh pbhyq trg va cebyr chof. Gur cebyrf jrer fhccbfrq abg gb 
 qevax tva, gubhtu va cenpgvpr gurl pbhyq trg ubyq bs vg rnfvyl rabhtu. Gur 
 tnzr bs qnegf jnf va shyy fjvat ntnva, naq gur xabg bs zra ng gur one unq 
 ortha gnyxvat nobhg ybggrel gvpxrgf. Jvafgba'f cerfrapr jnf sbetbggra sbe n 
 zbzrag. Gurer jnf n qrny gnoyr haqre gur jvaqbj jurer ur naq gur byq zna 
 pbhyq gnyx jvgubhg srne bs orvat bireurneq. Vg jnf ubeevoyl qnatrebhf, ohg 
 ng nal engr gurer jnf ab gryrfperra va gur ebbz, n cbvag ur unq znqr fher 
 bs nf fbba nf ur pnzr va. 
 ''R pbhyq 'n qenjrq zr bss n cvag,' tehzoyrq gur byq zna nf ur frggyrq 
 qbja oruvaq n tynff. 'N 'nys yvger nva'g rabhtu. Vg qba'g fngvfsl. Naq n 
 'byr yvger'f gbb zhpu. Vg fgnegf zl oynqqre ehaavat. Yrg nybar gur cevpr.' 
 'Lbh zhfg unir frra terng punatrf fvapr lbh jrer n lbhat zna,' fnvq 
 Jvafgba gragngviryl. 
 Gur byq zna'f cnyr oyhr rlrf zbirq sebz gur qnegf obneq gb gur one, 
 naq sebz gur one gb gur qbbe bs gur Tragf, nf gubhtu vg jrer va gur one- 
 ebbz gung ur rkcrpgrq gur punatrf gb unir bppheerq. 
 'Gur orre jnf orggre,' ur fnvq svanyyl. 'Naq purncre! Jura V jnf n 
 lbhat zna, zvyq orre -- jnyybc jr hfrq gb pnyy vg -- jnf sbhecrapr n cvag. 
 Gung jnf orsber gur jne, bs pbhefr.' 
 'Juvpu jne jnf gung?' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 'Vg'f nyy jnef,' fnvq gur byq zna inthryl. Ur gbbx hc uvf tynff, naq 
 uvf fubhyqref fgenvtugrarq ntnva. ''Rer'f jvfuvat lbh gur irel orfg bs 
 'rnygu!' 
 Va uvf yrna guebng gur funec-cbvagrq Nqnz'f nccyr znqr n fhecevfvatyl 
 encvq hc-naq-qbja zbirzrag, naq gur orre inavfurq. Jvafgba jrag gb gur one 
 naq pnzr onpx jvgu gjb zber unys-yvgerf. Gur byq zna nccrnerq gb unir 
 sbetbggra uvf cerwhqvpr ntnvafg qevaxvat n shyy yvger. 
 'Lbh ner irel zhpu byqre guna V nz,' fnvq Jvafgba. 'Lbh zhfg unir orra 
 n tebja zna orsber V jnf obea. Lbh pna erzrzore jung vg jnf yvxr va gur byq 
 qnlf, orsber gur Eribyhgvba. Crbcyr bs zl ntr qba'g ernyyl xabj nalguvat 
 nobhg gubfr gvzrf. Jr pna bayl ernq nobhg gurz va obbxf, naq jung vg fnlf 
 va gur obbxf znl abg or gehr. V fubhyq yvxr lbhe bcvavba ba gung. Gur 
 uvfgbel obbxf fnl gung yvsr orsber gur Eribyhgvba jnf pbzcyrgryl qvssrerag 
 sebz jung vg vf abj. Gurer jnf gur zbfg greevoyr bccerffvba, vawhfgvpr, 
 cbiregl jbefr guna nalguvat jr pna vzntvar. Urer va Ybaqba, gur terng znff 
 bs gur crbcyr arire unq rabhtu gb rng sebz ovegu gb qrngu. Unys bs gurz 
 unqa'g rira obbgf ba gurve srrg. Gurl jbexrq gjryir ubhef n qnl, gurl yrsg 
 fpubby ng avar, gurl fyrcg gra va n ebbz. Naq ng gur fnzr gvzr gurer jrer n 
 irel srj crbcyr, bayl n srj gubhfnaqf -- gur pncvgnyvfgf, gurl jrer pnyyrq 
 -- jub jrer evpu naq cbjreshy. Gurl bjarq rirelguvat gung gurer jnf gb bja. 
 Gurl yvirq va terng tbetrbhf ubhfrf jvgu guvegl freinagf, gurl ebqr nobhg 
 va zbgbe-pnef naq sbhe-ubefr pneevntrf, gurl qenax punzcntar, gurl jber gbc 
 ungf--' 
 Gur byq zna oevtugrarq fhqqrayl. 
 'Gbc 'ngf!' ur fnvq. 'Shaal lbh fubhyq zragvba 'rz. Gur fnzr guvat 
 pbzr vagb zl 'rnq bayl lrfgreqnl, V qbab jul. V jnf wrfg guvaxvat, V nva'g 
 frra n gbc 'ng va lrnef. Tbea evtug bhg, gurl 'nir. Gur ynfg gvzr V jber 
 bar jnf ng zl fvfgre-va-ynj'f shareny. Naq gung jnf -- jryy, V pbhyqa'g 
 tvir lbh gur qngr, ohg vg zhfg'n orra svsgl lrnef ntb. Bs pbhefr vg jnf 
 bayl 'verq sbe gur bppnfvba, lbh haqrefgnaq.' 
 'Vg vfa'g irel vzcbegnag nobhg gur gbc ungf,' fnvq Jvafgba cngvragyl. 
 'Gur cbvag vf, gurfr pncvgnyvfgf -- gurl naq n srj ynjlref naq cevrfgf naq 
 fb sbegu jub yvirq ba gurz -- jrer gur ybeqf bs gur rnegu. Rirelguvat 
 rkvfgrq sbe gurve orarsvg. Lbh -- gur beqvanel crbcyr, gur jbexref -- jrer 
 gurve fynirf. Gurl pbhyq qb jung gurl yvxrq jvgu lbh. Gurl pbhyq fuvc lbh 
 bss gb Pnanqn yvxr pnggyr. Gurl pbhyq fyrrc jvgu lbhe qnhtugref vs gurl 
 pubfr. Gurl pbhyq beqre lbh gb or sybttrq jvgu fbzrguvat pnyyrq n png-b'- 
 avar gnvyf. Lbh unq gb gnxr lbhe pnc bss jura lbh cnffrq gurz. Rirel 
 pncvgnyvfg jrag nobhg jvgu n tnat bs ynpxrlf jub--' 
 Gur byq zna oevtugrarq ntnva. 
 'Ynpxrlf!' ur fnvq. 'Abj gurer'f n jbeq V nva'g 'rneq fvapr rire fb 
 ybat. Ynpxrlf! Gung ert'yne gnxrf zr onpx, gung qbrf. V erpbyyrpg bu, 
 qbaxrl'f lrnef ntb -- V hfrq gb fbzrgvzrf tb gb 'Lqr Cnex bs n Fhaqnl 
 nsgreabba gb 'rne gur oybxrf znxvat fcrrpurf. Fnyingvba Nezl, Ebzna 
 Pngubyvpf, Wrjf, Vaqvnaf -- nyy fbegf gurer jnf. Naq gurer jnf bar oybxr -- 
 jryy, V pbhyqa'g tvir lbh 'vf anzr, ohg n erny cbjreshy fcrnxre 'r jnf. 'R 
 qvqa'g 'nys tvir vg 'rz! "Ynpxrlf!" 'r fnlf, "ynpxrlf bs gur obhetrbvfvr! 
 Syhaxvrf bs gur ehyvat pynff!" Cnenfvgrf -- gung jnf nabgure bs gurz. Naq 
 'lranf -- 'r qrsvavgryl pnyyrq 'rz 'lranf. Bs pbhefr 'r jnf ersreevat gb 
 gur Ynobhe Cnegl, lbh haqrefgnaq.' 
 Jvafgba unq gur srryvat gung gurl jrer gnyxvat ng pebff-checbfrf. 
 'Jung V ernyyl jnagrq gb xabj jnf guvf,' ur fnvq. 'Qb lbh srry gung 
 lbh unir zber serrqbz abj guna lbh unq va gubfr qnlf? Ner lbh gerngrq zber 
 yvxr n uhzna orvat? Va gur byq qnlf, gur evpu crbcyr, gur crbcyr ng gur 
 gbc--' 
 'Gur 'Bhfr bs Ybeqf,' chg va gur byq zna erzvavfpragyl. 
 'Gur Ubhfr bs Ybeqf, vs lbh yvxr. Jung V nz nfxvat vf, jrer gurfr 
 crbcyr noyr gb gerng lbh nf na vasrevbe, fvzcyl orpnhfr gurl jrer evpu naq 
 lbh jrer cbbe? Vf vg n snpg, sbe vafgnapr, gung lbh unq gb pnyy gurz "Fve" 
 naq gnxr bss lbhe pnc jura lbh cnffrq gurz?' 
 Gur byq zna nccrnerq gb guvax qrrcyl. Ur qenax bss nobhg n dhnegre bs 
 uvf orre orsber nafjrevat. 
 'Lrf,' ur fnvq. 'Gurl yvxrq lbh gb gbhpu lbhe pnc gb 'rz. Vg fubjrq 
 erfcrpg, yvxr. V qvqa'g nterr jvgu vg, zlfrys, ohg V qbar vg bsgra rabhtu. 
 Unq gb, nf lbh zvtug fnl.' 
 'Naq jnf vg hfhny -- V'z bayl dhbgvat jung V'ir ernq va uvfgbel obbxf 
 -- jnf vg hfhny sbe gurfr crbcyr naq gurve freinagf gb chfu lbh bss gur 
 cnirzrag vagb gur thggre?' 
 'Bar bs 'rz chfurq zr bapr,' fnvq gur byq zna. 'V erpbyyrpg vg nf vs 
 vg jnf lrfgreqnl. Vg jnf Obng Enpr avtug -- greevoyl ebjql gurl hfrq gb trg 
 ba Obng Enpr avtug -- naq V ohzcf vagb n lbhat oybxr ba Funsgrfohel Nirahr. 
 Dhvgr n trag, 'r jnf -- qerff fuveg, gbc 'ng, oynpx birepbng. 'R jnf xvaq 
 bs mvt-mnttvat npebff gur cnirzrag, naq V ohzcf vagb 'vz nppvqragny-yvxr. 
 'R fnlf, "Jul pna'g lbh ybbx jurer lbh'er tbvat?" 'r fnlf. V fnl, "Wh guvax 
 lbh'ir obhtug gur oyrrqvat cnirzrag?" 'R fnlf, "V'yy gjvfg lbhe oybbql 'rnq 
 bss vs lbh trg serfu jvgu zr." V fnlf, "Lbh'er qehax. V'yy tvir lbh va 
 punetr va 'nys n zvahgr," V fnlf. Na' vs lbh'yy oryvrir zr, 'r chgf 'vf 
 'naq ba zl purfg naq tvirf zr n fubir nf cerggl arne frag zr haqre gur 
 jurryf bs n ohf. Jryy, V jnf lbhat va gurz qnlf, naq V jnf tbvat gb 'nir 
 srgpurq 'vz bar, bayl--' 
 N frafr bs urycyrffarff gbbx ubyq bs Jvafgba. Gur byq zna'f zrzbel jnf 
 abguvat ohg n ehoovfu-urnc bs qrgnvyf. Bar pbhyq dhrfgvba uvz nyy qnl 
 jvgubhg trggvat nal erny vasbezngvba. Gur cnegl uvfgbevrf zvtug fgvyy or 
 gehr, nsgre n snfuvba: gurl zvtug rira or pbzcyrgryl gehr. Ur znqr n ynfg 
 nggrzcg. 
 'Creuncf V unir abg znqr zlfrys pyrne,' ur fnvq. 'Jung V'z gelvat gb 
 fnl vf guvf. Lbh unir orra nyvir n irel ybat gvzr; lbh yvirq unys lbhe yvsr 
 orsber gur Eribyhgvba. Va 1925, sbe vafgnapr, lbh jrer nyernql tebja hc. 
 Jbhyq lbh fnl sebz jung lbh pna erzrzore, gung yvsr va 1925 jnf orggre guna 
 vg vf abj, be jbefr? Vs lbh pbhyq pubbfr, jbhyq lbh cersre gb yvir gura be 
 abj?' 
 Gur byq zna ybbxrq zrqvgngviryl ng gur qnegf obneq. Ur svavfurq hc uvf 
 orre, zber fybjyl guna orsber. Jura ur fcbxr vg jnf jvgu n gbyrenag 
 cuvybfbcuvpny nve, nf gubhtu gur orre unq zryybjrq uvz. 
 'V xabj jung lbh rkcrpg zr gb fnl,' ur fnvq. 'Lbh rkcrpg zr gb fnl nf 
 V'q fbbare or lbhat ntnva. Zbfg crbcyr'q fnl gurl'q fbbare or lbhat, vs lbh 
 nefg" 'rz. Lbh tbg lbhe 'rnygu naq fgeratgu jura lbh'er lbhat. Jura lbh trg 
 gb zl gvzr bs yvsr lbh nva'g arire jryy. V fhssre fbzrguvat jvpxrq sebz zl 
 srrg, naq zl oynqqre'f wrfg greevoyr. Fvk naq frira gvzrf n avtug vg 'nf zr 
 bhg bs orq. Ba gur bgure 'naq, gurer'f terng nqinagntrf va orvat n byq zna. 
 Lbh nva'g tbg gur fnzr jbeevrf. Ab gehpx jvgu jbzra, naq gung'f n terng 
 guvat. V nva'g 'nq n jbzna sbe arne ba guvegl lrne, vs lbh'q perqvg vg. Abe 
 jnagrq gb, jung'f zber.' 
 Jvafgba fng onpx ntnvafg gur jvaqbj-fvyy. Vg jnf ab hfr tbvat ba. Ur 
 jnf nobhg gb ohl fbzr zber orre jura gur byq zna fhqqrayl tbg hc naq 
 fuhssyrq encvqyl vagb gur fgvaxvat hevany ng gur fvqr bs gur ebbz. Gur 
 rkgen unys-yvger jnf nyernql jbexvat ba uvz. Jvafgba fng sbe n zvahgr be 
 gjb tnmvat ng uvf rzcgl tynff, naq uneqyl abgvprq jura uvf srrg pneevrq uvz 
 bhg vagb gur fgerrg ntnva. Jvguva gjragl lrnef ng gur zbfg, ur ersyrpgrq, 
 gur uhtr naq fvzcyr dhrfgvba, 'Jnf yvsr orggre orsber gur Eribyhgvba guna 
 vg vf abj?' jbhyq unir prnfrq bapr naq sbe nyy gb or nafjrenoyr. Ohg va 
 rssrpg vg jnf hanafjrenoyr rira abj, fvapr gur srj fpnggrerq fheivibef sebz 
 gur napvrag jbeyq jrer vapncnoyr bs pbzcnevat bar ntr jvgu nabgure. Gurl 
 erzrzorerq n zvyyvba hfryrff guvatf, n dhneery jvgu n jbexzngr, n uhag sbe 
 n ybfg ovplpyr chzc, gur rkcerffvba ba n ybat-qrnq fvfgre'f snpr, gur 
 fjveyf bs qhfg ba n jvaql zbeavat friragl lrnef ntb: ohg nyy gur eryrinag 
 snpgf jrer bhgfvqr gur enatr bs gurve ivfvba. Gurl jrer yvxr gur nag, juvpu 
 pna frr fznyy bowrpgf ohg abg ynetr barf. Naq jura zrzbel snvyrq naq 
 jevggra erpbeqf jrer snyfvsvrq -- jura gung unccrarq, gur pynvz bs gur 
 Cnegl gb unir vzcebirq gur pbaqvgvbaf bs uhzna yvsr unq tbg gb or npprcgrq, 
 orpnhfr gurer qvq abg rkvfg, naq arire ntnva pbhyq rkvfg, nal fgnaqneq 
 ntnvafg juvpu vg pbhyq or grfgrq. 
 Ng guvf zbzrag uvf genva bs gubhtug fgbccrq noehcgyl. Ur unygrq naq 
 ybbxrq hc. Ur jnf va n aneebj fgerrg, jvgu n srj qnex yvggyr fubcf, 
 vagrefcrefrq nzbat qjryyvat-ubhfrf. Vzzrqvngryl nobir uvf urnq gurer uhat 
 guerr qvfpbybherq zrgny onyyf juvpu ybbxrq nf vs gurl unq bapr orra tvyqrq. 
 Ur frrzrq gb xabj gur cynpr. Bs pbhefr! Ur jnf fgnaqvat bhgfvqr gur whax- 
 fubc jurer ur unq obhtug gur qvnel. 
 N gjvatr bs srne jrag guebhtu uvz. Vg unq orra n fhssvpvragyl enfu npg 
 gb ohl gur obbx va gur ortvaavat, naq ur unq fjbea arire gb pbzr arne gur 
 cynpr ntnva. Naq lrg gur vafgnag gung ur nyybjrq uvf gubhtugf gb jnaqre, 
 uvf srrg unq oebhtug uvz onpx urer bs gurve bja nppbeq. Vg jnf cerpvfryl 
 ntnvafg fhvpvqny vzchyfrf bs guvf xvaq gung ur unq ubcrq gb thneq uvzfrys 
 ol bcravat gur qvnel. Ng gur fnzr gvzr ur abgvprq gung nygubhtu vg jnf 
 arneyl gjragl-bar ubhef gur fubc jnf fgvyy bcra. Jvgu gur srryvat gung ur 
 jbhyq or yrff pbafcvphbhf vafvqr guna unatvat nobhg ba gur cnirzrag, ur 
 fgrccrq guebhtu gur qbbejnl. Vs dhrfgvbarq, ur pbhyq cynhfvoyl fnl gung ur 
 jnf gelvat gb ohl enmbe oynqrf. 
 Gur cebcevrgbe unq whfg yvtugrq n unatvat bvy ynzc juvpu tnir bss na 
 hapyrna ohg sevraqyl fzryy. Ur jnf n zna bs creuncf fvkgl, senvy naq objrq, 
 jvgu n ybat, oraribyrag abfr, naq zvyq rlrf qvfgbegrq ol guvpx fcrpgnpyrf. 
 Uvf unve jnf nyzbfg juvgr, ohg uvf rlroebjf jrer ohful naq fgvyy oynpx. Uvf 
 fcrpgnpyrf, uvf tragyr, shffl zbirzragf, naq gur snpg gung ur jnf jrnevat 
 na ntrq wnpxrg bs oynpx iryirg, tnir uvz n inthr nve bs vagryyrpghnyvgl, nf 
 gubhtu ur unq orra fbzr xvaq bs yvgrenel zna, be creuncf n zhfvpvna. Uvf 
 ibvpr jnf fbsg, nf gubhtu snqrq, naq uvf npprag yrff qronfrq guna gung bs 
 gur znwbevgl bs cebyrf. 
 'V erpbtavmrq lbh ba gur cnirzrag,' ur fnvq vzzrqvngryl. 'Lbh'er gur 
 tragyrzna gung obhtug gur lbhat ynql'f xrrcfnxr nyohz. Gung jnf n ornhgvshy 
 ovg bs cncre, gung jnf. Pernz-ynvq, vg hfrq gb or pnyyrq. Gurer'f orra ab 
 cncre yvxr gung znqr sbe -- bu, V qner fnl svsgl lrnef.' Ur crrerq ng 
 Jvafgba bire gur gbc bs uvf fcrpgnpyrf. 'Vf gurer nalguvat fcrpvny V pna qb 
 sbe lbh? Be qvq lbh whfg jnag gb ybbx ebhaq?' 
 'V jnf cnffvat,' fnvq Jvafgba inthryl. 'V whfg ybbxrq va. V qba'g jnag 
 nalguvat va cnegvphyne.' 
 'Vg'f whfg nf jryy,' fnvq gur bgure, 'orpnhfr V qba'g fhccbfr V pbhyq 
 unir fngvfsvrq lbh.' Ur znqr na ncbybtrgvp trfgher jvgu uvf fbsgcnyzrq 
 unaq. 'Lbh frr ubj vg vf; na rzcgl fubc, lbh zvtug fnl. Orgjrra lbh naq zr, 
 gur nagvdhr genqr'f whfg nobhg svavfurq. Ab qrznaq nal ybatre, naq ab fgbpx 
 rvgure. Sheavgher, puvan, tynff vg'f nyy orra oebxra hc ol qrterrf. Naq bs 
 pbhefr gur zrgny fghss'f zbfgyl orra zrygrq qbja. V unira'g frra n oenff 
 pnaqyrfgvpx va lrnef.' 
 Gur gval vagrevbe bs gur fubc jnf va snpg hapbzsbegnoyl shyy, ohg 
 gurer jnf nyzbfg abguvat va vg bs gur fyvtugrfg inyhr. Gur sybbefcnpr jnf 
 irel erfgevpgrq, orpnhfr nyy ebhaq gur jnyyf jrer fgnpxrq vaahzrenoyr qhfgl 
 cvpgher-senzrf. Va gur jvaqbj gurer jrer genlf bs ahgf naq obygf, jbea-bhg 
 puvfryf, craxavirf jvgu oebxra oynqrf, gneavfurq jngpurf gung qvq abg rira 
 cergraq gb or va tbvat beqre, naq bgure zvfpryynarbhf ehoovfu. Bayl ba n 
 fznyy gnoyr va gur pbeare jnf gurer n yvggre bs bqqf naq raqf -- ynpdhrerq 
 fahssobkrf, ntngr oebbpurf, naq gur yvxr -- juvpu ybbxrq nf gubhtu gurl 
 zvtug vapyhqr fbzrguvat vagrerfgvat. Nf Jvafgba jnaqrerq gbjneqf gur gnoyr 
 uvf rlr jnf pnhtug ol n ebhaq, fzbbgu guvat gung tyrnzrq fbsgyl va gur 
 ynzcyvtug, naq ur cvpxrq vg hc. 
 Vg jnf n urnil yhzc bs tynff, pheirq ba bar fvqr, syng ba gur bgure, 
 znxvat nyzbfg n urzvfcurer. Gurer jnf n crphyvne fbsgarff, nf bs envajngre, 
 va obgu gur pbybhe naq gur grkgher bs gur tynff. Ng gur urneg bs vg, 
 zntavsvrq ol gur pheirq fhesnpr, gurer jnf n fgenatr, cvax, pbaibyhgrq 
 bowrpg gung erpnyyrq n ebfr be n frn narzbar. 
 'Jung vf vg?' fnvq Jvafgba, snfpvangrq. 
 'Gung'f pbeny, gung vf,' fnvq gur byq zna. 'Vg zhfg unir pbzr sebz gur 
 Vaqvna Bprna. Gurl hfrq gb xvaq bs rzorq vg va gur tynff. Gung jnfa'g znqr 
 yrff guna n uhaqerq lrnef ntb. Zber, ol gur ybbx bs vg.' 
 'Vg'f n ornhgvshy guvat,' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 'Vg vf n ornhgvshy guvat,' fnvq gur bgure nccerpvngviryl. 'Ohg gurer'f 
 abg znal gung'q fnl fb abjnqnlf.' Ur pbhturq. 'Abj, vs vg fb unccrarq gung 
 lbh jnagrq gb ohl vg, gung'q pbfg lbh sbhe qbyynef. V pna erzrzore jura n 
 guvat yvxr gung jbhyq unir srgpurq rvtug cbhaqf, naq rvtug cbhaqf jnf -- 
 jryy, V pna'g jbex vg bhg, ohg vg jnf n ybg bs zbarl. Ohg jub pnerf nobhg 
 trahvar nagvdhrf abjnqnlf rira gur srj gung'f yrsg?' 
 Jvafgba vzzrqvngryl cnvq bire gur sbhe qbyynef naq fyvq gur pbirgrq 
 guvat vagb uvf cbpxrg. Jung nccrnyrq gb uvz nobhg vg jnf abg fb zhpu vgf 
 ornhgl nf gur nve vg frrzrq gb cbffrff bs orybatvat gb na ntr dhvgr 
 qvssrerag sebz gur cerfrag bar. Gur fbsg, envajngrel tynff jnf abg yvxr nal 
 tynff gung ur unq rire frra. Gur guvat jnf qbhoyl nggenpgvir orpnhfr bs vgf 
 nccnerag hfryrffarff, gubhtu ur pbhyq thrff gung vg zhfg bapr unir orra 
 vagraqrq nf n cncrejrvtug. Vg jnf irel urnil va uvf cbpxrg, ohg sbeghangryl 
 vg qvq abg znxr zhpu bs n ohytr. Vg jnf n dhrre guvat, rira n pbzcebzvfvat 
 guvat, sbe n Cnegl zrzore gb unir va uvf cbffrffvba. Nalguvat byq, naq sbe 
 gung znggre nalguvat ornhgvshy, jnf nyjnlf inthryl fhfcrpg. Gur byq zna unq 
 tebja abgvprnoyl zber purreshy nsgre erprvivat gur sbhe qbyynef. Jvafgba 
 ernyvmrq gung ur jbhyq unir npprcgrq guerr be rira gjb. 
 'Gurer'f nabgure ebbz hcfgnvef gung lbh zvtug pner gb gnxr n ybbx ng,' 
 ur fnvq. 'Gurer'f abg zhpu va vg. Whfg n srj cvrprf. Jr'yy qb jvgu n yvtug 
 vs jr'er tbvat hcfgnvef.' 
 Ur yvg nabgure ynzc, naq, jvgu objrq onpx, yrq gur jnl fybjyl hc gur 
 fgrrc naq jbea fgnvef naq nybat n gval cnffntr, vagb n ebbz juvpu qvq abg 
 tvir ba gur fgerrg ohg ybbxrq bhg ba n pbooyrq lneq naq n sberfg bs 
 puvzarl-cbgf. Jvafgba abgvprq gung gur sheavgher jnf fgvyy neenatrq nf 
 gubhtu gur ebbz jrer zrnag gb or yvirq va. Gurer jnf n fgevc bs pnecrg ba 
 gur sybbe, n cvpgher be gjb ba gur jnyyf, naq n qrrc, fynggreayl nez-punve 
 qenja hc gb gur svercynpr. Na byq-snfuvbarq tynff pybpx jvgu n gjryir-ubhe 
 snpr jnf gvpxvat njnl ba gur znagrycvrpr. Haqre gur jvaqbj, naq bpphclvat 
 arneyl n dhnegre bs gur ebbz, jnf na rabezbhf orq jvgu gur znggerff fgvyy 
 ba vg. 
 'Jr yvirq urer gvyy zl jvsr qvrq,' fnvq gur byq zna unys 
 ncbybtrgvpnyyl. 'V'z fryyvat gur sheavgher bss ol yvggyr naq yvggyr. Abj 
 gung'f n ornhgvshy znubtnal orq, be ng yrnfg vg jbhyq or vs lbh pbhyq trg 
 gur ohtf bhg bs vg. Ohg V qner fnl lbh'q svaq vg n yvggyr ovg phzorefbzr.' 
 Ur jnf ubyqyat gur ynzc uvtu hc, fb nf gb vyyhzvangr gur jubyr ebbz, 
 naq va gur jnez qvz yvtug gur cynpr ybbxrq phevbhfyl vaivgvat. Gur gubhtug 
 syvggrq guebhtu Jvafgba'f zvaq gung vg jbhyq cebonoyl or dhvgr rnfl gb erag 
 gur ebbz sbe n srj qbyynef n jrrx, vs ur qnerq gb gnxr gur evfx. Vg jnf n 
 jvyq, vzcbffvoyr abgvba, gb or nonaqbarq nf fbba nf gubhtug bs; ohg gur 
 ebbz unq njnxrarq va uvz n fbeg bs abfgnytvn, n fbeg bs naprfgeny zrzbel. 
 Vg frrzrq gb uvz gung ur xarj rknpgyl jung vg sryg yvxr gb fvg va n ebbz 
 yvxr guvf, va na nez-punve orfvqr na bcra sver jvgu lbhe srrg va gur sraqre 
 naq n xrggyr ba gur ubo; hggreyl nybar, hggreyl frpher, jvgu abobql 
 jngpuvat lbh, ab ibvpr chefhvat lbh, ab fbhaq rkprcg gur fvatvat bs gur 
 xrggyr naq gur sevraqyl gvpxvat bs gur pybpx. 
 'Gurer'f ab gryrfperra!' ur pbhyq abg uryc zhezhevat. 
 'Nu,' fnvq gur byq zna, 'V arire unq bar bs gubfr guvatf. Gbb 
 rkcrafvir. Naq V arire frrzrq gb srry gur arrq bs vg, fbzrubj. Abj gung'f n 
 avpr tngryrt gnoyr va gur pbeare gurer. Gubhtu bs pbhefr lbh'q unir gb chg 
 arj uvatrf ba vg vs lbh jnagrq gb hfr gur syncf.' 
 Gurer jnf n fznyy obbxpnfr va gur bgure pbeare, naq Jvafgba unq 
 nyernql tenivgngrq gbjneqf vg. Vg pbagnvarq abguvat ohg ehoovfu. Gur 
 uhagvat-qbja naq qrfgehpgvba bs obbxf unq orra qbar jvgu gur fnzr 
 gubebhtuarff va gur cebyr dhnegref nf rireljurer ryfr. Vg jnf irel hayvxryl 
 gung gurer rkvfgrq naljurer va Bprnavn n pbcl bs n obbx cevagrq rneyvre 
 guna 1960. Gur byq zna, fgvyy pneelvat gur ynzc, jnf fgnaqvat va sebag bs n 
 cvpgher va n ebfrjbbq senzr juvpu uhat ba gur bgure fvqr bs gur svercynpr, 
 bccbfvgr gur orq. 
 'Abj, vs lbh unccra gb or vagrerfgrq va byq cevagf ng nyy--' ur ortna 
 qryvpngryl. 
 Jvafgba pnzr npebff gb rknzvar gur cvpgher. Vg jnf n fgrry ratenivat 
 bs na biny ohvyqvat jvgu erpgnathyne jvaqbjf, naq n fznyy gbjre va sebag. 
 Gurer jnf n envyvat ehaavat ebhaq gur ohvyqvat, naq ng gur erne raq gurer 
 jnf jung nccrnerq gb or n fgnghr. Jvafgba tnmrq ng vg sbe fbzr zbzragf. Vg 
 frrzrq inthryl snzvyvne, gubhtu ur qvq abg erzrzore gur fgnghr. 
 'Gur senzr'f svkrq gb gur jnyy,' fnvq gur byq zna, 'ohg V pbhyq 
 hafperj vg sbe lbh, V qner fnl.' 
 'V xabj gung ohvyqvat,' fnvq Jvafgba svanyyl. 'Vg'f n ehva abj. Vg'f 
 va gur zvqqyr bs gur fgerrg bhgfvqr gur Cnynpr bs Whfgvpr.' 
 'Gung'f evtug. Bhgfvqr gur Ynj Pbhegf. Vg jnf obzorq va -- bu, znal 
 lrnef ntb. Vg jnf n puhepu ng bar gvzr, Fg. Pyrzrag'f Qnarf, vgf anzr jnf.' 
 Ur fzvyrq ncbybtrgvpnyyl, nf gubhtu pbafpvbhf bs fnlvat fbzrguvat fyvtugyl 
 evqvphybhf, naq nqqrq: '"Benatrf naq yrzbaf," fnl gur oryyf bs Fg. 
 Pyrzrag'f!' 
 'Jung'f gung?' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 'Bu -- "'Benatrf naq yrzbaf,' fnl gur oryyf bs Fg. Pyrzrag'f." Gung 
 jnf n eulzr jr unq jura V jnf n yvggyr obl. Ubj vg tbrf ba V qba'g 
 erzrzore, ohg V qb xabj vg raqrq hc, "Urer pbzrf n pnaqyr gb yvtug lbh gb 
 orq, Urer pbzrf n pubccre gb pubc bss lbhe urnq." Vg jnf n xvaq bs n qnapr. 
 Gurl uryq bhg gurve nezf sbe lbh gb cnff haqre, naq jura gurl pnzr gb "Urer 
 pbzrf n pubccre gb pubc bss lbhe urnq" gurl oebhtug gurve nezf qbja naq 
 pnhtug lbh. Vg jnf whfg anzrf bs puhepurf. Nyy gur Ybaqba puhepurf jrer va 
 vg -- nyy gur cevapvcny barf, gung vf.' 
 Jvafgba jbaqrerq inthryl gb jung praghel gur puhepu orybatrq. Vg jnf 
 nyjnlf qvssvphyg gb qrgrezvar gur ntr bs n Ybaqba ohvyqvat. Nalguvat ynetr 
 naq vzcerffvir, vs vg jnf ernfbanoyl arj va nccrnenapr, jnf nhgbzngvpnyyl 
 pynvzrq nf univat orra ohvyg fvapr gur Eribyhgvba, juvyr nalguvat gung jnf 
 boivbhfyl bs rneyvre qngr jnf nfpevorq gb fbzr qvz crevbq pnyyrq gur Zvqqyr 
 Ntrf. Gur praghevrf bs pncvgnyvfz jrer uryq gb unir cebqhprq abguvat bs nal 
 inyhr. Bar pbhyq abg yrnea uvfgbel sebz nepuvgrpgher nal zber guna bar 
 pbhyq yrnea vg sebz obbxf. Fgnghrf, vafpevcgvbaf, zrzbevny fgbarf, gur 
 anzrf bs fgerrgf -- nalguvat gung zvtug guebj yvtug hcba gur cnfg unq orra 
 flfgrzngvpnyyl nygrerq. 
 'V arire xarj vg unq orra n puhepu,' ur fnvq. 
 'Gurer'f n ybg bs gurz yrsg, ernyyl,' fnvq gur byq zna, 'gubhtu 
 gurl'ir orra chg gb bgure hfrf. Abj, ubj qvq gung eulzr tb? Nu! V'ir tbg 
 vg! 
 
 'Benatrf naq yrzbaf,' fnl gur oryyf bs Fg. Pyrzrag'f, 
 'Lbh bjr zr guerr sneguvatf,' fnl gur oryyf bs Fg. Znegva'f-- 
 
 gurer, abj, gung'f nf sne nf V pna trg. N sneguvat, gung jnf n fznyy pbccre 
 pbva, ybbxrq fbzrguvat yvxr n prag.' 
 'Jurer jnf Fg. Znegva'f?' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 'Fg. Znegva'f? Gung'f fgvyy fgnaqvat. Vg'f va Ivpgbel Fdhner, 
 nybatfvqr gur cvpgher tnyyrel. N ohvyqvat jvgu n xvaq bs n gevnathyne cbepu 
 naq cvyynef va sebag, naq n ovt syvtug bs fgrcf.' 
 Jvafgba xarj gur cynpr jryy. Vg jnf n zhfrhz hfrq sbe cebcntnaqn 
 qvfcynlf bs inevbhf xvaqf -- fpnyr zbqryf bs ebpxrg obzof naq Sybngvat 
 Sbegerffrf, jnkjbex gnoyrnhk vyyhfgengvat rarzl ngebpvgvrf, naq gur yvxr. 
 'Fg. Znegva'f-va-gur-Svryqf vg hfrq gb or pnyyrq,' fhccyrzragrq gur 
 byq zna, 'gubhtu V qba'g erpbyyrpg nal svryqf naljurer va gubfr cnegf.' 
 Jvafgba qvq abg ohl gur cvpgher. Vg jbhyq unir orra na rira zber 
 vapbatehbhf cbffrffvba guna gur tynff cncrejrvtug, naq vzcbffvoyr gb pneel 
 ubzr, hayrff vg jrer gnxra bhg bs vgf senzr. Ohg ur yvatrerq sbe fbzr 
 zvahgrf zber, gnyxvat gb gur byq zna, jubfr anzr, ur qvfpbirerq, jnf abg 
 Jrrxf -- nf bar zvtug unir tngurerq sebz gur vafpevcgvba bire gur fubc- 
 sebag -- ohg Puneevatgba. Ze. Puneevatgba, vg frrzrq, jnf n jvqbjre ntrq 
 fvkgl-guerr naq unq vaunovgrq guvf fubc sbe guvegl lrnef. Guebhtubhg gung 
 gvzr ur unq orra vagraqvat gb nygre gur anzr bire gur jvaqbj, ohg unq arire 
 dhvgr tbg gb gur cbvag bs qbvat vg. Nyy gur juvyr gung gurl jrer gnyxvat 
 gur unys-erzrzorerq eulzr xrcg ehaavat guebhtu Jvafgba'f urnq. Benatrf naq 
 yrzbaf fnl gur oryyf bs Fg. Pyrzrag'f, Lbh bjr zr guerr sneguvatf, fnl gur 
 oryyf bs Fg. Znegva'f! Vg jnf phevbhf, ohg jura lbh fnvq vg gb lbhefrys lbh 
 unq gur vyyhfvba bs npghnyyl urnevat oryyf, gur oryyf bs n ybfg Ybaqba gung 
 fgvyy rkvfgrq fbzrjurer be bgure, qvfthvfrq naq sbetbggra. Sebz bar tubfgyl 
 fgrrcyr nsgre nabgure ur frrzrq gb urne gurz crnyvat sbegu. Lrg fb sne nf 
 ur pbhyq erzrzore ur unq arire va erny yvsr urneq puhepu oryyf evatvat. 
 Ur tbg njnl sebz Ze. Puneevatgba naq jrag qbja gur fgnvef nybar, fb nf 
 abg gb yrg gur byq zna frr uvz erpbaabvgevat gur fgerrg orsber fgrccvat bhg 
 bs gur qbbe. Ur unq nyernql znqr hc uvf zvaq gung nsgre n fhvgnoyr vagreiny 
 -- n zbagu, fnl -- ur jbhyq gnxr gur evfx bs ivfvgvat gur fubc ntnva. Vg 
 jnf creuncf abg zber qnatrebhf guna fuvexvat na riravat ng gur Prager. Gur 
 frevbhf cvrpr bs sbyyl unq orra gb pbzr onpx urer va gur svefg cynpr, nsgre 
 ohlvat gur qvnel naq jvgubhg xabjvat jurgure gur cebcevrgbe bs gur fubc 
 pbhyq or gehfgrq. Ubjrire--! 
 Lrf, ur gubhtug ntnva, ur jbhyq pbzr onpx. Ur jbhyq ohl shegure fpencf 
 bs ornhgvshy ehoovfu. Ur jbhyq ohl gur ratenivat bs Fg. Pyrzrag'f Qnarf, 
 gnxr vg bhg bs vgf senzr, naq pneel vg ubzr pbaprnyrq haqre gur wnpxrg bs 
 uvf birenyyf. Ur jbhyq qent gur erfg bs gung cbrz bhg bs Ze. Puneevatgba'f 
 zrzbel. Rira gur yhangvp cebwrpg bs eragvat gur ebbz hcfgnvef synfurq 
 zbzragnevyl guebhtu uvf zvaq ntnva. Sbe creuncf svir frpbaqf rknygngvba 
 znqr uvz pneryrff, naq ur fgrccrq bhg ba gb gur cnirzrag jvgubhg fb zhpu nf 
 n ceryvzvanel tynapr guebhtu gur jvaqbj. Ur unq rira fgnegrq uhzzvat gb na 
 vzcebivfrq ghar-- 
 
 'Benatrf naq yrzbaf,' fnl gur oryyf bs Fg. Pyrzrag'f, 
 'Lbh bjr zr guerr sneguvatf,' fnl gur-- 
 
 Fhqqrayl uvf urneg frrzrq gb ghea gb vpr naq uvf objryf gb jngre. N 
 svther va oyhr birenyyf jnf pbzvat qbja gur cnirzrag, abg gra zrgerf njnl. 
 Vg jnf gur tvey sebz gur Svpgvba Qrcnegzrag, gur tvey jvgu qnex unve. Gur 
 yvtug jnf snvyvat, ohg gurer jnf ab qvssvphygl va erpbtavmvat ure. Fur 
 ybbxrq uvz fgenvtug va gur snpr, gura jnyxrq dhvpxyl ba nf gubhtu fur unq 
 abg frra uvz. 
 Sbe n srj frpbaqf Jvafgba jnf gbb cnenylfrq gb zbir. Gura ur ghearq gb 
 gur evtug naq jnyxrq urnivyl njnl, abg abgvpvat sbe gur zbzrag gung ur jnf 
 tbvat va gur jebat qverpgvba. Ng nal engr, bar dhrfgvba jnf frggyrq. Gurer 
 jnf ab qbhogvat nal ybatre gung gur tvey jnf fclvat ba uvz. Fur zhfg unir 
 sbyybjrq uvz urer, orpnhfr vg jnf abg perqvoyr gung ol cher punapr fur 
 fubhyq unir unccrarq gb or jnyxvat ba gur fnzr riravat hc gur fnzr bofpher 
 onpxfgerrg, xvybzrgerf qvfgnag sebz nal dhnegre jurer Cnegl zrzoref yvirq. 
 Vg jnf gbb terng n pbvapvqrapr. Jurgure fur jnf ernyyl na ntrag bs gur 
 Gubhtug Cbyvpr, be fvzcyl na nzngrhe fcl npghngrq ol bssvpvbhfarff, uneqyl 
 znggrerq. Vg jnf rabhtu gung fur jnf jngpuvat uvz. Cebonoyl fur unq frra 
 uvz tb vagb gur cho nf jryy. 
 Vg jnf na rssbeg gb jnyx. Gur yhzc bs tynff va uvf cbpxrg onatrq 
 ntnvafg uvf guvtu ng rnpu fgrc, naq ur jnf unys zvaqrq gb gnxr vg bhg naq 
 guebj vg njnl. Gur jbefg guvat jnf gur cnva va uvf oryyl. Sbe n pbhcyr bs 
 zvahgrf ur unq gur srryvat gung ur jbhyq qvr vs ur qvq abg ernpu n yningbel 
 fbba. Ohg gurer jbhyq or ab choyvp yningbevrf va n dhnegre yvxr guvf. Gura 
 gur fcnfz cnffrq, yrnivat n qhyy npur oruvaq. 
 Gur fgerrg jnf n oyvaq nyyrl. Jvafgba unygrq, fgbbq sbe frireny 
 frpbaqf jbaqrevat inthryl jung gb qb, gura ghearq ebhaq naq ortna gb 
 ergenpr uvf fgrcf. Nf ur ghearq vg bppheerq gb uvz gung gur tvey unq bayl 
 cnffrq uvz guerr zvahgrf ntb naq gung ol ehaavat ur pbhyq cebonoyl pngpu hc 
 jvgu ure. Ur pbhyq xrrc ba ure genpx gvyy gurl jrer va fbzr dhvrg cynpr, 
 naq gura fznfu ure fxhyy va jvgu n pbooyrfgbar. Gur cvrpr bs tynff va uvf 
 cbpxrg jbhyq or urnil rabhtu sbe gur wbo. Ohg ur nonaqbarq gur vqrn 
 vzzrqvngryl, orpnhfr rira gur gubhtug bs znxvat nal culfvpny rssbeg jnf 
 haornenoyr. Ur pbhyq abg eha, ur pbhyq abg fgevxr n oybj. Orfvqrf, fur jnf 
 lbhat naq yhfgl naq jbhyq qrsraq urefrys. Ur gubhtug nyfb bs uheelvat gb 
 gur Pbzzhavgl Prager naq fgnlvat gurer gvyy gur cynpr pybfrq, fb nf gb 
 rfgnoyvfu n cnegvny nyvov sbe gur riravat. Ohg gung gbb jnf vzcbffvoyr. N 
 qrnqyl ynffvghqr unq gnxra ubyq bs uvz. Nyy ur jnagrq jnf gb trg ubzr 
 dhvpxyl naq gura fvg qbja naq or dhvrg. 
 Vg jnf nsgre gjragl-gjb ubhef jura ur tbg onpx gb gur syng. Gur yvtugf 
 jbhyq or fjvgpurq bss ng gur znva ng gjragl-guerr guvegl. Ur jrag vagb gur 
 xvgpura naq fjnyybjrq arneyl n grnphcshy bs Ivpgbel Tva. Gura ur jrag gb 
 gur gnoyr va gur nypbir, fng qbja, naq gbbx gur qvnel bhg bs gur qenjre. 
 Ohg ur qvq abg bcra vg ng bapr. Sebz gur gryrfperra n oenffl srznyr ibvpr 
 jnf fdhnyyvat n cngevbgvp fbat. Ur fng fgnevat ng gur zneoyrq pbire bs gur 
 obbx, gelvat jvgubhg fhpprff gb fuhg gur ibvpr bhg bs uvf pbafpvbhfarff. 
 Vg jnf ng avtug gung gurl pnzr sbe lbh, nyjnlf ng avtug. Gur cebcre 
 guvat jnf gb xvyy lbhefrys orsber gurl tbg lbh. Haqbhogrqyl fbzr crbcyr qvq 
 fb. Znal bs gur qvfnccrnenaprf jrer npghnyyl fhvpvqrf. Ohg vg arrqrq 
 qrfcrengr pbhentr gb xvyy lbhefrys va n jbeyq jurer svernezf, be nal dhvpx 
 naq pregnva cbvfba, jrer pbzcyrgryl hacebphenoyr. Ur gubhtug jvgu n xvaq bs 
 nfgbavfuzrag bs gur ovbybtvpny hfryrffarff bs cnva naq srne, gur gernpurel 
 bs gur uhzna obql juvpu nyjnlf serrmrf vagb varegvn ng rknpgyl gur zbzrag 
 jura n fcrpvny rssbeg vf arrqrq. Ur zvtug unir fvyraprq gur qnex-unverq 
 tvey vs bayl ur unq npgrq dhvpxyl rabhtu: ohg cerpvfryl orpnhfr bs gur 
 rkgerzvgl bs uvf qnatre ur unq ybfg gur cbjre gb npg. Vg fgehpx uvz gung va 
 zbzragf bs pevfvf bar vf arire svtugvat ntnvafg na rkgreany rarzl, ohg 
 nyjnlf ntnvafg bar'f bja obql. Rira abj, va fcvgr bs gur tva, gur qhyy npur 
 va uvf oryyl znqr pbafrphgvir gubhtug vzcbffvoyr. Naq vg vf gur fnzr, ur 
 creprvirq, va nyy frrzvatyl urebvp be gentvp fvghngvbaf. Ba gur 
 onggyrsvryq, va gur gbegher punzore, ba n fvaxvat fuvc, gur vffhrf gung lbh 
 ner svtugvat sbe ner nyjnlf sbetbggra, orpnhfr gur obql fjryyf hc hagvy vg 
 svyyf gur havirefr, naq rira jura lbh ner abg cnenylfrq ol sevtug be 
 fpernzvat jvgu cnva, yvsr vf n zbzrag-gb-zbzrag fgehttyr ntnvafg uhatre be 
 pbyq be fyrrcyrffarff, ntnvafg n fbhe fgbznpu be na npuvat gbbgu. 
 Ur bcrarq gur qvnel. Vg jnf vzcbegnag gb jevgr fbzrguvat qbja. Gur 
 jbzna ba gur gryrfperra unq fgnegrq n arj fbat. Ure ibvpr frrzrq gb fgvpx 
 vagb uvf oenva yvxr wnttrq fcyvagref bs tynff. Ur gevrq gb guvax bs 
 B'Oevra, sbe jubz, be gb jubz, gur qvnel jnf jevggra, ohg vafgrnq ur ortna 
 guvaxvat bs gur guvatf gung jbhyq unccra gb uvz nsgre gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr 
 gbbx uvz njnl. Vg jbhyq abg znggre vs gurl xvyyrq lbh ng bapr. Gb or xvyyrq 
 jnf jung lbh rkcrpgrq. Ohg orsber qrngu (abobql fcbxr bs fhpu guvatf, lrg 
 rirelobql xarj bs gurz) gurer jnf gur ebhgvar bs pbasrffvba gung unq gb or 
 tbar guebhtu: gur tebiryyvat ba gur sybbe naq fpernzvat sbe zrepl, gur 
 penpx bs oebxra obarf, gur fznfurq grrgu, naq oybbql pybgf bs unve. 
 Jul qvq lbh unir gb raqher vg, fvapr gur raq jnf nyjnlf gur fnzr? Jul 
 jnf vg abg cbffvoyr gb phg n srj qnlf be jrrxf bhg bs lbhe yvsr? Abobql 
 rire rfpncrq qrgrpgvba, naq abobql rire snvyrq gb pbasrff. Jura bapr lbh 
 unq fhpphzorq gb gubhtugpevzr vg jnf pregnva gung ol n tvira qngr lbh jbhyq 
 or qrnq. Jul gura qvq gung ubeebe, juvpu nygrerq abguvat, unir gb yvr 
 rzorqqrq va shgher gvzr? 
 Ur gevrq jvgu n yvggyr zber fhpprff guna orsber gb fhzzba hc gur vzntr 
 bs B'Oevra. 'Jr funyy zrrg va gur cynpr jurer gurer vf ab qnexarff,' 
 B'Oevra unq fnvq gb uvz. Ur xarj jung vg zrnag, be gubhtug ur xarj. Gur 
 cynpr jurer gurer vf ab qnexarff jnf gur vzntvarq shgher, juvpu bar jbhyq 
 arire frr, ohg juvpu, ol sberxabjyrqtr, bar pbhyq zlfgvpnyyl funer va. Ohg 
 jvgu gur ibvpr sebz gur gryrfperra anttvat ng uvf rnef ur pbhyq abg sbyybj 
 gur genva bs gubhtug shegure. Ur chg n pvtnerggr va uvf zbhgu. Unys gur 
 gbonppb cebzcgyl sryy bhg ba gb uvf gbathr, n ovggre qhfg juvpu jnf 
 qvssvphyg gb fcvg bhg ntnva. Gur snpr bs Ovt Oebgure fjnz vagb uvf zvaq, 
 qvfcynpvat gung bs B'Oevra. Whfg nf ur unq qbar n srj qnlf rneyvre, ur fyvq 
 n pbva bhg bs uvf cbpxrg naq ybbxrq ng vg. Gur snpr tnmrq hc ng uvz, urnil, 
 pnyz, cebgrpgvat: ohg jung xvaq bs fzvyr jnf uvqqra orarngu gur qnex 
 zbhfgnpur? Yvxr n yrnqra xaryy gur jbeqf pnzr onpx ng uvz: 
 
 JNE VF CRNPR 
 SERRQBZ VF FYNIREL 
 VTABENAPR VF FGERATGU 
 
 * * * 
 
 CNEG VV 
 
 V 
 
 Vg jnf gur zvqqyr bs gur zbeavat, naq Jvafgba unq yrsg gur phovpyr gb 
 tb gb gur yningbel. 
 N fbyvgnel svther jnf pbzvat gbjneqf uvz sebz gur bgure raq bs gur 
 ybat, oevtugyl-yvg pbeevqbe. Vg jnf gur tvey jvgu qnex unve. Sbhe qnlf unq 
 tbar cnfg fvapr gur riravat jura ur unq eha vagb ure bhgfvqr gur whax-fubc. 
 Nf fur pnzr arnere ur fnj gung ure evtug nez jnf va n fyvat, abg abgvprnoyr 
 ng n qvfgnapr orpnhfr vg jnf bs gur fnzr pbybhe nf ure birenyyf. Cebonoyl 
 fur unq pehfurq ure unaq juvyr fjvatvat ebhaq bar bs gur ovt xnyrvqbfpbcrf 
 ba juvpu gur cybgf bs abiryf jrer 'ebhturq va'. Vg jnf n pbzzba nppvqrag va 
 gur Svpgvba Qrcnegzrag. 
 Gurl jrer creuncf sbhe zrgerf ncneg jura gur tvey fghzoyrq naq sryy 
 nyzbfg syng ba ure snpr. N funec pel bs cnva jnf jehat bhg bs ure. Fur zhfg 
 unir snyyra evtug ba gur vawherq nez. Jvafgba fgbccrq fubeg. Gur tvey unq 
 evfra gb ure xarrf. Ure snpr unq ghearq n zvyxl lryybj pbybhe ntnvafg juvpu 
 ure zbhgu fgbbq bhg erqqre guna rire. Ure rlrf jrer svkrq ba uvf, jvgu na 
 nccrnyvat rkcerffvba gung ybbxrq zber yvxr srne guna cnva. 
 N phevbhf rzbgvba fgveerq va Jvafgba'f urneg. Va sebag bs uvz jnf na 
 rarzl jub jnf gelvat gb xvyy uvz: va sebag bs uvz, nyfb, jnf n uhzna 
 perngher, va cnva naq creuncf jvgu n oebxra obar. Nyernql ur unq 
 vafgvapgviryl fgnegrq sbejneq gb uryc ure. Va gur zbzrag jura ur unq frra 
 ure snyy ba gur onaqntrq nez, vg unq orra nf gubhtu ur sryg gur cnva va uvf 
 bja obql. 
 'Lbh'er uheg?' ur fnvq. 
 'Vg'f abguvat. Zl nez. Vg'yy or nyy evtug va n frpbaq.' 
 Fur fcbxr nf gubhtu ure urneg jrer syhggrevat. Fur unq pregnvayl 
 ghearq irel cnyr. 
 'Lbh unira'g oebxra nalguvat?' 
 'Ab, V'z nyy evtug. Vg uheg sbe n zbzrag, gung'f nyy.' 
 Fur uryq bhg ure serr unaq gb uvz, naq ur urycrq ure hc. Fur unq 
 ertnvarq fbzr bs ure pbybhe, naq nccrnerq irel zhpu orggre. 
 'Vg'f abguvat,' fur ercrngrq fubegyl. 'V bayl tnir zl jevfg n ovg bs n 
 onat. Gunaxf, pbzenqr!' 
 Naq jvgu gung fur jnyxrq ba va gur qverpgvba va juvpu fur unq orra 
 tbvat, nf oevfxyl nf gubhtu vg unq ernyyl orra abguvat. Gur jubyr vapvqrag 
 pbhyq abg unir gnxra nf zhpu nf unys n zvahgr. Abg gb yrg bar'f srryvatf 
 nccrne va bar'f snpr jnf n unovg gung unq npdhverq gur fgnghf bs na 
 vafgvapg, naq va nal pnfr gurl unq orra fgnaqvat fgenvtug va sebag bs n 
 gryrfperra jura gur guvat unccrarq. Arireguryrff vg unq orra irel qvssvphyg 
 abg gb orgenl n zbzragnel fhecevfr, sbe va gur gjb be guerr frpbaqf juvyr 
 ur jnf urycvat ure hc gur tvey unq fyvccrq fbzrguvat vagb uvf unaq. Gurer 
 jnf ab dhrfgvba gung fur unq qbar vg vagragvbanyyl. Vg jnf fbzrguvat fznyy 
 naq syng. Nf ur cnffrq guebhtu gur yningbel qbbe ur genafsreerq vg gb uvf 
 cbpxrg naq sryg vg jvgu gur gvcf bs uvf svatref. Vg jnf n fpenc bs cncre 
 sbyqrq vagb n fdhner. 
 Juvyr ur fgbbq ng gur hevany ur znantrq, jvgu n yvggyr zber svatrevat, 
 gb trg vg hasbyqrq. Boivbhfyl gurer zhfg or n zrffntr bs fbzr xvaq jevggra 
 ba vg. Sbe n zbzrag ur jnf grzcgrq gb gnxr vg vagb bar bs gur jngre-pybfrgf 
 naq ernq vg ng bapr. Ohg gung jbhyq or fubpxvat sbyyl, nf ur jryy xarj. 
 Gurer jnf ab cynpr jurer lbh pbhyq or zber pregnva gung gur gryrfperraf 
 jrer jngpurq pbagvahbhfyl. 
 Ur jrag onpx gb uvf phovpyr, fng qbja, guerj gur sentzrag bs cncre 
 pnfhnyyl nzbat gur bgure cncref ba gur qrfx, chg ba uvf fcrpgnpyrf naq 
 uvgpurq gur fcrnxjevgr gbjneqf uvz. 'svir zvahgrf,' ur gbyq uvzfrys, 'svir 
 zvahgrf ng gur irel yrnfg!' Uvf urneg ohzcrq va uvf oernfg jvgu sevtugravat 
 ybhqarff. Sbeghangryl gur cvrpr bs jbex ur jnf ratntrq ba jnf zrer ebhgvar, 
 gur erpgvsvpngvba bs n ybat yvfg bs svtherf, abg arrqvat pybfr nggragvba. 
 Jungrire jnf jevggra ba gur cncre, vg zhfg unir fbzr xvaq bs cbyvgvpny 
 zrnavat. Fb sne nf ur pbhyq frr gurer jrer gjb cbffvovyvgvrf. Bar, zhpu gur 
 zber yvxryl, jnf gung gur tvey jnf na ntrag bs gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr, whfg nf 
 ur unq srnerq. Ur qvq abg xabj jul gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr fubhyq pubbfr gb 
 qryvire gurve zrffntrf va fhpu n snfuvba, ohg creuncf gurl unq gurve 
 ernfbaf. Gur guvat gung jnf jevggra ba gur cncre zvtug or n guerng, n 
 fhzzbaf, na beqre gb pbzzvg fhvpvqr, n genc bs fbzr qrfpevcgvba. Ohg gurer 
 jnf nabgure, jvyqre cbffvovyvgl gung xrcg envfvat vgf urnq, gubhtu ur gevrq 
 invayl gb fhccerff vg. Guvf jnf, gung gur zrffntr qvq abg pbzr sebz gur 
 Gubhtug Cbyvpr ng nyy, ohg sebz fbzr xvaq bs haqretebhaq betnavmngvba. 
 Creuncf gur Oebgureubbq rkvfgrq nsgre nyy! Creuncf gur tvey jnf cneg bs vg! 
 Ab qbhog gur vqrn jnf nofheq, ohg vg unq fcehat vagb uvf zvaq va gur irel 
 vafgnag bs srryvat gur fpenc bs cncre va uvf unaq. Vg jnf abg gvyy n pbhcyr 
 bs zvahgrf yngre gung gur bgure, zber cebonoyr rkcynangvba unq bppheerq gb 
 uvz. Naq rira abj, gubhtu uvf vagryyrpg gbyq uvz gung gur zrffntr cebonoyl 
 zrnag qrngu -- fgvyy, gung jnf abg jung ur oryvrirq, naq gur haernfbanoyr 
 ubcr crefvfgrq, naq uvf urneg onatrq, naq vg jnf jvgu qvssvphygl gung ur 
 xrcg uvf ibvpr sebz gerzoyvat nf ur zhezherq uvf svtherf vagb gur 
 fcrnxjevgr. 
 Ur ebyyrq hc gur pbzcyrgrq ohaqyr bs jbex naq fyvq vg vagb gur 
 carhzngvp ghor. Rvtug zvahgrf unq tbar ol. Ur er-nqwhfgrq uvf fcrpgnpyrf ba 
 uvf abfr, fvturq, naq qerj gur arkg ongpu bs jbex gbjneqf uvz, jvgu gur 
 fpenc bs cncre ba gbc bs vg. Ur synggrarq vg bhg. Ba vg jnf jevggra, va n 
 ynetr hasbezrq unaqjevgvat: 
 
 V ybir lbh. 
 
 Sbe frireny frpbaqf ur jnf gbb fghaarq rira gb guebj gur vapevzvangvat 
 guvat vagb gur zrzbel ubyr. Jura ur qvq fb, nygubhtu ur xarj irel jryy gur 
 qnatre bs fubjvat gbb zhpu vagrerfg, ur pbhyq abg erfvfg ernqvat vg bapr 
 ntnva, whfg gb znxr fher gung gur jbeqf jrer ernyyl gurer. 
 Sbe gur erfg bs gur zbeavat vg jnf irel qvssvphyg gb jbex. Jung jnf 
 rira jbefr guna univat gb sbphf uvf zvaq ba n frevrf bs avttyvat wbof jnf 
 gur arrq gb pbaprny uvf ntvgngvba sebz gur gryrfperra. Ur sryg nf gubhtu n 
 sver jrer oheavat va uvf oryyl. Yhapu va gur ubg, pebjqrq, abvfr-svyyrq 
 pnagrra jnf gbezrag. Ur unq ubcrq gb or nybar sbe n yvggyr juvyr qhevat gur 
 yhapu ubhe, ohg nf onq yhpx jbhyq unir vg gur vzorpvyr Cnefbaf sybccrq qbja 
 orfvqr uvz, gur gnat bs uvf fjrng nyzbfg qrsrngvat gur gvaal fzryy bs fgrj, 
 naq xrcg hc n fgernz bs gnyx nobhg gur cercnengvbaf sbe Ungr Jrrx. Ur jnf 
 cnegvphyneyl raguhfvnfgvp nobhg n cncvre-znpur zbqry bs Ovt Oebgure'f urnq, 
 gjb zrgerf jvqr, juvpu jnf orvat znqr sbe gur bppnfvba ol uvf qnhtugre'f 
 gebbc bs Fcvrf. Gur veevgngvat guvat jnf gung va gur enpxrg bs ibvprf 
 Jvafgba pbhyq uneqyl urne jung Cnefbaf jnf fnlvat, naq jnf pbafgnagyl 
 univat gb nfx sbe fbzr snghbhf erznex gb or ercrngrq. Whfg bapr ur pnhtug n 
 tyvzcfr bs gur tvey, ng n gnoyr jvgu gjb bgure tveyf ng gur sne raq bs gur 
 ebbz. Fur nccrnerq abg gb unir frra uvz, naq ur qvq abg ybbx va gung 
 qverpgvba ntnva. 
 Gur nsgreabba jnf zber ornenoyr. Vzzrqvngryl nsgre yhapu gurer neevirq 
 n qryvpngr, qvssvphyg cvrpr bs jbex juvpu jbhyq gnxr frireny ubhef naq 
 arprffvgngrq chggvat rirelguvat ryfr nfvqr. Vg pbafvfgrq va snyfvslvat n 
 frevrf bs cebqhpgvba ercbegf bs gjb lrnef ntb, va fhpu n jnl nf gb pnfg 
 qvfperqvg ba n cebzvarag zrzore bs gur Vaare Cnegl, jub jnf abj haqre n 
 pybhq. Guvf jnf gur xvaq bs guvat gung Jvafgba jnf tbbq ng, naq sbe zber 
 guna gjb ubhef ur fhpprrqrq va fuhggvat gur tvey bhg bs uvf zvaq 
 nygbtrgure. Gura gur zrzbel bs ure snpr pnzr onpx, naq jvgu vg n entvat, 
 vagbyrenoyr qrfver gb or nybar. Hagvy ur pbhyq or nybar vg jnf vzcbffvoyr 
 gb guvax guvf arj qrirybczrag bhg. Gbavtug jnf bar bs uvf avtugf ng gur 
 Pbzzhavgl Prager. Ur jbysrq nabgure gnfgryrff zrny va gur pnagrra, uheevrq 
 bss gb gur Prager, gbbx cneg va gur fbyrza sbbyrel bs n 'qvfphffvba tebhc', 
 cynlrq gjb tnzrf bs gnoyr graavf, fjnyybjrq frireny tynffrf bs tva, naq fng 
 sbe unys na ubhe guebhtu n yrpgher ragvgyrq 'Vatfbp va eryngvba gb purff'. 
 Uvf fbhy jevgurq jvgu oberqbz, ohg sbe bapr ur unq unq ab vzchyfr gb fuvex 
 uvf riravat ng gur Prager. Ng gur fvtug bs gur jbeqf V ybir lbh gur qrfver 
 gb fgnl nyvir unq jryyrq hc va uvz, naq gur gnxvat bs zvabe evfxf fhqqrayl 
 frrzrq fghcvq. Vg jnf abg gvyy gjragl-guerr ubhef, jura ur jnf ubzr naq va 
 orq -- va gur qnexarff, jurer lbh jrer fnsr rira sebz gur gryrfperra fb 
 ybat nf lbh xrcg fvyrag -- gung ur jnf noyr gb guvax pbagvahbhfyl. 
 Vg jnf n culfvpny ceboyrz gung unq gb or fbyirq: ubj gb trg va gbhpu 
 jvgu gur tvey naq neenatr n zrrgvat. Ur qvq abg pbafvqre nal ybatre gur 
 cbffvovyvgl gung fur zvtug or ynlvat fbzr xvaq bs genc sbe uvz. Ur xarj 
 gung vg jnf abg fb, orpnhfr bs ure hazvfgnxnoyr ntvgngvba jura fur unaqrq 
 uvz gur abgr. Boivbhfyl fur unq orra sevtugrarq bhg bs ure jvgf, nf jryy 
 fur zvtug or. Abe qvq gur vqrn bs ershfvat ure nqinaprf rira pebff uvf 
 zvaq. Bayl svir avtugf ntb ur unq pbagrzcyngrq fznfuvat ure fxhyy va jvgu n 
 pbooyrfgbar, ohg gung jnf bs ab vzcbegnapr. Ur gubhtug bs ure anxrq, 
 lbhgushy obql, nf ur unq frra vg va uvf qernz. Ur unq vzntvarq ure n sbby 
 yvxr nyy gur erfg bs gurz, ure urnq fghssrq jvgu yvrf naq ungerq, ure oryyl 
 shyy bs vpr. N xvaq bs srire frvmrq uvz ng gur gubhtug gung ur zvtug ybfr 
 ure, gur juvgr lbhgushy obql zvtug fyvc njnl sebz uvz! Jung ur srnerq zber 
 guna nalguvat ryfr jnf gung fur jbhyq fvzcyl punatr ure zvaq vs ur qvq abg 
 trg va gbhpu jvgu ure dhvpxyl. Ohg gur culfvpny qvssvphygl bs zrrgvat jnf 
 rabezbhf. Vg jnf yvxr gelvat gb znxr n zbir ng purff jura lbh jrer nyernql 
 zngrq. Juvpurire jnl lbh ghearq, gur gryrfperra snprq lbh. Npghnyyl, nyy 
 gur cbffvoyr jnlf bs pbzzhavpngvat jvgu ure unq bppheerq gb uvz jvguva svir 
 zvahgrf bs ernqvat gur abgr; ohg abj, jvgu gvzr gb guvax, ur jrag bire gurz 
 bar ol bar, nf gubhtu ynlvat bhg n ebj bs vafgehzragf ba n gnoyr. 
 Boivbhfyl gur xvaq bs rapbhagre gung unq unccrarq guvf zbeavat pbhyq 
 abg or ercrngrq. Vs fur unq jbexrq va gur Erpbeqf Qrcnegzrag vg zvtug unir 
 orra pbzcnengviryl fvzcyr, ohg ur unq bayl n irel qvz vqrn jurernobhgf va 
 gur ohvyqvat gur Svpgvba Qrcnegearag ynl, naq ur unq ab cergrkg sbe tbvat 
 gurer. Vs ur unq xabja jurer fur yvirq, naq ng jung gvzr fur yrsg jbex, ur 
 pbhyq unir pbagevirq gb zrrg ure fbzrjurer ba ure jnl ubzr; ohg gb gel gb 
 sbyybj ure ubzr jnf abg fnsr, orpnhfr vg jbhyq zrna ybvgrevat nobhg bhgfvqr 
 gur Zvavfgel, juvpu jnf obhaq gb or abgvprq. Nf sbe fraqvat n yrggre 
 guebhtu gur znvyf, vg jnf bhg bs gur dhrfgvba. Ol n ebhgvar gung jnf abg 
 rira frperg, nyy yrggref jrer bcrarq va genafvg. Npghnyyl, srj crbcyr rire 
 jebgr yrggref. Sbe gur zrffntrf gung vg jnf bppnfvbanyyl arprffnel gb fraq, 
 gurer jrer cevagrq cbfgpneqf jvgu ybat yvfgf bs cuenfrf, naq lbh fgehpx bhg 
 gur barf gung jrer vanccyvpnoyr. Va nal pnfr ur qvq abg xabj gur tvey'f 
 anzr, yrg nybar ure nqqerff. Svanyyl ur qrpvqrq gung gur fnsrfg cynpr jnf 
 gur pnagrra. Vs ur pbhyq trg ure ng n gnoyr ol urefrys, fbzrjurer va gur 
 zvqqyr bs gur ebbz, abg gbb arne gur gryrfperraf, naq jvgu n fhssvpvrag 
 ohmm bs pbairefngvba nyy ebhaq -- vs gurfr pbaqvgvbaf raqherq sbe, fnl, 
 guvegl frpbaqf, vg zvtug or cbffvoyr gb rkpunatr n srj jbeqf. 
 Sbe n jrrx nsgre guvf, yvsr jnf yvxr n erfgyrff qernz. Ba gur arkg qnl 
 fur qvq abg nccrne va gur pnagrra hagvy ur jnf yrnivat vg, gur juvfgyr 
 univat nyernql oybja. Cerfhznoyl fur unq orra punatrq ba gb n yngre fuvsg. 
 Gurl cnffrq rnpu bgure jvgubhg n tynapr. Ba gur qnl nsgre gung fur jnf va 
 gur pnagrra ng gur hfhny gvzr, ohg jvgu guerr bgure tveyf naq vzzrqvngryl 
 haqre n gryrfperra. Gura sbe guerr qernqshy qnlf fur qvq abg nccrne ng nyy. 
 Uvf jubyr zvaq naq obql frrzrq gb or nssyvpgrq jvgu na haornenoyr 
 frafvgvivgl, n fbeg bs genafcnerapl, juvpu znqr rirel zbirzrag, rirel 
 fbhaq, rirel pbagnpg, rirel jbeq gung ur unq gb fcrnx be yvfgra gb, na 
 ntbal. Rira va fyrrc ur pbhyq abg nygbtrgure rfpncr sebz ure vzntr. Ur qvq 
 abg gbhpu gur qvnel qhevat gubfr qnlf. Vs gurer jnf nal eryvrs, vg jnf va 
 uvf jbex, va juvpu ur pbhyq fbzrgvzrf sbetrg uvzfrys sbe gra zvahgrf ng n 
 fgergpu. Ur unq nofbyhgryl ab pyhr nf gb jung unq unccrarq gb ure. Gurer 
 jnf ab radhvel ur pbhyq znxr. Fur zvtug unir orra incbevmrq, fur zvtug unir 
 pbzzvggrq fhvpvqr, fur zvtug unir orra genafsreerq gb gur bgure raq bs 
 Bprnavn: jbefg naq yvxryvrfg bs nyy, fur zvtug fvzcyl unir punatrq ure zvaq 
 naq qrpvqrq gb nibvq uvz. 
 Gur arkg qnl fur ernccrnerq. Ure nez jnf bhg bs gur fyvat naq fur unq 
 n onaq bs fgvpxvat-cynfgre ebhaq ure jevfg. Gur eryvrs bs frrvat ure jnf fb 
 terng gung ur pbhyq abg erfvfg fgnevat qverpgyl ng ure sbe frireny frpbaqf. 
 Ba gur sbyybjvat qnl ur irel arneyl fhpprrqrq va fcrnxvat gb ure. Jura ur 
 pnzr vagb gur pnagrra fur jnf fvggvat ng n gnoyr jryy bhg sebz gur jnyy, 
 naq jnf dhvgr nybar. Vg jnf rneyl, naq gur cynpr jnf abg irel shyy. Gur 
 dhrhr rqtrq sbejneq gvyy Jvafgba jnf nyzbfg ng gur pbhagre, gura jnf uryq 
 hc sbe gjb zvahgrf orpnhfr fbzrbar va sebag jnf pbzcynvavat gung ur unq abg 
 erprvirq uvf gnoyrg bs fnppunevar. Ohg gur tvey jnf fgvyy nybar jura 
 Jvafgba frpherq uvf genl naq ortna gb znxr sbe ure gnoyr. Ur jnyxrq 
 pnfhnyyl gbjneqf ure, uvf rlrf frnepuvat sbe n cynpr ng fbzr gnoyr orlbaq 
 ure. Fur jnf creuncf guerr zrgerf njnl sebz uvz. Nabgure gjb frpbaqf jbhyq 
 qb vg. Gura n ibvpr oruvaq uvz pnyyrq, 'Fzvgu!' Ur cergraqrq abg gb urne. 
 'Fzvgu!' ercrngrq gur ibvpr, zber ybhqyl. Vg jnf ab hfr. Ur ghearq ebhaq. N 
 oybaq-urnqrq, fvyyl-snprq lbhat zna anzrq Jvyfure, jubz ur oneryl xarj, jnf 
 vaivgvat uvz jvgu n fzvyr gb n inpnag cynpr ng uvf gnoyr. Vg jnf abg fnsr 
 gb ershfr. Nsgre univat orra erpbtavmrq, ur pbhyq abg tb naq fvg ng n gnoyr 
 jvgu na hanggraqrq tvey. Vg jnf gbb abgvprnoyr. Ur fng qbja jvgu n sevraqyl 
 fzvyr. Gur fvyyl oybaq snpr ornzrq vagb uvf. Jvafgba unq n unyyhpvangvba bs 
 uvzfrys fznfuvat n cvpx-nkr evtug vagb gur zvqqyr bs vg. Gur tvey'f gnoyr 
 svyyrq hc n srj zvahgrf yngre. 
 Ohg fur zhfg unir frra uvz pbzvat gbjneqf ure, naq creuncf fur jbhyq 
 gnxr gur uvag. Arkg qnl ur gbbx pner gb neevir rneyl. Fheryl rabhtu, fur 
 jnf ng n gnoyr va nobhg gur fnzr cynpr, naq ntnva nybar. Gur crefba 
 vzzrqvngryl nurnq bs uvz va gur dhrhr jnf n fznyy, fjvsgyl-zbivat, orrgyr- 
 yvxr zna jvgu n syng snpr naq gval, fhfcvpvbhf rlrf. Nf Jvafgba ghearq njnl 
 sebz gur pbhagre jvgu uvf genl, ur fnj gung gur yvggyr zna jnf znxvat 
 fgenvtug sbe gur tvey'f gnoyr. Uvf ubcrf fnax ntnva. Gurer jnf n inpnag 
 cynpr ng n gnoyr shegure njnl, ohg fbzrguvat va gur yvggyr zna'f nccrnenapr 
 fhttrfgrq gung ur jbhyq or fhssvpvragyl nggragvir gb uvf bja pbzsbeg gb 
 pubbfr gur rzcgvrfg gnoyr. Jvgu vpr ng uvf urneg Jvafgba sbyybjrq. Vg jnf 
 ab hfr hayrff ur pbhyq trg gur tvey nybar. Ng guvf zbzrag gurer jnf n 
 gerzraqbhf penfu. Gur yvggyr zna jnf fcenjyvat ba nyy sbhef, uvf genl unq 
 tbar sylvat, gjb fgernzf bs fbhc naq pbssrr jrer sybjvat npebff gur sybbe. 
 Ur fgnegrq gb uvf srrg jvgu n znyvtanag tynapr ng Jvafgba, jubz ur 
 rivqragyl fhfcrpgrq bs univat gevccrq uvz hc. Ohg vg jnf nyy evtug. Svir 
 frpbaqf yngre, jvgu n guhaqrevat urneg, Jvafgba jnf fvggvat ng gur tvey'f 
 gnoyr. 
 Ur qvq abg ybbx ng ure. Ur hacnpxrq uvf genl naq cebzcgyl ortna 
 rngvat. Vg jnf nyy-vzcbegnag gb fcrnx ng bapr, orsber nalbar ryfr pnzr, ohg 
 abj n greevoyr srne unq gnxra cbffrffvba bs uvz. N jrrx unq tbar ol fvapr 
 fur unq svefg nccebnpurq uvz. Fur jbhyq unir punatrq ure zvaq, fur zhfg 
 unir punatrq ure zvaq! Vg jnf vzcbffvoyr gung guvf nssnve fubhyq raq 
 fhpprffshyyl; fhpu guvatf qvq abg unccra va erny yvsr. Ur zvtug unir 
 syvapurq nygbtrgure sebz fcrnxvat vs ng guvf zbzrag ur unq abg frra 
 Nzcyrsbegu, gur unvel-rnerq cbrg, jnaqrevat yvzcyl ebhaq gur ebbz jvgu n 
 genl, ybbxvat sbe n cynpr gb fvg qbja. Va uvf inthr jnl Nzcyrsbegu jnf 
 nggnpurq gb Jvafgba, naq jbhyq pregnvayl fvg qbja ng uvf gnoyr vs ur pnhtug 
 fvtug bs uvz. Gurer jnf creuncf n zvahgr va juvpu gb npg. Obgu Jvafgba naq 
 gur tvey jrer rngvat fgrnqvyl. Gur fghss gurl jrer rngvat jnf n guva fgrj, 
 npghnyyl n fbhc, bs unevpbg ornaf. Va n ybj zhezhe Jvafgba ortna fcrnxvat. 
 Arvgure bs gurz ybbxrq hc; fgrnqvyl gurl fcbbarq gur jngrel fghss vagb 
 gurve zbhguf, naq orgjrra fcbbashyf rkpunatrq gur srj arprffnel jbeqf va 
 ybj rkcerffvbayrff ibvprf. 
 'Jung gvzr qb lbh yrnir jbex?' 
 'Rvtugrra-guvegl.' 
 'Jurer pna jr zrrg?' 
 'Ivpgbel Fdhner, arne gur zbahzrag.' 
 'Vg'f shyy bs gryrfperraf.' 
 'Vg qbrfa'g znggre vs gurer'f n pebjq.' 
 'Nal fvtany?' 
 'Ab. Qba'g pbzr hc gb zr hagvy lbh frr zr nzbat n ybg bs crbcyr. Naq 
 qba'g ybbx ng zr. Whfg xrrc fbzrjurer arne zr.' 
 'Jung gvzr?' 
 'Avargrra ubhef.' 
 'Nyy evtug.' 
 Nzcyrsbegu snvyrq gb frr Jvafgba naq fng qbja ng nabgure gnoyr. Gurl 
 qvq abg fcrnx ntnva, naq, fb sne nf vg jnf cbffvoyr sbe gjb crbcyr fvggvat 
 ba bccbfvgr fvqrf bs gur fnzr gnoyr, gurl qvq abg ybbx ng bar nabgure. Gur 
 tvey svavfurq ure yhapu dhvpxyl naq znqr bss, juvyr Jvafgba fgnlrq gb fzbxr 
 n pvtnerggr. 
 Jvafgba jnf va Ivpgbel Fdhner orsber gur nccbvagrq gvzr. Ur jnaqrerq 
 ebhaq gur onfr bs gur rabezbhf syhgrq pbyhza, ng gur gbc bs juvpu Ovt 
 Oebgure'f fgnghr tnmrq fbhgujneq gbjneqf gur fxvrf jurer ur unq inadhvfurq 
 gur Rhenfvna nrebcynarf (gur Rnfgnfvna nrebcynarf, vg unq orra, n srj lrnef 
 ntb) va gur Onggyr bs Nvefgevc Bar. Va gur fgerrg va sebag bs vg gurer jnf 
 n fgnghr bs n zna ba ubefronpx juvpu jnf fhccbfrq gb ercerfrag Byvire 
 Pebzjryy. Ng svir zvahgrf cnfg gur ubhe gur tvey unq fgvyy abg nccrnerq. 
 Ntnva gur greevoyr srne frvmrq hcba Jvafgba. Fur jnf abg pbzvat, fur unq 
 punatrq ure zvaq! Ur jnyxrq fybjyl hc gb gur abegu fvqr bs gur fdhner naq 
 tbg n fbeg bs cnyr-pbybherq cyrnfher sebz vqragvslvat Fg. Znegva'f Puhepu, 
 jubfr oryyf, jura vg unq oryyf, unq puvzrq 'Lbh bjr zr guerr sneguvatf.' 
 Gura ur fnj gur tvey fgnaqvat ng gur onfr bs gur zbahzrag, ernqvat be 
 cergraqvat gb ernq n cbfgre juvpu ena fcvenyyl hc gur pbyhza. Vg jnf abg 
 fnsr gb tb arne ure hagvy fbzr zber crbcyr unq npphzhyngrq. Gurer jrer 
 gryrfperraf nyy ebhaq gur crqvzrag. Ohg ng guvf zbzrag gurer jnf n qva bs 
 fubhgvat naq n mbbz bs urnil iruvpyrf sebz fbzrjurer gb gur yrsg. Fhqqrayl 
 rirelbar frrzrq gb or ehaavat npebff gur fdhner. Gur tvey avccrq avzoyl 
 ebhaq gur yvbaf ng gur onfr bs gur zbahzrag naq wbvarq va gur ehfu. Jvafgba 
 sbyybjrq. Nf ur ena, ur tngurerq sebz fbzr fubhgrq erznexf gung n pbaibl bs 
 Rhenfvna cevfbaref jnf cnffvat. 
 Nyernql n qrafr znff bs crbcyr jnf oybpxvat gur fbhgu fvqr bs gur 
 fdhner. Jvafgba, ng abezny gvzrf gur xvaq bs crefba jub tenivgngrf gb gur 
 bhgre rqtr bs nal xvaq bs fpevzzntr, fubirq, ohggrq, fdhvezrq uvf jnl 
 sbejneq vagb gur urneg bs gur pebjq. Fbba ur jnf jvguva nez'f yratgu bs gur 
 tvey, ohg gur jnl jnf oybpxrq ol na rabezbhf cebyr naq na nyzbfg rdhnyyl 
 rabezbhf jbzna, cerfhznoyl uvf jvsr, jub frrzrq gb sbez na vzcrargenoyr 
 jnyy bs syrfu. Jvafgba jevttyrq uvzfrys fvqrjnlf, naq jvgu n ivbyrag yhatr 
 znantrq gb qevir uvf fubhyqre orgjrra gurz. Sbe n zbzrag vg sryg nf gubhtu 
 uvf ragenvyf jrer orvat tebhaq gb chyc orgjrra gur gjb zhfphyne uvcf, gura 
 ur unq oebxra guebhtu, fjrngvat n yvggyr. Ur jnf arkg gb gur tvey. Gurl 
 jrer fubhyqre gb fubhyqre, obgu fgnevat svkrqyl va sebag bs gurz. 
 N ybat yvar bs gehpxf, jvgu jbbqra-snprq thneqf nezrq jvgu fho-znpuvar 
 thaf fgnaqvat hcevtug va rnpu pbeare, jnf cnffvat fybjyl qbja gur fgerrg. 
 Va gur gehpxf yvggyr lryybj zra va funool terravfu havsbezf jrer fdhnggvat, 
 wnzzrq pybfr gbtrgure. Gurve fnq, Zbatbyvna snprf tnmrq bhg bire gur fvqrf 
 bs gur gehpxf hggreyl vaphevbhf. Bppnfvbanyyl jura n gehpx wbygrq gurer jnf 
 n pynax-pynax bs zrgny: nyy gur cevfbaref jrer jrnevat yrt-vebaf. Gehpx- 
 ybnq nsgre gehpx-ybnq bs gur fnq snprf cnffrq. Jvafgba xarj gurl jrer gurer 
 ohg ur fnj gurz bayl vagrezvggragyl. Gur tvey'f fubhyqre, naq ure nez evtug 
 qbja gb gur ryobj, jrer cerffrq ntnvafg uvf. Ure purrx jnf nyzbfg arne 
 rabhtu sbe uvz gb srry vgf jnezgu. Fur unq vzzrqvngryl gnxra punetr bs gur 
 fvghngvba, whfg nf fur unq qbar va gur pnagrra. Fur ortna fcrnxvat va gur 
 fnzr rkcerffvbayrff ibvpr nf orsber, jvgu yvcf oneryl zbivat, n zrer zhezhe 
 rnfvyl qebjarq ol gur qva bs ibvprf naq gur ehzoyvat bs gur gehpxf. 
 'Pna lbh urne zr?' 
 'Lrf.' 
 'Pna lbh trg Fhaqnl nsgreabba bss?' 
 'Lrf.' 
 'Gura yvfgra pnershyyl. Lbh'yy unir gb erzrzore guvf. Tb gb Cnqqvatgba 
 Fgngvba--' 
 Jvgu n fbeg bs zvyvgnel cerpvfvba gung nfgbavfurq uvz, fur bhgyvarq 
 gur ebhgr gung ur jnf gb sbyybj. N unys-ubhe envyjnl wbhearl; ghea yrsg 
 bhgfvqr gur fgngvba; gjb xvybzrgerf nybat gur ebnq: n tngr jvgu gur gbc one 
 zvffvat; n cngu npebff n svryq; n tenff-tebja ynar; n genpx orgjrra ohfurf; 
 n qrnq gerr jvgu zbff ba vg. Vg jnf nf gubhtu fur unq n znc vafvqr ure 
 urnq. 'Pna lbh erzrzore nyy gung?' fur zhezherq svanyyl. 
 'Lrf.' 
 'Lbh ghea yrsg, gura evtug, gura yrsg ntnva. Naq gur tngr'f tbg ab gbc 
 one.' 
 'Lrf. Jung gvzr?' 
 'Nobhg svsgrra. Lbh znl unir gb jnvg. V'yy trg gurer ol nabgure jnl. 
 Ner lbh fher lbh erzrzore rirelguvat?' 
 'Lrf.' 
 'Gura trg njnl sebz zr nf dhvpx nf lbh pna.' 
 Fur arrq abg unir gbyq uvz gung. Ohg sbe gur zbzrag gurl pbhyq abg 
 rkgevpngr gurzfryirf sebz gur pebjq. Gur gehpxf jrer fgvyy svyvat cbfg, gur 
 crbcyr fgvyy vafngvnoyl tncvat. Ng gur fgneg gurer unq orra n srj obbf naq 
 uvffrf, ohg vg pnzr bayl sebz gur Cnegl zrzoref nzbat gur pebjq, naq unq 
 fbba fgbccrq. Gur cerinvyvat rzbgvba jnf fvzcyl phevbfvgl. Sbervtaref, 
 jurgure sebz Rhenfvn be sebz Rnfgnfvn, jrer n xvaq bs fgenatr navzny. Bar 
 yvgrenyyl arire fnj gurz rkprcg va gur thvfr bs cevfbaref, naq rira nf 
 cevfbaref bar arire tbg zber guna n zbzragnel tyvzcfr bs gurz. Abe qvq bar 
 xabj jung orpnzr bs gurz, ncneg sebz gur srj jub jrer unatrq nf jne- 
 pevzvanyf: gur bguref fvzcyl inavfurq, cerfhznoyl vagb sbeprq-ynobhe pnzcf. 
 Gur ebhaq Zbtby snprf unq tvira jnl gb snprf bs n zber Rhebcrna glcr, 
 qvegl, orneqrq naq rkunhfgrq. Sebz bire fpehool purrxobarf rlrf ybbxrq vagb 
 Jvafgba'f, fbzrgvzrf jvgu fgenatr vagrafvgl, naq synfurq njnl ntnva. Gur 
 pbaibl jnf qenjvat gb na raq. Va gur ynfg gehpx ur pbhyq frr na ntrq zna, 
 uvf snpr n znff bs tevmmyrq unve, fgnaqvat hcevtug jvgu jevfgf pebffrq va 
 sebag bs uvz, nf gubhtu ur jrer hfrq gb univat gurz obhaq gbtrgure. Vg jnf 
 nyzbfg gvzr sbe Jvafgba naq gur tvey gb cneg. Ohg ng gur ynfg zbzrag, juvyr 
 gur pebjq fgvyy urzzrq gurz va, ure unaq sryg sbe uvf naq tnir vg n 
 syrrgvat fdhrrmr. 
 Vg pbhyq abg unir orra gra frpbaqf, naq lrg vg frrzrq n ybat gvzr gung 
 gurve unaqf jrer pynfcrq gbtrgure. Ur unq gvzr gb yrnea rirel qrgnvy bs ure 
 unaq. Ur rkcyberq gur ybat svatref, gur funcryl anvyf, gur jbex-uneqrarq 
 cnyz jvgu vgf ebj bs pnyybhfrf, gur fzbbgu syrfu haqre gur jevfg. Zreryl 
 sebz srryvat vg ur jbhyq unir xabja vg ol fvtug. Va gur fnzr vafgnag vg 
 bppheerq gb uvz gung ur qvq abg xabj jung pbybhe gur tvey'f rlrf jrer. Gurl 
 jrer cebonoyl oebja, ohg crbcyr jvgu qnex unve fbzrgvzrf unq oyhr rlrf. Gb 
 ghea uvf urnq naq ybbx ng ure jbhyq unir orra vapbaprvinoyr sbyyl. Jvgu 
 unaqf ybpxrq gbtrgure, vaivfvoyr nzbat gur cerff bs obqvrf, gurl fgnerq 
 fgrnqvyl va sebag bs gurz, naq vafgrnq bs gur rlrf bs gur tvey, gur rlrf bs 
 gur ntrq cevfbare tnmrq zbheashyyl ng Jvafgba bhg bs arfgf bs unve. 
 
 VV 
 
 Jvafgba cvpxrq uvf jnl hc gur ynar guebhtu qnccyrq yvtug naq funqr, 
 fgrccvat bhg vagb cbbyf bs tbyq jurerire gur obhtuf cnegrq. Haqre gur gerrf 
 gb gur yrsg bs uvz gur tebhaq jnf zvfgl jvgu oyhroryyf. Gur nve frrzrq gb 
 xvff bar'f fxva. Vg jnf gur frpbaq bs Znl. Sebz fbzrjurer qrrcre va gur 
 urneg bs gur jbbq pnzr gur qebavat bs evat qbirf. 
 Ur jnf n ovg rneyl. Gurer unq orra ab qvssvphygvrf nobhg gur wbhearl, 
 naq gur tvey jnf fb rivqragyl rkcrevraprq gung ur jnf yrff sevtugrarq guna 
 ur jbhyq abeznyyl unir orra. Cerfhznoyl fur pbhyq or gehfgrq gb svaq n fnsr 
 cynpr. Va trareny lbh pbhyq abg nffhzr gung lbh jrer zhpu fnsre va gur 
 pbhagel guna va Ybaqba. Gurer jrer ab gryrfperraf, bs pbhefr, ohg gurer jnf 
 nyjnlf gur qnatre bs pbaprnyrq zvpebcubarf ol juvpu lbhe ibvpr zvtug or 
 cvpxrq hc naq erpbtavmrq; orfvqrf, vg jnf abg rnfl gb znxr n wbhearl ol 
 lbhefrys jvgubhg nggenpgvat nggragvba. Sbe qvfgnaprf bs yrff guna 100 
 xvybzrgerf vg jnf abg arprffnel gb trg lbhe cnffcbeg raqbefrq, ohg 
 fbzrgvzrf gurer jrer cngebyf unatvat nobhg gur envyjnl fgngvbaf, jub 
 rknzvarq gur cncref bs nal Cnegl zrzore gurl sbhaq gurer naq nfxrq njxjneq 
 dhrfgvbaf. Ubjrire, ab cngebyf unq nccrnerq, naq ba gur jnyx sebz gur 
 fgngvba ur unq znqr fher ol pnhgvbhf onpxjneq tynaprf gung ur jnf abg orvat 
 sbyybjrq. Gur genva jnf shyy bs cebyrf, va ubyvqnl zbbq orpnhfr bs gur 
 fhzzrel jrngure. Gur jbbqra-frngrq pneevntr va juvpu ur geniryyrq jnf 
 svyyrq gb biresybjvat ol n fvatyr rabezbhf snzvyl, enatvat sebz n gbbguyrff 
 terng-tenaqzbgure gb n zbagu-byq onol, tbvat bhg gb fcraq na nsgreabba jvgu 
 'va-ynjf' va gur pbhagel, naq, nf gurl serryl rkcynvarq gb Jvafgba, gb trg 
 ubyq bs n yvggyr oynpxznexrg ohggre. 
 Gur ynar jvqrarq, naq va n zvahgr ur pnzr gb gur sbbgcngu fur unq gbyq 
 uvz bs, n zrer pnggyr-genpx juvpu cyhatrq orgjrra gur ohfurf. Ur unq ab 
 jngpu, ohg vg pbhyq abg or svsgrra lrg. Gur oyhroryyf jrer fb guvpx 
 haqresbbg gung vg jnf vzcbffvoyr abg gb gernq ba gurz. Ur xaryg qbja naq 
 ortna cvpxvat fbzr cnegyl gb cnff gur gvzr njnl, ohg nyfb sebz n inthr vqrn 
 gung ur jbhyq yvxr gb unir n ohapu bs sybjref gb bssre gb gur tvey jura 
 gurl zrg. Ur unq tbg gbtrgure n ovt ohapu naq jnf fzryyvat gurve snvag 
 fvpxyl fprag jura n fbhaq ng uvf onpx sebmr uvz, gur hazvfgnxnoyr penpxyr 
 bs n sbbg ba gjvtf. Ur jrag ba cvpxvat oyhroryyf. Vg jnf gur orfg guvat gb 
 qb. Vg zvtug or gur tvey, be ur zvtug unir orra sbyybjrq nsgre nyy. Gb ybbx 
 ebhaq jnf gb fubj thvyg. Ur cvpxrq nabgure naq nabgure. N unaq sryy yvtugyl 
 ba uvf fubhyqre. 
 Ur ybbxrq hc. Vg jnf gur tvey. Fur fubbx ure urnq, rivqragyl nf n 
 jneavat gung ur zhfg xrrc fvyrag, gura cnegrq gur ohfurf naq dhvpxyl yrq 
 gur jnl nybat gur aneebj genpx vagb gur jbbq. Boivbhfyl fur unq orra gung 
 jnl orsber, sbe fur qbqtrq gur obttl ovgf nf gubhtu ol unovg. Jvafgba 
 sbyybjrq, fgvyy pynfcvat uvf ohapu bs sybjref. Uvf svefg srryvat jnf 
 eryvrs, ohg nf ur jngpurq gur fgebat fyraqre obql zbivat va sebag bs uvz, 
 jvgu gur fpneyrg fnfu gung jnf whfg gvtug rabhtu gb oevat bhg gur pheir bs 
 ure uvcf, gur frafr bs uvf bja vasrevbevgl jnf urnil hcba uvz. Rira abj vg 
 frrzrq dhvgr yvxryl gung jura fur ghearq ebhaq naq ybbxrq ng uvz fur jbhyq 
 qenj onpx nsgre nyy. Gur fjrrgarff bs gur nve naq gur terraarff bs gur 
 yrnirf qnhagrq uvz. Nyernql ba gur jnyx sebz gur fgngvba gur Znl fhafuvar 
 unq znqr uvz srry qvegl naq rgvbyngrq, n perngher bs vaqbbef, jvgu gur 
 fbbgl qhfg bs Ybaqba va gur cberf bs uvf fxva. Vg bppheerq gb uvz gung gvyy 
 abj fur unq cebonoyl arire frra uvz va oebnq qnlyvtug va gur bcra. Gurl 
 pnzr gb gur snyyra gerr gung fur unq fcbxra bs. Gur tvey ubccrq bire naq 
 sbeprq ncneg gur ohfurf, va juvpu gurer qvq abg frrz gb or na bcravat. Jura 
 Jvafgba sbyybjrq ure, ur sbhaq gung gurl jrer va n angheny pyrnevat, n gval 
 tenffl xabyy fheebhaqrq ol gnyy fncyvatf gung fuhg vg va pbzcyrgryl. Gur 
 tvey fgbccrq naq ghearq. 
 'Urer jr ner,' fur fnvq. 
 Ur jnf snpvat ure ng frireny cnprf" qvfgnapr. Nf lrg ur qvq abg qner 
 zbir arnere gb ure. 
 'V qvqa'g jnag gb fnl nalguvat va gur ynar,' fur jrag ba, 'va pnfr 
 gurer'f n zvxr uvqqra gurer. V qba'g fhccbfr gurer vf, ohg gurer pbhyq or. 
 Gurer'f nyjnlf gur punapr bs bar bs gubfr fjvar erpbtavmvat lbhe ibvpr. 
 Jr'er nyy evtug urer.' 
 Ur fgvyy unq abg gur pbhentr gb nccebnpu ure. 'Jr'er nyy evtug urer?' 
 ur ercrngrq fghcvqyl. 
 'Lrf. Ybbx ng gur gerrf.' Gurl jrer fznyy nfurf, juvpu ng fbzr gvzr 
 unq orra phg qbja naq unq fcebhgrq hc ntnva vagb n sberfg bs cbyrf, abar bs 
 gurz guvpxre guna bar'f jevfg. 'Gurer'f abguvat ovt rabhtu gb uvqr n zvxr 
 va. Orfvqrf, V'ir orra urer orsber.' 
 Gurl jrer bayl znxvat pbairefngvba. Ur unq znantrq gb zbir pybfre gb 
 ure abj. Fur fgbbq orsber uvz irel hcevtug, jvgu n fzvyr ba ure snpr gung 
 ybbxrq snvagyl vebavpny, nf gubhtu fur jrer jbaqrevat jul ur jnf fb fybj gb 
 npg. Gur oyhroryyf unq pnfpnqrq ba gb gur tebhaq. Gurl frrzrq gb unir 
 snyyra bs gurve bja nppbeq. Ur gbbx ure unaq. 
 'Jbhyq lbh oryvrir,' ur fnvq, 'gung gvyy guvf zbzrag V qvqa'g xabj 
 jung pbybhe lbhe rlrf jrer?' Gurl jrer oebja, ur abgrq, n engure yvtug 
 funqr bs oebja, jvgu qnex ynfurf. 'Abj gung lbh'ir frra jung V'z ernyyl 
 yvxr, pna lbh fgvyy orne gb ybbx ng zr?' 
 'Lrf, rnfvyl.' 
 'V'z guvegl-avar lrnef byq. V'ir tbg n jvsr gung V pna'g trg evq bs. 
 V'ir tbg inevpbfr irvaf. V'ir tbg svir snyfr grrgu.' 
 'V pbhyqa'g pner yrff,' fnvq gur tvey. 
 Gur arkg zbzrag, vg jnf uneq gb fnl ol jubfr npg, fur jnf va uvf uvf 
 nezf. Ng gur ortvaavat ur unq ab srryvat rkprcg furre vaperqhyvgl. Gur 
 lbhgushy obql jnf fgenvarq ntnvafg uvf bja, gur znff bs qnex unve jnf 
 ntnvafg uvf snpr, naq lrf! npghnyyl fur unq ghearq ure snpr hc naq ur jnf 
 xvffvat gur jvqr erq zbhgu. Fur unq pynfcrq ure nezf nobhg uvf arpx, fur 
 jnf pnyyvat uvz qneyvat, cerpvbhf bar, ybirq bar. Ur unq chyyrq ure qbja ba 
 gb gur tebhaq, fur jnf hggreyl haerfvfgvat, ur pbhyq qb jung ur yvxrq jvgu 
 ure. Ohg gur gehgu jnf gung ur unq ab culfvpny frafngvba, rkprcg gung bs 
 zrer pbagnpg. Nyy ur sryg jnf vaperqhyvgl naq cevqr. Ur jnf tynq gung guvf 
 jnf unccravat, ohg ur unq ab culfvpny qrfver. Vg jnf gbb fbba, ure lbhgu 
 naq cerggvarff unq sevtugrarq uvz, ur jnf gbb zhpu hfrq gb yvivat jvgubhg 
 jbzra -- ur qvq abg xabj gur ernfba. Gur tvey cvpxrq urefrys hc naq chyyrq 
 n oyhroryy bhg bs ure unve. Fur fng ntnvafg uvz, chggvat ure nez ebhaq uvf 
 jnvfg. 
 'Arire zvaq, qrne. Gurer'f ab uheel. Jr'ir tbg gur jubyr nsgreabba. 
 Vfa'g guvf n fcyraqvq uvqr-bhg? V sbhaq vg jura V tbg ybfg bapr ba n 
 pbzzhavgl uvxr. Vs nalbar jnf pbzvat lbh pbhyq urne gurz n uhaqerq zrgerf 
 njnl.' 
 'Jung vf lbhe anzr?' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 'Whyvn. V xabj lbhef. Vg'f Jvafgba -- Jvafgba Fzvgu.' 
 'Ubj qvq lbh svaq gung bhg?' 
 'V rkcrpg V'z orggre ng svaqvat guvatf bhg guna lbh ner, qrne. Gryy 
 zr, jung qvq lbh guvax bs zr orsber gung qnl V tnir lbh gur abgr?' 
 Ur qvq abg srry nal grzcgngvba gb gryy yvrf gb ure. Vg jnf rira n fbeg 
 bs ybir-bssrevat gb fgneg bss ol gryyvat gur jbefg. 
 'V ungrq gur fvtug bs lbh,' ur fnvq. 'V jnagrq gb encr lbh naq gura 
 zheqre lbh nsgrejneqf. Gjb jrrxf ntb V gubhtug frevbhfyl bs fznfuvat lbhe 
 urnq va jvgu n pbooyrfgbar. Vs lbh ernyyl jnag gb xabj, V vzntvarq gung lbh 
 unq fbzrguvat gb qb jvgu gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr.' 
 Gur tvey ynhturq qryvtugrqyl, rivqragyl gnxvat guvf nf n gevohgr gb 
 gur rkpryyrapr bs ure qvfthvfr. 
 'Abg gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr! Lbh qvqa'g ubarfgyl guvax gung?' 
 'Jryy, creuncf abg rknpgyl gung. Ohg sebz lbhe trareny nccrnenapr -- 
 zreryl orpnhfr lbh'er lbhat naq serfu naq urnygul, lbh haqrefgnaq -- V 
 gubhtug gung cebonoyl--' 
 'Lbh gubhtug V jnf n tbbq Cnegl zrzore. Cher va jbeq naq qrrq. 
 Onaaref, cebprffvbaf, fybtnaf, tnzrf, pbzzhavgl uvxrf nyy gung fghss. Naq 
 lbh gubhtug gung vs V unq n dhnegre bs n punapr V'q qrabhapr lbh nf n 
 gubhtug-pevzvany naq trg lbh xvyyrq bss?' 
 'Lrf, fbzrguvat bs gung xvaq. N terng znal lbhat tveyf ner yvxr gung, 
 lbh xabj.' 
 'Vg'f guvf oybbql guvat gung qbrf vg,' fur fnvq, evccvat bss gur 
 fpneyrg fnfu bs gur Whavbe Nagv-Frk Yrnthr naq syvatvat vg ba gb n obhtu. 
 Gura, nf gubhtu gbhpuvat ure jnvfg unq erzvaqrq ure bs fbzrguvat, fur sryg 
 va gur cbpxrg bs ure birenyyf naq cebqhprq n fznyy fyno bs pubpbyngr. Fur 
 oebxr vg va unys naq tnir bar bs gur cvrprf gb Jvafgba. Rira orsber ur unq 
 gnxra vg ur xarj ol gur fzryy gung vg jnf irel hahfhny pubpbyngr. Vg jnf 
 qnex naq fuval, naq jnf jenccrq va fvyire cncre. Pubpbyngr abeznyyl jnf 
 qhyy-oebja pehzoyl fghss gung gnfgrq, nf arneyl nf bar pbhyq qrfpevor vg, 
 yvxr gur fzbxr bs n ehoovfu sver. Ohg ng fbzr gvzr be nabgure ur unq gnfgrq 
 pubpbyngr yvxr gur cvrpr fur unq tvira uvz. Gur svefg juvss bs vgf fprag 
 unq fgveerq hc fbzr zrzbel juvpu ur pbhyq abg cva qbja, ohg juvpu jnf 
 cbjreshy naq gebhoyvat. 
 'Jurer qvq lbh trg guvf fghss?' ur fnvq. 
 'Oynpx znexrg,' fur fnvq vaqvssreragyl. 'Npghnyyl V nz gung fbeg bs 
 tvey, gb ybbx ng. V'z tbbq ng tnzrf. V jnf n gebbc-yrnqre va gur Fcvrf. V 
 qb ibyhagnel jbex guerr riravatf n jrrx sbe gur Whavbe Nagv-Frk Yrnthr. 
 Ubhef naq ubhef V'ir fcrag cnfgvat gurve oybbql ebg nyy bire Ybaqba. V 
 nyjnlf pneel bar raq bs n onaare va gur cebprffvbaf. V nyjnlf Vbbx purreshy 
 naq V arire fuvex nalguvat. Nyjnlf lryy jvgu gur pebjq, gung'f jung V fnl. 
 Vg'f gur bayl jnl gb or fnsr.' 
 Gur svefg sentzrag bs pubpbyngr unq zrygrq ba Jvafgba'f gbathr. Gur 
 gnfgr jnf qryvtugshy. Ohg gurer jnf fgvyy gung zrzbel zbivat ebhaq gur 
 rqtrf bs uvf pbafpvbhfarff, fbzrguvat fgebatyl sryg ohg abg erqhpvoyr gb 
 qrsvavgr funcr, yvxr na bowrpg frra bhg bs gur pbeare bs bar'f rlr. Ur 
 chfurq vg njnl sebz uvz, njner bayl gung vg jnf gur zrzbel bs fbzr npgvba 
 juvpu ur jbhyq unir yvxrq gb haqb ohg pbhyq abg. 
 'Lbh ner irel lbhat,' ur fnvq. 'Lbh ner gra be svsgrra lrnef lbhatre 
 guna V nz. Jung pbhyq lbh frr gb nggenpg lbh va n zna yvxr zr?' 
 'Vg jnf fbzrguvat va lbhe snpr. V gubhtug V'q gnxr n punapr. V'z tbbq 
 ng fcbggvat crbcyr jub qba'g orybat. Nf fbba nf V fnj lbh V xarj lbh jrer 
 ntnvafg gurz.' 
 Gurz, vg nccrnerq, zrnag gur Cnegl, naq nobir nyy gur Vaare Cnegl, 
 nobhg jubz fur gnyxrq jvgu na bcra wrrevat ungerq juvpu znqr Jvafgba srry 
 harnfl, nygubhtu ur xarj gung gurl jrer fnsr urer vs gurl pbhyq or fnsr 
 naljurer. N guvat gung nfgbavfurq uvz nobhg ure jnf gur pbnefrarff bs ure 
 ynathntr. Cnegl zrzoref jrer fhccbfrq abg gb fjrne, naq Jvafgba uvzfrys 
 irel fryqbz qvq fjrne, nybhq, ng nal engr. Whyvn, ubjrire, frrzrq hanoyr gb 
 zragvba gur Cnegl, naq rfcrpvnyyl gur Vaare Cnegl, jvgubhg hfvat gur xvaq 
 bs jbeqf gung lbh fnj punyxrq hc va qevccvat nyyrl-jnlf. Ur qvq abg qvfyvxr 
 vg. Vg jnf zreryl bar flzcgbz bs ure eribyg ntnvafg gur Cnegl naq nyy vgf 
 jnlf, naq fbzrubj vg frrzrq angheny naq urnygul, yvxr gur farrmr bs n ubefr 
 gung fzryyf onq unl. Gurl unq yrsg gur pyrnevat naq jrer jnaqrevat ntnva 
 guebhtu gur purdhrerq funqr, jvgu gurve nezf ebhaq rnpu bgure'f jnvfgf 
 jurarire vg jnf jvqr rabhtu gb jnyx gjb noernfg. Ur abgvprq ubj zhpu fbsgre 
 ure jnvfg frrzrq gb srry abj gung gur fnfu jnf tbar. Gurl qvq abg fcrnx 
 nobir n juvfcre. Bhgfvqr gur pyrnevat, Whyvn fnvq, vg jnf orggre gb tb 
 dhvrgyl. Cerfragyl gurl unq ernpurq gur rqtr bs gur yvggyr jbbq. Fur 
 fgbccrq uvz. 
 'Qba'g tb bhg vagb gur bcra. Gurer zvtug or fbzrbar jngpuvat. Jr'er 
 nyy evtug vs jr xrrc oruvaq gur obhtuf.' 
 Gurl jrer fgnaqvat va gur funqr bs unmry ohfurf. Gur fhayvtug, 
 svygrevat guebhtu vaahzrenoyr yrnirf, jnf fgvyy ubg ba gurve snprf. Jvafgba 
 ybbxrq bhg vagb gur svryq orlbaq, naq haqrejrag n phevbhf, fybj fubpx bs 
 erpbtavgvba. Ur xarj vg ol fvtug. Na byq, pybfrovggra cnfgher, jvgu n 
 sbbgcngu jnaqrevat npebff vg naq n zbyruvyy urer naq gurer. Va gur enttrq 
 urqtr ba gur bccbfvgr fvqr gur obhtuf bs gur ryz gerrf fjnlrq whfg 
 creprcgvoyl va gur oerrmr, naq gurve yrnirf fgveerq snvagyl va qrafr znffrf 
 yvxr jbzra'f unve. Fheryl fbzrjurer arneol, ohg bhg bs fvtug, gurer zhfg or 
 n fgernz jvgu terra cbbyf jurer qnpr jrer fjvzzvat? 
 'Vfa'g gurer n fgernz fbzrjurer arne urer?' ur juvfcrerq. 
 'Gung'f evtug, gurer vf n fgernz. Vg'f ng gur rqtr bs gur arkg svryq, 
 npghnyyl. Gurer ner svfu va vg, terng ovt barf. Lbh pna jngpu gurz ylvat va 
 gur cbbyf haqre gur jvyybj gerrf, jnivat gurve gnvyf.' 
 'Vg'f gur Tbyqra Pbhagel -- nyzbfg,' ur zhezherq. 
 'Gur Tbyqra Pbhagel?' 
 'Vg'f abguvat, ernyyl. N ynaqfpncr V'ir frra fbzrgvzrf va n qernz.' 
 'Ybbx!' juvfcrerq Whyvn. 
 N guehfu unq nyvtugrq ba n obhtu abg svir zrgerf njnl, nyzbfg ng gur 
 yriry bs gurve snprf. Creuncf vg unq abg frra gurz. Vg jnf va gur fha, gurl 
 va gur funqr. Vg fcernq bhg vgf jvatf, svggrq gurz pnershyyl vagb cynpr 
 ntnva, qhpxrq vgf urnq sbe n zbzrag, nf gubhtu znxvat n fbeg bs borvfnapr 
 gb gur fha, naq gura ortna gb cbhe sbegu n gbeerag bs fbat. Va gur 
 nsgreabba uhfu gur ibyhzr bs fbhaq jnf fgnegyvat. Jvafgba naq Whyvn pyhat 
 gbtrgure, snfpvangrq. Gur zhfvp jrag ba naq ba, zvahgr nsgre zvahgr, jvgu 
 nfgbavfuvat inevngvbaf, arire bapr ercrngvat vgfrys, nyzbfg nf gubhtu gur 
 oveq jrer qryvorengryl fubjvat bss vgf iveghbfvgl. Fbzrgvzrf vg fgbccrq sbe 
 n srj frpbaqf, fcernq bhg naq erfrggyrq vgf jvatf, gura fjryyrq vgf 
 fcrpxyrq oernfg naq ntnva ohefg vagb fbat. Jvafgba jngpurq vg jvgu n fbeg 
 bs inthr erirerapr. Sbe jubz, sbe jung, jnf gung oveq fvatvat? Ab zngr, ab 
 eviny jnf jngpuvat vg. Jung znqr vg fvg ng gur rqtr bs gur ybaryl jbbq naq 
 cbhe vgf zhfvp vagb abguvatarff? Ur jbaqrerq jurgure nsgre nyy gurer jnf n 
 zvpebcubar uvqqra fbzrjurer arne. Ur naq Whyvn unq fcbxra bayl va ybj 
 juvfcref, naq vg jbhyq abg cvpx hc jung gurl unq fnvq, ohg vg jbhyq cvpx hc 
 gur guehfu. Creuncf ng gur bgure raq bs gur vafgehzrag fbzr fznyy, orrgyr- 
 yvxr zna jnf yvfgravat vagragyl -- yvfgravat gb gung. Ohg ol qrterrf gur 
 sybbq bs zhfvp qebir nyy fcrphyngvbaf bhg bs uvf zvaq. Vg jnf nf gubhtu vg 
 jrer n xvaq bs yvdhvq fghss gung cbherq nyy bire uvz naq tbg zvkrq hc jvgu 
 gur fhayvtug gung svygrerq guebhtu gur yrnirf. Ur fgbccrq guvaxvat naq 
 zreryl sryg. Gur tvey'f jnvfg va gur oraq bs uvf nez jnf fbsg naq jnez. Ur 
 chyyrq ure ebhaq fb gung gurl jrer oernfg gb oernfg; ure obql frrzrq gb 
 zryg vagb uvf. Jurerire uvf unaqf zbirq vg jnf nyy nf lvryqvat nf jngre. 
 Gurve zbhguf pyhat gbtrgure; vg jnf dhvgr qvssrerag sebz gur uneq xvffrf 
 gurl unq rkpunatrq rneyvre. Jura gurl zbirq gurve snprf ncneg ntnva obgu bs 
 gurz fvturq qrrcyl. Gur oveq gbbx sevtug naq syrq jvgu n pynggre bs jvatf. 
 Jvafgba chg uvf yvcf ntnvafg ure rne. 'Abj,' ur juvfcrerq. 
 'Abg urer,' fur juvfcrerq onpx. 'Pbzr onpx gb gur uvqrbhg. Vg'f 
 fnsre.' 
 Dhvpxyl, jvgu na bppnfvbany penpxyr bs gjvtf, gurl guernqrq gurve jnl 
 onpx gb gur pyrnevat. Jura gurl jrer bapr vafvqr gur evat bs fncyvatf fur 
 ghearq naq snprq uvz. Gurl jrer obgu oernguvat snfg. ohg gur fzvyr unq 
 ernccrnerq ebhaq gur pbearef bs ure zbhgu. Fur fgbbq ybbxvat ng uvz sbe na 
 vafgnag, gura sryg ng gur mvccre bs ure birenyyf. Naq, lrf! vg jnf nyzbfg 
 nf va uvf qernz. Nyzbfg nf fjvsgyl nf ur unq vzntvarq vg, fur unq gbea ure 
 pybgurf bss, naq jura fur syhat gurz nfvqr vg jnf jvgu gung fnzr 
 zntavsvprag trfgher ol juvpu n jubyr pvivyvmngvba frrzrq gb or naavuvyngrq. 
 Ure obql tyrnzrq juvgr va gur fha. Ohg sbe n zbzrag ur qvq abg ybbx ng ure 
 obql; uvf rlrf jrer napuberq ol gur serpxyrq snpr jvgu vgf snvag, obyq 
 fzvyr. Ur xaryg qbja orsber ure naq gbbx ure unaqf va uvf. 
 'Unir lbh qbar guvf orsber?' 
 'Bs pbhefr. Uhaqerqf bs gvzrf -- jryy, fpberf bs gvzrf naljnl.' 
 'Jvgu Cnegl zrzoref?' 
 'Lrf, nyjnlf jvgu Cnegl zrzoref.' 
 'Jvgu zrzoref bs gur Vaare Cnegl?' 
 'Abg jvgu gubfr fjvar, ab. Ohg gurer'f cyragl gung jbhyq vs gurl tbg 
 unys n punapr. Gurl'er abg fb ubyl nf gurl znxr bhg.' 
 Uvf urneg yrncg. Fpberf bs gvzrf fur unq qbar vg: ur jvfurq vg unq 
 orra uhaqerqf -- gubhfnaqf. Nalguvat gung uvagrq ng pbeehcgvba nyjnlf 
 svyyrq uvz jvgu n jvyq ubcr. Jub xarj, creuncf gur Cnegl jnf ebggra haqre 
 gur fhesnpr, vgf phyg bs fgerahbhfarff naq frys-qravny fvzcyl n funz 
 pbaprnyvat vavdhvgl. Vs ur pbhyq unir vasrpgrq gur jubyr ybg bs gurz jvgu 
 yrcebfl be flcuvyvf, ubj tynqyl ur jbhyq unir qbar fb! Nalguvat gb ebg, gb 
 jrnxra, gb haqrezvar! Ur chyyrq ure qbja fb gung gurl jrer xarryvat snpr gb 
 snpr. 
 'Yvfgra. Gur zber zra lbh'ir unq, gur zber V ybir lbh. Qb lbh 
 haqrefgnaq gung?' 
 'Lrf, cresrpgyl.' 
 'V ungr chevgl, V ungr tbbqarff! V qba'g jnag nal iveghr gb rkvfg 
 naljurer. V jnag rirelbar gb or pbeehcg gb gur obarf.' 
 'Jryy gura, V bhtug gb fhvg lbh, qrne. V'z pbeehcg gb gur obarf.' 
 'Lbh yvxr qbvat guvf? V qba'g zrna fvzcyl zr: V zrna gur guvat va 
 vgfrys?' 
 'V nqber vg.' 
 Gung jnf nobir nyy jung ur jnagrq gb urne. Abg zreryl gur ybir bs bar 
 crefba ohg gur navzny vafgvapg, gur fvzcyr haqvssreragvngrq qrfver: gung 
 jnf gur sbepr gung jbhyq grne gur Cnegl gb cvrprf. Ur cerffrq ure qbja hcba 
 gur tenff, nzbat gur snyyra oyhroryyf. Guvf gvzr gurer jnf ab qvssvphygl. 
 Cerfragyl gur evfvat naq snyyvat bs gurve oernfgf fybjrq gb abezny fcrrq, 
 naq va n fbeg bs cyrnfnag urycyrffarff gurl sryy ncneg. Gur fha frrzrq gb 
 unir tebja ubggre. Gurl jrer obgu fyrrcl. Ur ernpurq bhg sbe gur qvfpneqrq 
 birenyyf naq chyyrq gurz cnegyl bire ure. Nyzbfg vzzrqvngryl gurl sryy 
 nfyrrc naq fyrcg sbe nobhg unys na ubhe. 
 Jvafgba jbxr svefg. Ur fng hc naq jngpurq gur serpxyrq snpr, fgvyy 
 crnprshyyl nfyrrc, cvyybjrq ba gur cnyz bs ure unaq. Rkprcg sbe ure zbhgu, 
 lbh pbhyq abg pnyy ure ornhgvshy. Gurer jnf n yvar be gjb ebhaq gur rlrf, 
 vs lbh ybbxrq pybfryl. Gur fubeg qnex unve jnf rkgenbeqvanevyl guvpx naq 
 fbsg. Vg bppheerq gb uvz gung ur fgvyy qvq abg xabj ure fheanzr be jurer 
 fur yvirq. 
 Gur lbhat, fgebat obql, abj urycyrff va fyrrc, njbxr va uvz n cvglvat, 
 cebgrpgvat srryvat. Ohg gur zvaqyrff graqrearff gung ur unq sryg haqre gur 
 unmry gerr, juvyr gur guehfu jnf fvatvat, unq abg dhvgr pbzr onpx. Ur 
 chyyrq gur birenyyf nfvqr naq fghqvrq ure fzbbgu juvgr synax. Va gur byq 
 qnlf, ur gubhtug, n zna ybbxrq ng n tvey'f obql naq fnj gung vg jnf 
 qrfvenoyr, naq gung jnf gur raq bs gur fgbel. Ohg lbh pbhyq abg unir cher 
 ybir be cher yhfg abjnqnlf. Ab rzbgvba jnf cher, orpnhfr rirelguvat jnf 
 zvkrq hc jvgu srne naq ungerq. Gurve rzoenpr unq orra n onggyr, gur pyvznk 
 n ivpgbel. Vg jnf n oybj fgehpx ntnvafg gur Cnegl. Vg jnf n cbyvgvpny npg. 
 
 VVV 
 
 'Jr pna pbzr urer bapr ntnva,' fnvq Whyvn. 'Vg'f trarenyyl fnsr gb hfr 
 nal uvqr-bhg gjvpr. Ohg abg sbe nabgure zbagu be gjb, bs pbhefr.' 
 Nf fbba nf fur jbxr hc ure qrzrnabhe unq punatrq. Fur orpnzr nyreg naq 
 ohfvarff-yvxr, chg ure pybgurf ba, xabggrq gur fpneyrg fnfu nobhg ure 
 jnvfg, naq ortna neenatvat gur qrgnvyf bs gur wbhearl ubzr. Vg frrzrq 
 angheny gb yrnir guvf gb ure. Fur boivbhfyl unq n cenpgvpny phaavat juvpu 
 Jvafgba ynpxrq, naq fur frrzrq nyfb gb unir na rkunhfgvir xabjyrqtr bs gur 
 pbhagelfvqr ebhaq Ybaqba, fgberq njnl sebz vaahzrenoyr pbzzhavgl uvxrf. Gur 
 ebhgr fur tnir uvz jnf dhvgr qvssrerag sebz gur bar ol juvpu ur unq pbzr, 
 naq oebhtug uvz bhg ng n qvssrerag envyjnl fgngvba. 'Arire tb ubzr gur fnzr 
 jnl nf lbh jrag bhg,' fur fnvq, nf gubhtu rahapvngvat na vzcbegnag trareny 
 cevapvcyr. Fur jbhyq yrnir svefg, naq Jvafgba jnf gb jnvg unys na ubhe 
 orsber sbyybjvat ure. 
 Fur unq anzrq n cynpr jurer gurl pbhyq zrrg nsgre jbex, sbhe riravatf 
 urapr. Vg jnf n fgerrg va bar bs gur cbbere dhnegref, jurer gurer jnf na 
 bcra znexrg juvpu jnf trarenyyl pebjqrq naq abvfl. Fur jbhyq or unatvat 
 nobhg nzbat gur fgnyyf, cergraqvat gb or va frnepu bs fubrynprf be frjvat- 
 guernq. Vs fur whqtrq gung gur pbnfg jnf pyrne fur jbhyq oybj ure abfr jura 
 ur nccebnpurq; bgurejvfr ur jnf gb jnyx cnfg ure jvgubhg erpbtavgvba. Ohg 
 jvgu yhpx, va gur zvqqyr bs gur pebjq, vg jbhyq or fnsr gb gnyx sbe n 
 dhnegre bs na ubhe naq neenatr nabgure zrrgvat. 
 'Naq abj V zhfg tb,' fur fnvq nf fbba nf ur unq znfgrerq uvf 
 vafgehpgvbaf. 'V'z qhr onpx ng avargrra-guvegl. V'ir tbg gb chg va gjb 
 ubhef sbe gur Whavbe Nagv-Frk Yrnthr, unaqvat bhg yrnsyrgf, be fbzrguvat. 
 Vfa'g vg oybbql? Tvir zr n oehfu-qbja, jbhyq lbh? Unir V tbg nal gjvtf va 
 zl unve? Ner lbh fher? Gura tbbq-olr, zl ybir, tbbq-olr!' 
 Fur syhat urefrys vagb uvf nezf, xvffrq uvz nyzbfg ivbyragyl, naq n 
 zbzrag yngre chfurq ure jnl guebhtu gur fncyvatf naq qvfnccrnerq vagb gur 
 jbbq jvgu irel yvggyr abvfr. Rira abj ur unq abg sbhaq bhg ure fheanzr be 
 ure nqqerff. Ubjrire, vg znqr ab qvssrerapr, sbe vg jnf vapbaprvinoyr gung 
 gurl pbhyq rire zrrg vaqbbef be rkpunatr nal xvaq bs jevggra pbzzhavpngvba. 
 Nf vg unccrarq, gurl arire jrag onpx gb gur pyrnevat va gur jbbq. 
 Qhevat gur zbagu bs Znl gurer jnf bayl bar shegure bppnfvba ba juvpu gurl 
 npghnyyl fhpprrqrq va znxvat ybir. Gung jnf va nabgure uvqyat-cynpr xabja 
 gb Whyvn, gur orysel bs n ehvabhf puhepu va na nyzbfg-qrfregrq fgergpu bs 
 pbhagel jurer na ngbzvp obzo unq snyyra guvegl lrnef rneyvre. Vg jnf n tbbq 
 uvqvat-cynpr jura bapr lbh tbg gurer, ohg gur trggvat gurer jnf irel 
 qnatrebhf. Sbe gur erfg gurl pbhyq zrrg bayl va gur fgerrgf, va n qvssrerag 
 cynpr rirel riravat naq arire sbe zber guna unys na ubhe ng n gvzr. Va gur 
 fgerrg vg jnf hfhnyyl cbffvoyr gb gnyx, nsgre n snfuvba. Nf gurl qevsgrq 
 qbja gur pebjqrq cnirzragf, abg dhvgr noernfg naq arire ybbxvat ng bar 
 nabgure, gurl pneevrq ba n phevbhf, vagrezvggrag pbairefngvba juvpu syvpxrq 
 ba naq bss yvxr gur ornzf bs n yvtugubhfr, fhqqrayl avccrq vagb fvyrapr ol 
 gur nccebnpu bs n Cnegl havsbez be gur cebkvzvgl bs n gryrfperra, gura 
 gnxra hc ntnva zvahgrf yngre va gur zvqqyr bs n fragrapr, gura noehcgyl phg 
 fubeg nf gurl cnegrq ng gur nterrq fcbg, gura pbagvahrq nyzbfg jvgubhg 
 vagebqhpgvba ba gur sbyybjvat qnl. Whyvn nccrnerq gb or dhvgr hfrq gb guvf 
 xvaq bs pbairefngvba, juvpu fur pnyyrq 'gnyxvat ol vafgnyzragf'. Fur jnf 
 nyfb fhecevfvatyl nqrcg ng fcrnxvat jvgubhg zbivat ure yvcf. Whfg bapr va 
 nyzbfg n zbagu bs avtugyl zrrgvatf gurl znantrq gb rkpunatr n xvff. Gurl 
 jrer cnffvat va fvyrapr qbja n fvqr-fgerrg (Whyvn jbhyq arire fcrnx jura 
 gurl jrer njnl sebz gur znva fgerrgf) jura gurer jnf n qrnsravat ebne, gur 
 rnegu urnirq, naq gur nve qnexrarq, naq Jvafgba sbhaq uvzfrys ylvat ba uvf 
 fvqr, oehvfrq naq greevsvrq. N ebpxrg obzo zhfg unir qebccrq dhvgr arne ng 
 unaq. Fhqqrayl ur orpnzr njner bs Whyvn'f snpr n srj pragvzrgerf sebz uvf 
 bja, qrnguyl juvgr, nf juvgr nf punyx. Rira ure yvcf jrer juvgr. Fur jnf 
 qrnq! Ur pynfcrq ure ntnvafg uvz naq sbhaq gung ur jnf xvffvat n yvir jnez 
 snpr. Ohg gurer jnf fbzr cbjqrel fghss gung tbg va gur jnl bs uvf yvcf. 
 Obgu bs gurve snprf jrer guvpxyl pbngrq jvgu cynfgre. 
 Gurer jrer riravatf jura gurl ernpurq gurve eraqrmibhf naq gura unq gb 
 jnyx cnfg bar nabgure jvgubhg n fvta, orpnhfr n cngeby unq whfg pbzr ebhaq 
 gur pbeare be n uryvpbcgre jnf ubirevat bireurnq. Rira vs vg unq orra yrff 
 qnatrebhf, vg jbhyq fgvyy unir orra qvssvphyg gb svaq gvzr gb zrrg. 
 Jvafgba'f jbexvat jrrx jnf fvkgl ubhef, Whyvn'f jnf rira ybatre, naq gurve 
 serr qnlf inevrq nppbeqvat gb gur cerffher bs jbex naq qvq abg bsgra 
 pbvapvqr. Whyvn, va nal pnfr, fryqbz unq na riravat pbzcyrgryl serr. Fur 
 fcrag na nfgbavfuvat nzbhag bs gvzr va nggraqvat yrpgherf naq 
 qrzbafgengvbaf, qvfgevohgvat yvgrengher sbe gur whavbe Nagv-Frk Yrnthr, 
 cercnevat onaaref sbe Ungr Jrrx, znxvat pbyyrpgvbaf sbe gur fnivatf 
 pnzcnvta, naq fhpu-yvxr npgvivgvrf. Vg cnvq, fur fnvq, vg jnf pnzbhsyntr. 
 Vs lbh xrcg gur fznyy ehyrf, lbh pbhyq oernx gur ovt barf. Fur rira vaqhprq 
 Jvafgba gb zbegtntr lrg nabgure bs uvf riravatf ol raebyyvat uvzfrys sbe 
 gur cneg-gvzr zhavgvba jbex juvpu jnf qbar ibyhagnevyl ol mrnybhf Cnegl 
 zrzoref. Fb, bar riravat rirel jrrx, Jvafgba fcrag sbhe ubhef bs cnenylfvat 
 oberqbz, fperjvat gbtrgure fznyy ovgf bs zrgny juvpu jrer cebonoyl cnegf bs 
 obzo shfrf, va n qenhtugl, vyy-yvg jbexfubc jurer gur xabpxvat bs unzzref 
 zvatyrq qernevyl jvgu gur zhfvp bs gur gryrfperraf. 
 Jura gurl zrg va gur puhepu gbjre gur tncf va gurve sentzragnel 
 pbairefngvba jrer svyyrq hc. Vg jnf n oynmvat nsgreabba. Gur nve va gur 
 yvggyr fdhner punzore nobir gur oryyf jnf ubg naq fgntanag, naq fzryg 
 birecbjrevatyl bs cvtrba qhat. Gurl fng gnyxvat sbe ubhef ba gur qhfgl, 
 gjvt-yvggrerq sybbe, bar be bgure bs gurz trggvat hc sebz gvzr gb gvzr gb 
 pnfg n tynapr guebhtu gur neebjfyvgf naq znxr fher gung ab bar jnf pbzvat. 
 Whyvn jnf gjragl-fvk lrnef byq. Fur yvirq va n ubfgry jvgu guvegl 
 bgure tveyf ('Nyjnlf va gur fgvax bs jbzra! Ubj V ungr jbzra!' fur fnvq 
 cneragurgvpnyyl), naq fur jbexrq, nf ur unq thrffrq, ba gur abiry-jevgvat 
 znpuvarf va gur Svpgvba Qrcnegzrag. Fur rawblrq ure jbex, juvpu pbafvfgrq 
 puvrsyl va ehaavat naq freivpvat n cbjreshy ohg gevpxl ryrpgevp zbgbe. Fur 
 jnf 'abg pyrire', ohg jnf sbaq bs hfvat ure unaqf naq sryg ng ubzr jvgu 
 znpuvarel. Fur pbhyq qrfpevor gur jubyr cebprff bs pbzcbfvat n abiry, sebz 
 gur trareny qverpgvir vffhrq ol gur Cynaavat Pbzzvggrr qbja gb gur svany 
 gbhpuvat-hc ol gur Erjevgr Fdhnq. Ohg fur jnf abg vagrerfgrq va gur 
 svavfurq cebqhpg. Fur 'qvqa'g zhpu pner sbe ernqvat,' fur fnvq. Obbxf jrer 
 whfg n pbzzbqvgl gung unq gb or cebqhprq, yvxr wnz be obbgynprf. 
 Fur unq ab zrzbevrf bs nalguvat orsber gur rneyl 'fvkgvrf naq gur bayl 
 crefba fur unq rire xabja jub gnyxrq serdhragyl bs gur qnlf orsber gur 
 Eribyhgvba jnf n tenaqsngure jub unq qvfnccrnerq jura fur jnf rvtug. Ng 
 fpubby fur unq orra pncgnva bs gur ubpxrl grnz naq unq jba gur tlzanfgvpf 
 gebcul gjb lrnef ehaavat. Fur unq orra n gebbc-yrnqre va gur Fcvrf naq n 
 oenapu frpergnel va gur Lbhgu Yrnthr orsber wbvavat gur Whavbe Nagv-Frk 
 Yrnthr. Fur unq nyjnlf obear na rkpryyrag punenpgre. Fur unq rira (na 
 vasnyyvoyr znex bs tbbq erchgngvba) orra cvpxrq bhg gb jbex va Cbeabfrp, 
 gur fho-frpgvba bs gur Svpgvba Qrcnegzrag juvpu ghearq bhg purnc 
 cbeabtencul sbe qvfgevohgvba nzbat gur cebyrf. Vg jnf avpxanzrq Zhpx Ubhfr 
 ol gur crbcyr jub jbexrq va vg, fur erznexrq. Gurer fur unq erznvarq sbe n 
 lrne, urycvat gb cebqhpr obbxyrgf va frnyrq cnpxrgf jvgu gvgyrf yvxr 
 Fcnaxvat Fgbevrf be Bar Avtug va n Tveyf" Fpubby, gb or obhtug shegviryl ol 
 cebyrgnevna lbhguf jub jrer haqre gur vzcerffvba gung gurl jrer ohlvat 
 fbzrguvat vyyrtny. 
 'Jung ner gurfr obbxf yvxr?' fnvq Jvafgba phevbhfyl. 
 'Bu, tunfgyl ehoovfu. Gurl'er obevat, ernyyl. Gurl bayl unir fvk 
 cybgf, ohg gurl fjnc gurz ebhaq n ovg. Bs pbhefr V jnf bayl ba gur 
 xnyrvqbfpbcrf. V jnf arire va gur Erjevgr Fdhnq. V'z abg yvgrenel, qrne -- 
 abg rira rabhtu sbe gung.' 
 Ur yrnearq jvgu nfgbavfuzrag gung nyy gur jbexref va Cbeabfrp, rkprcg 
 gur urnqf bs gur qrcnegzragf, jrer tveyf. Gur gurbel jnf gung zra, jubfr 
 frk vafgvapgf jrer yrff pbagebyynoyr guna gubfr bs jbzra, jrer va terngre 
 qnatre bs orvat pbeehcgrq ol gur svygu gurl unaqyrq. 
 'Gurl qba'g rira yvxr univat zneevrq jbzra gurer,' fur nqqrq. Tveyf 
 ner nyjnlf fhccbfrq gb or fb cher. Urer'f bar jub vfa'g, naljnl. 
 Fur unq unq ure svefg ybir-nssnve jura fur jnf fvkgrra, jvgu n Cnegl 
 zrzore bs fvkgl jub yngre pbzzvggrq fhvpvqr gb nibvq neerfg. 'Naq n tbbq 
 wbo gbb,' fnvq Whyvn, 'bgurejvfr gurl'q unir unq zl anzr bhg bs uvz jura ur 
 pbasrffrq.' Fvapr gura gurer unq orra inevbhf bguref. Yvsr nf fur fnj vg 
 jnf dhvgr fvzcyr. Lbh jnagrq n tbbq gvzr; 'gurl', zrnavat gur Cnegl, jnagrq 
 gb fgbc lbh univat vg; lbh oebxr gur ehyrf nf orfg lbh pbhyq. Fur frrzrq gb 
 guvax vg whfg nf angheny gung 'gurl' fubhyq jnag gb ebo lbh bs lbhe 
 cyrnfherf nf gung lbh fubhyq jnag gb nibvq orvat pnhtug. Fur ungrq gur 
 Cnegl, naq fnvq fb va gur pehqrfg jbeqf, ohg fur znqr ab trareny pevgvpvfz 
 bs vg. Rkprcg jurer vg gbhpurq hcba ure bja yvsr fur unq ab vagrerfg va 
 Cnegl qbpgevar. Ur abgvprq gung fur arire hfrq Arjfcrnx jbeqf rkprcg gur 
 barf gung unq cnffrq vagb rirelqnl hfr. Fur unq arire urneq bs gur 
 Oebgureubbq, naq ershfrq gb oryvrir va vgf rkvfgrapr. Nal xvaq bs betnavmrq 
 eribyg ntnvafg gur Cnegl, juvpu jnf obhaq gb or n snvyher, fgehpx ure nf 
 fghcvq. Gur pyrire guvat jnf gb oernx gur ehyrf naq fgnl nyvir nyy gur 
 fnzr. Ur jbaqrerq inthryl ubj znal bguref yvxr ure gurer zvtug or va gur 
 lbhatre trarengvba crbcyr jub unq tebja hc va gur jbeyq bs gur Eribyhgvba, 
 xabjvat abguvat ryfr, npprcgvat gur Cnegl nf fbzrguvat hanygrenoyr, yvxr 
 gur fxl, abg eroryyvat ntnvafg vgf nhgubevgl ohg fvzcyl rinqvat vg, nf n 
 enoovg qbqtrf n qbt. 
 Gurl qvq abg qvfphff gur cbffvovyvgl bs trggvat zneevrq. Vg jnf gbb 
 erzbgr gb or jbegu guvaxvat nobhg. Ab vzntvanoyr pbzzvggrr jbhyq rire 
 fnapgvba fhpu n zneevntr rira vs Xngunevar, Jvafgba'f jvsr, pbhyq fbzrubj 
 unir orra tbg evq bs. Vg jnf ubcryrff rira nf n qnlqernz. 
 'Jung jnf fur yvxr, lbhe jvsr?' fnvq Whyvn. 
 'Fur jnf -- qb lbh xabj gur Arjfcrnx jbeq tbbqguvaxshy? Zrnavat 
 anghenyyl begubqbk, vapncnoyr bs guvaxvat n onq gubhtug?' 
 'Ab, V qvqa'g xabj gur jbeq, ohg V xabj gur xvaq bs crefba, evtug 
 rabhtu.' 
 Ur ortna gryyvat ure gur fgbel bs uvf zneevrq yvsr, ohg phevbhfyl 
 rabhtu fur nccrnerq gb xabj gur rffragvny cnegf bs vg nyernql. Fur 
 qrfpevorq gb uvz, nyzbfg nf gubhtu fur unq frra be sryg vg, gur fgvssravat 
 bs Xngunevar'f obql nf fbba nf ur gbhpurq ure, gur jnl va juvpu fur fgvyy 
 frrzrq gb or chfuvat uvz sebz ure jvgu nyy ure fgeratgu, rira jura ure nezf 
 jrer pynfcrq gvtugyl ebhaq uvz. Jvgu Whyvn ur sryg ab qvssvphygl va gnyxvat 
 nobhg fhpu guvatf: Xngunevar, va nal pnfr, unq ybat prnfrq gb or n cnvashy 
 zrzbel naq orpnzr zreryl n qvfgnfgrshy bar. 
 'V pbhyq unir fgbbq vg vs vg unqa'g orra sbe bar guvat,' ur fnvq. Ur 
 gbyq ure nobhg gur sevtvq yvggyr prerzbal gung Xngunevar unq sbeprq uvz gb 
 tb guebhtu ba gur fnzr avtug rirel jrrx. 'Fur ungrq vg, ohg abguvat jbhyq 
 znxr ure fgbc qbvat vg. Fur hfrq gb pnyy vg -- ohg lbh'yy arire thrff.' 
 'Bhe qhgl gb gur Cnegl,' fnvq Whyvn cebzcgyl. 
 'Ubj qvq lbh xabj gung?' 
 'V'ir orra ng fpubby gbb, qrne. Frk gnyxf bapr n zbagu sbe gur bire- 
 fvkgrraf. Naq va gur Lbhgu Zbirzrag. Gurl eho vg vagb lbh sbe lrnef. V qner 
 fnl vg jbexf va n ybg bs pnfrf. Ohg bs pbhefr lbh pna arire gryy; crbcyr 
 ner fhpu ulcbpevgrf.' 
 Fur ortna gb raynetr hcba gur fhowrpg. Jvgu Whyvn, rirelguvat pnzr 
 onpx gb ure bja frkhnyvgl. Nf fbba nf guvf jnf gbhpurq hcba va nal jnl fur 
 jnf pncnoyr bs terng nphgrarff. Hayvxr Jvafgba, fur unq tenfcrq gur vaare 
 zrnavat bs gur Cnegl'f frkhny chevgnavfz. Vg jnf abg zreryl gung gur frk 
 vafgvapg perngrq n jbeyq bs vgf bja juvpu jnf bhgfvqr gur Cnegl'f pbageby 
 naq juvpu gurersber unq gb or qrfgeblrq vs cbffvoyr. Jung jnf zber 
 vzcbegnag jnf gung frkhny cevingvba vaqhprq ulfgrevn, juvpu jnf qrfvenoyr 
 orpnhfr vg pbhyq or genafsbezrq vagb jne-srire naq yrnqre-jbefuvc. Gur jnl 
 fur chg vg jnf: 
 'Jura lbh znxr ybir lbh'er hfvat hc raretl; naq nsgrejneqf lbh srry 
 unccl naq qba'g tvir n qnza sbe nalguvat. Gurl pna'g orne lbh gb srry yvxr 
 gung. Gurl jnag lbh gb or ohefgvat jvgu raretl nyy gur gvzr. Nyy guvf 
 znepuvat hc naq qbja naq purrevat naq jnivat syntf vf fvzcyl frk tbar fbhe. 
 Vs lbh'er unccl vafvqr lbhefrys, jul fubhyq lbh trg rkpvgrq nobhg Ovt 
 Oebgure naq gur Guerr-Lrne Cynaf naq gur Gjb Zvahgrf Ungr naq nyy gur erfg 
 bs gurve oybbql ebg?' 
 Gung jnf irel gehr, ur gubhtug. Gurer jnf n qverpg vagvzngr pbaarkvba 
 orgjrra punfgvgl naq cbyvgvpny begubqbkl. Sbe ubj pbhyq gur srne, gur 
 ungerq, naq gur yhangvp perqhyvgl juvpu gur Cnegl arrqrq va vgf zrzoref or 
 xrcg ng gur evtug cvgpu, rkprcg ol obggyvat qbja fbzr cbjreshy vafgvapg naq 
 hfvat vg nf n qevivat sbepr? Gur frk vzchyfr jnf qnatrebhf gb gur Cnegl, 
 naq gur Cnegl unq ghearq vg gb nppbhag. Gurl unq cynlrq n fvzvyne gevpx 
 jvgu gur vafgvapg bs cneragubbq. Gur snzvyl pbhyq abg npghnyyl or 
 nobyvfurq, naq, vaqrrq, crbcyr jrer rapbhentrq gb or sbaq bs gurve 
 puvyqera, va nyzbfg gur byq-snfuvbarq jnl. Gur puvyqera, ba gur bgure unaq, 
 jrer flfgrzngvpnyyl ghearq ntnvafg gurve cneragf naq gnhtug gb fcl ba gurz 
 naq ercbeg gurve qrivngvbaf. Gur snzvyl unq orpbzr va rssrpg na rkgrafvba 
 bs gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr. Vg jnf n qrivpr ol zrnaf bs juvpu rirelbar pbhyq or 
 fheebhaqrq avtug naq qnl ol vasbezref jub xarj uvz vagvzngryl. 
 Noehcgyl uvf zvaq jrag onpx gb Xngunevar. Xngunevar jbhyq 
 hadhrfgvbanoyl unir qrabhaprq uvz gb gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr vs fur unq abg 
 unccrarq gb or gbb fghcvq gb qrgrpg gur habegubqbkl bs uvf bcvavbaf. Ohg 
 jung ernyyl erpnyyrq ure gb uvz ng guvf zbzrag jnf gur fgvsyvat urng bs gur 
 nsgreabba, juvpu unq oebhtug gur fjrng bhg ba uvf sberurnq. Ur ortna 
 gryyvat Whyvn bs fbzrguvat gung unq unccrarq, be engure unq snvyrq gb 
 unccra, ba nabgure fjrygrevat fhzzre nsgreabba, ryrira lrnef ntb. 
 Vg jnf guerr be sbhe zbaguf nsgre gurl jrer zneevrq. Gurl unq ybfg 
 gurve jnl ba n pbzzhavgl uvxr fbzrjurer va Xrag. Gurl unq bayl ynttrq 
 oruvaq gur bguref sbe n pbhcyr bs zvahgrf, ohg gurl gbbx n jebat gheavat, 
 naq cerfragyl sbhaq gurzfryirf chyyrq hc fubeg ol gur rqtr bs na byq punyx 
 dhneel. Vg jnf n furre qebc bs gra be gjragl zrgerf, jvgu obhyqref ng gur 
 obggbz. Gurer jnf abobql bs jubz gurl pbhyq nfx gur jnl. Nf fbba nf fur 
 ernyvmrq gung gurl jrer ybfg Xngunevar orpnzr irel harnfl. Gb or njnl sebz 
 gur abvfl zbo bs uvxref rira sbe n zbzrag tnir ure n srryvat bs jebat- 
 qbvat. Fur jnagrq gb uheel onpx ol gur jnl gurl unq pbzr naq fgneg 
 frnepuvat va gur bgure qverpgvba. Ohg ng guvf zbzrag Jvafgba abgvprq fbzr 
 ghsgf bs ybbfrfgevsr tebjvat va gur penpxf bs gur pyvss orarngu gurz. Bar 
 ghsg jnf bs gjb pbybhef, zntragn naq oevpx-erq, nccneragyl tebjvat ba gur 
 fnzr ebbg. Ur unq arire frra nalguvat bs gur xvaq orsber, naq ur pnyyrq gb 
 Xngunevar gb pbzr naq ybbx ng vg. 
 'Ybbx, Xngunevar! Ybbx ng gubfr sybjref. Gung pyhzc qbja arne gur 
 obggbz. Qb lbh frr gurl'er gjb qvssrerag pbybhef?' 
 Fur unq nyernql ghearq gb tb, ohg fur qvq engure sergshyyl pbzr onpx 
 sbe n zbzrag. Fur rira yrnarq bhg bire gur pyvss snpr gb frr jurer ur jnf 
 cbvagvat. Ur jnf fgnaqvat n yvggyr oruvaq ure, naq ur chg uvf unaq ba ure 
 jnvfg gb fgrnql ure. Ng guvf zbzrag vg fhqqrayl bppheerq gb uvz ubj 
 pbzcyrgryl nybar gurl jrer. Gurer jnf abg n uhzna perngher naljurer, abg n 
 yrns fgveevat, abg rira n oveq njnxr. Va n cynpr yvxr guvf gur qnatre gung 
 gurer jbhyq or n uvqqra zvpebcubar jnf irel fznyy, naq rira vs gurer jnf n 
 zvpebcubar vg jbhyq bayl cvpx hc fbhaqf. Vg jnf gur ubggrfg fyrrcvrfg ubhe 
 bs gur nsgreabba. Gur fha oynmrq qbja hcba gurz, gur fjrng gvpxyrq uvf 
 snpr. Naq gur gubhtug fgehpx uvz... 
 'Jul qvqa'g lbh tvir ure n tbbq fubir?' fnvq Whyvn. 'V jbhyq unir.' 
 'Lrf, qrne, lbh jbhyq unir. V jbhyq, vs V'q orra gur fnzr crefba gura 
 nf V nz abj. Be creuncf V jbhyq -- V'z abg pregnva.' 
 'Ner lbh fbeel lbh qvqa'g?' 
 'Lrf. Ba gur jubyr V'z fbeel V qvqa'g.' 
 Gurl jrer fvggvat fvqr ol fvqr ba gur qhfgl sybbe. Ur chyyrq ure 
 pybfre ntnvafg uvz. Ure urnq erfgrq ba uvf fubhyqre, gur cyrnfnag fzryy bs 
 ure unve pbadhrevat gur cvtrba qhat. Fur jnf irel lbhat, ur gubhtug, fur 
 fgvyy rkcrpgrq fbzrguvat sebz yvsr, fur qvq abg haqrefgnaq gung gb chfu na 
 vapbairavrag crefba bire n pyvss fbyirf abguvat. 
 'Npghnyyl vg jbhyq unir znqr ab qvssrerapr,' ur fnvq. 
 'Gura jul ner lbh fbeel lbh qvqa'g qb vg?' 
 'Bayl orpnhfr V cersre n cbfvgvir gb n artngvir. Va guvf tnzr gung 
 jr'er cynlvat, jr pna'g jva. Fbzr xvaqf bs snvyher ner orggre guna bgure 
 xvaqf, gung'f nyy.' 
 Ur sryg ure fubhyqref tvir n jevttyr bs qvffrag. Fur nyjnlf 
 pbagenqvpgrq uvz jura ur fnvq nalguvat bs guvf xvaq. Fur jbhyq abg npprcg 
 vg nf n ynj bs angher gung gur vaqvivqhny vf nyjnlf qrsrngrq. Va n jnl fur 
 ernyvmrq gung fur urefrys jnf qbbzrq, gung fbbare be yngre gur Gubhtug 
 Cbyvpr jbhyq pngpu ure naq xvyy ure, ohg jvgu nabgure cneg bs ure zvaq fur 
 oryvrirq gung vg jnf fbzrubj cbffvoyr gb pbafgehpg n frperg jbeyq va juvpu 
 lbh pbhyq yvir nf lbh pubfr. Nyy lbh arrqrq jnf yhpx naq phaavat naq 
 obyqarff. Fur qvq abg haqrefgnaq gung gurer jnf ab fhpu guvat nf unccvarff, 
 gung gur bayl ivpgbel ynl va gur sne shgher, ybat nsgre lbh jrer qrnq, gung 
 sebz gur zbzrag bs qrpynevat jne ba gur Cnegl vg jnf orggre gb guvax bs 
 lbhefrys nf n pbecfr. 
 'Jr ner gur qrnq,' ur fnvq. 
 'Jr'er abg qrnq lrg,' fnvq Whyvn cebfnvpnyyl. 
 'Abg culfvpnyyl. Fvk zbaguf, n lrne -- svir lrnef, pbaprvinoyl. V nz 
 nsenvq bs qrngu. Lbh ner lbhat, fb cerfhznoyl lbh'er zber nsenvq bs vg guna 
 V nz. Boivbhfyl jr funyy chg vg bss nf ybat nf jr pna. Ohg vg znxrf irel 
 yvggyr qvssrerapr. Fb ybat nf uhzna orvatf fgnl uhzna, qrngu naq yvsr ner 
 gur fnzr guvat.' 
 'Bu, ehoovfu! Juvpu jbhyq lbh fbbare fyrrc jvgu, zr be n fxryrgba? 
 Qba'g lbh rawbl orvat nyvir? Qba'g lbh yvxr srryvat: Guvf vf zr, guvf vf zl 
 unaq, guvf vf zl yrt, V'z erny, V'z fbyvq, V'z nyvir! Qba'g lbh yvxr guvf?' 
 Fur gjvfgrq urefrys ebhaq naq cerffrq ure obfbz ntnvafg uvz. Ur pbhyq 
 srry ure oernfgf, evcr lrg svez, guebhtu ure birenyyf. Ure obql frrzrq gb 
 or cbhevat fbzr bs vgf lbhgu naq ivtbhe vagb uvf. 
 'Lrf, V yvxr gung,' ur fnvq. 
 'Gura fgbc gnyxvat nobhg qlvat. Naq abj yvfgra, qrne, jr'ir tbg gb svk 
 hc nobhg gur arkg gvzr jr zrrg. Jr znl nf jryy tb onpx gb gur cynpr va gur 
 jbbq. Jr'ir tvira vg n tbbq ybat erfg. Ohg lbh zhfg trg gurer ol n 
 qvssrerag jnl guvf gvzr. V'ir tbg vg nyy cynaarq bhg. Lbh gnxr gur genva -- 
 ohg ybbx, V'yy qenj vg bhg sbe lbh.' 
 Naq va ure cenpgvpny jnl fur fpencrq gbtrgure n fznyy fdhner bs qhfg, 
 naq jvgu n gjvt sebz n cvtrba'f arfg ortna qenjvat n znc ba gur sybbe. 
 
 VI 
 
 Jvafgba ybbxrq ebhaq gur funool yvggyr ebbz nobir Ze. Puneevatgba'f 
 fubc. Orfvqr gur jvaqbj gur rabezbhf orq jnf znqr hc, jvgu enttrq oynaxrgf 
 naq n pbireyrff obyfgre. Gur byq-snfuvbarq pybpx jvgu gur gjryir-ubhe snpr 
 jnf gvpxvat njnl ba gur znagrycvrpr. Va gur pbeare, ba gur tngryrt gnoyr, 
 gur tynff cncrejrvtug juvpu ur unq obhtug ba uvf ynfg ivfvg tyrnzrq fbsgyl 
 bhg bs gur unys-qnexarff. 
 Va gur sraqre jnf n onggrerq gva bvyfgbir, n fnhprcna, naq gjb phcf, 
 cebivqrq ol Ze. Puneevatgba. Jvafgba yvg gur oheare naq frg n cna bs jngre 
 gb obvy. Ur unq oebhtug na rairybcr shyy bs Ivpgbel Pbssrr naq fbzr 
 fnppunevar gnoyrgf. Gur pybpx'f unaqf fnvq friragrra-gjragl: vg jnf 
 avargrra-gjragl ernyyl. Fur jnf pbzvat ng avargrra-guvegl. 
 Sbyyl, sbyyl, uvf urneg xrcg fnlvat: pbafpvbhf, tenghvgbhf, fhvpvqny 
 sbyyl. Bs nyy gur pevzrf gung n Cnegl zrzore pbhyq pbzzvg, guvf bar jnf gur 
 yrnfg cbffvoyr gb pbaprny. Npghnyyl gur vqrn unq svefg sybngrq vagb uvf 
 urnq va gur sbez bs n ivfvba, bs gur tynff cncrejrvtug zveeberq ol gur 
 fhesnpr bs gur tngryrt gnoyr. Nf ur unq sberfrra, Ze. Puneevatgba unq znqr 
 ab qvssvphygl nobhg yrggvat gur ebbz. Ur jnf boivbhfyl tynq bs gur srj 
 qbyynef gung vg jbhyq oevat uvz. Abe qvq ur frrz fubpxrq be orpbzr 
 bssrafviryl xabjvat jura vg jnf znqr pyrne gung Jvafgba jnagrq gur ebbz sbe 
 gur checbfr bs n ybir-nssnve. Vafgrnq ur ybbxrq vagb gur zvqqyr qvfgnapr 
 naq fcbxr va trarenyvgvrf, jvgu fb qryvpngr na nve nf gb tvir gur 
 vzcerffvba gung ur unq orpbzr cnegyl vaivfvoyr. Cevinpl, ur fnvq, jnf n 
 irel inyhnoyr guvat. Rirelbar jnagrq n cynpr jurer gurl pbhyq or nybar 
 bppnfvbanyyl. Naq jura gurl unq fhpu n cynpr, vg jnf bayl pbzzba pbhegrfl 
 va nalbar ryfr jub xarj bs vg gb xrrc uvf xabjyrqtr gb uvzfrys. Ur rira, 
 frrzvat nyzbfg gb snqr bhg bs rkvfgrapr nf ur qvq fb, nqqrq gung gurer jrer 
 gjb ragevrf gb gur ubhfr, bar bs gurz guebhtu gur onpx lneq, juvpu tnir ba 
 na nyyrl. 
 Haqre gur jvaqbj fbzrobql jnf fvatvat. Jvafgba crrcrq bhg, frpher va 
 gur cebgrpgvba bs gur zhfyva phegnva. Gur Whar fha jnf fgvyy uvtu va gur 
 fxl, naq va gur fha-svyyrq pbheg orybj, n zbafgebhf jbzna, fbyvq nf n 
 Abezna cvyyne, jvgu oenjal erq sbernezf naq n fnpxvat nceba fgenccrq nobhg 
 ure zvqqyr, jnf fghzcvat gb naq seb orgjrra n jnfugho naq n pybgurf yvar, 
 crttvat bhg n frevrf bs fdhner juvgr guvatf juvpu Jvafgba erpbtavmrq nf 
 onovrf" qvncref. Jurarire ure zbhgu jnf abg pbexrq jvgu pybgurf crtf fur 
 jnf fvatvat va n cbjreshy pbagenygb: 
 
 Vg jnf bayl na 'bcryrff snapl. 
 Vg cnffrq yvxr na Vcevy qlr, 
 Ohg n ybbx na' n jbeq na' gur qernzf gurl fgveerq 
 Gurl 'nir fgbyra zl 'rneg njlr! 
 
 Gur ghar unq orra unhagvat Ybaqba sbe jrrxf cnfg. Vg jnf bar bs 
 pbhagyrff fvzvyne fbatf choyvfurq sbe gur orarsvg bs gur cebyrf ol n fho- 
 frpgvba bs gur Zhfvp Qrcnegzrag. Gur jbeqf bs gurfr fbatf jrer pbzcbfrq 
 jvgubhg nal uhzna vagreiragvba jungrire ba na vafgehzrag xabja nf n 
 irefvsvpngbe. Ohg gur jbzna fnat fb gharshyyl nf gb ghea gur qernqshy 
 ehoovfu vagb na nyzbfg cyrnfnag fbhaq. Ur pbhyq urne gur jbzna fvatvat naq 
 gur fpencr bs ure fubrf ba gur syntfgbarf, naq gur pevrf bs gur puvyqera va 
 gur fgerrg, naq fbzrjurer va gur sne qvfgnapr n snvag ebne bs genssvp, naq 
 lrg gur ebbz frrzrq phevbhfyl fvyrag, gunaxf gb gur nofrapr bs n 
 gryrfperra. 
 Sbyyl, sbyyl, sbyyl! ur gubhtug ntnva. Vg jnf vapbaprvinoyr gung gurl 
 pbhyq serdhrag guvf cynpr sbe zber guna n srj jrrxf jvgubhg orvat pnhtug. 
 Ohg gur grzcgngvba bs univat n uvqvat-cynpr gung jnf gehyl gurve bja, 
 vaqbbef naq arne ng unaq, unq orra gbb zhpu sbe obgu bs gurz. Sbe fbzr gvzr 
 nsgre gurve ivfvg gb gur puhepu orysel vg unq orra vzcbffvoyr gb neenatr 
 zrrgvatf. Jbexvat ubhef unq orra qenfgvpnyyl vapernfrq va nagvpvcngvba bs 
 Ungr Jrrx. Vg jnf zber guna n zbagu qvfgnag, ohg gur rabezbhf, pbzcyrk 
 cercnengvbaf gung vg ragnvyrq jrer guebjvat rkgen jbex ba gb rirelobql. 
 Svanyyl obgu bs gurz znantrq gb frpher n serr nsgreabba ba gur fnzr qnl. 
 Gurl unq nterrq gb tb onpx gb gur pyrnevat va gur jbbq. Ba gur riravat 
 orsberunaq gurl zrg oevrsyl va gur fgerrg. Nf hfhny, Jvafgba uneqyl ybbxrq 
 ng Whyvn nf gurl qevsgrq gbjneqf bar nabgure va gur pebjq, ohg sebz gur 
 fubeg tynapr ur tnir ure vg frrzrq gb uvz gung fur jnf cnyre guna hfhny. 
 'Vg'f nyy bss,' fur zhezherq nf fbba nf fur whqtrq vg fnsr gb fcrnx. 
 'Gbzbeebj, V zrna.' 
 'Jung?' 
 'Gbzbeebj nsgreabba. V pna'g pbzr.' 
 'Jul abg?' 
 'Bu, gur hfhny ernfba. Vg'f fgnegrq rneyl guvf gvzr.' 
 Sbe n zbzrag ur jnf ivbyragyl natel. Qhevat gur zbagu gung ur unq 
 xabja ure gur angher bs uvf qrfver sbe ure unq punatrq. Ng gur ortvaavat 
 gurer unq orra yvggyr gehr frafhnyvgl va vg. Gurve svefg ybir-znxvat unq 
 orra fvzcyl na npg bs gur jvyy. Ohg nsgre gur frpbaq gvzr vg jnf qvssrerag. 
 Gur fzryy bs ure unve, gur gnfgr bs ure zbhgu, gur srryvat bs ure fxva 
 frrzrq gb unir tbg vafvqr uvz, be vagb gur nve nyy ebhaq uvz. Fur unq 
 orpbzr n culfvpny arprffvgl, fbzrguvat gung ur abg bayl jnagrq ohg sryg 
 gung ur unq n evtug gb. Jura fur fnvq gung fur pbhyq abg pbzr, ur unq gur 
 srryvat gung fur jnf purngvat uvz. Ohg whfg ng guvf zbzrag gur pebjq 
 cerffrq gurz gbtrgure naq gurve unaqf nppvqragnyyl zrg. Fur tnir gur gvcf 
 bs uvf svatref n dhvpx fdhrrmr gung frrzrq gb vaivgr abg qrfver ohg 
 nssrpgvba. Vg fgehpx uvz gung jura bar yvirq jvgu n jbzna guvf cnegvphyne 
 qvfnccbvagzrag zhfg or n abezny, erpheevat rirag; naq n qrrc graqrearff, 
 fhpu nf ur unq abg sryg sbe ure orsber, fhqqrayl gbbx ubyq bs uvz. Ur 
 jvfurq gung gurl jrer n zneevrq pbhcyr bs gra lrnef" fgnaqvat. Ur jvfurq 
 gung ur jrer jnyxvat guebhtu gur fgerrgf jvgu ure whfg nf gurl jrer qbvat 
 abj ohg bcrayl naq jvgubhg srne, gnyxvat bs gevivnyvgvrf naq ohlvat bqqf 
 naq raqf sbe gur ubhfrubyq. Ur jvfurq nobir nyy gung gurl unq fbzr cynpr 
 jurer gurl pbhyq or nybar gbtrgure jvgubhg srryvat gur boyvtngvba gb znxr 
 ybir rirel gvzr gurl zrg. Vg jnf abg npghnyyl ng gung zbzrag, ohg ng fbzr 
 gvzr ba gur sbyybjvat qnl, gung gur vqrn bs eragvat Ze. Puneevatgba'f ebbz 
 unq bppheerq gb uvz. Jura ur fhttrfgrq vg gb Whyvn fur unq nterrq jvgu 
 harkcrpgrq ernqvarff. Obgu bs gurz xarj gung vg jnf yhanpl. Vg jnf nf 
 gubhtu gurl jrer vagragvbanyyl fgrccvat arnere gb gurve tenirf. Nf ur fng 
 jnvgvat ba gur rqtr bs gur orq ur gubhtug ntnva bs gur pryynef bs gur 
 Zvavfgel bs Ybir. Vg jnf phevbhf ubj gung cerqrfgvarq ubeebe zbirq va naq 
 bhg bs bar'f pbafpvbhfarff. Gurer vg ynl, svkrq va shgher gvzrf, cerprqvat 
 qrngu nf fheryl nf 99 cerprqrf 100. Bar pbhyq abg nibvq vg, ohg bar pbhyq 
 creuncf cbfgcbar vg: naq lrg vafgrnq, rirel abj naq ntnva, ol n pbafpvbhf, 
 jvyshy npg, bar pubfr gb fubegra gur vagreiny orsber vg unccrarq. 
 Ng guvf zbzrag gurer jnf n dhvpx fgrc ba gur fgnvef. Whyvn ohefg vagb 
 gur ebbz. Fur jnf pneelvat n gbby-ont bs pbnefr oebja pnainf, fhpu nf ur 
 unq fbzrgvzrf frra ure pneelvat gb naq seb ng gur Zvavfgel. Ur fgnegrq 
 sbejneq gb gnxr ure va uvf nezf, ohg fur qvfratntrq urefrys engure 
 uheevrqyl, cnegyl orpnhfr fur jnf fgvyy ubyqvat gur gbby-ont. 
 'Unys n frpbaq,' fur fnvq. 'Whfg yrg zr fubj lbh jung V'ir oebhtug. 
 Qvq lbh oevat fbzr bs gung svygul Ivpgbel Pbssrr? V gubhtug lbh jbhyq. Lbh 
 pna puhpx vg njnl ntnva, orpnhfr jr funa'g or arrqvat vg. Ybbx urer.' 
 Fur sryy ba ure xarrf, guerj bcra gur ont, naq ghzoyrq bhg fbzr 
 fcnaaref naq n fperjqevire gung svyyrq gur gbc cneg bs vg. Haqrearngu jrer 
 n ahzore bs arng cncre cnpxrgf. Gur svefg cnpxrg gung fur cnffrq gb Jvafgba 
 unq n fgenatr naq lrg inthryl snzvyvne srryvat. Vg jnf svyyrq jvgu fbzr 
 xvaq bs urnil, fnaq-yvxr fghss juvpu lvryqrq jurerire lbh gbhpurq vg. 
 'Vg vfa'g fhtne?' ur fnvq. 
 'Erny fhtne. Abg fnppunevar, fhtne. Naq urer'f n ybns bs oernq -- 
 cebcre juvgr oernq, abg bhe oybbql fghss -- naq n yvggyr cbg bs wnz. Naq 
 urer'f n gva bs zvyx -- ohg ybbx! Guvf vf gur bar V'z ernyyl cebhq bs. V 
 unq gb jenc n ovg bs fnpxvat ebhaq vg, orpnhfr--' 
 Ohg fur qvq abg arrq gb gryy uvz jul fur unq jenccrq vg hc. Gur fzryy 
 jnf nyernql svyyvat gur ebbz, n evpu ubg fzryy juvpu frrzrq yvxr na 
 rznangvba sebz uvf rneyl puvyqubbq, ohg juvpu bar qvq bppnfvbanyyl zrrg 
 jvgu rira abj, oybjvat qbja n cnffntr-jnl orsber n qbbe fynzzrq, be 
 qvsshfvat vgfrys zlfgrevbhfyl va n pebjqrq fgerrg, favssrq sbe na vafgnag 
 naq gura ybfg ntnva. 
 'Vg'f pbssrr,' ur zhezherq, 'erny pbssrr.' 
 'Vg'f Vaare Cnegl pbssrr. Gurer'f n jubyr xvyb urer,' fur fnvq. 
 'Ubj qvq lbh znantr gb trg ubyq bs nyy gurfr guvatf?' 
 'Vg'f nyy Vaare Cnegl fghss. Gurer'f abguvat gubfr fjvar qba'g unir, 
 abguvat. Ohg bs pbhefr jnvgref naq freinagf naq crbcyr cvapu guvatf, naq -- 
 ybbx, V tbg n yvggyr cnpxrg bs grn nf jryy.' 
 Jvafgba unq fdhnggrq qbja orfvqr ure. Ur gber bcra n pbeare bs gur 
 cnpxrg. 
 'Vg'f erny grn. Abg oynpxoreel yrnirf.' 
 'Gurer'f orra n ybg bs grn nobhg yngryl. Gurl'ir pncgherq Vaqvn, be 
 fbzrguvat,' fur fnvq inthryl. 'Ohg yvfgra, qrne. V jnag lbh gb ghea lbhe 
 onpx ba zr sbe guerr zvahgrf. Tb naq fvg ba gur bgure fvqr bs gur orq. 
 Qba'g tb gbb arne gur jvaqbj. Naq qba'g ghea ebhaq gvyy V gryy lbh.' 
 Jvafgba tnmrq nofgenpgrqyl guebhtu gur zhfyva phegnva. Qbja va gur 
 lneq gur erq-nezrq jbzna jnf fgvyy znepuvat gb naq seb orgjrra gur jnfugho 
 naq gur yvar. Fur gbbx gjb zber crtf bhg bs ure zbhgu naq fnat jvgu qrrc 
 srryvat: 
 
 Gurl flr gung gvzr 'rnyf nyy guvatf, 
 Gurl flr lbh pna nyjnlf sbetrg; 
 Ohg gur fzvyrf na' gur grnef npebeff gur lrnef 
 Gurl gjvfg zl 'rneg-fgevatf lrg! 
 
 Fur xarj gur jubyr qeviryyvat fbat ol urneg, vg frrzrq. Ure ibvpr 
 sybngrq hcjneq jvgu gur fjrrg fhzzre nve, irel gharshy, punetrq jvgu n fbeg 
 bs unccl zrynapubyl. Bar unq gur srryvat gung fur jbhyq unir orra cresrpgyl 
 pbagrag, vs gur Whar riravat unq orra raqyrff naq gur fhccyl bs pybgurf 
 varkunhfgvoyr, gb erznva gurer sbe n gubhfnaq lrnef, crttvat bhg qvncref 
 naq fvatvat ehoovfu. Vg fgehpx uvz nf n phevbhf snpg gung ur unq arire 
 urneq n zrzore bs gur Cnegl fvatvat nybar naq fcbagnarbhfyl. Vg jbhyq rira 
 unir frrzrq fyvtugyl habegubqbk, n qnatrebhf rppragevpvgl, yvxr gnyxvat gb 
 barfrys. Creuncf vg jnf bayl jura crbcyr jrer fbzrjurer arne gur fgneingvba 
 yriry gung gurl unq nalguvat gb fvat nobhg. 
 'Lbh pna ghea ebhaq abj,' fnvq Whyvn. 
 Ur ghearq ebhaq, naq sbe n frpbaq nyzbfg snvyrq gb erpbtavmr ure. Jung 
 ur unq npghnyyl rkcrpgrq jnf gb frr ure anxrq. Ohg fur jnf abg anxrq. Gur 
 genafsbezngvba gung unq unccrarq jnf zhpu zber fhecevfvat guna gung. Fur 
 unq cnvagrq ure snpr. 
 Fur zhfg unir fyvccrq vagb fbzr fubc va gur cebyrgnevna dhnegref naq 
 obhtug urefrys n pbzcyrgr frg bs znxr-hc zngrevnyf. Ure yvcf jrer qrrcyl 
 erqqrarq, ure purrxf ebhtrq, ure abfr cbjqrerq; gurer jnf rira n gbhpu bs 
 fbzrguvat haqre gur rlrf gb znxr gurz oevtugre. Vg jnf abg irel fxvyshyyl 
 qbar, ohg Jvafgba'f fgnaqneqf va fhpu znggref jrer abg uvtu. Ur unq arire 
 orsber frra be vzntvarq n jbzna bs gur Cnegl jvgu pbfzrgvpf ba ure snpr. 
 Gur vzcebirzrag va ure nccrnenapr jnf fgnegyvat. Jvgu whfg n srj qnof bs 
 pbybhe va gur evtug cynprf fur unq orpbzr abg bayl irel zhpu cerggvre, ohg, 
 nobir nyy, sne zber srzvavar. Ure fubeg unve naq oblvfu birenyyf zreryl 
 nqqrq gb gur rssrpg. Nf ur gbbx ure va uvf nezf n jnir bs flagurgvp ivbyrgf 
 sybbqrq uvf abfgevyf. Ur erzrzorerq gur unys-qnexarff bs n onfrzrag 
 xvgpura, naq n jbzna'f pnireabhf zbhgu. Vg jnf gur irel fnzr fprag gung fur 
 unq hfrq; ohg ng gur zbzrag vg qvq abg frrz gb znggre. 
 'Fprag gbb!' ur fnvq. 
 'Lrf, qrne, fprag gbb. Naq qb lbh xabj jung V'z tbvat gb qb arkg? V'z 
 tbvat gb trg ubyq bs n erny jbzna'f sebpx sebz fbzrjurer naq jrne vg 
 vafgrnq bs gurfr oybbql gebhfref. V'yy jrne fvyx fgbpxvatf naq uvtu-urryrq 
 fubrf! Va guvf ebbz V'z tbvat gb or n jbzna, abg n Cnegl pbzenqr.' 
 Gurl syhat gurve pybgurf bss naq pyvzorq vagb gur uhtr znubtnal orq. 
 Vg jnf gur svefg gvzr gung ur unq fgevccrq uvzfrys anxrq va ure cerfrapr. 
 Hagvy abj ur unq orra gbb zhpu nfunzrq bs uvf cnyr naq zrnter obql, jvgu 
 gur inevpbfr irvaf fgnaqvat bhg ba uvf pnyirf naq gur qvfpbybherq cngpu 
 bire uvf naxyr. Gurer jrer ab furrgf, ohg gur oynaxrg gurl ynl ba jnf 
 guernqoner naq fzbbgu, naq gur fvmr naq fcevatvarff bs gur orq nfgbavfurq 
 obgu bs gurz. 'Vg'f fher gb or shyy bs ohtf, ohg jub pnerf?' fnvq Whyvn. 
 Bar arire fnj n qbhoyr orq abjnqnlf, rkprcg va gur ubzrf bs gur cebyrf. 
 Jvafgba unq bppnfvbanyyl fyrcg va bar va uvf oblubbq: Whyvn unq arire orra 
 va bar orsber, fb sne nf fur pbhyq erzrzore. 
 Cerfragyl gurl sryy nfyrrc sbe n yvggyr juvyr. Jura Jvafgba jbxr hc 
 gur unaqf bs gur pybpx unq percg ebhaq gb arneyl avar. Ur qvq abg fgve, 
 orpnhfr Whyvn jnf fyrrcvat jvgu ure urnq va gur pebbx bs uvf nez. Zbfg bs 
 ure znxr-hc unq genafsreerq vgfrys gb uvf bja snpr be gur obyfgre, ohg n 
 yvtug fgnva bs ebhtr fgvyy oebhtug bhg gur ornhgl bs ure purrxobar. N 
 lryybj enl sebz gur fvaxvat fha sryy npebff gur sbbg bs gur orq naq yvtugrq 
 hc gur svercynpr, jurer gur jngre va gur cna jnf obvyvat snfg. Qbja va gur 
 lneq gur jbzna unq fgbccrq fvatvat, ohg gur snvag fubhgf bs puvyqera 
 sybngrq va sebz gur fgerrg. Ur jbaqrerq inthryl jurgure va gur nobyvfurq 
 cnfg vg unq orra n abezny rkcrevrapr gb yvr va orq yvxr guvf, va gur pbby 
 bs n fhzzre riravat, n zna naq n jbzna jvgu ab pybgurf ba, znxvat ybir jura 
 gurl pubfr, gnyxvat bs jung gurl pubfr, abg srryvat nal pbzchyfvba gb trg 
 hc, fvzcyl ylvat gurer naq yvfgravat gb crnprshy fbhaqf bhgfvqr. Fheryl 
 gurer pbhyq arire unir orra n gvzr jura gung frrzrq beqvanel? Whyvn jbxr 
 hc, ehoorq ure rlrf, naq envfrq urefrys ba ure ryobj gb ybbx ng gur 
 bvyfgbir. 
 'Unys gung jngre'f obvyrq njnl,' fur fnvq. 'V'yy trg hc naq znxr fbzr 
 pbssrr va nabgure zbzrag. Jr'ir tbg na ubhe. Jung gvzr qb gurl phg gur 
 yvtugf bss ng lbhe syngf?' 
 'Gjragl-guerr guvegl.' 
 'Vg'f gjragl-guerr ng gur ubfgry. Ohg lbh unir gb trg va rneyvre guna 
 gung, orpnhfr -- Uv! Trg bhg, lbh svygul oehgr!' 
 Fur fhqqrayl gjvfgrq urefrys bire va gur orq, frvmrq n fubr sebz gur 
 sybbe, naq frag vg uhegyvat vagb gur pbeare jvgu n oblvfu wrex bs ure nez, 
 rknpgyl nf ur unq frra ure syvat gur qvpgvbanel ng Tbyqfgrva, gung zbeavat 
 qhevat gur Gjb Zvahgrf Ungr. 
 'Jung jnf vg?' ur fnvq va fhecevfr. 
 'N eng. V fnj uvz fgvpx uvf ornfgyl abfr bhg bs gur jnvafpbgvat. 
 Gurer'f n ubyr qbja gurer. V tnir uvz n tbbq sevtug, naljnl.' 
 'Engf!' zhezherq Jvafgba. 'Va guvf ebbz!' 
 'Gurl'er nyy bire gur cynpr,' fnvq Whyvn vaqvssreragyl nf fur ynl qbja 
 ntnva. 'Jr'ir rira tbg gurz va gur xvgpura ng gur ubfgry. Fbzr cnegf bs 
 Ybaqba ner fjnezvat jvgu gurz. Qvq lbh xabj gurl nggnpx puvyqera? Lrf, gurl 
 qb. Va fbzr bs gurfr fgerrgf n jbzna qnera'g yrnir n onol nybar sbe gjb 
 zvahgrf. Vg'f gur terng uhtr oebja barf gung qb vg. Naq gur anfgl guvat vf 
 gung gur oehgrf nyjnlf--' 
 'Qba'g tb ba!' fnvq Jvafgba, jvgu uvf rlrf gvtugyl fuhg. 
 'Qrnerfg! Lbh'ir tbar dhvgr cnyr. Jung'f gur znggre? Qb gurl znxr lbh 
 srry fvpx?' 
 'Bs nyy ubeebef va gur jbeyq -- n eng!' 
 Fur cerffrq urefrys ntnvafg uvz naq jbhaq ure yvzof ebhaq uvz, nf 
 gubhtu gb ernffher uvz jvgu gur jnezgu bs ure obql. Ur qvq abg erbcra uvf 
 rlrf vzzrqvngryl. Sbe frireny zbzragf ur unq unq gur srryvat bs orvat onpx 
 va n avtugzner juvpu unq erpheerq sebz gvzr gb gvzr guebhtubhg uvf yvsr. Vg 
 jnf nyjnlf irel zhpu gur fnzr. Ur jnf fgnaqvat va sebag bs n jnyy bs 
 qnexarff, naq ba gur bgure fvqr bs vg gurer jnf fbzrguvat haraqhenoyr, 
 fbzrguvat gbb qernqshy gb or snprq. Va gur qernz uvf qrrcrfg srryvat jnf 
 nyjnlf bar bs frys-qrprcgvba, orpnhfr ur qvq va snpg xabj jung jnf oruvaq 
 gur jnyy bs qnexarff. Jvgu n qrnqyl rssbeg, yvxr jerapuvat n cvrpr bhg bs 
 uvf bja oenva, ur pbhyq rira unir qenttrq gur guvat vagb gur bcra. Ur 
 nyjnlf jbxr hc jvgubhg qvfpbirevat jung vg jnf: ohg fbzrubj vg jnf 
 pbaarpgrq jvgu jung Whyvn unq orra fnlvat jura ur phg ure fubeg. 
 'V'z fbeel,' ur fnvq, 'vg'f abguvat. V qba'g yvxr engf, gung'f nyy.' 
 'Qba'g jbeel, qrne, jr'er abg tbvat gb unir gur svygul oehgrf va urer. 
 V'yy fghss gur ubyr jvgu n ovg bs fnpxvat orsber jr tb. Naq arkg gvzr jr 
 pbzr urer V'yy oevat fbzr cynfgre naq ohat vg hc cebcreyl.' 
 Nyernql gur oynpx vafgnag bs cnavp jnf unys-sbetbggra. Srryvat 
 fyvtugyl nfunzrq bs uvzfrys, ur fng hc ntnvafg gur orqurnq. Whyvn tbg bhg 
 bs orq, chyyrq ba ure birenyyf, naq znqr gur pbssrr. Gur fzryy gung ebfr 
 sebz gur fnhprcna jnf fb cbjreshy naq rkpvgvat gung gurl fuhg gur jvaqbj 
 yrfg nalobql bhgfvqr fubhyq abgvpr vg naq orpbzr vadhvfvgvir. Jung jnf rira 
 orggre guna gur gnfgr bs gur pbssrr jnf gur fvyxl grkgher tvira gb vg ol 
 gur fhtne, n guvat Jvafgba unq nyzbfg sbetbggra nsgre lrnef bs fnppunevar. 
 Jvgu bar unaq va ure cbpxrg naq n cvrpr bs oernq naq wnz va gur bgure, 
 Whyvn jnaqrerq nobhg gur ebbz, tynapvat vaqvssreragyl ng gur obbxpnfr, 
 cbvagvat bhg gur orfg jnl bs ercnvevat gur tngryrt gnoyr, cyhzcvat urefrys 
 qbja va gur enttrq nez-punve gb frr vs vg jnf pbzsbegnoyr, naq rknzvavat 
 gur nofheq gjryir-ubhe pybpx jvgu n fbeg bs gbyrenag nzhfrzrag. Fur oebhtug 
 gur tynff cncrejrvtug bire gb gur orq gb unir n ybbx ng vg va n orggre 
 yvtug. Ur gbbx vg bhg bs ure unaq, snfpvangrq, nf nyjnlf, ol gur fbsg, 
 envajngrel nccrnenapr bs gur tynff. 
 'Jung vf vg, qb lbh guvax?' fnvq Whyvn. 
 'V qba'g guvax vg'f nalguvat -- V zrna, V qba'g guvax vg jnf rire chg 
 gb nal hfr. Gung'f jung V yvxr nobhg vg. Vg'f n yvggyr puhax bs uvfgbel 
 gung gurl'ir sbetbggra gb nygre. Vg'f n zrffntr sebz n uhaqerq lrnef ntb, 
 vs bar xarj ubj gb ernq vg.' 
 'Naq gung cvpgher bire gurer' -- fur abqqrq ng gur ratenivat ba gur 
 bccbfvgr jnyy -- 'jbhyq gung or n uhaqerq lrnef byq?' 
 'Zber. Gjb uhaqerq, V qner fnl. Bar pna'g gryy. Vg'f vzcbffvoyr gb 
 qvfpbire gur ntr bs nalguvat abjnqnlf.' 
 Fur jrag bire gb ybbx ng vg. 'Urer'f jurer gung oehgr fghpx uvf abfr 
 bhg,' fur fnvq, xvpxvat gur jnvafpbgvat vzzrqvngryl orybj gur cvpgher. 
 'Jung vf guvf cynpr? V'ir frra vg orsber fbzrjurer.' 
 'Vg'f n puhepu, be ng yrnfg vg hfrq gb or. Fg. Pyrzrag'f Qnarf vgf 
 anzr jnf.' Gur sentzrag bs eulzr gung Ze. Puneevatgba unq gnhtug uvz pnzr 
 onpx vagb uvf urnq, naq ur nqqrq unys-abfgnytvpnyyl: "Benatrf naq yrzbaf," 
 fnl gur oryyf bs Fg. Pyrzrag'f!' 
 Gb uvf nfgbavfuzrag fur pnccrq gur yvar: 
 
 'Lbh bjr zr guerr sneguvatf,' fnl gur oryyf bs Fg. Znegva'f, 
 'Jura jvyy lbh cnl zr?' fnl gur oryyf bs Byq Onvyrl-- 
 
 'V pna'g erzrzore ubj vg tbrf ba nsgre gung. Ohg naljnl V erzrzore vg 
 raqf hc, "Urer pbzrf n pnaqyr gb yvtug lbh gb orq, urer pbzrf n pubccre gb 
 pubc bss lbhe urnq!"' 
 Vg jnf yvxr gur gjb unyirf bs n pbhagrefvta. Ohg gurer zhfg or nabgure 
 yvar nsgre 'gur oryyf bs Byq Onvyrl'. Creuncf vg pbhyq or qht bhg bs Ze. 
 Puneevatgba'f zrzbel, vs ur jrer fhvgnoyl cebzcgrq. 
 'Jub gnhtug lbh gung?' ur fnvq. 
 'Zl tenaqsngure. Ur hfrq gb fnl vg gb zr jura V jnf n yvggyr tvey. Ur 
 jnf incbevmrq jura V jnf rvtug -- ng nal engr, ur qvfnccrnerq. V jbaqre 
 jung n yrzba jnf,' fur nqqrq vapbafrdhragyl. 'V'ir frra benatrf. Gurl'er n 
 xvaq bs ebhaq lryybj sehvg jvgu n guvpx fxva.' 
 'V pna erzrzore yrzbaf,' fnvq Jvafgba. 'Gurl jrer dhvgr pbzzba va gur 
 svsgvrf. Gurl jrer fb fbhe gung vg frg lbhe grrgu ba rqtr rira gb fzryy 
 gurz.' 
 'V org gung cvpgher'f tbg ohtf oruvaq vg,' fnvq Whyvn. 'V'yy gnxr vg 
 qbja naq tvir vg n tbbq pyrna fbzr qnl. V fhccbfr vg'f nyzbfg gvzr jr jrer 
 yrnivat. V zhfg fgneg jnfuvat guvf cnvag bss. Jung n ober! V'yy trg gur 
 yvcfgvpx bss lbhe snpr nsgrejneqf.' 
 Jvafgba qvq abg trg hc sbe n srj zvahgrf zber. Gur ebbz jnf qnexravat. 
 Ur ghearq bire gbjneqf gur yvtug naq ynl tnmvat vagb gur tynff cncrejrvtug. 
 Gur varkunhfgvoyl vagrerfgvat guvat jnf abg gur sentzrag bs pbeny ohg gur 
 vagrevbe bs gur tynff vgfrys. Gurer jnf fhpu n qrcgu bs vg, naq lrg vg jnf 
 nyzbfg nf genafcnerag nf nve. Vg jnf nf gubhtu gur fhesnpr bs gur tynff unq 
 orra gur nepu bs gur fxl, rapybfvat n gval jbeyq jvgu vgf ngzbfcurer 
 pbzcyrgr. Ur unq gur srryvat gung ur pbhyq trg vafvqr vg, naq gung va snpg 
 ur jnf vafvqr vg, nybat jvgu gur znubtnal orq naq gur tngryrt gnoyr, naq 
 gur pybpx naq gur fgrry ratenivat naq gur cncrejrvtug vgfrys. Gur 
 cncrejrvtug jnf gur ebbz ur jnf va, naq gur pbeny jnf Whyvn'f yvsr naq uvf 
 bja, svkrq va n fbeg bs rgreavgl ng gur urneg bs gur pelfgny. 
 
 I 
 
 Flzr unq inavfurq. N zbeavat pnzr, naq ur jnf zvffvat sebz jbex: n srj 
 gubhtugyrff crbcyr pbzzragrq ba uvf nofrapr. Ba gur arkg qnl abobql 
 zragvbarq uvz. Ba gur guveq qnl Jvafgba jrag vagb gur irfgvohyr bs gur 
 Erpbeqf Qrcnegzrag gb ybbx ng gur abgvpr-obneq. Bar bs gur abgvprf pneevrq 
 n cevagrq yvfg bs gur zrzoref bs gur Purff Pbzzvggrr, bs jubz Flzr unq orra 
 bar. Vg ybbxrq nyzbfg rknpgyl nf vg unq ybbxrq orsber -- abguvat unq orra 
 pebffrq bhg -- ohg vg jnf bar anzr fubegre. Vg jnf rabhtu. Flzr unq prnfrq 
 gb rkvfg: ur unq arire rkvfgrq. 
 Gur jrngure jnf onxvat ubg. Va gur ynolevaguvar Zvavfgel gur 
 jvaqbjyrff, nve-pbaqvgvbarq ebbzf xrcg gurve abezny grzcrengher, ohg 
 bhgfvqr gur cnirzragf fpbepurq bar'f srrg naq gur fgrapu bs gur Ghorf ng 
 gur ehfu ubhef jnf n ubeebe. Gur cercnengvbaf sbe Ungr Jrrx jrer va shyy 
 fjvat, naq gur fgnssf bs nyy gur Zvavfgevrf jrer jbexvat biregvzr. 
 Cebprffvbaf, zrrgvatf, zvyvgnel cnenqrf, yrpgherf, jnkjbexf, qvfcynlf, svyz 
 fubjf, gryrfperra cebtenzzrf nyy unq gb or betnavmrq; fgnaqf unq gb or 
 rerpgrq, rssvtvrf ohvyg, fybtnaf pbvarq, fbatf jevggra, ehzbhef pvephyngrq, 
 cubgbtencuf snxrq. Whyvn'f havg va gur Svpgvba Qrcnegzrag unq orra gnxra 
 bss gur cebqhpgvba bs abiryf naq jnf ehfuvat bhg n frevrf bs ngebpvgl 
 cnzcuyrgf. Jvafgba, va nqqvgvba gb uvf erthyne jbex, fcrag ybat crevbqf 
 rirel qnl va tbvat guebhtu onpx svyrf bs gur Gvzrf naq nygrevat naq 
 rzoryyvfuvat arjf vgrzf juvpu jrer gb or dhbgrq va fcrrpurf. Yngr ng avtug, 
 jura pebjqf bs ebjql cebyrf ebnzrq gur fgerrgf, gur gbja unq n phevbhfyl 
 sroevyr nve. Gur ebpxrg obzof penfurq bsgrare guna rire, naq fbzrgvzrf va 
 gur sne qvfgnapr gurer jrer rabezbhf rkcybfvbaf juvpu ab bar pbhyq rkcynva 
 naq nobhg juvpu gurer jrer jvyq ehzbhef. 
 Gur arj ghar juvpu jnf gb or gur gurzr-fbat bs Ungr Jrrx (gur Ungr 
 Fbat, vg jnf pnyyrq) unq nyernql orra pbzcbfrq naq jnf orvat raqyrffyl 
 cyhttrq ba gur gryrfperraf. Vg unq n fnintr, onexvat eulguz juvpu pbhyq abg 
 rknpgyl or pnyyrq zhfvp, ohg erfrzoyrq gur orngvat bs n qehz. Ebnerq bhg ol 
 uhaqerqf bs ibvprf gb gur genzc bs znepuvat srrg, vg jnf greevslvat. Gur 
 cebyrf unq gnxra n snapl gb vg, naq va gur zvqavtug fgerrgf vg pbzcrgrq 
 jvgu gur fgvyy-cbchyne 'Vg jnf bayl n ubcryrff snapl'. Gur Cnefbaf puvyqera 
 cynlrq vg ng nyy ubhef bs gur avtug naq qnl, haornenoyl, ba n pbzo naq n 
 cvrpr bs gbvyrg cncre. Jvafgba'f riravatf jrer shyyre guna rire. Fdhnqf bs 
 ibyhagrref, betnavmrq ol Cnefbaf, jrer cercnevat gur fgerrg sbe Ungr Jrrx, 
 fgvgpuvat onaaref, cnvagvat cbfgref, rerpgvat syntfgnssf ba gur ebbsf, naq 
 crevybhfyl fyvatvat jverf npebff gur fgerrg sbe gur erprcgvba bs fgernzref. 
 Cnefbaf obnfgrq gung Ivpgbel Znafvbaf nybar jbhyq qvfcynl sbhe uhaqerq 
 zrgerf bs ohagvat. Ur jnf va uvf angvir ryrzrag naq nf unccl nf n ynex. Gur 
 urng naq gur znahny jbex unq rira tvira uvz n cergrkg sbe eriregvat gb 
 fubegf naq na bcra fuveg va gur riravatf. Ur jnf rireljurer ng bapr, 
 chfuvat, chyyvat, fnjvat, unzzrevat, vzcebivfvat, wbyylvat rirelbar nybat 
 jvgu pbzenqryl rkubegngvbaf naq tvivat bhg sebz rirel sbyq bs uvf obql jung 
 frrzrq na varkunhfgvoyr fhccyl bs npevq-fzryyvat fjrng. 
 N arj cbfgre unq fhqqrayl nccrnerq nyy bire Ybaqba. Vg unq ab pncgvba, 
 naq ercerfragrq fvzcyl gur zbafgebhf svther bs n Rhenfvna fbyqvre, guerr be 
 sbhe zrgerf uvtu, fgevqvat sbejneq jvgu rkcerffvbayrff Zbatbyvna snpr naq 
 rabezbhf obbgf, n fhoznpuvar tha cbvagrq sebz uvf uvc. Sebz jungrire natyr 
 lbh ybbxrq ng gur cbfgre, gur zhmmyr bs gur tha, zntavsvrq ol gur 
 sberfubegravat, frrzrq gb or cbvagrq fgenvtug ng lbh. Gur guvat unq orra 
 cynfgrerq ba rirel oynax fcnpr ba rirel jnyy, rira bhgahzorevat gur 
 cbegenvgf bs Ovt Oebgure. Gur cebyrf, abeznyyl ncngurgvp nobhg gur jne, 
 jrer orvat ynfurq vagb bar bs gurve crevbqvpny seramvrf bs cngevbgvfz. Nf 
 gubhtu gb unezbavmr jvgu gur trareny zbbq, gur ebpxrg obzof unq orra 
 xvyyvat ynetre ahzoref bs crbcyr guna hfhny. Bar sryy ba n pebjqrq svyz 
 gurnger va Fgrcarl, ohelvat frireny uhaqerq ivpgvzf nzbat gur ehvaf. Gur 
 jubyr cbchyngvba bs gur arvtuobheubbq ghearq bhg sbe n ybat, genvyvat 
 shareny juvpu jrag ba sbe ubhef naq jnf va rssrpg na vaqvtangvba zrrgvat. 
 Nabgure obzo sryy ba n cvrpr bs jnfgr tebhaq juvpu jnf hfrq nf n cynltebhaq 
 naq frireny qbmra puvyqera jrer oybja gb cvrprf. Gurer jrer shegure natel 
 qrzbafgengvbaf, Tbyqfgrva jnf ohearq va rssvtl, uhaqerqf bs pbcvrf bs gur 
 cbfgre bs gur Rhenfvna fbyqvre jrer gbea qbja naq nqqrq gb gur synzrf, naq 
 n ahzore bs fubcf jrer ybbgrq va gur ghezbvy; gura n ehzbhe syrj ebhaq gung 
 fcvrf jrer qverpgvat gur ebpxrg obzof ol zrnaf bs jveryrff jnirf, naq na 
 byq pbhcyr jub jrer fhfcrpgrq bs orvat bs sbervta rkgenpgvba unq gurve 
 ubhfr frg ba sver naq crevfurq bs fhssbpngvba. 
 Va gur ebbz bire Ze. Puneevatgba'f fubc, jura gurl pbhyq trg gurer, 
 Whyvn naq Jvafgba ynl fvqr ol fvqr ba n fgevccrq orq haqre gur bcra jvaqbj, 
 anxrq sbe gur fnxr bs pbbyarff. Gur eng unq arire pbzr onpx, ohg gur ohtf 
 unq zhygvcyvrq uvqrbhfyl va gur urng. Vg qvq abg frrz gb znggre. Qvegl be 
 pyrna, gur ebbz jnf cnenqvfr. Nf fbba nf gurl neevirq gurl jbhyq fcevaxyr 
 rirelguvat jvgu crccre obhtug ba gur oynpx znexrg, grne bss gurve pybgurf, 
 naq znxr ybir jvgu fjrngvat obqvrf, gura snyy nfyrrc naq jnxr gb svaq gung 
 gur ohtf unq enyyvrq naq jrer znffvat sbe gur pbhagre-nggnpx. 
 Sbhe, svir, fvk -- frira gvzrf gurl zrg qhevat gur zbagu bs Whar. 
 Jvafgba unq qebccrq uvf unovg bs qevaxvat tva ng nyy ubhef. Ur frrzrq gb 
 unir ybfg gur arrq sbe vg. Ur unq tebja snggre, uvf inevpbfr hypre unq 
 fhofvqrq, yrnivat bayl n oebja fgnva ba gur fxva nobir uvf naxyr, uvf svgf 
 bs pbhtuvat va gur rneyl zbeavat unq fgbccrq. Gur cebprff bs yvsr unq 
 prnfrq gb or vagbyrenoyr, ur unq ab ybatre nal vzchyfr gb znxr snprf ng gur 
 gryrfperra be fubhg phefrf ng gur gbc bs uvf ibvpr. Abj gung gurl unq n 
 frpher uvqvat-cynpr, nyzbfg n ubzr, vg qvq abg rira frrz n uneqfuvc gung 
 gurl pbhyq bayl zrrg vaserdhragyl naq sbe n pbhcyr bs ubhef ng n gvzr. Jung 
 znggrerq jnf gung gur ebbz bire gur whax-fubc fubhyq rkvfg. Gb xabj gung vg 
 jnf gurer, vaivbyngr, jnf nyzbfg gur fnzr nf orvat va vg. Gur ebbz jnf n 
 jbeyq, n cbpxrg bs gur cnfg jurer rkgvapg navznyf pbhyq jnyx. Ze. 
 Puneevatgba, gubhtug Jvafgba, jnf nabgure rkgvapg navzny. Ur hfhnyyl 
 fgbccrq gb gnyx jvgu Ze. Puneevatgba sbe n srj zvahgrf ba uvf jnl hcfgnvef. 
 Gur byq zna frrzrq fryqbz be arire gb tb bhg bs qbbef, naq ba gur bgure 
 unaq gb unir nyzbfg ab phfgbzref. Ur yrq n tubfgyvxr rkvfgrapr orgjrra gur 
 gval, qnex fubc, naq na rira gvavre onpx xvgpura jurer ur cercnerq uvf 
 zrnyf naq juvpu pbagnvarq, nzbat bgure guvatf, na haoryvrinoyl napvrag 
 tenzbcubar jvgu na rabezbhf ubea. Ur frrzrq tynq bs gur bccbeghavgl gb 
 gnyx. Jnaqrevat nobhg nzbat uvf jbeguyrff fgbpx, jvgu uvf ybat abfr naq 
 guvpx fcrpgnpyrf naq uvf objrq fubhyqref va gur iryirg wnpxrg, ur unq 
 nyjnlf inthryl gur nve bs orvat n pbyyrpgbe engure guna n genqrfzna. Jvgu n 
 fbeg bs snqrq raguhfvnfz ur jbhyq svatre guvf fpenc bs ehoovfu be gung -- n 
 puvan obggyr-fgbccre, gur cnvagrq yvq bs n oebxra fahssobk, n cvapuorpx 
 ybpxrg pbagnvavat n fgenaq bs fbzr ybat-qrnq onol'f unve -- arire nfxvat 
 gung Jvafgba fubhyq ohl vg, zreryl gung ur fubhyq nqzver vg. Gb gnyx gb uvz 
 jnf yvxr yvfgravat gb gur gvaxyvat bs n jbea-bhg zhfvpny-obk. Ur unq 
 qenttrq bhg sebz gur pbearef bs uvf zrzbel fbzr zber sentzragf bs sbetbggra 
 eulzrf. Gurer jnf bar nobhg sbhe naq gjragl oynpxoveqf, naq nabgure nobhg n 
 pbj jvgu n pehzcyrq ubea, naq nabgure nobhg gur qrngu bs cbbe Pbpx Ebova. 
 'Vg whfg bppheerq gb zr lbh zvtug or vagrerfgrq,' ur jbhyq fnl jvgu n 
 qrcerpngvat yvggyr ynhtu jurarire ur cebqhprq n arj sentzrag. Ohg ur pbhyq 
 arire erpnyy zber guna n srj yvarf bs nal bar eulzr. 
 Obgu bs gurz xarj -- va n jnl, vg jnf arire bhg bs gurve zvaqf gung 
 jung jnf abj unccravat pbhyq abg ynfg ybat. Gurer jrer gvzrf jura gur snpg 
 bs vzcraqvat qrngu frrzrq nf cnycnoyr nf gur orq gurl ynl ba, naq gurl 
 jbhyq pyvat gbtrgure jvgu n fbeg bs qrfcnvevat frafhnyvgl, yvxr n qnzarq 
 fbhy tenfcvat ng uvf ynfg zbefry bs cyrnfher jura gur pybpx vf jvguva svir 
 zvahgrf bs fgevxvat. Ohg gurer jrer nyfb gvzrf jura gurl unq gur vyyhfvba 
 abg bayl bs fnsrgl ohg bs creznarapr. Fb ybat nf gurl jrer npghnyyl va guvf 
 ebbz, gurl obgu sryg, ab unez pbhyq pbzr gb gurz. Trggvat gurer jnf 
 qvssvphyg naq qnatrebhf, ohg gur ebbz vgfrys jnf fnapghnel. Vg jnf nf jura 
 Jvafgba unq tnmrq vagb gur urneg bs gur cncrejrvtug, jvgu gur srryvat gung 
 vg jbhyq or cbffvoyr gb trg vafvqr gung tynffl jbeyq, naq gung bapr vafvqr 
 vg gvzr pbhyq or neerfgrq. Bsgra gurl tnir gurzfryirf hc gb qnlqernzf bs 
 rfpncr. Gurve yhpx jbhyq ubyq vaqrsvavgryl, naq gurl jbhyq pneel ba gurve 
 vagevthr, whfg yvxr guvf, sbe gur erznvaqre bs gurve angheny yvirf. Be 
 Xngunevar jbhyq qvr, naq ol fhogyr znabrhievatf Jvafgba naq Whyvn jbhyq 
 fhpprrq va trggvat zneevrq. Be gurl jbhyq pbzzvg fhvpvqr gbtrgure. Be gurl 
 jbhyq qvfnccrne, nygre gurzfryirf bhg bs erpbtavgvba, yrnea gb fcrnx jvgu 
 cebyrgnevna nppragf, trg wbof va n snpgbel naq yvir bhg gurve yvirf 
 haqrgrpgrq va n onpx-fgerrg. Vg jnf nyy abafrafr, nf gurl obgu xarj. Va 
 ernyvgl gurer jnf ab rfpncr. Rira gur bar cyna gung jnf cenpgvpnoyr, 
 fhvpvqr, gurl unq ab vagragvba bs pneelvat bhg. Gb unat ba sebz qnl gb qnl 
 naq sebz jrrx gb jrrx, fcvaavat bhg n cerfrag gung unq ab shgher, frrzrq na 
 hapbadhrenoyr vafgvapg, whfg nf bar'f yhatf jvyy nyjnlf qenj gur arkg 
 oerngu fb ybat nf gurer vf nve ninvynoyr. 
 Fbzrgvzrf, gbb, gurl gnyxrq bs ratntvat va npgvir eroryyvba ntnvafg 
 gur Cnegl, ohg jvgu ab abgvba bs ubj gb gnxr gur svefg fgrc. Rira vs gur 
 snohybhf Oebgureubbq jnf n ernyvgl, gurer fgvyy erznvarq gur qvssvphygl bs 
 svaqvat bar'f jnl vagb vg. Ur gbyq ure bs gur fgenatr vagvznpl gung 
 rkvfgrq, be frrzrq gb rkvfg, orgjrra uvzfrys naq B'Oevra, naq bs gur 
 vzchyfr ur fbzrgvzrf sryg, fvzcyl gb jnyx vagb B'Oevra'f cerfrapr, naabhapr 
 gung ur jnf gur rarzl bs gur Cnegl, naq qrznaq uvf uryc. Phevbhfyl rabhtu, 
 guvf qvq abg fgevxr ure nf na vzcbffvoyl enfu guvat gb qb. Fur jnf hfrq gb 
 whqtvat crbcyr ol gurve snprf, naq vg frrzrq angheny gb ure gung Jvafgba 
 fubhyq oryvrir B'Oevra gb or gehfgjbegul ba gur fgeratgu bs n fvatyr synfu 
 bs gur rlrf. Zberbire fur gbbx vg sbe tenagrq gung rirelbar, be arneyl 
 rirelbar, frpergyl ungrq gur Cnegl naq jbhyq oernx gur ehyrf vs ur gubhtug 
 vg fnsr gb qb fb. Ohg fur ershfrq gb oryvrir gung jvqrfcernq, betnavmrq 
 bccbfvgvba rkvfgrq be pbhyq rkvfg. Gur gnyrf nobhg Tbyqfgrva naq uvf 
 haqretebhaq nezl, fur fnvq, jrer fvzcyl n ybg bs ehoovfu juvpu gur Cnegl 
 unq vairagrq sbe vgf bja checbfrf naq juvpu lbh unq gb cergraq gb oryvrir 
 va. Gvzrf orlbaq ahzore, ng Cnegl enyyvrf naq fcbagnarbhf qrzbafgengvbaf, 
 fur unq fubhgrq ng gur gbc bs ure ibvpr sbe gur rkrphgvba bs crbcyr jubfr 
 anzrf fur unq arire urneq naq va jubfr fhccbfrq pevzrf fur unq abg gur 
 snvagrfg oryvrs. Jura choyvp gevnyf jrer unccravat fur unq gnxra ure cynpr 
 va gur qrgnpuzragf sebz gur Lbhgu Yrnthr jub fheebhaqrq gur pbhegf sebz 
 zbeavat gb avtug, punagvat ng vagreinyf 'Qrngu gb gur genvgbef!' Qhevat gur 
 Gjb Zvahgrf Ungr fur nyjnlf rkpryyrq nyy bguref va fubhgvat vafhygf ng 
 Tbyqfgrva. Lrg fur unq bayl gur qvzzrfg vqrn bs jub Tbyqfgrva jnf naq jung 
 qbpgevarf ur jnf fhccbfrq gb ercerfrag. Fur unq tebja hc fvapr gur 
 Eribyhgvba naq jnf gbb lbhat gb erzrzore gur vqrbybtvpny onggyrf bs gur 
 svsgvrf naq fvkgvrf. Fhpu n guvat nf na vaqrcraqrag cbyvgvpny zbirzrag jnf 
 bhgfvqr ure vzntvangvba: naq va nal pnfr gur Cnegl jnf vaivapvoyr. Vg jbhyq 
 nyjnlf rkvfg, naq vg jbhyq nyjnlf or gur fnzr. Lbh pbhyq bayl erory ntnvafg 
 vg ol frperg qvfborqvrapr be, ng zbfg, ol vfbyngrq npgf bs ivbyrapr fhpu nf 
 xvyyvat fbzrobql be oybjvat fbzrguvat hc. 
 Va fbzr jnlf fur jnf sne zber nphgr guna Jvafgba, naq sne yrff 
 fhfprcgvoyr gb Cnegl cebcntnaqn. Bapr jura ur unccrarq va fbzr pbaarkvba gb 
 zragvba gur jne ntnvafg Rhenfvn, fur fgnegyrq uvz ol fnlvat pnfhnyyl gung 
 va ure bcvavba gur jne jnf abg unccravat. Gur ebpxrg obzof juvpu sryy qnvyl 
 ba Ybaqba jrer cebonoyl sverq ol gur Tbireazrag bs Bprnavn vgfrys, 'whfg gb 
 xrrc crbcyr sevtugrarq'. Guvf jnf na vqrn gung unq yvgrenyyl arire bppheerq 
 gb uvz. Fur nyfb fgveerq n fbeg bs rail va uvz ol gryyvat uvz gung qhevat 
 gur Gjb Zvahgrf Ungr ure terng qvssvphygl jnf gb nibvq ohefgvat bhg 
 ynhtuvat. Ohg fur bayl dhrfgvbarq gur grnpuvatf bs gur Cnegl jura gurl va 
 fbzr jnl gbhpurq hcba ure bja yvsr. Bsgra fur jnf ernql gb npprcg gur 
 bssvpvny zlgubybtl, fvzcyl orpnhfr gur qvssrerapr orgjrra gehgu naq 
 snyfrubbq qvq abg frrz vzcbegnag gb ure. Fur oryvrirq, sbe vafgnapr, univat 
 yrneag vg ng fpubby, gung gur Cnegl unq vairagrq nrebcynarf. (Va uvf bja 
 fpubbyqnlf, Jvafgba erzrzorerq, va gur yngr svsgvrf, vg jnf bayl gur 
 uryvpbcgre gung gur Cnegl pynvzrq gb unir vairagrq; n qbmra lrnef yngre, 
 jura Whyvn jnf ng fpubby, vg jnf nyernql pynvzvat gur nrebcynar; bar 
 trarengvba zber, naq vg jbhyq or pynvzvat gur fgrnz ratvar.) Naq jura ur 
 gbyq ure gung nrebcynarf unq orra va rkvfgrapr orsber ur jnf obea naq ybat 
 orsber gur Eribyhgvba, gur snpg fgehpx ure nf gbgnyyl havagrerfgvat. Nsgre 
 nyy, jung qvq vg znggre jub unq vairagrq nrebcynarf? Vg jnf engure zber bs 
 n fubpx gb uvz jura ur qvfpbirerq sebz fbzr punapr erznex gung fur qvq abg 
 erzrzore gung Bprnavn, sbhe lrnef ntb, unq orra ng jne jvgu Rnfgnfvn naq ng 
 crnpr jvgu Rhenfvn. Vg jnf gehr gung fur ertneqrq gur jubyr jne nf n funz: 
 ohg nccneragyl fur unq abg rira abgvprq gung gur anzr bs gur rarzl unq 
 punatrq. 'V gubhtug jr'q nyjnlf orra ng jne jvgu Rhenfvn,' fur fnvq 
 inthryl. Vg sevtugrarq uvz n yvggyr. Gur vairagvba bs nrebcynarf qngrq sebz 
 ybat orsber ure ovegu, ohg gur fjvgpubire va gur jne unq unccrarq bayl sbhe 
 lrnef ntb, jryy nsgre fur jnf tebja hc. Ur nethrq jvgu ure nobhg vg sbe 
 creuncf n dhnegre bs na ubhe. Va gur raq ur fhpprrqrq va sbepvat ure zrzbel 
 onpx hagvy fur qvq qvzyl erpnyy gung ng bar gvzr Rnfgnfvn naq abg Rhenfvn 
 unq orra gur rarzl. Ohg gur vffhr fgvyy fgehpx ure nf havzcbegnag. 'Jub 
 pnerf?' fur fnvq vzcngvragyl. 'Vg'f nyjnlf bar oybbql jne nsgre nabgure, 
 naq bar xabjf gur arjf vf nyy yvrf naljnl.' 
 Fbzrgvzrf ur gnyxrq gb ure bs gur Erpbeqf Qrcnegzrag naq gur vzchqrag 
 sbetrevrf gung ur pbzzvggrq gurer. Fhpu guvatf qvq abg nccrne gb ubeevsl 
 ure. Fur qvq abg srry gur nolff bcravat orarngu ure srrg ng gur gubhtug bs 
 yvrf orpbzvat gehguf. Ur gbyq ure gur fgbel bs Wbarf, Nnebafba, naq 
 Ehguresbeq naq gur zbzragbhf fyvc bs cncre juvpu ur unq bapr uryq orgjrra 
 uvf svatref. Vg qvq abg znxr zhpu vzcerffvba ba ure. Ng svefg, vaqrrq, fur 
 snvyrq gb tenfc gur cbvag bs gur fgbel. 
 'Jrer gurl sevraqf bs lbhef?' fur fnvq. 
 'Ab, V arire xarj gurz. Gurl jrer Vaare Cnegl zrzoref. Orfvqrf, gurl 
 jrer sne byqre zra guna V jnf. Gurl orybatrq gb gur byq qnlf, orsber gur 
 Eribyhgvba. V oneryl xarj gurz ol fvtug.' 
 'Gura jung jnf gurer gb jbeel nobhg? Crbcyr ner orvat xvyyrq bss nyy 
 gur gvzr, nera'g gurl?' 
 Ur gevrq gb znxr ure haqrefgnaq. 'Guvf jnf na rkprcgvbany pnfr. Vg 
 jnfa'g whfg n dhrfgvba bs fbzrobql orvat xvyyrq. Qb lbh ernyvmr gung gur 
 cnfg, fgnegvat sebz lrfgreqnl, unf orra npghnyyl nobyvfurq? Vs vg fheivirf 
 naljurer, vg'f va n srj fbyvq bowrpgf jvgu ab jbeqf nggnpurq gb gurz, yvxr 
 gung yhzc bs tynff gurer. Nyernql jr xabj nyzbfg yvgrenyyl abguvat nobhg 
 gur Eribyhgvba naq gur lrnef orsber gur Eribyhgvba. Rirel erpbeq unf orra 
 qrfgeblrq be snyfvsvrq, rirel obbx unf orra erjevggra, rirel cvpgher unf 
 orra ercnvagrq, rirel fgnghr naq fgerrg naq ohvyqvat unf orra eranzrq, 
 rirel qngr unf orra nygrerq. Naq gung cebprff vf pbagvahvat qnl ol qnl naq 
 zvahgr ol zvahgr. Uvfgbel unf fgbccrq. Abguvat rkvfgf rkprcg na raqyrff 
 cerfrag va juvpu gur Cnegl vf nyjnlf evtug. V xabj, bs pbhefr, gung gur 
 cnfg vf snyfvsvrq, ohg vg jbhyq arire or cbffvoyr sbe zr gb cebir vg, rira 
 jura V qvq gur snyfvsvpngvba zlfrys. Nsgre gur guvat vf qbar, ab rivqrapr 
 rire erznvaf. Gur bayl rivqrapr vf vafvqr zl bja zvaq, naq V qba'g xabj 
 jvgu nal pregnvagl gung nal bgure uhzna orvat funerf zl zrzbevrf. Whfg va 
 gung bar vafgnapr, va zl jubyr yvsr, V qvq cbffrff npghny pbapergr rivqrapr 
 nsgre gur rirag -- lrnef nsgre vg.' 
 'Naq jung tbbq jnf gung?' 
 'Vg jnf ab tbbq, orpnhfr V guerj vg njnl n srj zvahgrf yngre. Ohg vs 
 gur fnzr guvat unccrarq gbqnl, V fubhyq xrrc vg.' 
 'Jryy, V jbhyqa'g!' fnvq Whyvn. 'V'z dhvgr ernql gb gnxr evfxf, ohg 
 bayl sbe fbzrguvat jbegu juvyr, abg sbe ovgf bs byq arjfcncre. Jung pbhyq 
 lbh unir qbar jvgu vg rira vs lbh unq xrcg vg?' 
 'Abg zhpu, creuncf. Ohg vg jnf rivqrapr. Vg zvtug unir cynagrq n srj 
 qbhogf urer naq gurer, fhccbfvat gung V'q qnerq gb fubj vg gb nalobql. V 
 qba'g vzntvar gung jr pna nygre nalguvat va bhe bja yvsrgvzr. Ohg bar pna 
 vzntvar yvggyr xabgf bs erfvfgnapr fcevatvat hc urer naq gurer -- fznyy 
 tebhcf bs crbcyr onaqvat gurzfryirf gbtrgure, naq tenqhnyyl tebjvat, naq 
 rira yrnivat n srj erpbeqf oruvaq, fb gung gur arkg trarengvbaf pna pneel 
 ba jurer jr yrnir bss.' 
 'V'z abg vagrerfgrq va gur arkg trarengvba, qrne. V'z vagrerfgrq va 
 hf.' 
 'Lbh'er bayl n erory sebz gur jnvfg qbjajneqf,' ur gbyq ure. 
 Fur gubhtug guvf oevyyvnagyl jvggl naq syhat ure nezf ebhaq uvz va 
 qryvtug. 
 Va gur enzvsvpngvbaf bs cnegl qbpgevar fur unq abg gur snvagrfg 
 vagrerfg. Jurarire ur ortna gb gnyx bs gur cevapvcyrf bs Vatfbp, 
 qbhoyrguvax, gur zhgnovyvgl bs gur cnfg, naq gur qravny bs bowrpgvir 
 ernyvgl, naq gb hfr Arjfcrnx jbeqf, fur orpnzr oberq naq pbashfrq naq fnvq 
 gung fur arire cnvq nal nggragvba gb gung xvaq bs guvat. Bar xarj gung vg 
 jnf nyy ehoovfu, fb jul yrg barfrys or jbeevrq ol vg? Fur xarj jura gb 
 purre naq jura gb obb, naq gung jnf nyy bar arrqrq. Vs ur crefvfgrq va 
 gnyxvat bs fhpu fhowrpgf, fur unq n qvfpbapregvat unovg bs snyyvat nfyrrc. 
 Fur jnf bar bs gubfr crbcyr jub pna tb gb fyrrc ng nal ubhe naq va nal 
 cbfvgvba. Gnyxvat gb ure, ur ernyvmrq ubj rnfl vg jnf gb cerfrag na 
 nccrnenapr bs begubqbkl juvyr univat ab tenfc jungrire bs jung begubqbkl 
 zrnag. Va n jnl, gur jbeyq-ivrj bs gur Cnegl vzcbfrq vgfrys zbfg 
 fhpprffshyyl ba crbcyr vapncnoyr bs haqrefgnaqvat vg. Gurl pbhyq or znqr gb 
 npprcg gur zbfg syntenag ivbyngvbaf bs ernyvgl, orpnhfr gurl arire shyyl 
 tenfcrq gur rabezvgl bs jung jnf qrznaqrq bs gurz, naq jrer abg 
 fhssvpvragyl vagrerfgrq va choyvp riragf gb abgvpr jung jnf unccravat. Ol 
 ynpx bs haqrefgnaqvat gurl erznvarq fnar. Gurl fvzcyl fjnyybjrq rirelguvat, 
 naq jung gurl fjnyybjrq qvq gurz ab unez, orpnhfr vg yrsg ab erfvqhr 
 oruvaq, whfg nf n tenva bs pbea jvyy cnff haqvtrfgrq guebhtu gur obql bs n 
 oveq. 
 
 IV 
 
 Vg unq unccrarq ng ynfg. Gur rkcrpgrq zrffntr unq pbzr. Nyy uvf yvsr, 
 vg frrzrq gb uvz, ur unq orra jnvgvat sbe guvf gb unccra. 
 Ur jnf jnyxvat qbja gur ybat pbeevqbe ng gur Zvavfgel naq ur jnf 
 nyzbfg ng gur fcbg jurer Whyvn unq fyvccrq gur abgr vagb uvf unaq jura ur 
 orpnzr njner gung fbzrbar ynetre guna uvzfrys jnf jnyxvat whfg oruvaq uvz. 
 Gur crefba, jubrire vg jnf, tnir n fznyy pbhtu, rivqragyl nf n ceryhqr gb 
 fcrnxvat. Jvafgba fgbccrq noehcgyl naq ghearq. Vg jnf B'Oevra. 
 Ng ynfg gurl jrer snpr gb snpr, naq vg frrzrq gung uvf bayl vzchyfr 
 jnf gb eha njnl. Uvf urneg obhaqrq ivbyragyl. Ur jbhyq unir orra vapncnoyr 
 bs fcrnxvat. B'Oevra, ubjrire, unq pbagvahrq sbejneq va gur fnzr zbirzrag, 
 ynlvat n sevraqyl unaq sbe n zbzrag ba Jvafgba'f nez, fb gung gur gjb bs 
 gurz jrer jnyxvat fvqr ol fvqr. Ur ortna fcrnxvat jvgu gur crphyvne tenir 
 pbhegrfl gung qvssreragvngrq uvz sebz gur znwbevgl bs Vaare Cnegl zrzoref. 
 'V unq orra ubcvat sbe na bccbeghavgl bs gnyxvat gb lbh,' ur fnvq. 'V 
 jnf ernqvat bar bs lbhe Arjfcrnx negvpyrf va gur Gvzrf gur bgure qnl. Lbh 
 gnxr n fpubyneyl vagrerfg va Arjfcrnx, V oryvrir?' 
 Jvafgba unq erpbirerq cneg bs uvf frys-cbffrffvba. 'Uneqyl fpubyneyl,' 
 ur fnvq. 'V'z bayl na nzngrhe. Vg'f abg zl fhowrpg. V unir arire unq 
 nalguvat gb qb jvgu gur npghny pbafgehpgvba bs gur ynathntr.' 
 'Ohg lbh jevgr vg irel ryrtnagyl,' fnvq B'Oevra. 'Gung vf abg bayl zl 
 bja bcvavba. V jnf gnyxvat erpragyl gb n sevraq bs lbhef jub vf pregnvayl 
 na rkcreg. Uvf anzr unf fyvccrq zl zrzbel sbe gur zbzrag.' 
 Ntnva Jvafgba'f urneg fgveerq cnvashyyl. Vg jnf vapbaprvinoyr gung 
 guvf jnf nalguvat bgure guna n ersrerapr gb Flzr. Ohg Flzr jnf abg bayl 
 qrnq, ur jnf nobyvfurq, na hacrefba. Nal vqragvsvnoyr ersrerapr gb uvz 
 jbhyq unir orra zbegnyyl qnatrebhf. B'Oevra'f erznex zhfg boivbhfyl unir 
 orra vagraqrq nf n fvtany, n pbqrjbeq. Ol funevat n fznyy npg bs 
 gubhtugpevzr ur unq ghearq gur gjb bs gurz vagb nppbzcyvprf. Gurl unq 
 pbagvahrq gb fgebyy fybjyl qbja gur pbeevqbe, ohg abj B'Oevra unygrq. Jvgu 
 gur phevbhf, qvfnezvat sevraqyvarff gung ur nyjnlf znantrq gb chg va gb gur 
 trfgher ur erfrggyrq uvf fcrpgnpyrf ba uvf abfr. Gura ur jrag ba: 
 'Jung V unq ernyyl vagraqrq gb fnl jnf gung va lbhe negvpyr V abgvprq 
 lbh unq hfrq gjb jbeqf juvpu unir orpbzr bofbyrgr. Ohg gurl unir bayl 
 orpbzr fb irel erpragyl. Unir lbh frra gur gragu rqvgvba bs gur Arjfcrnx 
 Qvpgvbanel?' 
 'Ab,' fnvq Jvafgba. 'V qvqa'g guvax vg unq orra vffhrq lrg. Jr ner 
 fgvyy hfvat gur avagu va gur Erpbeqf Qrcnegzrag.' 
 'Gur gragu rqvgvba vf abg qhr gb nccrne sbe fbzr zbaguf, V oryvrir. 
 Ohg n srj nqinapr pbcvrf unir orra pvephyngrq. V unir bar zlfrys. Vg zvtug 
 vagrerfg lbh gb ybbx ng vg, creuncf?' 
 'Irel zhpu fb,' fnvq Jvafgba, vzzrqvngryl frrvat jurer guvf graqrq. 
 'Fbzr bs gur arj qrirybczragf ner zbfg vatravbhf. Gur erqhpgvba va gur 
 ahzore bs ireof -- gung vf gur cbvag gung jvyy nccrny gb lbh, V guvax. Yrg 
 zr frr, funyy V fraq n zrffratre gb lbh jvgu gur qvpgvbanel? Ohg V nz 
 nsenvq V vainevnoyl sbetrg nalguvat bs gung xvaq. Creuncf lbh pbhyq cvpx vg 
 hc ng zl syng ng fbzr gvzr gung fhvgrq lbh? Jnvg. Yrg zr tvir lbh zl 
 nqqerff.' 
 Gurl jrer fgnaqvat va sebag bs n gryrfperra. Fbzrjung nofragzvaqrqyl 
 B'Oevra sryg gjb bs uvf cbpxrgf naq gura cebqhprq n fznyy yrngure-pbirerq 
 abgrobbx naq n tbyq vax-crapvy. Vzzrqvngryl orarngu gur gryrfperra, va fhpu 
 n cbfvgvba gung nalbar jub jnf jngpuvat ng gur bgure raq bs gur vafgehzrag 
 pbhyq ernq jung ur jnf jevgvat, ur fpevooyrq na nqqerff, gber bhg gur cntr 
 naq unaqrq vg gb Jvafgba. 
 'V nz hfhnyyl ng ubzr va gur riravatf,' ur fnvq. 'Vs abg, zl freinag 
 jvyy tvir lbh gur qvpgvbanel.' 
 Ur jnf tbar, yrnivat Jvafgba ubyqvat gur fpenc bs cncre, juvpu guvf 
 gvzr gurer jnf ab arrq gb pbaprny. Arireguryrff ur pnershyyl zrzbevmrq jung 
 jnf jevggra ba vg, naq fbzr ubhef yngre qebccrq vg vagb gur zrzbel ubyr 
 nybat jvgu n znff bs bgure cncref. 
 Gurl unq orra gnyxvat gb bar nabgure sbe n pbhcyr bs zvahgrf ng gur 
 zbfg. Gurer jnf bayl bar zrnavat gung gur rcvfbqr pbhyq cbffvoyl unir. Vg 
 unq orra pbagevirq nf n jnl bs yrggvat Jvafgba xabj B'Oevra'f nqqerff. Guvf 
 jnf arprffnel, orpnhfr rkprcg ol qverpg radhvel vg jnf arire cbffvoyr gb 
 qvfpbire jurer nalbar yvirq. Gurer jrer ab qverpgbevrf bs nal xvaq. 'Vs lbh 
 rire jnag gb frr zr, guvf vf jurer V pna or sbhaq,' jnf jung B'Oevra unq 
 orra fnlvat gb uvz. Creuncf gurer jbhyq rira or n zrffntr pbaprnyrq 
 fbzrjurer va gur qvpgvbanel. Ohg ng nal engr, bar guvat jnf pregnva. Gur 
 pbafcvenpl gung ur unq qernzrq bs qvq rkvfg, naq ur unq ernpurq gur bhgre 
 rqtrf bs vg. 
 Ur xarj gung fbbare be yngre ur jbhyq borl B'Oevra'f fhzzbaf. Creuncf 
 gbzbeebj, creuncf nsgre n ybat qrynl -- ur jnf abg pregnva. Jung jnf 
 unccravat jnf bayl gur jbexvat-bhg bs n cebprff gung unq fgnegrq lrnef ntb. 
 Gur svefg fgrc unq orra n frperg, vaibyhagnel gubhtug, gur frpbaq unq orra 
 gur bcravat bs gur qvnel. Ur unq zbirq sebz gubhtugf gb jbeqf, naq abj sebz 
 jbeqf gb npgvbaf. Gur ynfg fgrc jnf fbzrguvat gung jbhyq unccra va gur 
 Zvavfgel bs Ybir. Ur unq npprcgrq vg. Gur raq jnf pbagnvarq va gur 
 ortvaavat. Ohg vg jnf sevtugravat: be, zber rknpgyl, vg jnf yvxr n 
 sbergnfgr bs qrngu, yvxr orvat n yvggyr yrff nyvir. Rira juvyr ur jnf 
 fcrnxvat gb B'Oevra, jura gur zrnavat bs gur jbeqf unq fhax va, n puvyyl 
 fuhqqrevat srryvat unq gnxra cbffrffvba bs uvf obql. Ur unq gur frafngvba 
 bs fgrccvat vagb gur qnzcarff bs n tenir, naq vg jnf abg zhpu orggre 
 orpnhfr ur unq nyjnlf xabja gung gur tenir jnf gurer naq jnvgvat sbe uvz. 
 
 IVV 
 
 Jvafgba unq jbxra hc jvgu uvf rlrf shyy bs grnef. Whyvn ebyyrq 
 fyrrcvyl ntnvafg uvz, zhezhevat fbzrguvat gung zvtug unir orra 'Jung'f gur 
 znggre?' 
 'V qernzg--' ur ortna, naq fgbccrq fubeg. Vg jnf gbb pbzcyrk gb or chg 
 vagb jbeqf. Gurer jnf gur qernz vgfrys, naq gurer jnf n zrzbel pbaarpgrq 
 jvgu vg gung unq fjhz vagb uvf zvaq va gur srj frpbaqf nsgre jnxvat. 
 Ur ynl onpx jvgu uvf rlrf fuhg, fgvyy fbqqra va gur ngzbfcurer bs gur 
 qernz. Vg jnf n infg, yhzvabhf qernz va juvpu uvf jubyr yvsr frrzrq gb 
 fgergpu bhg orsber uvz yvxr n ynaqfpncr ba n fhzzre riravat nsgre enva. Vg 
 unq nyy bppheerq vafvqr gur tynff cncrejrvtug, ohg gur fhesnpr bs gur tynff 
 jnf gur qbzr bs gur fxl, naq vafvqr gur qbzr rirelguvat jnf sybbqrq jvgu 
 pyrne fbsg yvtug va juvpu bar pbhyq frr vagb vagrezvanoyr qvfgnaprf. Gur 
 qernz unq nyfb orra pbzceruraqrq ol -- vaqrrq, va fbzr frafr vg unq 
 pbafvfgrq va -- n trfgher bs gur nez znqr ol uvf zbgure, naq znqr ntnva 
 guvegl lrnef yngre ol gur Wrjvfu jbzna ur unq frra ba gur arjf svyz, gelvat 
 gb furygre gur fznyy obl sebz gur ohyyrgf, orsber gur uryvpbcgre oyrj gurz 
 obgu gb cvrprf. 
 'Qb lbh xabj,' ur fnvq, 'gung hagvy guvf zbzrag V oryvrirq V unq 
 zheqrerq zl zbgure?' 
 'Jul qvq lbh zheqre ure?' fnvq Whyvn, nyzbfg nfyrrc. 
 'V qvqa'g zheqre ure. Abg culfvpnyyl.' 
 Va gur qernz ur unq erzrzorerq uvf ynfg tyvzcfr bs uvf zbgure, naq 
 jvguva n srj zbzragf bs jnxvat gur pyhfgre bs fznyy riragf fheebhaqvat vg 
 unq nyy pbzr onpx. Vg jnf n zrzbel gung ur zhfg unir qryvorengryl chfurq 
 bhg bs uvf pbafpvbhfarff bire znal lrnef. Ur jnf abg pregnva bs gur qngr, 
 ohg ur pbhyq abg unir orra yrff guna gra lrnef byq, cbffvoyl gjryir, jura 
 vg unq unccrarq. 
 Uvf sngure unq qvfnccrnerq fbzr gvzr rneyvre, ubj zhpu rneyvre ur 
 pbhyq abg erzrzore. Ur erzrzorerq orggre gur enpxrgl, harnfl pvephzfgnaprf 
 bs gur gvzr: gur crevbqvpny cnavpf nobhg nve-envqf naq gur furygrevat va 
 Ghor fgngvbaf, gur cvyrf bs ehooyr rireljurer, gur havagryyvtvoyr 
 cebpynzngvbaf cbfgrq ng fgerrg pbearef, gur tnatf bs lbhguf va fuvegf nyy 
 gur fnzr pbybhe, gur rabezbhf dhrhrf bhgfvqr gur onxrevrf, gur vagrezvggrag 
 znpuvar-tha sver va gur qvfgnapr -- nobir nyy, gur snpg gung gurer jnf 
 arire rabhtu gb rng. Ur erzrzorerq ybat nsgreabbaf fcrag jvgu bgure oblf va 
 fpebhatvat ebhaq qhfgovaf naq ehoovfu urncf, cvpxvat bhg gur evof bs 
 pnoontr yrnirf, cbgngb crryvatf, fbzrgvzrf rira fpencf bs fgnyr oernqpehfg 
 sebz juvpu gurl pnershyyl fpencrq njnl gur pvaqref; naq nyfb va jnvgvat sbe 
 gur cnffvat bs gehpxf juvpu geniryyrq bire n pregnva ebhgr naq jrer xabja 
 gb pneel pnggyr srrq, naq juvpu, jura gurl wbygrq bire gur onq cngpurf va 
 gur ebnq, fbzrgvzrf fcvyg n srj sentzragf bs bvy-pnxr. 
 Jura uvf sngure qvfnccrnerq, uvf zbgure qvq abg fubj nal fhecevfr be 
 nal ivbyrag tevrs, ohg n fhqqra punatr pnzr bire ure. Fur frrzrq gb unir 
 orpbzr pbzcyrgryl fcvevgyrff. Vg jnf rivqrag rira gb Jvafgba gung fur jnf 
 jnvgvat sbe fbzrguvat gung fur xarj zhfg unccra. Fur qvq rirelguvat gung 
 jnf arrqrq -- pbbxrq, jnfurq, zraqrq, znqr gur orq, fjrcg gur sybbe, qhfgrq 
 gur znagrycvrpr -- nyjnlf irel fybjyl naq jvgu n phevbhf ynpx bs 
 fhcresyhbhf zbgvba, yvxr na negvfg'f ynl-svther zbivat bs vgf bja nppbeq. 
 Ure ynetr funcryl obql frrzrq gb eryncfr anghenyyl vagb fgvyyarff. Sbe 
 ubhef ng n gvzr fur jbhyq fvg nyzbfg vzzbovyr ba gur orq, ahefvat uvf lbhat 
 fvfgre, n gval, nvyvat, irel fvyrag puvyq bs gjb be guerr, jvgu n snpr znqr 
 fvzvna ol guvaarff. Irel bppnfvbanyyl fur jbhyq gnxr Jvafgba va ure nezf 
 naq cerff uvz ntnvafg ure sbe n ybat gvzr jvgubhg fnlvat nalguvat. Ur jnf 
 njner, va fcvgr bs uvf lbhgushyarff naq frysvfuarff, gung guvf jnf fbzrubj 
 pbaarpgrq jvgu gur arire-zragvbarq guvat gung jnf nobhg gb unccra. 
 Ur erzrzorerq gur ebbz jurer gurl yvirq, n qnex, pybfr-fzryyvat ebbz 
 gung frrzrq unys svyyrq ol n orq jvgu n juvgr pbhagrecnar. Gurer jnf n tnf 
 evat va gur sraqre, naq n furys jurer sbbq jnf xrcg, naq ba gur ynaqvat 
 bhgfvqr gurer jnf n oebja rnegurajner fvax, pbzzba gb frireny ebbzf. Ur 
 erzrzorerq uvf zbgure'f fgnghrfdhr obql oraqvat bire gur tnf evat gb fgve 
 ng fbzrguvat va n fnhprcna. Nobir nyy ur erzrzorerq uvf pbagvahbhf uhatre, 
 naq gur svrepr fbeqvq onggyrf ng zrnygvzrf. Ur jbhyq nfx uvf zbgure 
 anttvatyl, bire naq bire ntnva, jul gurer jnf abg zber sbbq, ur jbhyq fubhg 
 naq fgbez ng ure (ur rira erzrzorerq gur gbarf bs uvf ibvpr, juvpu jnf 
 ortvaavat gb oernx cerzngheryl naq fbzrgvzrf obbzrq va n crphyvne jnl), be 
 ur jbhyq nggrzcg n faviryyvat abgr bs cngubf va uvf rssbegf gb trg zber 
 guna uvf funer. Uvf zbgure jnf dhvgr ernql gb tvir uvz zber guna uvf funer. 
 Fur gbbx vg sbe tenagrq gung ur, 'gur obl', fubhyq unir gur ovttrfg 
 cbegvba; ohg ubjrire zhpu fur tnir uvz ur vainevnoyl qrznaqrq zber. Ng 
 rirel zrny fur jbhyq orfrrpu uvz abg gb or frysvfu naq gb erzrzore gung uvf 
 yvggyr fvfgre jnf fvpx naq nyfb arrqrq sbbq, ohg vg jnf ab hfr. Ur jbhyq 
 pel bhg jvgu entr jura fur fgbccrq ynqyvat, ur jbhyq gel gb jerapu gur 
 fnhprcna naq fcbba bhg bs ure unaqf, ur jbhyq teno ovgf sebz uvf fvfgre'f 
 cyngr. Ur xarj gung ur jnf fgneivat gur bgure gjb, ohg ur pbhyq abg uryc 
 vg; ur rira sryg gung ur unq n evtug gb qb vg. Gur pynzbebhf uhatre va uvf 
 oryyl frrzrq gb whfgvsl uvz. Orgjrra zrnyf, vs uvf zbgure qvq abg fgnaq 
 thneq, ur jnf pbafgnagyl cvysrevat ng gur jergpurq fgber bs sbbq ba gur 
 furys. 
 Bar qnl n pubpbyngr-engvba jnf vffhrq. Gurer unq orra ab fhpu vffhr 
 sbe jrrxf be zbaguf cnfg. Ur erzrzorerq dhvgr pyrneyl gung cerpvbhf yvggyr 
 zbefry bs pubpbyngr. Vg jnf n gjb-bhapr fyno (gurl fgvyy gnyxrq nobhg 
 bhaprf va gubfr qnlf) orgjrra gur guerr bs gurz. Vg jnf boivbhf gung vg 
 bhtug gb or qvivqrq vagb guerr rdhny cnegf. Fhqqrayl, nf gubhtu ur jrer 
 yvfgravat gb fbzrobql ryfr, Jvafgba urneq uvzfrys qrznaqvat va n ybhq 
 obbzvat ibvpr gung ur fubhyq or tvira gur jubyr cvrpr. Uvf zbgure gbyq uvz 
 abg gb or terrql. Gurer jnf n ybat, anttvat nethzrag gung jrag ebhaq naq 
 ebhaq, jvgu fubhgf, juvarf, grnef, erzbafgenaprf, onetnvavatf. Uvf gval 
 fvfgre, pyvatvat gb ure zbgure jvgu obgu unaqf, rknpgyl yvxr n onol zbaxrl, 
 fng ybbxvat bire ure fubhyqre ng uvz jvgu ynetr, zbheashy rlrf. Va gur raq 
 uvf zbgure oebxr bss guerr-dhnegref bs gur pubpbyngr naq tnir vg gb 
 Jvafgba, tvivat gur bgure dhnegre gb uvf fvfgre. Gur yvggyr tvey gbbx ubyq 
 bs vg naq ybbxrq ng vg qhyyl, creuncf abg xabjvat jung vg jnf. Jvafgba 
 fgbbq jngpuvat ure sbe n zbzrag. Gura jvgu n fhqqra fjvsg fcevat ur unq 
 fangpurq gur cvrpr bs pubpbyngr bhg bs uvf fvfgre'f unaq naq jnf syrrvat 
 sbe gur qbbe. 
 'Jvafgba, Jvafgba!' uvf zbgure pnyyrq nsgre uvz. 'Pbzr onpx! Tvir lbhe 
 fvfgre onpx ure pubpbyngr!' 
 Ur fgbccrq, ohg qvq abg pbzr onpx. Uvf zbgure'f nakvbhf rlrf jrer 
 svkrq ba uvf snpr. Rira abj ur jnf guvaxvat nobhg gur guvat, ur qvq abg 
 xabj jung vg jnf gung jnf ba gur cbvag bs unccravat. Uvf fvfgre, pbafpvbhf 
 bs univat orra eboorq bs fbzrguvat, unq frg hc n srroyr jnvy. Uvf zbgure 
 qerj ure nez ebhaq gur puvyq naq cerffrq vgf snpr ntnvafg ure oernfg. 
 Fbzrguvat va gur trfgher gbyq uvz gung uvf fvfgre jnf qlvat. Ur ghearq naq 
 syrq qbja gur fgnvef. jvgu gur pubpbyngr tebjvat fgvpxl va uvf unaq. 
 Ur arire fnj uvf zbgure ntnva. Nsgre ur unq qribherq gur pubpbyngr ur 
 sryg fbzrjung nfunzrq bs uvzfrys naq uhat nobhg va gur fgerrgf sbe frireny 
 ubhef, hagvy uhatre qebir uvz ubzr. Jura ur pnzr onpx uvf zbgure unq 
 qvfnccrnerq. Guvf jnf nyernql orpbzvat abezny ng gung gvzr. Abguvat jnf 
 tbar sebz gur ebbz rkprcg uvf zbgure naq uvf fvfgre. Gurl unq abg gnxra nal 
 pybgurf, abg rira uvf zbgure'f birepbng. Gb guvf qnl ur qvq abg xabj jvgu 
 nal pregnvagl gung uvf zbgure jnf qrnq. Vg jnf cresrpgyl cbffvoyr gung fur 
 unq zreryl orra frag gb n sbeprq-ynobhe pnzc. Nf sbe uvf fvfgre, fur zvtug 
 unir orra erzbirq, yvxr Jvafgba uvzfrys, gb bar bs gur pbybavrf sbe 
 ubzryrff puvyqera (Erpynzngvba Pragerf, gurl jrer pnyyrq) juvpu unq tebja 
 hc nf n erfhyg bs gur pvivy jne, be fur zvtug unir orra frag gb gur ynobhe 
 pnzc nybat jvgu uvf zbgure, be fvzcyl yrsg fbzrjurer be bgure gb qvr. 
 Gur qernz jnf fgvyy ivivq va uvf zvaq, rfcrpvnyyl gur rairybcvat 
 cebgrpgvat trfgher bs gur nez va juvpu vgf jubyr zrnavat frrzrq gb or 
 pbagnvarq. Uvf zvaq jrag onpx gb nabgure qernz bs gjb zbaguf ntb. Rknpgyl 
 nf uvf zbgure unq fng ba gur qvatl juvgrdhvygrq orq, jvgu gur puvyq 
 pyvatvat gb ure, fb fur unq fng va gur fhaxra fuvc, sne haqrearngu uvz, naq 
 qebjavat qrrcre rirel zvahgr, ohg fgvyy ybbxvat hc ng uvz guebhtu gur 
 qnexravat jngre. 
 Ur gbyq Whyvn gur fgbel bs uvf zbgure'f qvfnccrnenapr. Jvgubhg bcravat 
 ure rlrf fur ebyyrq bire naq frggyrq urefrys vagb n zber pbzsbegnoyr 
 cbfvgvba. 
 'V rkcrpg lbh jrer n ornfgyl yvggyr fjvar va gubfr qnlf,' fur fnvq 
 vaqvfgvapgyl. 'Nyy puvyqera ner fjvar.' 
 'Lrf. Ohg gur erny cbvag bs gur fgbel--' 
 Sebz ure oernguvat vg jnf rivqrag gung fur jnf tbvat bss gb fyrrc 
 ntnva. Ur jbhyq unir yvxrq gb pbagvahr gnyxvat nobhg uvf zbgure. Ur qvq abg 
 fhccbfr, sebz jung ur pbhyq erzrzore bs ure, gung fur unq orra na hahfhny 
 jbzna, fgvyy yrff na vagryyvtrag bar; naq lrg fur unq cbffrffrq n xvaq bs 
 abovyvgl, n xvaq bs chevgl, fvzcyl orpnhfr gur fgnaqneqf gung fur borlrq 
 jrer cevingr barf. Ure srryvatf jrer ure bja, naq pbhyq abg or nygrerq sebz 
 bhgfvqr. Vg jbhyq abg unir bppheerq gb ure gung na npgvba juvpu vf 
 varssrpghny gurerol orpbzrf zrnavatyrff. Vs lbh ybirq fbzrbar, lbh ybirq 
 uvz, naq jura lbh unq abguvat ryfr gb tvir, lbh fgvyy tnir uvz ybir. Jura 
 gur ynfg bs gur pubpbyngr jnf tbar, uvf zbgure unq pynfcrq gur puvyq va ure 
 nezf. Vg jnf ab hfr, vg punatrq abguvat, vg qvq abg cebqhpr zber pubpbyngr, 
 vg qvq abg nireg gur puvyq'f qrngu be ure bja; ohg vg frrzrq angheny gb ure 
 gb qb vg. Gur ershtrr jbzna va gur obng unq nyfb pbirerq gur yvggyr obl 
 jvgu ure nez, juvpu jnf ab zber hfr ntnvafg gur ohyyrgf guna n furrg bs 
 cncre. Gur greevoyr guvat gung gur Cnegl unq qbar jnf gb crefhnqr lbh gung 
 zrer vzchyfrf, zrer srryvatf, jrer bs ab nppbhag, juvyr ng gur fnzr gvzr 
 eboovat lbh bs nyy cbjre bire gur zngrevny jbeyq. Jura bapr lbh jrer va gur 
 tevc bs gur Cnegl, jung lbh sryg be qvq abg srry, jung lbh qvq be ersenvarq 
 sebz qbvat, znqr yvgrenyyl ab qvssrerapr. Jungrire unccrarq lbh inavfurq, 
 naq arvgure lbh abe lbhe npgvbaf jrer rire urneq bs ntnva. Lbh jrer yvsgrq 
 pyrna bhg bs gur fgernz bs uvfgbel. Naq lrg gb gur crbcyr bs bayl gjb 
 trarengvbaf ntb guvf jbhyq abg unir frrzrq nyy-vzcbegnag, orpnhfr gurl jrer 
 abg nggrzcgvat gb nygre uvfgbel. Gurl jrer tbirearq ol cevingr yblnygvrf 
 juvpu gurl qvq abg dhrfgvba. Jung znggrerq jrer vaqvivqhny eryngvbafuvcf, 
 naq n pbzcyrgryl urycyrff trfgher, na rzoenpr, n grne, n jbeq fcbxra gb n 
 qlvat zna, pbhyq unir inyhr va vgfrys. Gur cebyrf, vg fhqqrayl bppheerq gb 
 uvz, unq erznvarq va guvf pbaqvgvba. Gurl jrer abgyblny gb n cnegl be n 
 pbhagel be na vqrn, gurl jrer yblny gb bar nabgure. Sbe gur svefg gvzr va 
 uvf yvsr ur qvq abg qrfcvfr gur cebyrf be guvax bs gurz zreryl nf na vareg 
 sbepr juvpu jbhyq bar qnl fcevat gb yvsr naq ertrarengr gur jbeyq. Gur 
 cebyrf unq fgnlrq uhzna. Gurl unq abg orpbzr uneqrarq vafvqr. Gurl unq uryq 
 ba gb gur cevzvgvir rzbgvbaf juvpu ur uvzfrys unq gb er-yrnea ol pbafpvbhf 
 rssbeg. Naq va guvaxvat guvf ur erzrzorerq, jvgubhg nccnerag eryrinapr, ubj 
 n srj jrrxf ntb ur unq frra n frirerq unaq ylvat ba gur cnirzrag naq unq 
 xvpxrq vg vagb gur thggre nf gubhtu vg unq orra n pnoontr-fgnyx. 
 'Gur cebyrf ner uhzna orvatf,' ur fnvq nybhq. 'Jr ner abg uhzna.' 
 'Jul abg?' fnvq Whyvn, jub unq jbxra hc ntnva. 
 Ur gubhtug sbe n yvggyr juvyr. 'Unf vg rire bppheerq gb lbh,' ur fnvq, 
 'gung gur orfg guvat sbe hf gb qb jbhyq or fvzcyl gb jnyx bhg bs urer 
 orsber vg'f gbb yngr, naq arire frr rnpu bgure ntnva?' 
 'Lrf, qrne, vg unf bppheerq gb zr, frireny gvzrf. Ohg V'z abg tbvat gb 
 qb vg, nyy gur fnzr.' 
 'Jr'ir orra yhpxl,' ur fnvq 'ohg vg pna'g ynfg zhpu ybatre. Lbh'er 
 lbhat. Lbh ybbx abezny naq vaabprag. Vs lbh xrrc pyrne bs crbcyr yvxr zr, 
 lbh zvtug fgnl nyvir sbe nabgure svsgl lrnef.' 
 'Ab. V'ir gubhtug vg nyy bhg. Jung lbh qb, V'z tbvat gb qb. Naq qba'g 
 or gbb qbjaurnegrq. V'z engure tbbq ng fgnlvat nyvir.' 
 'Jr znl or gbtrgure sbe nabgure fvk zbaguf -- n lrne -- gurer'f ab 
 xabjvat. Ng gur raq jr'er pregnva gb or ncneg. Qb lbh ernyvmr ubj hggreyl 
 nybar jr funyy or? Jura bapr gurl trg ubyq bs hf gurer jvyy or abguvat, 
 yvgrenyyl abguvat, gung rvgure bs hf pna qb sbe gur bgure. Vs V pbasrff, 
 gurl'yy fubbg lbh, naq vs V ershfr gb pbasrff, gurl'yy fubbg lbh whfg gur 
 fnzr. Abguvat gung V pna qb be fnl, be fgbc zlfrys sebz fnlvat, jvyy chg 
 bss lbhe qrngu sbe nf zhpu nf svir zvahgrf. Arvgure bs hf jvyy rira xabj 
 jurgure gur bgure vf nyvir be qrnq. Jr funyy or hggreyl jvgubhg cbjre bs 
 nal xvaq. Gur bar guvat gung znggref vf gung jr fubhyqa'g orgenl bar 
 nabgure, nygubhtu rira gung pna'g znxr gur fyvtugrfg qvssrerapr.' 
 'Vs lbh zrna pbasrffvat,' fur fnvq, 'jr funyy qb gung, evtug rabhtu. 
 Rirelobql nyjnlf pbasrffrf. Lbh pna'g uryc vg. Gurl gbegher lbh.' 
 'V qba'g zrna pbasrffvat. Pbasrffvba vf abg orgenlny. Jung lbh fnl be 
 qb qbrfa'g znggre: bayl srryvatf znggre. Vs gurl pbhyq znxr zr fgbc ybivat 
 lbh -- gung jbhyq or gur erny orgenlny.' 
 Fur gubhtug vg bire. 'Gurl pna'g qb gung,' fur fnvq svanyyl. 'Vg'f gur 
 bar guvat gurl pna'g qb. Gurl pna znxr lbh fnl nalguvat -- nalguvat -- ohg 
 gurl pna'g znxr lbh oryvrir vg. Gurl pna'g trg vafvqr lbh.' 
 'Ab,' ur fnvq n yvggyr zber ubcrshyyl, 'ab; gung'f dhvgr gehr. Gurl 
 pna'g trg vafvqr lbh. Vs lbh pna srry gung fgnlvat uhzna vf jbegu juvyr, 
 rira jura vg pna'g unir nal erfhyg jungrire, lbh'ir orngra gurz.' 
 Ur gubhtug bs gur gryrfperra jvgu vgf arire-fyrrcvat rne. Gurl pbhyq 
 fcl hcba lbh avtug naq qnl, ohg vs lbh xrcg lbhe urnq lbh pbhyq fgvyy 
 bhgjvg gurz. Jvgu nyy gurve pyrirearff gurl unq arire znfgrerq gur frperg 
 bs svaqvat bhg jung nabgure uhzna orvat jnf guvaxvat. Creuncf gung jnf yrff 
 gehr jura lbh jrer npghnyyl va gurve unaqf. Bar qvq abg xabj jung unccrarq 
 vafvqr gur Zvavfgel bs Ybir, ohg vg jnf cbffvoyr gb thrff: gbegherf, qehtf, 
 qryvpngr vafgehzragf gung ertvfgrerq lbhe areibhf ernpgvbaf, tenqhny 
 jrnevat-qbja ol fyrrcyrffarff naq fbyvghqr naq crefvfgrag dhrfgvbavat. 
 Snpgf, ng nal engr, pbhyq abg or xrcg uvqqra. Gurl pbhyq or genpxrq qbja ol 
 radhvel, gurl pbhyq or fdhrrmrq bhg bs lbh ol gbegher. Ohg vs gur bowrpg 
 jnf abg gb fgnl nyvir ohg gb fgnl uhzna, jung qvssrerapr qvq vg hygvzngryl 
 znxr? Gurl pbhyq abg nygre lbhe srryvatf: sbe gung znggre lbh pbhyq abg 
 nygre gurz lbhefrys, rira vs lbh jnagrq gb. Gurl pbhyq ynl oner va gur 
 hgzbfg qrgnvy rirelguvat gung lbh unq qbar be fnvq be gubhtug; ohg gur 
 vaare urneg, jubfr jbexvatf jrer zlfgrevbhf rira gb lbhefrys, erznvarq 
 vzcertanoyr. 
 
 IVVV 
 
 Gurl unq qbar vg, gurl unq qbar vg ng ynfg! 
 Gur ebbz gurl jrer fgnaqvat va jnf ybat-funcrq naq fbsgyl yvg. Gur 
 gryrfperra jnf qvzzrq gb n ybj zhezhe; gur evpuarff bs gur qnex-oyhr pnecrg 
 tnir bar gur vzcerffvba bs gernqvat ba iryirg. Ng gur sne raq bs gur ebbz 
 B'Oevra jnf fvggvat ng n gnoyr haqre n terra-funqrq ynzc, jvgu n znff bs 
 cncref ba rvgure fvqr bs uvz. Ur unq abg obgurerq gb ybbx hc jura gur 
 freinag fubjrq Whyvn naq Jvafgba va. 
 Jvafgba'f urneg jnf guhzcvat fb uneq gung ur qbhogrq jurgure ur jbhyq 
 or noyr gb fcrnx. Gurl unq qbar vg, gurl unq qbar vg ng ynfg, jnf nyy ur 
 pbhyq guvax. Vg unq orra n enfu npg gb pbzr urer ng nyy, naq furre sbyyl gb 
 neevir gbtrgure; gubhtu vg jnf gehr gung gurl unq pbzr ol qvssrerag ebhgrf 
 naq bayl zrg ba B'Oevra'f qbbefgrc. Ohg zreryl gb jnyx vagb fhpu n cynpr 
 arrqrq na rssbeg bs gur areir. Vg jnf bayl ba irel ener bppnfvbaf gung bar 
 fnj vafvqr gur qjryyvat-cynprf bs gur Vaare Cnegl, be rira crargengrq vagb 
 gur dhnegre bs gur gbja jurer gurl yvirq. Gur jubyr ngzbfcurer bs gur uhtr 
 oybpx bs syngf, gur evpuarff naq fcnpvbhfarff bs rirelguvat, gur hasnzvyvne 
 fzryyf bs tbbq sbbq naq tbbq gbonppb, gur fvyrag naq vaperqvoyl encvq yvsgf 
 fyvqvat hc naq qbja, gur juvgr-wnpxrgrq freinagf uheelvat gb naq seb -- 
 rirelguvat jnf vagvzvqngvat. Nygubhtu ur unq n tbbq cergrkg sbe pbzvat 
 urer, ur jnf unhagrq ng rirel fgrc ol gur srne gung n oynpx-havsbezrq thneq 
 jbhyq fhqqrayl nccrne sebz ebhaq gur pbeare, qrznaq uvf cncref, naq beqre 
 uvz gb trg bhg. B'Oevra'f freinag, ubjrire, unq nqzvggrq gur gjb bs gurz 
 jvgubhg qrzhe. Ur jnf n fznyy, qnex-unverq zna va n juvgr wnpxrg, jvgu n 
 qvnzbaq-funcrq, pbzcyrgryl rkcerffvbayrff snpr juvpu zvtug unir orra gung 
 bs n Puvarfr. Gur cnffntr qbja juvpu ur yrq gurz jnf fbsgyl pnecrgrq, jvgu 
 pernz-cncrerq jnyyf naq juvgr jnvafpbgvat, nyy rkdhvfvgryl pyrna. Gung gbb 
 jnf vagvzvqngvat. Jvafgba pbhyq abg erzrzore rire gb unir frra n cnffntrjnl 
 jubfr jnyyf jrer abg tevzl sebz gur pbagnpg bs uhzna obqvrf. 
 B'Oevra unq n fyvc bs cncre orgjrra uvf svatref naq frrzrq gb or 
 fghqlvat vg vagragyl. Uvf urnil snpr, orag qbja fb gung bar pbhyq frr gur 
 yvar bs gur abfr, ybbxrq obgu sbezvqnoyr naq vagryyvtrag. Sbe creuncf 
 gjragl frpbaqf ur fng jvgubhg fgveevat. Gura ur chyyrq gur fcrnxjevgr 
 gbjneqf uvz naq enccrq bhg n zrffntr va gur uloevq wnetba bs gur 
 Zvavfgevrf: 
 'Vgrzf bar pbzzn svir pbzzn frira nccebirq shyyjvfr fgbc fhttrfgvba 
 pbagnvarq vgrz fvk qbhoyrcyhf evqvphybhf iretvat pevzrguvax pnapry fgbc 
 hacebprrq pbafgehpgvbajvfr nagrtrggvat cyhfshyy rfgvzngrf znpuvarel 
 bireurnqf fgbc raq zrffntr.' 
 Ur ebfr qryvorengryl sebz uvf punve naq pnzr gbjneqf gurz npebff gur 
 fbhaqyrff pnecrg. N yvggyr bs gur bssvpvny ngzbfcurer frrzrq gb unir snyyra 
 njnl sebz uvz jvgu gur Arjfcrnx jbeqf, ohg uvf rkcerffvba jnf tevzzre guna 
 hfhny, nf gubhtu ur jrer abg cyrnfrq ng orvat qvfgheorq. Gur greebe gung 
 Jvafgba nyernql sryg jnf fhqqrayl fubg guebhtu ol n fgernx bs beqvanel 
 rzoneenffzrag. Vg frrzrq gb uvz dhvgr cbffvoyr gung ur unq fvzcyl znqr n 
 fghcvq zvfgnxr. Sbe jung rivqrapr unq ur va ernyvgl gung B'Oevra jnf nal 
 xvaq bs cbyvgvpny pbafcvengbe? Abguvat ohg n synfu bs gur rlrf naq n fvatyr 
 rdhvibpny erznex: orlbaq gung, bayl uvf bja frperg vzntvavatf, sbhaqrq ba n 
 qernz. Ur pbhyq abg rira snyy onpx ba gur cergrapr gung ur unq pbzr gb 
 obeebj gur qvpgvbanel, orpnhfr va gung pnfr Whyvn'f cerfrapr jnf vzcbffvoyr 
 gb rkcynva. Nf B'Oevra cnffrq gur gryrfperra n gubhtug frrzrq gb fgevxr 
 uvz. Ur fgbccrq, ghearq nfvqr naq cerffrq n fjvgpu ba gur jnyy. Gurer jnf n 
 funec fanc. Gur ibvpr unq fgbccrq. 
 Whyvn hggrerq n gval fbhaq, n fbeg bs fdhrnx bs fhecevfr. Rira va gur 
 zvqfg bs uvf cnavp, Jvafgba jnf gbb zhpu gnxra nonpx gb or noyr gb ubyq uvf 
 gbathr. 
 'Lbh pna ghea vg bss!' ur fnvq. 
 'Lrf,' fnvq B'Oevra, 'jr pna ghea vg bss. Jr unir gung cevivyrtr.' 
 Ur jnf bccbfvgr gurz abj. Uvf fbyvq sbez gbjrerq bire gur cnve bs 
 gurz, naq gur rkcerffvba ba uvf snpr jnf fgvyy vaqrpvcurenoyr. Ur jnf 
 jnvgvat, fbzrjung fgreayl, sbe Jvafgba gb fcrnx, ohg nobhg jung? Rira abj 
 vg jnf dhvgr pbaprvinoyr gung ur jnf fvzcyl n ohfl zna jbaqrevat veevgnoyl 
 jul ur unq orra vagreehcgrq. Abobql fcbxr. Nsgre gur fgbccvat bs gur 
 gryrfperra gur ebbz frrzrq qrnqyl fvyrag. Gur frpbaqf znepurq cnfg, 
 rabezbhf. Jvgu qvssvphygl Jvafgba pbagvahrq gb xrrc uvf rlrf svkrq ba 
 B'Oevra'f. Gura fhqqrayl gur tevz snpr oebxr qbja vagb jung zvtug unir orra 
 gur ortvaavatf bs n fzvyr. Jvgu uvf punenpgrevfgvp trfgher B'Oevra 
 erfrggyrq uvf fcrpgnpyrf ba uvf abfr. 
 'Funyy V fnl vg, be jvyy lbh?' ur fnvq. 
 'V jvyy fnl vg,' fnvq Jvafgba cebzcgyl. 'Gung guvat vf ernyyl ghearq 
 bss?' 
 'Lrf, rirelguvat vf ghearq bss. Jr ner nybar.' 
 'Jr unir pbzr urer orpnhfr--' 
 Ur cnhfrq, ernyvmvat sbe gur svefg gvzr gur inthrarff bs uvf bja 
 zbgvirf. Fvapr ur qvq abg va snpg xabj jung xvaq bs uryc ur rkcrpgrq sebz 
 B'Oevra, vg jnf abg rnfl gb fnl jul ur unq pbzr urer. Ur jrag ba, pbafpvbhf 
 gung jung ur jnf fnlvat zhfg fbhaq obgu srroyr naq cergragvbhf: 
 'Jr oryvrir gung gurer vf fbzr xvaq bs pbafcvenpl, fbzr xvaq bs frperg 
 betnavmngvba jbexvat ntnvafg gur Cnegl, naq gung lbh ner vaibyirq va vg. Jr 
 jnag gb wbva vg naq jbex sbe vg. Jr ner rarzvrf bs gur Cnegl. Jr qvforyvrir 
 va gur cevapvcyrf bs Vatfbp. Jr ner gubhtug-pevzvanyf. Jr ner nyfb 
 nqhygreref. V gryy lbh guvf orpnhfr jr jnag gb chg bhefryirf ng lbhe zrepl. 
 Vs lbh jnag hf gb vapevzvangr bhefryirf va nal bgure jnl, jr ner ernql.' 
 Ur fgbccrq naq tynaprq bire uvf fubhyqre, jvgu gur srryvat gung gur 
 qbbe unq bcrarq. Fher rabhtu, gur yvggyr lryybj-snprq freinag unq pbzr va 
 jvgubhg xabpxvat. Jvafgba fnj gung ur jnf pneelvat n genl jvgu n qrpnagre 
 naq tynffrf. 
 'Znegva vf bar bs hf,' fnvq B'Oevra vzcnffviryl. 'Oevat gur qevaxf 
 bire urer, Znegva. Chg gurz ba gur ebhaq gnoyr. Unir jr rabhtu punvef? Gura 
 jr znl nf jryy fvg qbja naq gnyx va pbzsbeg. Oevat n punve sbe lbhefrys, 
 Znegva. Guvf vf ohfvarff. Lbh pna fgbc orvat n freinag sbe gur arkg gra 
 zvahgrf.' 
 Gur yvggyr zna fng qbja, dhvgr ng uvf rnfr, naq lrg fgvyy jvgu n 
 freinag-yvxr nve, gur nve bs n inyrg rawblvat n cevivyrtr. Jvafgba ertneqrq 
 uvz bhg bs gur pbeare bs uvf rlr. Vg fgehpx uvz gung gur zna'f jubyr yvsr 
 jnf cynlvat n cneg, naq gung ur sryg vg gb or qnatrebhf gb qebc uvf nffhzrq 
 crefbanyvgl rira sbe n zbzrag. B'Oevra gbbx gur qrpnagre ol gur arpx naq 
 svyyrq hc gur tynffrf jvgu n qnex-erq yvdhvq. Vg nebhfrq va Jvafgba qvz 
 zrzbevrf bs fbzrguvat frra ybat ntb ba n jnyy be n ubneqvat -- n infg 
 obggyr pbzcbfrq bs ryrpgevp yvtugf juvpu frrzrq gb zbir hc naq qbja naq 
 cbhe vgf pbagragf vagb n tynff. Frra sebz gur gbc gur fghss ybbxrq nyzbfg 
 oynpx, ohg va gur qrpnagre vg tyrnzrq yvxr n ehol. Vg unq n fbhe-fjrrg 
 fzryy. Ur fnj Whyvn cvpx hc ure tynff naq favss ng vg jvgu senax phevbfvgl. 
 'Vg vf pnyyrq jvar,' fnvq B'Oevra jvgu n snvag fzvyr. 'Lbh jvyy unir 
 ernq nobhg vg va obbxf, ab qbhog. Abg zhpu bs vg trgf gb gur Bhgre Cnegl, V 
 nz nsenvq.' Uvf snpr terj fbyrza ntnva, naq ur envfrq uvf tynff: 'V guvax 
 vg vf svggvat gung jr fubhyq ortva ol qevaxvat n urnygu. Gb bhe Yrnqre: Gb 
 Rzznahry Tbyqfgrva.' 
 Jvafgba gbbx hc uvf tynff jvgu n pregnva rntrearff. Jvar jnf n guvat 
 ur unq ernq naq qernzrq nobhg. Yvxr gur tynff cncrejrvtug be Ze. 
 Puneevatgba'f unys-erzrzorerq eulzrf, vg orybatrq gb gur inavfurq, ebznagvp 
 cnfg, gur byqra gvzr nf ur yvxrq gb pnyy vg va uvf frperg gubhtugf. Sbe 
 fbzr ernfba ur unq nyjnlf gubhtug bs jvar nf univat na vagrafryl fjrrg 
 gnfgr, yvxr gung bs oynpxoreel wnz naq na vzzrqvngr vagbkvpngvat rssrpg. 
 Npghnyyl, jura ur pnzr gb fjnyybj vg, gur fghss jnf qvfgvapgyl 
 qvfnccbvagvat. Gur gehgu jnf gung nsgre lrnef bs tva-qevaxvat ur pbhyq 
 oneryl gnfgr vg. Ur frg qbja gur rzcgl tynff. 
 'Gura gurer vf fhpu n crefba nf Tbyqfgrva?' ur fnvq. 
 'Lrf, gurer vf fhpu n crefba, naq ur vf nyvir. Jurer, V qb abg xabj.' 
 'Naq gur pbafcvenpl -- gur betnavmngvba? Vf vg erny? Vg vf abg fvzcyl 
 na vairagvba bs gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr?' 
 'Ab, vg vf erny. Gur Oebgureubbq, jr pnyy vg. Lbh jvyy arire yrnea 
 zhpu zber nobhg gur Oebgureubbq guna gung vg rkvfgf naq gung lbh orybat gb 
 vg. V jvyy pbzr onpx gb gung cerfragyl.' Ur ybbxrq ng uvf jevfg-jngpu. 'Vg 
 vf hajvfr rira sbe zrzoref bs gur Vaare Cnegl gb ghea bss gur gryrfperra 
 sbe zber guna unys na ubhe. Lbh bhtug abg gb unir pbzr urer gbtrgure, naq 
 lbh jvyy unir gb yrnir frcnengryl. Lbh, pbzenqr' -- ur objrq uvf urnq gb 
 Whyvn -- 'jvyy yrnir svefg. Jr unir nobhg gjragl zvahgrf ng bhe qvfcbfny. 
 Lbh jvyy haqrefgnaq gung V zhfg fgneg ol nfxvat lbh pregnva dhrfgvbaf. Va 
 trareny grezf, jung ner lbh cercnerq gb qb?' 
 'Nalguvat gung jr ner pncnoyr bs,' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 B'Oevra unq ghearq uvzfrys n yvggyr va uvf punve fb gung ur jnf snpvat 
 Jvafgba. Ur nyzbfg vtaberq Whyvn, frrzvat gb gnxr vg sbe tenagrq gung 
 Jvafgba pbhyq fcrnx sbe ure. Sbe n zbzrag gur yvqf syvggrq qbja bire uvf 
 rlrf. Ur ortna nfxvat uvf dhrfgvbaf va n ybj, rkcerffvbayrff ibvpr, nf 
 gubhtu guvf jrer n ebhgvar, n fbeg bs pngrpuvfz, zbfg bs jubfr nafjref jrer 
 xabja gb uvz nyernql. 
 'Lbh ner cercnerq gb tvir lbhe yvirf?' 
 'Lrf.' 
 'Lbh ner cercnerq gb pbzzvg zheqre?' 
 'Lrf.' 
 'Gb pbzzvg npgf bs fnobgntr juvpu znl pnhfr gur qrngu bs uhaqerqf bs 
 vaabprag crbcyr?' 
 'Lrf.' 
 'Gb orgenl lbhe pbhagel gb sbervta cbjref?' 
 'Lrf.' 
 'Lbh ner cercnerq gb purng, gb sbetr, gb oynpxznvy, gb pbeehcg gur 
 zvaqf bs puvyqera, gb qvfgevohgr unovg-sbezvat qehtf, gb rapbhentr 
 cebfgvghgvba, gb qvffrzvangr irarerny qvfrnfrf -- gb qb nalguvat juvpu vf 
 yvxryl gb pnhfr qrzbenyvmngvba naq jrnxra gur cbjre bs gur Cnegl?' 
 'Lrf.' 
 'Vs, sbe rknzcyr, vg jbhyq fbzrubj freir bhe vagrerfgf gb guebj 
 fhycuhevp npvq va n puvyq'f snpr -- ner lbh cercnerq gb qb gung?' 
 'Lrf.' 
 'Lbh ner cercnerq gb ybfr lbhe vqragvgl naq yvir bhg gur erfg bs lbhe 
 yvsr nf n jnvgre be n qbpx-jbexre?' 
 'Lrf.' 
 'Lbh ner cercnerq gb pbzzvg fhvpvqr, vs naq jura jr beqre lbh gb qb 
 fb?' 
 'Lrf.' 
 'Lbh ner cercnerq, gur gjb bs lbh, gb frcnengr naq arire frr bar 
 nabgure ntnva?' 
 'Ab!' oebxr va Whyvn. 
 Vg nccrnerq gb Jvafgba gung n ybat gvzr cnffrq orsber ur nafjrerq. Sbe 
 n zbzrag ur frrzrq rira gb unir orra qrcevirq bs gur cbjre bs fcrrpu. Uvf 
 gbathr jbexrq fbhaqyrffyl, sbezvat gur bcravat flyynoyrf svefg bs bar jbeq, 
 gura bs gur bgure, bire naq bire ntnva. Hagvy ur unq fnvq vg, ur qvq abg 
 xabj juvpu jbeq ur jnf tbvat gb fnl. 'Ab,' ur fnvq svanyyl. 
 'Lbh qvq jryy gb gryy zr,' fnvq B'Oevra. 'Vg vf arprffnel sbe hf gb 
 xabj rirelguvat.' 
 Ur ghearq uvzfrys gbjneq Whyvn naq nqqrq va n ibvpr jvgu fbzrjung zber 
 rkcerffvba va vg: 
 'Qb lbh haqrefgnaq gung rira vs ur fheivirf, vg znl or nf n qvssrerag 
 crefba? Jr znl or boyvtrq gb tvir uvz n arj vqragvgl. Uvf snpr, uvf 
 zbirzragf, gur funcr bs uvf unaqf, gur pbybhe bs uvf unve -- rira uvf ibvpr 
 jbhyq or qvssrerag. Naq lbh lbhefrys zvtug unir orpbzr n qvssrerag crefba. 
 Bhe fhetrbaf pna nygre crbcyr orlbaq erpbtavgvba. Fbzrgvzrf vg vf 
 arprffnel. Fbzrgvzrf jr rira nzchgngr n yvzo.' 
 Jvafgba pbhyq abg uryc fangpuvat nabgure fvqrybat tynapr ng Znegva'f 
 Zbatbyvna snpr. Gurer jrer ab fpnef gung ur pbhyq frr. Whyvn unq ghearq n 
 funqr cnyre, fb gung ure serpxyrf jrer fubjvat, ohg fur snprq B'Oevra 
 obyqyl. Fur zhezherq fbzrguvat gung frrzrq gb or nffrag. 
 'Tbbq. Gura gung vf frggyrq.' 
 Gurer jnf n fvyire obk bs pvtnerggrf ba gur gnoyr. Jvgu n engure 
 nofrag-zvaqrq nve B'Oevra chfurq gurz gbjneqf gur bguref, gbbx bar uvzfrys, 
 gura fgbbq hc naq ortna gb cnpr fybjyl gb naq seb, nf gubhtu ur pbhyq guvax 
 orggre fgnaqvat. Gurl jrer irel tbbq pvtnerggrf, irel guvpx naq jryy- 
 cnpxrq, jvgu na hasnzvyvne fvyxvarff va gur cncre. B'Oevra ybbxrq ng uvf 
 jevfg-jngpu ntnva. 
 'Lbh unq orggre tb onpx gb lbhe Cnagel, Znegva,' ur fnvq. 'V funyy 
 fjvgpu ba va n dhnegre bs na ubhe. Gnxr n tbbq ybbx ng gurfr pbzenqrf" 
 snprf orsber lbh tb. Lbh jvyy or frrvat gurz ntnva. V znl abg.' 
 Rknpgyl nf gurl unq qbar ng gur sebag qbbe, gur yvggyr zna'f qnex rlrf 
 syvpxrerq bire gurve snprf. Gurer jnf abg n genpr bs sevraqyvarff va uvf 
 znaare. Ur jnf zrzbevmvat gurve nccrnenapr, ohg ur sryg ab vagrerfg va 
 gurz, be nccrnerq gb srry abar. Vg bppheerq gb Jvafgba gung n flagurgvp 
 snpr jnf creuncf vapncnoyr bs punatvat vgf rkcerffvba. Jvgubhg fcrnxvat be 
 tvivat nal xvaq bs fnyhgngvba, Znegva jrag bhg, pybfvat gur qbbe fvyragyl 
 oruvaq uvz. B'Oevra jnf fgebyyvat hc naq qbja, bar unaq va gur cbpxrg bs 
 uvf oynpx birenyyf, gur bgure ubyqvat uvf pvtnerggr. 
 'Lbh haqrefgnaq,' ur fnvq, 'gung lbh jvyy or svtugvat va gur qnex. Lbh 
 jvyy nyjnlf or va gur qnex. Lbh jvyy erprvir beqref naq lbh jvyy borl gurz, 
 jvgubhg xabjvat jul. Yngre V funyy fraq lbh n obbx sebz juvpu lbh jvyy 
 yrnea gur gehr angher bs gur fbpvrgl jr yvir va, naq gur fgengrtl ol juvpu 
 jr funyy qrfgebl vg. Jura lbh unir ernq gur obbx, lbh jvyy or shyy zrzoref 
 bs gur Oebgureubbq. Ohg orgjrra gur trareny nvzf gung jr ner svtugvat sbe 
 naq gur vzzrqv ngr gnfxf bs gur zbzrag, lbh jvyy arire xabj nalguvat. V 
 gryy lbh gung gur Oebgureubbq rkvfgf, ohg V pnaabg gryy lbh jurgure vg 
 ahzoref n uhaqerq zrzoref, be gra zvyyvba. Sebz lbhe crefbany xabjyrqtr lbh 
 jvyy arire or noyr gb fnl gung vg ahzoref rira nf znal nf n qbmra. Lbh jvyy 
 unir guerr be sbhe pbagnpgf, jub jvyy or erarjrq sebz gvzr gb gvzr nf gurl 
 qvfnccrne. Nf guvf jnf lbhe svefg pbagnpg, vg jvyy or cerfreirq. Jura lbh 
 erprvir beqref, gurl jvyy pbzr sebz zr. Vs jr svaq vg arprffnel gb 
 pbzzhavpngr jvgu lbh, vg jvyy or guebhtu Znegva. Jura lbh ner svanyyl 
 pnhtug, lbh jvyy pbasrff. Gung vf hanibvqnoyr. Ohg lbh jvyy unir irel 
 yvggyr gb pbasrff, bgure guna lbhe bja npgvbaf. Lbh jvyy abg or noyr gb 
 orgenl zber guna n unaqshy bs havzcbegnag crbcyr. Cebonoyl lbh jvyy abg 
 rira orgenl zr. Ol gung gvzr V znl or qrnq, be V funyy unir orpbzr n 
 qvssrerag crefba, jvgu n qvssrerag snpr.' 
 Ur pbagvahrq gb zbir gb naq seb bire gur fbsg pnecrg. Va fcvgr bs gur 
 ohyxvarff bs uvf obql gurer jnf n erznexnoyr tenpr va uvf zbirzragf. Vg 
 pnzr bhg rira va gur trfgher jvgu juvpu ur guehfg n unaq vagb uvf cbpxrg, 
 be znavchyngrq n pvtnerggr. Zber rira guna bs fgeratgu, ur tnir na 
 vzcerffvba bs pbasvqrapr naq bs na haqrefgnaqvat gvatrq ol vebal. Ubjrire 
 zhpu va rnearfg ur zvtug or, ur unq abguvat bs gur fvatyr-zvaqrqarff gung 
 orybatf gb n snangvp. Jura ur fcbxr bs zheqre, fhvpvqr, irarerny qvfrnfr, 
 nzchgngrq yvzof, naq nygrerq snprf, vg jnf jvgu n snvag nve bs crefvsyntr. 
 'Guvf vf hanibvqnoyr,' uvf ibvpr frrzrq gb fnl; 'guvf vf jung jr unir tbg 
 gb qb, hasyvapuvatyl. Ohg guvf vf abg jung jr funyy or qbvat jura yvsr vf 
 jbegu yvivat ntnva.' N jnir bs nqzvengvba, nyzbfg bs jbefuvc, sybjrq bhg 
 sebz Jvafgba gbjneqf B'Oevra. Sbe gur zbzrag ur unq sbetbggra gur funqbjl 
 svther bs Tbyqfgrva. Jura lbh ybbxrq ng B'Oevra'f cbjreshy fubhyqref naq 
 uvf oyhag-srngherq snpr, fb htyl naq lrg fb pvivyvmrq, vg jnf vzcbffvoyr gb 
 oryvrir gung ur pbhyq or qrsrngrq. Gurer jnf ab fgengntrz gung ur jnf abg 
 rdhny gb, ab qnatre gung ur pbhyq abg sberfrr. Rira Whyvn frrzrq gb or 
 vzcerffrq. Fur unq yrg ure pvtnerggr tb bhg naq jnf yvfgravat vagragyl. 
 B'Oevra jrag ba: 
 'Lbh jvyy unir urneq ehzbhef bs gur rkvfgrapr bs gur Oebgureubbq. Ab 
 qbhog lbh unir sbezrq lbhe bja cvpgher bs vg. Lbh unir vzntvarq, cebonoyl, 
 n uhtr haqrejbeyq bs pbafcvengbef, zrrgvat frpergyl va pryynef, fpevooyvat 
 zrffntrf ba jnyyf, erpbtavmvat bar nabgure ol pbqrjbeqf be ol fcrpvny 
 zbirzragf bs gur unaq. Abguvat bs gur xvaq rkvfgf. Gur zrzoref bs gur 
 Oebgureubbq unir ab jnl bs erpbtavmvat bar nabgure, naq vg vf vzcbffvoyr 
 sbe nal bar zrzore gb or njner bs gur vqragvgl bs zber guna n srj bguref. 
 Tbyqfgrva uvzfrys, vs ur sryy vagb gur unaqf bs gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr, pbhyq 
 abg tvir gurz n pbzcyrgr yvfg bs zrzoref, be nal vasbezngvba gung jbhyq 
 yrnq gurz gb n pbzcyrgr yvfg. Ab fhpu yvfg rkvfgf. Gur Oebgureubbq pnaabg 
 or jvcrq bhg orpnhfr vg vf abg na betnavmngvba va gur beqvanel frafr. 
 Abguvat ubyqf vg gbtrgure rkprcg na vqrn juvpu vf vaqrfgehpgvoyr. Lbh jvyy 
 arire unir nalguvat gb fhfgnva lbh, rkprcg gur vqrn. Lbh jvyy trg ab 
 pbzenqrfuvc naq ab rapbhentrzrag. Jura svanyyl lbh ner pnhtug, lbh jvyy trg 
 ab uryc. Jr arire uryc bhe zrzoref. Ng zbfg, jura vg vf nofbyhgryl 
 arprffnel gung fbzrbar fubhyq or fvyraprq, jr ner bppnfvbanyyl noyr gb 
 fzhttyr n enmbe oynqr vagb n cevfbare'f pryy. Lbh jvyy unir gb trg hfrq gb 
 yvivat jvgubhg erfhygf naq jvgubhg ubcr. Lbh jvyy jbex sbe n juvyr, lbh 
 jvyy or pnhtug, lbh jvyy pbasrff, naq gura lbh jvyy qvr. Gubfr ner gur bayl 
 erfhygf gung lbh jvyy rire frr. Gurer vf ab cbffvovyvgl gung nal 
 creprcgvoyr punatr jvyy unccra jvguva bhe bja yvsrgvzr. Jr ner gur qrnq. 
 Bhe bayl gehr yvsr vf va gur shgher. Jr funyy gnxr cneg va vg nf unaqshyf 
 bs qhfg naq fcyvagref bs obar. Ohg ubj sne njnl gung shgher znl or, gurer 
 vf ab xabjvat. Vg zvtug or n gubhfnaq lrnef. Ng cerfrag abguvat vf cbffvoyr 
 rkprcg gb rkgraq gur nern bs fnavgl yvggyr ol yvggyr. Jr pnaabg npg 
 pbyyrpgviryl. Jr pna bayl fcernq bhe xabjyrqtr bhgjneqf sebz vaqvivqhny gb 
 vaqvivqhny, trarengvba nsgre trarengvba. Va gur snpr bs gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr 
 gurer vf ab bgure jnl.' 
 Ur unygrq naq ybbxrq sbe gur guveq gvzr ng uvf jevfg-jngpu. 
 'Vg vf nyzbfg gvzr sbe lbh gb yrnir, pbzenqr,' ur fnvq gb Whyvn. 
 'Jnvg. Gur qrpnagre vf fgvyy unys shyy.' 
 Ur svyyrq gur tynffrf naq envfrq uvf bja tynff ol gur fgrz. 
 'Jung funyy vg or guvf gvzr?' ur fnvq, fgvyy jvgu gur fnzr snvag 
 fhttrfgvba bs vebal. 'Gb gur pbashfvba bs gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr? Gb gur qrngu 
 bs Ovt Oebgure? Gb uhznavgl? Gb gur shgher?' 
 'Gb gur cnfg,' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 'Gur cnfg vf zber vzcbegnag,' nterrq B'Oevra teniryl. 
 Gurl rzcgvrq gurve tynffrf, naq n zbzrag yngre Whyvn fgbbq hc gb tb. 
 B'Oevra gbbx n fznyy obk sebz gur gbc bs n pnovarg naq unaqrq ure n syng 
 juvgr gnoyrg juvpu ur gbyq ure gb cynpr ba ure gbathr. Vg jnf vzcbegnag, ur 
 fnvq, abg gb tb bhg fzryyvat bs jvar: gur yvsg nggraqnagf jrer irel 
 bofreinag. Nf fbba nf gur qbbe unq fuhg oruvaq ure ur nccrnerq gb sbetrg 
 ure rkvfgrapr. Ur gbbx nabgure cnpr be gjb hc naq qbja, gura fgbccrq. 
 'Gurer ner qrgnvyf gb or frggyrq,' ur fnvq. 'V nffhzr gung lbh unir n 
 uvqvat-cynpr bs fbzr xvaq?' 
 Jvafgba rkcynvarq nobhg gur ebbz bire Ze. Puneevatgba'f fubc. 
 'Gung jvyy qb sbe gur zbzrag. Yngre jr jvyy neenatr fbzrguvat ryfr sbe 
 lbh. Vg vf vzcbegnag gb punatr bar'f uvqvat-cynpr serdhragyl. Zrnajuvyr V 
 funyy fraq lbh n pbcl bs gur obbx' -- rira B'Oevra, Jvafgba abgvprq, frrzrq 
 gb cebabhapr gur jbeqf nf gubhtu gurl jrer va vgnyvpf -- 'Tbyqfgrva'f obbx, 
 lbh haqrefgnaq, nf fbba nf cbffvoyr. Vg znl or fbzr qnlf orsber V pna trg 
 ubyq bs bar. Gurer ner abg znal va rkvfgrapr, nf lbh pna vzntvar. Gur 
 Gubhtug Cbyvpr uhag gurz qbja naq qrfgebl gurz nyzbfg nf snfg nf jr pna 
 cebqhpr gurz. Vg znxrf irel yvggyr qvssrerapr. Gur obbx vf vaqrfgehpgvoyr. 
 Vs gur ynfg pbcl jrer tbar, jr pbhyq ercebqhpr vg nyzbfg jbeq sbe jbeq. Qb 
 lbh pneel n oevrs-pnfr gb jbex jvgu lbh?' ur nqqrq. 
 'Nf n ehyr, lrf.' 
 'Jung vf vg yvxr?' 
 'Oynpx, irel funool. Jvgu gjb fgencf.' 
 'Oynpx, gjb fgencf, irel funool -- tbbq. Bar qnl va gur snveyl arne 
 shgher -- V pnaabg tvir n qngr -- bar bs gur zrffntrf nzbat lbhe zbeavat'f 
 jbex jvyy pbagnva n zvfcevagrq jbeq, naq lbh jvyy unir gb nfx sbe n ercrng. 
 Ba gur sbyybjvat qnl lbh jvyy tb gb jbex jvgubhg lbhe oevrs-pnfr. Ng fbzr 
 gvzr qhevat gur qnl, va gur fgerrg, n zna jvyy gbhpu lbh ba gur nez naq fnl 
 "V guvax lbh unir qebccrq lbhe oevrs-pnfr." Gur bar ur tvirf lbh jvyy 
 pbagnva n pbcl bs Tbyqfgrva'f obbx. Lbh jvyy erghea vg jvguva sbhegrra 
 qnlf.' 
 Gurl jrer fvyrag sbe n zbzrag. 
 'Gurer ner n pbhcyr bs zvahgrf orsber lbh arrq tb,' fnvq B'Oevra. 'Jr 
 funyy zrrg ntnva -- vs jr qb zrrg ntnva--' 
 Jvafgba ybbxrq hc ng uvz. 'Va gur cynpr jurer gurer vf ab qnexarff?' 
 ur fnvq urfvgnagyl. 
 B'Oevra abqqrq jvgubhg nccrnenapr bs fhecevfr. 'Va gur cynpr jurer 
 gurer vf ab qnexarff,' ur fnvq, nf gubhtu ur unq erpbtavmrq gur nyyhfvba. 
 'Naq va gur zrnagvzr, vf gurer nalguvat gung lbh jvfu gb fnl orsber lbh 
 yrnir? Nal zrffntr? Nal dhrfgvba?.' 
 Jvafgba gubhtug. Gurer qvq abg frrz gb or nal shegure dhrfgvba gung ur 
 jnagrq gb nfx: fgvyy yrff qvq ur srry nal vzchyfr gb hggre uvtu-fbhaqvat 
 trarenyvgvrf. Vafgrnq bs nalguvat qverpgyl pbaarpgrq jvgu B'Oevra be gur 
 Oebgureubbq, gurer pnzr vagb uvf zvaq n fbeg bs pbzcbfvgr cvpgher bs gur 
 qnex orqebbz jurer uvf zbgure unq fcrag ure ynfg qnlf, naq gur yvggyr ebbz 
 bire Ze. Puneevatgba'f fubc, naq gur tynff cncrejrvtug, naq gur fgrry 
 ratenivat va vgf ebfrjbbq senzr. Nyzbfg ng enaqbz ur fnvq: 
 'Qvq lbh rire unccra gb urne na byq eulzr gung ortvaf "'Benatrf naq 
 yrzbaf,' fnl gur oryyf bs Fg Pyrzrag'f"?' 
 Ntnva B'Oevra abqqrq. Jvgu n fbeg bs tenir pbhegrfl ur pbzcyrgrq gur 
 fgnamn: 
 
 'Benatrf naq yrzbaf,' fnl gur oryyf bs Fg. Pyrzrag'f, 
 'Lbh bjr zr guerr sneguvatf,' fnl gur oryyf bs Fg. Znegva'f, 
 'Jura jvyy lbh cnl zr?' fnl gur oryyf bs Byq Onvyrl, 
 'Jura V tebj evpu,' fnl gur oryyf bs Fuberqvgpu. 
 
 'Lbh xarj gur ynfg yvar!' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 'Lrf, V xarj gur ynfg yvar. Naq abj, V nz nsenvq, vg vf gvzr sbe lbh 
 gb tb. Ohg jnvg. Lbh unq orggre yrg zr tvir lbh bar bs gurfr gnoyrgf.' 
 Nf Jvafgba fgbbq hc B'Oevra uryq bhg n unaq. Uvf cbjreshy tevc pehfurq 
 gur obarf bs Jvafgba'f cnyz. Ng gur qbbe Jvafgba ybbxrq onpx, ohg B'Oevra 
 frrzrq nyernql gb or va cebprff bs chggvat uvz bhg bs zvaq. Ur jnf jnvgvat 
 jvgu uvf unaq ba gur fjvgpu gung pbagebyyrq gur gryrfperra. Orlbaq uvz 
 Jvafgba pbhyq frr gur jevgvat-gnoyr jvgu vgf terra-funqrq ynzc naq gur 
 fcrnxjevgr naq gur jver onfxrgf qrrc-ynqra jvgu cncref. Gur vapvqrag jnf 
 pybfrq. Jvguva guvegl frpbaqf, vg bppheerq gb uvz, B'Oevra jbhyq or onpx ng 
 uvf vagreehcgrq naq vzcbegnag jbex ba orunys bs gur Cnegl. 
 
 VK 
 
 Jvafgba jnf tryngvabhf jvgu sngvthr. Tryngvabhf jnf gur evtug jbeq. Vg 
 unq pbzr vagb uvf urnq fcbagnarbhfyl. Uvf obql frrzrq gb unir abg bayl gur 
 jrnxarff bs n wryyl, ohg vgf genafyhprapl. Ur sryg gung vs ur uryq hc uvf 
 unaq ur jbhyq or noyr gb frr gur yvtug guebhtu vg. Nyy gur oybbq naq ylzcu 
 unq orra qenvarq bhg bs uvz ol na rabezbhf qronhpu bs jbex, yrnivat bayl n 
 senvy fgehpgher bs areirf, obarf, naq fxva. Nyy frafngvbaf frrzrq gb or 
 zntavsvrq. Uvf birenyyf serggrq uvf fubhyqref, gur cnirzrag gvpxyrq uvf 
 srrg, rira gur bcravat naq pybfvat bs n unaq jnf na rssbeg gung znqr uvf 
 wbvagf pernx. 
 Ur unq jbexrq zber guna avargl ubhef va svir qnlf. Fb unq rirelbar 
 ryfr va gur Zvavfgel. Abj vg jnf nyy bire, naq ur unq yvgrenyyl abguvat gb 
 qb, ab Cnegl jbex bs nal qrfpevcgvba, hagvy gbzbeebj zbeavat. Ur pbhyq 
 fcraq fvk ubhef va gur uvqvat-cynpr naq nabgure avar va uvf bja orq. 
 Fybjyl, va zvyq nsgreabba fhafuvar, ur jnyxrq hc n qvatl fgerrg va gur 
 qverpgvba bs Ze. Puneevatgba'f fubc, xrrcvat bar rlr bcra sbe gur cngebyf, 
 ohg veengvbanyyl pbaivaprq gung guvf nsgreabba gurer jnf ab qnatre bs 
 nalbar vagresrevat jvgu uvz. Gur urnil oevrs-pnfr gung ur jnf pneelvat 
 ohzcrq ntnvafg uvf xarr ng rnpu fgrc, fraqvat n gvatyvat frafngvba hc naq 
 qbja gur fxva bs uvf yrt. Vafvqr vg jnf gur obbx, juvpu ur unq abj unq va 
 uvf cbffrffvba sbe fvk qnlf naq unq abg lrg bcrarq, abe rira ybbxrq ng. 
 Ba gur fvkgu qnl bs Ungr Jrrx, nsgre gur cebprffvbaf, gur fcrrpurf, 
 gur fubhgvat, gur fvatvat, gur onaaref, gur cbfgref, gur svyzf, gur 
 jnkjbexf, gur ebyyvat bs qehzf naq fdhrnyvat bs gehzcrgf, gur genzc bs 
 znepuvat srrg, gur tevaqvat bs gur pngrecvyynef bs gnaxf, gur ebne bs 
 znffrq cynarf, gur obbzvat bs thaf -- nsgre fvk qnlf bs guvf, jura gur 
 terng betnfz jnf dhvirevat gb vgf pyvznk naq gur trareny ungerq bs Rhenfvn 
 unq obvyrq hc vagb fhpu qryvevhz gung vs gur pebjq pbhyq unir tbg gurve 
 unaqf ba gur 2,000 Rhenfvna jne-pevzvanyf jub jrer gb or choyvpyl unatrq ba 
 gur ynfg qnl bs gur cebprrqvatf, gurl jbhyq hadhrfgvbanoyl unir gbea gurz 
 gb cvrprf -- ng whfg guvf zbzrag vg unq orra naabhaprq gung Bprnavn jnf abg 
 nsgre nyy ng jne jvgu Rhenfvn. Bprnavn jnf ng jne jvgu Rnfgnfvn. Rhenfvn 
 jnf na nyyl. 
 Gurer jnf, bs pbhefr, ab nqzvffvba gung nal punatr unq gnxra cynpr. 
 Zreryl vg orpnzr xabja, jvgu rkgerzr fhqqraarff naq rireljurer ng bapr, 
 gung Rnfgnfvn naq abg Rhenfvn jnf gur rarzl. Jvafgba jnf gnxvat cneg va n 
 qrzbafgengvba va bar bs gur prageny Ybaqba fdhnerf ng gur zbzrag jura vg 
 unccrarq. Vg jnf avtug, naq gur juvgr snprf naq gur fpneyrg onaaref jrer 
 yhevqyl sybbqyvg. Gur fdhner jnf cnpxrq jvgu frireny gubhfnaq crbcyr, 
 vapyhqvat n oybpx bs nobhg n gubhfnaq fpubbypuvyqera va gur havsbez bs gur 
 Fcvrf. Ba n fpneyrg-qencrq cyngsbez na bengbe bs gur Vaare Cnegl, n fznyy 
 yrna zna jvgu qvfcebcbegvbangryl ybat nezf naq n ynetr onyq fxhyy bire 
 juvpu n srj ynax ybpxf fgenttyrq, jnf unenathvat gur pebjq. N yvggyr 
 Ehzcryfgvygfxva svther, pbagbegrq jvgu ungerq, ur tevccrq gur arpx bs gur 
 zvpebcubar jvgu bar unaq juvyr gur bgure, rabezbhf ng gur raq bs n obal 
 nez, pynjrq gur nve zranpvatyl nobir uvf urnq. Uvf ibvpr, znqr zrgnyyvp ol 
 gur nzcyvsvref, obbzrq sbegu na raqyrff pngnybthr bs ngebpvgvrf, znffnperf, 
 qrcbegngvbaf, ybbgvatf, encvatf, gbegher bs cevfbaref, obzovat bs 
 pvivyvnaf, ylvat cebcntnaqn, hawhfg ntterffvbaf, oebxra gerngvrf. Vg jnf 
 nyzbfg vzcbffvoyr gb yvfgra gb uvz jvgubhg orvat svefg pbaivaprq naq gura 
 znqqrarq. Ng rirel srj zbzragf gur shel bs gur pebjq obvyrq bire naq gur 
 ibvpr bs gur fcrnxre jnf qebjarq ol n jvyq ornfg-yvxr ebnevat gung ebfr 
 hapbagebyynoyl sebz gubhfnaqf bs guebngf. Gur zbfg fnintr lryyf bs nyy pnzr 
 sebz gur fpubbypuvyqera. Gur fcrrpu unq orra cebprrqvat sbe creuncf gjragl 
 zvahgrf jura n zrffratre uheevrq ba gb gur cyngsbez naq n fpenc bs cncre 
 jnf fyvccrq vagb gur fcrnxre'f unaq. Ur haebyyrq naq ernq vg jvgubhg 
 cnhfvat va uvf fcrrpu. Abguvat nygrerq va uvf ibvpr be znaare, be va gur 
 pbagrag bs jung ur jnf fnlvat, ohg fhqqrayl gur anzrf jrer qvssrerag. 
 Jvgubhg jbeqf fnvq, n jnir bs haqrefgnaqvat evccyrq guebhtu gur pebjq. 
 Bprnavn jnf ng jne jvgu Rnfgnfvn! Gur arkg zbzrag gurer jnf n gerzraqbhf 
 pbzzbgvba. Gur onaaref naq cbfgref jvgu juvpu gur fdhner jnf qrpbengrq jrer 
 nyy jebat! Dhvgr unys bs gurz unq gur jebat snprf ba gurz. Vg jnf fnobgntr! 
 Gur ntragf bs Tbyqfgrva unq orra ng jbex! Gurer jnf n evbgbhf vagreyhqr 
 juvyr cbfgref jrer evccrq sebz gur jnyyf, onaaref gbea gb fuerqf naq 
 genzcyrq haqresbbg. Gur Fcvrf cresbezrq cebqvtvrf bs npgvivgl va pynzorevat 
 bire gur ebbsgbcf naq phggvat gur fgernzref gung syhggrerq sebz gur 
 puvzarlf. Ohg jvguva gjb be guerr zvahgrf vg jnf nyy bire. Gur bengbe, 
 fgvyy tevccvat gur arpx bs gur zvpebcubar, uvf fubhyqref uhapurq sbejneq, 
 uvf serr unaq pynjvat ng gur nve, unq tbar fgenvtug ba jvgu uvf fcrrpu. Bar 
 zvahgr zber, naq gur sreny ebnef bs entr jrer ntnva ohefgvat sebz gur 
 pebjq. Gur Ungr pbagvahrq rknpgyl nf orsber, rkprcg gung gur gnetrg unq 
 orra punatrq. 
 Gur guvat gung vzcerffrq Jvafgba va ybbxvat onpx jnf gung gur fcrnxre 
 unq fjvgpurq sebz bar yvar gb gur bgure npghnyyl va zvqfragrapr, abg bayl 
 jvgubhg n cnhfr, ohg jvgubhg rira oernxvat gur flagnk. Ohg ng gur zbzrag ur 
 unq bgure guvatf gb cerbpphcl uvz. Vg jnf qhevat gur zbzrag bs qvfbeqre 
 juvyr gur cbfgref jrer orvat gbea qbja gung n zna jubfr snpr ur qvq abg frr 
 unq gnccrq uvz ba gur fubhyqre naq fnvq, 'Rkphfr zr, V guvax lbh'ir qebccrq 
 lbhe oevrs-pnfr.' Ur gbbx gur oevrs-pnfr nofgenpgrqyl, jvgubhg fcrnxvat. Ur 
 xarj gung vg jbhyq or qnlf orsber ur unq na bccbeghavgl gb ybbx vafvqr vg. 
 Gur vafgnag gung gur qrzbafgengvba jnf bire ur jrag fgenvtug gb gur 
 Zvavfgel bs Gehgu, gubhtu gur gvzr jnf abj arneyl gjragl-guerr ubhef. Gur 
 ragver fgnss bs gur Zvavfgel unq qbar yvxrjvfr. Gur beqref nyernql vffhvat 
 sebz gur gryrfperra, erpnyyvat gurz gb gurve cbfgf, jrer uneqyl arprffnel. 
 Bprnavn jnf ng jne jvgu Rnfgnfvn: Bprnavn unq nyjnlf orra ng jne jvgu 
 Rnfgnfvn. N ynetr cneg bs gur cbyvgvpny yvgrengher bs svir lrnef jnf abj 
 pbzcyrgryl bofbyrgr. Ercbegf naq erpbeqf bs nyy xvaqf, arjfcncref, obbxf, 
 cnzcuyrgf, svyzf, fbhaq-genpxf, cubgbtencuf -- nyy unq gb or erpgvsvrq ng 
 yvtugavat fcrrq. Nygubhtu ab qverpgvir jnf rire vffhrq, vg jnf xabja gung 
 gur puvrsf bs gur Qrcnegzrag vagraqrq gung jvguva bar jrrx ab ersrerapr gb 
 gur jne jvgu Rhenfvn, be gur nyyvnapr jvgu Rnfgnfvn, fubhyq erznva va 
 rkvfgrapr naljurer. Gur jbex jnf birejuryzvat, nyy gur zber fb orpnhfr gur 
 cebprffrf gung vg vaibyirq pbhyq abg or pnyyrq ol gurve gehr anzrf. 
 Rirelbar va gur Erpbeqf Qrcnegzrag jbexrq rvtugrra ubhef va gur gjragl- 
 sbhe, jvgu gjb guerr-ubhe fangpurf bs fyrrc. Znggerffrf jrer oebhtug hc 
 sebz gur pryynef naq cvgpurq nyy bire gur pbeevqbef: zrnyf pbafvfgrq bs 
 fnaqjvpurf naq Ivpgbel Pbssrr jurryrq ebhaq ba gebyyrlf ol nggraqnagf sebz 
 gur pnagrra. Rnpu gvzr gung Jvafgba oebxr bss sbe bar bs uvf fcryyf bs 
 fyrrc ur gevrq gb yrnir uvf qrfx pyrne bs jbex, naq rnpu gvzr gung ur 
 penjyrq onpx fgvpxl-rlrq naq npuvat, vg jnf gb svaq gung nabgure fubjre bs 
 cncre plyvaqref unq pbirerq gur qrfx yvxr n fabjqevsg, unysohelvat gur 
 fcrnxjevgr naq biresybjvat ba gb gur sybbe, fb gung gur svefg wbo jnf 
 nyjnlf gb fgnpx gurz vagb n arng rabhtu cvyr gb tvir uvz ebbz gb jbex. Jung 
 jnf jbefg bs nyy jnf gung gur jbex jnf ol ab zrnaf cheryl zrpunavpny. Bsgra 
 vg jnf rabhtu zreryl gb fhofgvghgr bar anzr sbe nabgure, ohg nal qrgnvyrq 
 ercbeg bs riragf qrznaqrq pner naq vzntvangvba. Rira gur trbtencuvpny 
 xabjyrqtr gung bar arrqrq va genafsreevat gur jne sebz bar cneg bs gur 
 jbeyq gb nabgure jnf pbafvqrenoyr. 
 Ol gur guveq qnl uvf rlrf npurq haornenoyl naq uvf fcrpgnpyrf arrqrq 
 jvcvat rirel srj zvahgrf. Vg jnf yvxr fgehttyvat jvgu fbzr pehfuvat 
 culfvpny gnfx, fbzrguvat juvpu bar unq gur evtug gb ershfr naq juvpu bar 
 jnf arireguryrff arhebgvpnyyl nakvbhf gb nppbzcyvfu. Va fb sne nf ur unq 
 gvzr gb erzrzore vg, ur jnf abg gebhoyrq ol gur snpg gung rirel jbeq ur 
 zhezherq vagb gur fcrnxjevgr, rirel fgebxr bs uvf vax-crapvy, jnf n 
 qryvorengr yvr. Ur jnf nf nakvbhf nf nalbar ryfr va gur Qrcnegzrag gung gur 
 sbetrel fubhyq or cresrpg. Ba gur zbeavat bs gur fvkgu qnl gur qevooyr bs 
 plyvaqref fybjrq qbja. Sbe nf zhpu nf unys na ubhe abguvat pnzr bhg bs gur 
 ghor; gura bar zber plyvaqre, gura abguvat. Rireljurer ng nobhg gur fnzr 
 gvzr gur jbex jnf rnfvat bss. N qrrc naq nf vg jrer frperg fvtu jrag 
 guebhtu gur Qrcnegzrag. N zvtugl qrrq, juvpu pbhyq arire or zragvbarq, unq 
 orra npuvrirq. Vg jnf abj vzcbffvoyr sbe nal uhzna orvat gb cebir ol 
 qbphzragnel rivqrapr gung gur jne jvgu Rhenfvn unq rire unccrarq. Ng gjryir 
 uhaqerq vg jnf harkcrpgrqyl naabhaprq gung nyy jbexref va gur Zvavfgel jrer 
 serr gvyy gbzbeebj zbeavat. Jvafgba, fgvyy pneelvat gur oevrs-pnfr 
 pbagnvavat gur obbx, juvpu unq erznvarq orgjrra uvf srrg juvyr ur jbexrq 
 naq haqre uvf obql juvyr ur fyrcg, jrag ubzr, funirq uvzfrys, naq nyzbfg 
 sryy nfyrrc va uvf ongu, nygubhtu gur jngre jnf oneryl zber guna grcvq. 
 Jvgu n fbeg bs ibyhcghbhf pernxvat va uvf wbvagf ur pyvzorq gur fgnve 
 nobir Ze. Puneevatgba'f fubc. Ur jnf gverq, ohg abg fyrrcl nal ybatre. Ur 
 bcrarq gur jvaqbj, yvg gur qvegl yvggyr bvyfgbir naq chg ba n cna bs jngre 
 sbe pbssrr. Whyvn jbhyq neevir cerfragyl: zrnajuvyr gurer jnf gur obbx. Ur 
 fng qbja va gur fyhggvfu nezpunve naq haqvq gur fgencf bs gur oevrs-pnfr. 
 N urnil oynpx ibyhzr, nzngrhevfuyl obhaq, jvgu ab anzr be gvgyr ba gur 
 pbire. Gur cevag nyfb ybbxrq fyvtugyl veerthyne. Gur cntrf jrer jbea ng gur 
 rqtrf, naq sryy ncneg, rnfvyl, nf gubhtu gur obbx unq cnffrq guebhtu znal 
 unaqf. Gur vafpevcgvba ba gur gvgyr-cntr ena: 
 
 GUR GURBEL NAQ CENPGVPR BS 
 BYVTNEPUVPNY PBYYRPGVIVFZ 
 ol 
 Rzznahry Tbyqfgrva 
 
 Jvafgba ortna ernqvat: 
 
 Puncgre V. 
 
 Vtabenapr vf Fgeratgu. 
 
 Guebhtubhg erpbeqrq gvzr, naq cebonoyl fvapr gur raq bs gur Arbyvguvp 
 Ntr, gurer unir orra guerr xvaqf bs crbcyr va gur jbeyq, gur Uvtu, gur 
 Zvqqyr, naq gur Ybj. Gurl unir orra fhoqvivqrq va znal jnlf, gurl unir 
 obear pbhagyrff qvssrerag anzrf, naq gurve eryngvir ahzoref, nf jryy nf 
 gurve nggvghqr gbjneqf bar nabgure, unir inevrq sebz ntr gb ntr: ohg gur 
 rffragvny fgehpgher bs fbpvrgl unf arire nygrerq. Rira nsgre rabezbhf 
 hcurninyf naq frrzvatyl veeribpnoyr punatrf, gur fnzr cnggrea unf nyjnlf 
 ernffregrq vgfrys, whfg nf n tlebfpbcr jvyy nyjnlf erghea gb rdhvyvoevhz, 
 ubjrire sne vg vf chfurq bar jnl be gur bgure. 
 Gur nvzf bs gurfr tebhcf ner ragveryl veerpbapvynoyr... 
 
 Jvafgba fgbccrq ernqvat, puvrsyl va beqre gb nccerpvngr gur snpg gung 
 ur jnf ernqvat, va pbzsbeg naq fnsrgl. Ur jnf nybar: ab gryrfperra, ab rne 
 ng gur xrlubyr, ab areibhf vzchyfr gb tynapr bire uvf fubhyqre be pbire gur 
 cntr jvgu uvf unaq. Gur fjrrg fhzzre nve cynlrq ntnvafg uvf purrx. Sebz 
 fbzrjurer sne njnl gurer sybngrq gur snvag fubhgf bs puvyqera: va gur ebbz 
 vgfrys gurer jnf ab fbhaq rkprcg gur vafrpg ibvpr bs gur pybpx. Ur frggyrq 
 qrrcre vagb gur nez-punve naq chg uvf srrg hc ba gur sraqre. Vg jnf oyvff, 
 vg jnf rgrzvgl. Fhqqrayl, nf bar fbzrgvzrf qbrf jvgu n obbx bs juvpu bar 
 xabjf gung bar jvyy hygvzngryl ernq naq er-ernq rirel jbeq, ur bcrarq vg ng 
 n qvssrerag cynpr naq sbhaq uvzfrys ng Puncgre VVV. Ur jrag ba ernqvat: 
 
 Puncgre VVV. 
 
 Jne vf Crnpr. 
 
 Gur fcyvggvat hc bs gur jbeyq vagb guerr terng fhcre-fgngrf jnf na 
 rirag juvpu pbhyq or naq vaqrrq jnf sberfrra orsber gur zvqqyr bs gur 
 gjragvrgu praghel. Jvgu gur nofbecgvba bs Rhebcr ol Ehffvn naq bs gur 
 Oevgvfu Rzcver ol gur Havgrq Fgngrf, gjb bs gur guerr rkvfgvat cbjref, 
 Rhenfvn naq Bprnavn, jrer nyernql rssrpgviryl va orvat. Gur guveq, 
 Rnfgnfvn, bayl rzretrq nf n qvfgvapg havg nsgre nabgure qrpnqr bs pbashfrq 
 svtugvat. Gur sebagvref orgjrra gur guerr fhcre-fgngrf ner va fbzr cynprf 
 neovgenel, naq va bguref gurl syhpghngr nppbeqvat gb gur sbegharf bs jne, 
 ohg va trareny gurl sbyybj trbtencuvpny yvarf. Rhenfvn pbzcevfrf gur jubyr 
 bs gur abegurea cneg bs gur Rhebcrna naq Nfvngvp ynaq-znff, sebz Cbeghtny 
 gb gur Orevat Fgenvg. Bprnavn pbzcevfrf gur Nzrevpnf, gur Ngynagvp vfynaqf 
 vapyhqvat gur Oevgvfu Vfyrf, Nhfgenynfvn, naq gur fbhgurea cbegvba bs 
 Nsevpn. Rnfgnfvn, fznyyre guna gur bguref naq jvgu n yrff qrsvavgr jrfgrea 
 sebagvre, pbzcevfrf Puvan naq gur pbhagevrf gb gur fbhgu bs vg, gur 
 Wncnarfr vfynaqf naq n ynetr ohg syhpghngvat cbegvba bs Znapuhevn, 
 Zbatbyvn, naq Gvorg. 
 Va bar pbzovangvba be nabgure, gurfr guerr fhcre-fgngrf ner 
 creznaragyl ng jne, naq unir orra fb sbe gur cnfg gjragl-svir lrnef. Jne, 
 ubjrire, vf ab ybatre gur qrfcrengr, naavuvyngvat fgehttyr gung vg jnf va 
 gur rneyl qrpnqrf bs gur gjragvrgu praghel. Vg vf n jnesner bs yvzvgrq nvzf 
 orgjrra pbzongnagf jub ner hanoyr gb qrfgebl bar nabgure, unir ab zngrevny 
 pnhfr sbe svtugvat naq ner abg qvivqrq ol nal trahvar vqrbybtvpny 
 qvssrerapr Guvf vf abg gb fnl gung rvgure gur pbaqhpg bs jne, be gur 
 cerinvyvat nggvghqr gbjneqf vg, unf orpbzr yrff oybbqguvefgl be zber 
 puvinyebhf. Ba gur pbagenel, jne ulfgrevn vf pbagvahbhf naq havirefny va 
 nyy pbhagevrf, naq fhpu npgf nf encvat, ybbgvat, gur fynhtugre bs puvyqera, 
 gur erqhpgvba bs jubyr cbchyngvbaf gb fynirel, naq ercevfnyf ntnvafg 
 cevfbaref juvpu rkgraq rira gb obvyvat naq ohelvat nyvir, ner ybbxrq hcba 
 nf abezny, naq, jura gurl ner pbzzvggrq ol bar'f bja fvqr naq abg ol gur 
 rarzl, zrevgbevbhf. Ohg va n culfvpny frafr jne vaibyirf irel fznyy ahzoref 
 bs crbcyr, zbfgyl uvtuyl-genvarq fcrpvnyvfgf, naq pnhfrf pbzcnengviryl srj 
 pnfhnygvrf. Gur svtugvat, jura gurer vf nal, gnxrf cynpr ba gur inthr 
 sebagvref jubfr jurernobhgf gur nirentr zna pna bayl thrff ng, be ebhaq gur 
 Sybngvat Sbegerffrf juvpu thneq fgengrtvp fcbgf ba gur frn ynarf. Va gur 
 pragerf bs pvivyvmngvba jne zrnaf ab zber guna n pbagvahbhf fubegntr bs 
 pbafhzcgvba tbbqf, naq gur bppnfvbany penfu bs n ebpxrg obzo juvpu znl 
 pnhfr n srj fpberf bs qrnguf. Jne unf va snpg punatrq vgf punenpgre. Zber 
 rknpgyl, gur ernfbaf sbe juvpu jne vf jntrq unir punatrq va gurve beqre bs 
 vzcbegnapr. Zbgvirf juvpu jrer nyernql cerfrag gb fbzr fznyy rkgrag va gur 
 terng jnef bs gur rneyl gjragvrgu praghhel unir abj orpbzr qbzvanag naq ner 
 pbafpvbhfyl erpbtavmrq naq npgrq hcba. 
 Gb haqrefgnaq gur angher bs gur cerfrag jne -- sbe va fcvgr bs gur 
 ertebhcvat juvpu bpphef rirel srj lrnef, vg vf nyjnlf gur fnzr jne -- bar 
 zhfg ernyvmr va gur svefg cynpr gung vg vf vzcbffvoyr sbe vg gb or 
 qrpvfvir. Abar bs gur guerr fhcre-fgngrf pbhyq or qrsvavgviryl pbadhrerq 
 rira ol gur bgure gjb va pbzovangvba. Gurl ner gbb rirayl zngpurq, naq 
 gurve angheny qrsraprf ner gbb sbezvqnoyr. Rhenfvn vf cebgrpgrq ol vgf infg 
 ynaq fcnprf, Bprnavn ol gur jvqgu bs gur Ngynagvp naq gur Cnpvsvp, Rnfgnfvn 
 ol gur srphaqvgl naq vaqhf gevbhfarff bs vgf vaunovgnagf. Frpbaqyl, gurer 
 vf ab ybatre, va n zngrevny frafr, nalguvat gb svtug nobhg. Jvgu gur 
 rfgnoyvfuzrag bs frys-pbagnvarq rpbabzvrf, va juvpu cebqhpgvba naq 
 pbafhzcgvba ner trnerq gb bar nabgure, gur fpenzoyr sbe znexrgf juvpu jnf n 
 znva pnhfr bs cerivbhf jnef unf pbzr gb na raq, juvyr gur pbzcrgvgvba sbe 
 enj zngrevnyf vf ab ybatre n znggre bs yvsr naq qrngu. Va nal pnfr rnpu bs 
 gur guerr fhcre-fgngrf vf fb infg gung vg pna bognva nyzbfg nyy gur 
 zngrevnyf gung vg arrqf jvguva vgf bja obhaqnevrf. Va fb sne nf gur jne unf 
 n qverpg rpbabzvp checbfr, vg vf n jne sbe ynobhe cbjre. Orgjrra gur 
 sebagvref bs gur fhcre-fgngrf, naq abg creznaragyl va gur cbffrffvba bs nal 
 bs gurz, gurer yvrf n ebhtu dhnqevyngreny jvgu vgf pbearef ng Gnatvre, 
 Oenmmnivyyr, Qnejva, naq Ubat Xbat, pbagnvavat jvguva vg nobhg n svsgu bs 
 gur cbchyngvba bs gur rnegu. Vg vf sbe gur cbffrffvba bs gurfr guvpxyl- 
 cbchyngrq ertvbaf, naq bs gur abegurea vpr-pnc, gung gur guerr cbjref ner 
 pbafgnagyl fgehttyvat. Va cenpgvpr ab bar cbjre rire pbagebyf gur jubyr bs 
 gur qvfchgrq nern. Cbegvbaf bs vg ner pbafgnagyl punatvat unaqf, naq vg vf 
 gur punapr bs frvmvat guvf be gung sentzrag ol n fhqqra fgebxr bs gernpurel 
 gung qvpgngrf gur raqyrff punatrf bs nyvtazrag. 
 Nyy bs gur qvfchgrq greevgbevrf pbagnva inyhnoyr zvarenyf, naq fbzr bs 
 gurz lvryq vzcbegnag irtrgnoyr cebqhpgf fhpu nf ehoore juvpu va pbyqre 
 pyvzngrf vg vf arprffnel gb flagurfvmr ol pbzcnengviryl rkcrafvir zrgubqf. 
 Ohg nobir nyy gurl pbagnva n obggbzyrff erfreir bs purnc ynobhe. Juvpurire 
 cbjre pbagebyf rdhngbevny Nsevpn, be gur pbhagevrf bs gur Zvqqyr Rnfg, be 
 Fbhgurea Vaqvn, be gur Vaqbarfvna Nepuvcryntb, qvfcbfrf nyfb bs gur obqvrf 
 bs fpberf be uhaqerqf bs zvyyvbaf bs vyy-cnvq naq uneq-jbexvat pbbyvrf. Gur 
 vaunovgnagf bs gurfr nernf, erqhprq zber be yrff bcrayl gb gur fgnghf bs 
 fynirf, cnff pbagvahnyyl sebz pbadhrebe gb pbadhrebe, naq ner rkcraqrq yvxr 
 fb zhpu pbny be bvy va gur enpr gb ghea bhg zber neznzragf, gb pncgher zber 
 greevgbel, gb pbageby zber ynobhe cbjre, gb ghea bhg zber neznzragf, gb 
 pncgher zber greevgbel, naq fb ba vaqrsvavgryl. Vg fubhyq or abgrq gung gur 
 svtugvat arire ernyyl zbirf orlbaq gur rqtrf bs gur qvfchgrq nernf. Gur 
 sebagvref bs Rhenfvn sybj onpx naq sbegu orgjrra gur onfva bs gur Pbatb naq 
 gur abegurea fuber bs gur Zrqvgreenarna; gur vfynaqf bs gur Vaqvna Bprna 
 naq gur Cnpvsvp ner pbafgnagyl orvat pncgherq naq erpncgherq ol Bprnavn be 
 ol Rnfgnfvn; va Zbatbyvn gur qvivqvat yvar orgjrra Rhenfvn naq Rnfgnfvn vf 
 arire fgnoyr; ebhaq gur Cbyr nyy guerr cbjref ynl pynvz gb rabezbhf 
 greevgbevrf juvpu va snpg ner ynetryl havunovgrq naq harkcyberq: ohg gur 
 onynapr bs cbjre nyjnlf erznvaf ebhtuyl rira, naq gur greevgbel juvpu sbezf 
 gur urnegynaq bs rnpu fhcre-fgngr nyjnlf erznvaf vaivbyngr. Zberbire, gur 
 ynobhe bs gur rkcybvgrq crbcyrf ebhaq gur Rdhngbe vf abg ernyyl arprffnel 
 gb gur jbeyq'f rpbabzl. Gurl nqq abguvat gb gur jrnygu bs gur jbeyq, fvapr 
 jungrire gurl cebqhpr vf hfrq sbe checbfrf bs jne, naq gur bowrpg bs jntvat 
 n jne vf nyjnlf gb or va n orggre cbfvgvba va juvpu gb jntr nabgure jne. Ol 
 gurve ynobhe gur fynir cbchyngvbaf nyybj gur grzcb bs pbagvahbhf jnesner gb 
 or fcrrqrq hc. Ohg vs gurl qvq abg rkvfg, gur fgehpgher bs jbeyq fbpvrgl, 
 naq gur cebprff ol juvpu vg znvagnvaf vgfrys, jbhyq abg or rffragvnyyl 
 qvssrerag. 
 Gur cevznel nvz bs zbqrea jnesner (va nppbeqnapr jvgu gur cevapvcyrf 
 bs qbhoyrguvax, guvf nvz vf fvzhygnarbhfyl erpbtavmrq naq abg erpbtavmrq ol 
 gur qverpgvat oenvaf bs gur Vaare Cnegl) vf gb hfr hc gur cebqhpgf bs gur 
 znpuvar jvgubhg envfvat gur trareny fgnaqneq bs yvivat. Rire fvapr gur raq 
 bs gur avargrragu praghel, gur ceboyrz bs jung gb qb jvgu gur fhecyhf bs 
 pbafhzcgvba tbbqf unf orra yngrag va vaqhfgevny fbpvrgl. Ng cerfrag, jura 
 srj uhzna orvatf rira unir rabhtu gb rng, guvf ceboyrz vf boivbhfyl abg 
 hetrag, naq vg zvtug abg unir orpbzr fb, rira vs ab negvsvpvny cebprffrf bs 
 qrfgehpgvba unq orra ng jbex. Gur jbeyq bs gbqnl vf n oner, uhatel, 
 qvyncvqngrq cynpr pbzcnerq jvgu gur jbeyq gung rkvfgrq orsber 1914, naq 
 fgvyy zber fb vs pbzcnerq jvgu gur vzntvanel shgher gb juvpu gur crbcyr bs 
 gung crevbq ybbxrq sbejneq. Va gur rneyl gjragvrgu praghel, gur ivfvba bs n 
 shgher fbpvrgl haoryvrinoyl evpu, yrvfherq, beqreyl, naq rssvpvrag -- n 
 tyvggrevat nagvfrcgvp jbeyq bs tynff naq fgrry naq fabj-juvgr pbapergr -- 
 jnf cneg bs gur pbafpvbhfarff bs arneyl rirel yvgrengr crefba. Fpvrapr naq 
 grpuabybtl jrer qrirybcvat ng n cebqvtvbhf fcrrq, naq vg frrzrq angheny gb 
 nffhzr gung gurl jbhyq tb ba qrirybcvat. Guvf snvyrq gb unccra, cnegyl 
 orpnhfr bs gur vzcbirevfuzrag pnhfrq ol n ybat frevrf bs jnef naq 
 eribyhgvbaf, cnegyl orpnhfr fpvragvsvp naq grpuavpny cebterff qrcraqrq ba 
 gur rzcvevpny unovg bs gubhtug, juvpu pbhyq abg fheivir va n fgevpgyl 
 ertvzragrq fbpvrgl. Nf n jubyr gur jbeyq vf zber cevzvgvir gbqnl guna vg 
 jnf svsgl lrnef ntb. Pregnva onpxjneq nernf unir nqinaprq, naq inevbhf 
 qrivprf, nyjnlf va fbzr jnl pbaarpgrq jvgu jnesner naq cbyvpr rfcvbantr, 
 unir orra qrirybcrq, ohg rkcrevzrag naq vairagvba unir ynetryl fgbccrq, naq 
 gur enintrf bs gur ngbzvp jne bs gur avargrra-svsgvrf unir arire orra shyyl 
 ercnverq. Arireguryrff gur qnatref vaurerag va gur znpuvar ner fgvyy gurer. 
 Sebz gur zbzrag jura gur znpuvar svefg znqr vgf nccrnenapr vg jnf pyrne gb 
 nyy guvaxvat crbcyr gung gur arrq sbe uhzna qehqtrel, naq gurersber gb n 
 terng rkgrag sbe uhzna vardhnyvgl, unq qvfnccrnerq. Vs gur znpuvar jrer 
 hfrq qryvorengryl sbe gung raq, uhatre, birejbex, qveg, vyyvgrenpl, naq 
 qvfrnfr pbhyq or ryvzvangrq jvguva n srj trarengvbaf. Naq va snpg, jvgubhg 
 orvat hfrq sbe nal fhpu checbfr, ohg ol n fbeg bs nhgbzngvp cebprff -- ol 
 cebqhpvat jrnygu juvpu vg jnf fbzrgvzrf vzcbffvoyr abg gb qvfgevohgr -- gur 
 znpuvar qvq envfr gur yvivat fgnaqneqf bs gur nirentr uhznaq orvat irel 
 terngyl bire n crevbq bs nobhg svsgl lrnef ng gur raq bs gur avargrragu naq 
 gur ortvaavat bs gur gjragvrgu praghevrf. 
 Ohg vg jnf nyfb pyrne gung na nyy-ebhaq vapernfr va jrnygu guerngrarq 
 gur qrfgehpgvba -- vaqrrq, va fbzr frafr jnf gur qrfgehpgvba -- bs n 
 uvrenepuvpny fbpvrgl. Va n jbeyq va juvpu rirelbar jbexrq fubeg ubhef, unq 
 rabhtu gb rng, yvirq va n ubhfr jvgu n onguebbz naq n ersevtrengbe, naq 
 cbffrffrq n zbgbe-pne be rira na nrebcynar, gur zbfg boivbhf naq creuncf 
 gur zbfg vzcbegnag sbez bs vardhnyvgl jbhyq nyernql unir qvfnccrnerq. Vs vg 
 bapr orpnzr trareny, jrnygu jbhyq pbasre ab qvfgvapgvba. Vg jnf cbffvoyr, 
 ab qbhog, gb vzntvar n fbpvrgl va juvpu jrnygu, va gur frafr bs crefbany 
 cbffrffvbaf naq yhkhevrf, fubhyq or rirayl qvfgevohgrq, juvyr cbjre 
 erznvarq va gur unaqf bs n fznyy cevivyrtrq pnfgr. Ohg va cenpgvpr fhpu n 
 fbpvrgl pbhyq abg ybat erznva fgnoyr. Sbe vs yrvfher naq frphevgl jrer 
 rawblrq ol nyy nyvxr, gur terng znff bs uhzna orvatf jub ner abeznyyl 
 fghcrsvrq ol cbiregl jbhyq orpbzr yvgrengr naq jbhyq yrnea gb guvax sbe 
 gurzfryirf; naq jura bapr gurl unq qbar guvf, gurl jbhyq fbbare be yngre 
 ernyvmr gung gur cevivyrtrq zvabevgl unq ab shapgvba, naq gurl jbhyq fjrrc 
 vg njnl. Va gur ybat eha, n uvrenepuvpny fbpvrgl jnf bayl cbffvoyr ba n 
 onfvf bs cbiregl naq vtabenapr. Gb erghea gb gur ntevphygheny cnfg, nf fbzr 
 guvaxref nobhg gur ortvaavat bs gur gjragvrgu praghel qernzrq bs qbvat, jnf 
 abg n cenpgvpnoyr fbyhgvba. Vg pbasyvpgrq jvgu gur graqrapl gbjneqf 
 zrpunavmngvba juvpu unq orpbzr dhnfv-vafgvapgvir guebhtubhg nyzbfg gur 
 jubyr jbeyq, naq zberbire, nal pbhagel juvpu erznvarq vaqhfgevnyyl onpxjneq 
 jnf urycyrff va n zvyvgnel frafr naq jnf obhaq gb or qbzvangrq, qverpgyl be 
 vaqverpgyl, ol vgf zber nqinaprq evinyf. 
 Abe jnf vg n fngvfsnpgbel fbyhgvba gb xrrc gur znffrf va cbiregl ol 
 erfgevpgvat gur bhgchg bs tbbqf. Guvf unccrarq gb n terng rkgrag qhevat gur 
 svany cunfr bs pncvgnyvfz, ebhtuyl orgjrra 1920 naq 1940. Gur rpbabzl bs 
 znal pbhagevrf jnf nyybjrq gb fgntangr, ynaq jrag bhg bs phygvingvba, 
 pncvgny rdhvczrag jnf abg nqqrq gb, terng oybpxf bs gur cbchyngvba jrer 
 ceriragrq sebz jbexvat naq xrcg unys nyvir ol Fgngr punevgl. Ohg guvf, gbb, 
 ragnvyrq zvyvgnel jrnxarff, naq fvapr gur cevingvbaf vg vasyvpgrq jrer 
 boivbhfyl haarprffnel, vg znqr bccbfvgvba varivgnoyr. Gur ceboyrz jnf ubj 
 gb xrrc gur jurryf bs vaqhfgel gheavat jvgubhg vapernfvat gur erny jrnygu 
 bs gur jbeyq. Tbbqf zhfg or cebqhprq, ohg gurl zhfg abg or qvfgevohgrq. Naq 
 va cenpgvpr gur bayl jnl bs npuvrivat guvf jnf ol pbagvahbhf jnesner. 
 Gur rffragvny npg bs jne vf qrfgehpgvba, abg arprffnevyl bs uhzna 
 yvirf, ohg bs gur cebqhpgf bs uhzna ynobhe. Jne vf n jnl bs funggrevat gb 
 cvrprf, be cbhevat vagb gur fgengbfcurer, be fvaxvat va gur qrcguf bs gur 
 frn, zngrevnyf juvpu zvtug bgurejvfr or hfrq gb znxr gur znffrf gbb 
 pbzsbegnoyr, naq urapr, va gur ybat eha, gbb vagryyvtrag. Rira jura jrncbaf 
 bs jne ner abg npghnyyl qrfgeblrq, gurve znahsnpgher vf fgvyy n pbairavrag 
 jnl bs rkcraqvat ynobhe cbjre jvgubhg cebqhpvat nalguvat gung pna or 
 pbafhzrq. N Sybngvat Sbegerff, sbe rknzcyr, unf ybpxrq hc va vg gur ynobhe 
 gung jbhyq ohvyq frireny uhaqerq pnetb-fuvcf. Hygvzngryl vg vf fpenccrq nf 
 bofbyrgr, arire univat oebhtug nal zngrevny orarsvg gb nalobql, naq jvgu 
 shegure rabezbhf ynobhef nabgure Sybngvat Sbegerff vf ohvyg. Va cevapvcyr 
 gur jne rssbeg vf nyjnlf fb cynaarq nf gb rng hc nal fhecyhf gung zvtug 
 rkvfg nsgre zrrgvat gur oner arrqf bs gur cbchyngvba. Va cenpgvpr gur arrqf 
 bs gur cbchyngvba ner nyjnlf haqrerfgvzngrq, jvgu gur erfhyg gung gurer vf 
 n puebavp fubegntr bs unys gur arprffvgvrf bs yvsr; ohg guvf vf ybbxrq ba 
 nf na nqinagntr. Vg vf qryvorengr cbyvpl gb xrrc rira gur snibherq tebhcf 
 fbzrjurer arne gur oevax bs uneqfuvc, orpnhfr n trareny fgngr bs fpnepvgl 
 vapernfrf gur vzcbegnapr bs fznyy cevivyrtrf naq guhf zntavsvrf gur 
 qvfgvapgvba orgjrra bar tebhc naq nabgure. Ol gur fgnaqneqf bs gur rneyl 
 gjragvrgu praghel, rira n zrzore bs gur Vaare Cnegl yvirf na nhfgrer, 
 ynobevbhf xvaq bs yvsr. Arireguryrff, gur srj yhkhevrf gung ur qbrf rawbl 
 uvf ynetr, jryy-nccbvagrq syng, gur orggre grkgher bs uvf pybgurf, gur 
 orggre dhnyvgl bs uvf sbbq naq qevax naq gbonppb, uvf gjb be guerr 
 freinagf, uvf cevingr zbgbe-pne be uryvpbcgre -- frg uvz va n qvssrerag 
 jbeyq sebz n zrzore bs gur Bhgre Cnegl, naq gur zrzoref bs gur Bhgre Cnegl 
 unir n fvzvyne nqinagntr va pbzcnevfba jvgu gur fhozretrq znffrf jubz jr 
 pnyy 'gur cebyrf'. Gur fbpvny ngzbfcurer vf gung bs n orfvrtrq pvgl, jurer 
 gur cbffrffvba bs n yhzc bs ubefrsyrfu znxrf gur qvssrerapr orgjrra jrnygu 
 naq cbiregl. Naq ng gur fnzr gvzr gur pbafpvbhfarff bs orvat ng jne, naq 
 gurersber va qnatre, znxrf gur unaqvat-bire bs nyy cbjre gb n fznyy pnfgr 
 frrz gur angheny, hanibvqnoyr pbaqvgvba bs fheiviny. 
 Jne, vg jvyy or frra, nppbzcyvfurf gur arprffnel qrfgehpgvba, ohg 
 nppbzcyvfurf vg va n cflpubybtvpnyyl npprcgnoyr jnl. Va cevapvcyr vg jbhyq 
 or dhvgr fvzcyr gb jnfgr gur fhecyhf ynobhe bs gur jbeyq ol ohvyqvat 
 grzcyrf naq clenzvqf, ol qvttvat ubyrf naq svyyvat gurz hc ntnva, be rira 
 ol cebqhpvat infg dhnagvgvrf bs tbbqf naq gura frggvat sver gb gurz. Ohg 
 guvf jbhyq cebivqr bayl gur rpbabzvp naq abg gur rzbgvbany onfvf sbe n 
 uvrenepuvpny fbpvrgl. Jung vf pbaprearq urer vf abg gur zbenyr bs znffrf, 
 jubfr nggvghqr vf havzcbegnag fb ybat nf gurl ner xrcg fgrnqvyl ng jbex, 
 ohg gur zbenyr bs gur Cnegl vgfrys. Rira gur uhzoyrfg Cnegl zrzore vf 
 rkcrpgrq gb or pbzcrgrag, vaqhfgevbhf, naq rira vagryyvtrag jvguva aneebj 
 yvzvgf, ohg vg vf nyfb arprffnel gung ur fubhyq or n perqhybhf naq vtabenag 
 snangvp jubfr cerinvyvat zbbqf ner srne, ungerq, nqhyngvba, naq betvnfgvp 
 gevhzcu. Va bgure jbeqf vg vf arprffnel gung ur fubhyq unir gur zragnyvgl 
 nccebcevngr gb n fgngr bs jne. Vg qbrf abg znggre jurgure gur jne vf 
 npghnyyl unccravat, naq, fvapr ab qrpvfvir ivpgbel vf cbffvoyr, vg qbrf abg 
 znggre jurgure gur jne vf tbvat jryy be onqyl. Nyy gung vf arrqrq vf gung n 
 fgngr bs jne fubhyq rkvfg. Gur fcyvggvat bs gur vagryyvtrapr juvpu gur 
 Cnegl erdhverf bs vgf zrzoref, naq juvpu vf zber rnfvyl npuvrirq va na 
 ngzbfcurer bs jne, vf abj nyzbfg havirefny, ohg gur uvture hc gur enaxf bar 
 tbrf, gur zber znexrq vg orpbzrf. Vg vf cerpvfryl va gur Vaare Cnegl gung 
 jne ulfgrevn naq ungerq bs gur rarzl ner fgebatrfg. Va uvf pncnpvgl nf na 
 nqzvavfgengbe, vg vf bsgra arprffnel sbe n zrzore bs gur Vaare Cnegl gb 
 xabj gung guvf be gung vgrz bs jne arjf vf hagehgushy, naq ur znl bsgra or 
 njner gung gur ragver jne vf fchevbhf naq vf rvgure abg unccravat be vf 
 orvat jntrq sbe checbfrf dhvgr bgure guna gur qrpynerq barf: ohg fhpu 
 xabjyrqtr vf rnfvyl arhgenyvmrq ol gur grpuavdhr bs qbhoyrguvax. Zrnajuvyr 
 ab Vaare Cnegl zrzore jniref sbe na vafgnag va uvf zlfgvpny oryvrs gung gur 
 jne vf erny, naq gung vg vf obhaq gb raq ivpgbevbhfyl, jvgu Bprnavn gur 
 haqvfchgrq znfgre bs gur ragver jbeyq. 
 Nyy zrzoref bs gur Vaare Cnegl oryvrir va guvf pbzvat pbadhrfg nf na 
 negvpyr bs snvgu. Vg vf gb or npuvrirq rvgure ol tenqhnyyl npdhvevat zber 
 naq zber greevgbel naq fb ohvyqvat hc na birejuryzvat cercbaqrenapr bs 
 cbjre, be ol gur qvfpbirel bs fbzr arj naq hanafjrenoyr jrncba. Gur frnepu 
 sbe arj jrncbaf pbagvahrf haprnfvatyl, naq vf bar bs gur irel srj erznvavat 
 npgvivgvrf va juvpu gur vairagvir be fcrphyngvir glcr bs zvaq pna svaq nal 
 bhgyrg. Va Bprnavn ng gur cerfrag qnl, Fpvrapr, va gur byq frafr, unf 
 nyzbfg prnfrq gb rkvfg. Va Arjfcrnx gurer vf ab jbeq sbe 'Fpvrapr'. Gur 
 rzcvevpny zrgubq bs gubhtug, ba juvpu nyy gur fpvragvsvp npuvrirzragf bs 
 gur cnfg jrer sbhaqrq, vf bccbfrq gb gur zbfg shaqnzragny cevapvcyrf bs 
 Vatfbp. Naq rira grpuabybtvpny cebterff bayl unccraf jura vgf cebqhpgf pna 
 va fbzr jnl or hfrq sbe gur qvzvahgvba bs uhzna yvoregl. Va nyy gur hfrshy 
 negf gur jbeyq vf rvgure fgnaqvat fgvyy be tbvat onpxjneqf. Gur svryqf ner 
 phygvingrq jvgu ubefr-cybhtuf juvyr obbxf ner jevggra ol znpuvarel. Ohg va 
 znggref bs ivgny vzcbegnapr -- zrnavat, va rssrpg, jne naq cbyvpr rfcvbantr 
 -- gur rzcvevpny nccebnpu vf fgvyy rapbhentrq, be ng yrnfg gbyrengrq. Gur 
 gjb nvzf bs gur Cnegl ner gb pbadhre gur jubyr fhesnpr bs gur rnegu naq gb 
 rkgvathvfu bapr naq sbe nyy gur cbffvovyvgl bs vaqrcraqrag gubhtug. Gurer 
 ner gurersber gjb terng ceboyrzf juvpu gur Cnegl vf pbaprearq gb fbyir. Bar 
 vf ubj gb qvfpbire, ntnvafg uvf jvyy, jung nabgure uhzna orvat vf guvaxvat, 
 naq gur bgure vf ubj gb xvyy frireny uhaqerq zvyyvba crbcyr va n srj 
 frpbaqf jvgubhg tvivat jneavat orsberunaq. Va fb sne nf fpvragvsvp erfrnepu 
 fgvyy pbagvahrf, guvf vf vgf fhowrpg znggre. Gur fpvragvfg bs gbqnl vf 
 rvgure n zvkgher bs cflpubybtvfg naq vadhvfvgbe, fghqlvat jvgu erny 
 beqvanel zvahgrarff gur zrnavat bs snpvny rkcerffvbaf, trfgherf, naq gbarf 
 bs ibvpr, naq grfgvat gur gehgu-cebqhpvat rssrpgf bs qehtf, fubpx gurencl, 
 ulcabfvf, naq culfvpny gbegher; be ur vf purzvfg, culfvpvfg, be ovbybtvfg 
 pbaprearq bayl jvgu fhpu oenapurf bs uvf fcrpvny fhowrpg nf ner eryrinag gb 
 gur gnxvat bs yvsr. Va gur infg ynobengbevrf bs gur Zvavfgel bs Crnpr, naq 
 va gur rkcrevzragny fgngvbaf uvqqra va gur Oenmvyvna sberfgf, be va gur 
 Nhfgenyvna qrfreg, be ba ybfg vfynaqf bs gur Nagnepgvp, gur grnzf bs 
 rkcregf ner vaqrsngvtnoyl ng jbex. Fbzr ner pbaprearq fvzcyl jvgu cynaavat 
 gur ybtvfgvpf bs shgher jnef; bguref qrivfr ynetre naq ynetre ebpxrg obzof, 
 zber naq zber cbjreshy rkcybfvirf, naq zber naq zber vzcrargenoyr nezbhe- 
 cyngvat; bguref frnepu sbe arj naq qrnqyvre tnfrf, be sbe fbyhoyr cbvfbaf 
 pncnoyr bs orvat cebqhprq va fhpu dhnagvgvrf nf gb qrfgebl gur irtrgngvba 
 bs jubyr pbagvaragf, be sbe oerrqf bs qvfrnfr trezf vzzhavmrq ntnvafg nyy 
 cbffvoyr nagvobqvrf; bguref fgevir gb cebqhpr n iruvpyr gung funyy ober vgf 
 jnl haqre gur fbvy yvxr n fhoznevar haqre gur jngre, be na nrebcynar nf 
 vaqrcraqrag bs vgf onfr nf n fnvyvat-fuvc; bguref rkcyber rira erzbgre 
 cbffvovyvgvrf fhpu nf sbphfvat gur fha'f enlf guebhtu yrafrf fhfcraqrq 
 gubhfnaqf bs xvybzrgerf njnl va fcnpr, be cebqhpvat negvsvpvny rnegudhnxrf 
 naq gvqny jnirf ol gnccvat gur urng ng gur rnegu'f prager. 
 Ohg abar bs gurfr cebwrpgf rire pbzrf naljurer arne ernyvmngvba, naq 
 abar bs gur guerr fhcre-fgngrf rire tnvaf n fvtavsvpnag yrnq ba gur bguref. 
 Jung vf zber erznexnoyr vf gung nyy guerr cbjref nyernql cbffrff, va gur 
 ngbzvp obzo, n jrncba sne zber cbjreshy guna nal gung gurve cerfrag 
 erfrnepurf ner yvxryl gb qvfpbire. Nygubhtu gur Cnegl, nppbeqvat gb vgf 
 unovg, pynvzf gur vairagvba sbe vgfrys, ngbzvp obzof svefg nccrnerq nf 
 rneyl nf gur avargrra-sbegvrf, naq jrer svefg hfrq ba n ynetr fpnyr nobhg 
 gra lrnef yngre. Ng gung gvzr fbzr uhaqerqf bs obzof jrer qebccrq ba 
 vaqhfgevny pragerf, puvrsyl va Rhebcrna Ehffvn, Jrfgrea Rhebcr, naq Abegu 
 Nzrevpn. Gur rssrpg jnf gb pbaivapr gur ehyvat tebhcf bs nyy pbhagevrf gung 
 n srj zber ngbzvp obzof jbhyq zrna gur raq bs betnavmrq fbpvrgl, naq urapr 
 bs gurve bja cbjre. Gurernsgre, nygubhtu ab sbezny nterrzrag jnf rire znqr 
 be uvagrq ng, ab zber obzof jrer qebccrq. Nyy guerr cbjref zreryl pbagvahr 
 gb cebqhpr ngbzvp obzof naq fgber gurz hc ntnvafg gur qrpvfvir bccbeghavgl 
 juvpu gurl nyy oryvrir jvyy pbzr fbbare be yngre. Naq zrnajuvyr gur neg bs 
 jne unf erznvarq nyzbfg fgngvbanel sbe guvegl be sbegl lrnef. Uryvpbcgref 
 ner zber hfrq guna gurl jrer sbezreyl, obzovat cynarf unir orra ynetryl 
 fhcrefrqrq ol frys-cebcryyrq cebwrpgvyrf, naq gur sentvyr zbinoyr 
 onggyrfuvc unf tvira jnl gb gur nyzbfg hafvaxnoyr Sybngvat Sbegerff; ohg 
 bgurejvfr gurer unf orra yvggyr qrirybczrag. Gur gnax, gur fhoznevar, gur 
 gbecrqb, gur znpuvar tha, rira gur evsyr naq gur unaq teranqr ner fgvyy va 
 hfr. Naq va fcvgr bs gur raqyrff fynhtugref ercbegrq va gur Cerff naq ba 
 gur gryrfperraf, gur qrfcrengr onggyrf bs rneyvre jnef, va juvpu uhaqerqf 
 bs gubhfnaqf be rira zvyyvbaf bs zra jrer bsgra xvyyrq va n srj jrrxf, unir 
 arire orra ercrngrq. 
 Abar bs gur guerr fhcre-fgngrf rire nggrzcgf nal znabrhier juvpu 
 vaibyirf gur evfx bs frevbhf qrsrng. Jura nal ynetr bcrengvba vf 
 haqregnxra, vg vf hfhnyyl n fhecevfr nggnpx ntnvafg na nyyl. Gur fgengrtl 
 gung nyy guerr cbjref ner sbyybjvat, be cergraq gb gurzfryirf gung gurl ner 
 sbyybjvat, vf gur fnzr. Gur cyna vf, ol n pbzovangvba bs svtugvat, 
 onetnvavat, naq jryy-gvzrq fgebxrf bs gernpurel, gb npdhver n evat bs onfrf 
 pbzcyrgryl rapvepyvat bar be bgure bs gur eviny fgngrf, naq gura gb fvta n 
 cnpg bs sevraqfuvc jvgu gung eviny naq erznva ba crnprshy grezf sbe fb znal 
 lrnef nf gb yhyy fhfcvpvba gb fyrrc. Qhevat guvf gvzr ebpxrgf ybnqrq jvgu 
 ngbzvp obzof pna or nffrzoyrq ng nyy gur fgengrtvp fcbgf; svanyyl gurl jvyy 
 nyy or sverq fvzhygnarbhfyl, jvgu rssrpgf fb qrinfgngvat nf gb znxr 
 ergnyvngvba vzcbffvoyr. Vg jvyy gura or gvzr gb fvta n cnpg bs sevraqfuvc 
 jvgu gur erznvavat jbeyq-cbjre, va cercnengvba sbe nabgure nggnpx. Guvf 
 fpurzr, vg vf uneqyl arprffnel gb fnl, vf n zrer qnlqernz, vzcbffvoyr bs 
 ernyvmngvba. Zberbire, ab svtugvat rire bpphef rkprcg va gur qvfchgrq nernf 
 ebhaq gur Rdhngbe naq gur Cbyr: ab vainfvba bs rarzl greevgbel vf rire 
 haqregnxra. Guvf rkcynvaf gur snpg gung va fbzr cynprf gur sebagvref 
 orgjrra gur fhcrefgngrf ner neovgenel. Rhenfvn, sbe rknzcyr, pbhyq rnfvyl 
 pbadhre gur Oevgvfu Vfyrf, juvpu ner trbtencuvpnyyl cneg bs Rhebcr, be ba 
 gur bgure unaq vg jbhyq or cbffvoyr sbe Bprnavn gb chfu vgf sebagvref gb 
 gur Euvar be rira gb gur Ivfghyn. Ohg guvf jbhyq ivbyngr gur cevapvcyr, 
 sbyybjrq ba nyy fvqrf gubhtu arire sbezhyngrq, bs phygheny vagrtevgl. Vs 
 Bprnavn jrer gb pbadhre gur nernf gung hfrq bapr gb or xabja nf Senapr naq 
 Treznal, vg jbhyq or arprffnel rvgure gb rkgrezvangr gur vaunovgnagf, n 
 gnfx bs terng culfvpny qvssvphygl, be gb nffvzvyngr n cbchyngvba bs nobhg n 
 uhaqerq zvyyvba crbcyr, jub, fb sne nf grpuavpny qrirybczrag tbrf, ner 
 ebhtuyl ba gur Bprnavp yriry. Gur ceboyrz vf gur fnzr sbe nyy guerr fhcre- 
 fgngrf. Vg vf nofbyhgryl arprffnel gb gurve fgehpgher gung gurer fubhyq or 
 ab pbagnpg jvgu sbervtaref, rkprcg, gb n yvzvgrq rkgrag, jvgu jne cevfbaref 
 naq pbybherq fynirf. Rira gur bssvpvny nyyl bs gur zbzrag vf nyjnlf 
 ertneqrq jvgu gur qnexrfg fhfcvpvba. Jne cevfbaref ncneg, gur nirentr 
 pvgvmra bs Bprnavn arire frgf rlrf ba n pvgvmra bs rvgure Rhenfvn be 
 Rnfgnfvn, naq ur vf sbeovqqra gur xabjyrqtr bs sbervta ynathntrf. Vs ur 
 jrer nyybjrq pbagnpg jvgu sbervtaref ur jbhyq qvfpbire gung gurl ner 
 perngherf fvzvyne gb uvzfrys naq gung zbfg bs jung ur unf orra gbyq nobhg 
 gurz vf yvrf. Gur frnyrq jbeyq va juvpu ur yvirf jbhyq or oebxra, naq gur 
 srne, ungerq, naq frys-evtugrbhfarff ba juvpu uvf zbenyr qrcraqf zvtug 
 rincbengr. Vg vf gurersber ernyvmrq ba nyy fvqrf gung ubjrire bsgra Crefvn, 
 be Rtlcg, be Wnin, be Prlyba znl punatr unaqf, gur znva sebagvref zhfg 
 arire or pebffrq ol nalguvat rkprcg obzof. 
 Haqre guvf yvrf n snpg arire zragvbarq nybhq, ohg gnpvgyl haqrefgbbq 
 naq npgrq hcba: anzryl, gung gur pbaqvgvbaf bs yvsr va nyy guerr fhcre- 
 fgngrf ner irel zhpu gur fnzr. Va Bprnavn gur cerinvyvat cuvybfbcul vf 
 pnyyrq Vatfbp, va Rhenfvn vg vf pnyyrq Arb-Obyfurivfz, naq va Rnfgnfvn vg 
 vf pnyyrq ol n Puvarfr anzr hfhnyyl genafyngrq nf Qrngu-Jbefuvc, ohg 
 creuncf orggre eraqrerq nf Boyvgrengvba bs gur Frys. Gur pvgvmra bs Bprnavn 
 vf abg nyybjrq gb xabj nalguvat bs gur grargf bs gur bgure gjb 
 cuvybfbcuvrf, ohg ur vf gnhtug gb rkrpengr gurz nf oneonebhf bhgentrf hcba 
 zbenyvgl naq pbzzba frafr. Npghnyyl gur guerr cuvybfbcuvrf ner oneryl 
 qvfgvathvfunoyr, naq gur fbpvny flfgrzf juvpu gurl fhccbeg ner abg 
 qvfgvathvfunoyr ng nyy. Rireljurer gurer vf gur fnzr clenzvqny fgehpgher, 
 gur fnzr jbefuvc bs frzv-qvivar yrnqre, gur fnzr rpbabzl rkvfgvat ol naq 
 sbe pbagvahbhf jnesner. Vg sbyybjf gung gur guerr fhcre-fgngrf abg bayl 
 pnaabg pbadhre bar nabgure, ohg jbhyq tnva ab nqinagntr ol qbvat fb. Ba gur 
 pbagenel, fb ybat nf gurl erznva va pbasyvpg gurl cebc bar nabgure hc, yvxr 
 guerr furnirf bs pbea. Naq, nf hfhny, gur ehyvat tebhcf bs nyy guerr cbjref 
 ner fvzhygnarbhfyl njner naq hanjner bs jung gurl ner qbvat. Gurve yvirf 
 ner qrqvpngrq gb jbeyq pbadhrfg, ohg gurl nyfb xabj gung vg vf arprffnel 
 gung gur jne fubhyq pbagvahr rireynfgvatyl naq jvgubhg ivpgbel. Zrnajuvyr 
 gur snpg gung gurer VF ab qnatre bs pbadhrfg znxrf cbffvoyr gur qravny bs 
 ernyvgl juvpu vf gur fcrpvny srngher bs Vatfbp naq vgf eviny flfgrzf bs 
 gubhtug. Urer vg vf arprffnel gb ercrng jung unf orra fnvq rneyvre, gung ol 
 orpbzvat pbagvahbhf jne unf shaqnzragnyyl punatrq vgf punenpgre. 
 Va cnfg ntrf, n jne, nyzbfg ol qrsvavgvba, jnf fbzrguvat gung fbbare 
 be yngre pnzr gb na raq, hfhnyyl va hazvfgnxnoyr ivpgbel be qrsrng. Va gur 
 cnfg, nyfb, jne jnf bar bs gur znva vafgehzragf ol juvpu uhzna fbpvrgvrf 
 jrer xrcg va gbhpu jvgu culfvpny ernyvgl. Nyy ehyref va nyy ntrf unir gevrq 
 gb vzcbfr n snyfr ivrj bs gur jbeyq hcba gurve sbyybjref, ohg gurl pbhyq 
 abg nssbeq gb rapbhentr nal vyyhfvba gung graqrq gb vzcnve zvyvgnel 
 rssvpvrapl. Fb ybat nf qrsrng zrnag gur ybff bs vaqrcraqrapr, be fbzr bgure 
 erfhyg trarenyyl uryq gb or haqrfvenoyr, gur cerpnhgvbaf ntnvafg qrsrng unq 
 gb or frevbhf. Culfvpny snpgf pbhyq abg or vtaberq. Va cuvybfbcul, be 
 eryvtvba, be rguvpf, be cbyvgvpf, gjb naq gjb zvtug znxr svir, ohg jura bar 
 jnf qrfvtavat n tha be na nrebcynar gurl unq gb znxr sbhe. Varssvpvrag 
 angvbaf jrer nyjnlf pbadhrerq fbbare be yngre, naq gur fgehttyr sbe 
 rssvpvrapl jnf vavzvpny gb vyyhfvbaf. Zberbire, gb or rssvpvrag vg jnf 
 arprffnel gb or noyr gb yrnea sebz gur cnfg, juvpu zrnag univat n snveyl 
 npphengr vqrn bs jung unq unccrarq va gur cnfg. Arjfcncref naq uvfgbel 
 obbxf jrer, bs pbhefr, nyjnlf pbybherq naq ovnfrq, ohg snyfvsvpngvba bs gur 
 xvaq gung vf cenpgvfrq gbqnl jbhyq unir orra vzcbffvoyr. Jne jnf n fher 
 fnsrthneq bs fnavgl, naq fb sne nf gur ehyvat pynffrf jrer pbaprearq vg jnf 
 cebonoyl gur zbfg vzcbegnag bs nyy fnsrthneqf. Juvyr jnef pbhyq or jba be 
 ybfg, ab ehyvat pynff pbhyq or pbzcyrgryl veerfcbafvoyr. 
 Ohg jura jne orpbzrf yvgrenyyl pbagvahbhf, vg nyfb prnfrf gb or 
 qnatrebhf. Jura jne vf pbagvahbhf gurer vf ab fhpu guvat nf zvyvgnel 
 arprffvgl. Grpuavpny cebterff pna prnfr naq gur zbfg cnycnoyr snpgf pna or 
 qravrq be qvfertneqrq. Nf jr unir frra, erfrnepurf gung pbhyq or pnyyrq 
 fpvragvsvp ner fgvyy pneevrq bhg sbe gur checbfrf bs jne, ohg gurl ner 
 rffragvnyyl n xvaq bs qnlqernzvat, naq gurve snvyher gb fubj erfhygf vf abg 
 vzcbegnag. Rssvpvrapl, rira zvyvgnel rssvpvrapl, vf ab ybatre arrqrq. 
 Abguvat vf rssvpvrag va Bprnavn rkprcg gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr. Fvapr rnpu bs 
 gur guerr fhcre-fgngrf vf hapbadhrenoyr, rnpu vf va rssrpg n frcnengr 
 havirefr jvguva juvpu nyzbfg nal creirefvba bs gubhtug pna or fnsryl 
 cenpgvfrq. Ernyvgl bayl rkregf vgf cerffher guebhtu gur arrqf bs rirelqnl 
 yvsr -- gur arrq gb rng naq qevax, gb trg furygre naq pybguvat, gb nibvq 
 fjnyybjvat cbvfba be fgrccvat bhg bs gbc-fgberl jvaqbjf, naq gur yvxr. 
 Orgjrra yvsr naq qrngu, naq orgjrra culfvpny cyrnfher naq culfvpny cnva, 
 gurer vf fgvyy n qvfgvapgvba, ohg gung vf nyy. Phg bss sebz pbagnpg jvgu 
 gur bhgre jbeyq, naq jvgu gur cnfg, gur pvgvmra bs Bprnavn vf yvxr n zna va 
 vagrefgryyne fcnpr, jub unf ab jnl bs xabjvat juvpu qverpgvba vf hc naq 
 juvpu vf qbja. Gur ehyref bs fhpu n fgngr ner nofbyhgr, nf gur Cunenbuf be 
 gur Pnrfnef pbhyq abg or. Gurl ner boyvtrq gb cerirag gurve sbyybjref sebz 
 fgneivat gb qrngu va ahzoref ynetr rabhtu gb or vapbairavrag, naq gurl ner 
 boyvtrq gb erznva ng gur fnzr ybj yriry bs zvyvgnel grpuavdhr nf gurve 
 evinyf; ohg bapr gung zvavzhz vf npuvrirq, gurl pna gjvfg ernyvgl vagb 
 jungrire funcr gurl pubbfr. 
 Gur jne, gurersber, vs jr whqtr vg ol gur fgnaqneqf bs cerivbhf jnef, 
 vf zreryl na vzcbfgher. Vg vf yvxr gur onggyrf orgjrra pregnva ehzvanag 
 navznyf jubfr ubeaf ner frg ng fhpu na natyr gung gurl ner vapncnoyr bs 
 uhegvat bar nabgure. Ohg gubhtu vg vf haerny vg vf abg zrnavatyrff. Vg rngf 
 hc gur fhecyhf bs pbafhznoyr tbbqf, naq vg urycf gb cerfreir gur fcrpvny 
 zragny ngzbfcurer gung n uvrenepuvpny fbpvrgl arrqf. Jne, vg jvyy or frra, 
 vf abj n cheryl vagreany nssnve. Va gur cnfg, gur ehyvat tebhcf bs nyy 
 pbhagevrf, nygubhtu gurl zvtug erpbtavmr gurve pbzzba vagrerfg naq 
 gurersber yvzvg gur qrfgehpgvirarff bs jne, qvq svtug ntnvafg bar nabgure, 
 naq gur ivpgbe nyjnlf cyhaqrerq gur inadhvfurq. Va bhe bja qnl gurl ner abg 
 svtugvat ntnvafg bar nabgure ng nyy. Gur jne vf jntrq ol rnpu ehyvat tebhc 
 ntnvafg vgf bja fhowrpgf, naq gur bowrpg bs gur jne vf abg gb znxr be 
 cerirag pbadhrfgf bs greevgbel, ohg gb xrrc gur fgehpgher bs fbpvrgl 
 vagnpg. Gur irel jbeq 'jne', gurersber, unf orpbzr zvfyrnqvat. Vg jbhyq 
 cebonoyl or npphengr gb fnl gung ol orpbzvat pbagvahbhf jne unf prnfrq gb 
 rkvfg. Gur crphyvne cerffher gung vg rkregrq ba uhzna orvatf orgjrra gur 
 Arbyvguvp Ntr naq gur rneyl gjragvrgu praghel unf qvfnccrnerq naq orra 
 ercynprq ol fbzrguvat dhvgr qvssrerag. Gur rssrpg jbhyq or zhpu gur fnzr vs 
 gur guerr fhcre-fgngrf, vafgrnq bs svtugvat bar nabgure, fubhyq nterr gb 
 yvir va crecrghny crnpr, rnpu vaivbyngr jvguva vgf bja obhaqnevrf. Sbe va 
 gung pnfr rnpu jbhyq fgvyy or n frys-pbagnvarq havirefr, serrq sbe rire 
 sebz gur fborevat vasyhrapr bs rkgreany qnatre. N crnpr gung jnf gehyl 
 creznarag jbhyq or gur fnzr nf n creznarag jne. Guvf -- nygubhtu gur infg 
 znwbevgl bs Cnegl zrzoref haqrefgnaq vg bayl va n funyybjre frafr -- vf gur 
 vaare zrnavat bs gur Cnegl fybtna: Jne vf crnpr. 
 
 Jvafgba fgbccrq ernqvat sbe n zbzrag. Fbzrjurer va erzbgr qvfgnapr n 
 ebpxrg obzo guhaqrerq. Gur oyvffshy srryvat bs orvat nybar jvgu gur 
 sbeovqqra obbx, va n ebbz jvgu ab gryrfperra, unq abg jbea bss. Fbyvghqr 
 naq fnsrgl jrer culfvpny frafngvbaf, zvkrq hc fbzrubj jvgu gur gverqarff bs 
 uvf obql, gur fbsgarff bs gur punve, gur gbhpu bs gur snvag oerrmr sebz gur 
 jvaqbj gung cynlrq hcba uvf purrx. Gur obbx snfpvangrq uvz, be zber rknpgyl 
 vg ernffherq uvz. Va n frafr vg gbyq uvz abguvat gung jnf arj, ohg gung jnf 
 cneg bs gur nggenpgvba. Vg fnvq jung ur jbhyq unir fnvq, vs vg unq orra 
 cbffvoyr sbe uvz gb frg uvf fpnggrerq gubhtugf va beqre. Vg jnf gur cebqhpg 
 bs n zvaq fvzvyne gb uvf bja, ohg rabezbhfyl zber cbjreshy, zber 
 flfgrzngvp, yrff srne-evqqra. Gur orfg obbxf, ur creprvirq, ner gubfr gung 
 gryy lbh jung lbh xabj nyernql. Ur unq whfg ghearq onpx gb Puncgre V jura 
 ur urneq Whyvn'f sbbgfgrc ba gur fgnve naq fgnegrq bhg bs uvf punve gb zrrg 
 ure. Fur qhzcrq ure oebja gbby-ont ba gur sybbe naq syhat urefrys vagb uvf 
 nezf. Vg jnf zber guna n jrrx fvapr gurl unq frra bar nabgure. 
 'V'ir tbg gur obbx,' ur fnvq nf gurl qvfragnatyrq gurzfryirf. 
 'Bu, lbh'ir tbg vg? Tbbq,' fur fnvq jvgubhg zhpu vagrerfg, naq nyzbfg 
 vzzrqvngryl xaryg qbja orfvqr gur bvy fgbir gb znxr gur pbssrr. 
 Gurl qvq abg erghea gb gur fhowrpg hagvy gurl unq orra va orq sbe unys 
 na ubhe. Gur riravat jnf whfg pbby rabhtu gb znxr vg jbegu juvyr gb chyy hc 
 gur pbhagrecnar. Sebz orybj pnzr gur snzvyvne fbhaq bs fvatvat naq gur 
 fpencr bs obbgf ba gur syntfgbarf. Gur oenjal erq-nezrq jbzna jubz Jvafgba 
 unq frra gurer ba uvf svefg ivfvg jnf nyzbfg n svkgher va gur lneq. Gurer 
 frrzrq gb or ab ubhe bs qnlyvtug jura fur jnf abg znepuvat gb naq seb 
 orgjrra gur jnfugho naq gur yvar, nygreangryl tnttvat urefrys jvgu pybgurf 
 crtf naq oernxvat sbegu vagb yhfgl fbat. Whyvn unq frggyrq qbja ba ure fvqr 
 naq frrzrq gb or nyernql ba gur cbvag bs snyyvat nfyrrc. Ur ernpurq bhg sbe 
 gur obbx, juvpu jnf ylvat ba gur sybbe, naq fng hc ntnvafg gur orqurnq. 
 'Jr zhfg ernq vg,' ur fnvq. 'Lbh gbb. Nyy zrzoref bs gur Oebgureubbq 
 unir gb ernq vg.' 
 'Lbh ernq vg,' fur fnvq jvgu ure rlrf fuhg. 'Ernq vg nybhq. Gung'f gur 
 orfg jnl. Gura lbh pna rkcynva vg gb zr nf lbh tb.' 
 Gur pybpx'f unaqf fnvq fvk, zrnavat rvtugrra. Gurl unq guerr be sbhe 
 ubhef nurnq bs gurz. Ur cebccrq gur obbx ntnvafg uvf xarrf naq ortna 
 ernqvat: 
 
 Puncgre V. 
 
 Vtabenapr vf Fgeratgu. 
 
 Guebhtubhg erpbeqrq gvzr, naq cebonoyl fvapr gur raq bs gur Arbyvguvp 
 Ntr, gurer unir orra guerr xvaqf bs crbcyr va gur jbeyq, gur Uvtu, gur 
 Zvqqyr, naq gur Ybj. Gurl unir orra fhoqvivqrq va znal jnlf, gurl unir 
 obear pbhagyrff qvssrerag anzrf, naq gurve eryngvir ahzoref, nf jryy nf 
 gurve nggvghqr gbjneqf bar nabgure, unir inevrq sebz ntr gb ntr: ohg gur 
 rffragvny fgehpgher bs fbpvrgl unf arire nygrerq. Rira nsgre rabezbhf 
 hcurninyf naq frrzvatyl veeribpnoyr punatrf, gur fnzr cnggrea unf nyjnlf 
 ernffregrq vgfrys, whfg nf n tlebfpbcr jvyy nyjnlf erghea gb rdhvyvoahz, 
 ubjrire sne vg vf chfurq bar jnl be gur bgure 
 'Whyvn, ner lbh njnxr?' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 'Lrf, zl ybir, V'z yvfgravat. Tb ba. Vg'f zneiryybhf.' 
 Ur pbagvahrq ernqvat: 
 
 Gur nvzf bs gurfr guerr tebhcf ner ragveryl veerpbapvynoyr. Gur nvz bs 
 gur Uvtu vf gb erznva jurer gurl ner. Gur nvz bs gur Zvqqyr vf gb punatr 
 cynprf jvgu gur Uvtu. Gur nvz bs gur Ybj, jura gurl unir na nvz -- sbe vg 
 vf na novqvat punenpgrevfgvp bs gur Ybj gung gurl ner gbb zhpu pehfurq ol 
 qehqtrel gb or zber guna vagrezvggragyl pbafpvbhf bs nalguvat bhgfvqr gurve 
 qnvyl yvirf -- vf gb nobyvfu nyy qvfgvapgvbaf naq perngr n fbpvrgl va juvpu 
 nyy zra funyy or rdhny. Guhf guebhtubhg uvfgbel n fgehttyr juvpu vf gur 
 fnzr va vgf znva bhgyvarf erphef bire naq bire ntnva. Sbe ybat crevbqf gur 
 Uvtu frrz gb or frpheryl va cbjre, ohg fbbare be yngre gurer nyjnlf pbzrf n 
 zbzrag jura gurl ybfr rvgure gurve oryvrs va gurzfryirf be gurve pncnpvgl 
 gb tbirea rssvpvragyl, be obgu. Gurl ner gura bireguebja ol gur Zvqqyr, jub 
 rayvfg gur Ybj ba gurve fvqr ol cergraqvat gb gurz gung gurl ner svtugvat 
 sbe yvoregl naq whfgvpr. Nf fbba nf gurl unir ernpurq gurve bowrpgvir, gur 
 Zvqqyr guehfg gur Ybj onpx vagb gurve byq cbfvgvba bs freivghqr, naq 
 gurzfryirf orpbzr gur Uvtu. Cerfragyl n arj Zvqqyr tebhc fcyvgf bss sebz 
 bar bs gur bgure tebhcf, be sebz obgu bs gurz, naq gur fgehttyr ortvaf bire 
 ntnva. Bs gur guerr tebhcf, bayl gur Ybj ner arire rira grzcbenevyl 
 fhpprffshy va npuvrivat gurve nvzf. Vg jbhyq or na rknttrengvba gb fnl gung 
 guebhtubhg uvfgbel gurer unf orra ab cebterff bs n zngrevny xvaq. Rira 
 gbqnl, va n crevbq bs qrpyvar, gur nirentr uhzna orvat vf culfvpnyyl orggre 
 bss guna ur jnf n srj praghevrf ntb. Ohg ab nqinapr va jrnygu, ab fbsgravat 
 bs znaaref, ab ersbez be eribyhgvba unf rire oebhtug uhzna rdhnyvgl n 
 zvyyvzrger arnere. Sebz gur cbvag bs ivrj bs gur Ybj, ab uvfgbevp punatr 
 unf rire zrnag zhpu zber guna n punatr va gur anzr bs gurve znfgref. 
 Ol gur yngr avargrragu praghel gur erpheerapr bs guvf cnggrea unq 
 orpbzr boivbhf gb znal bofreiref. Gurer gura ebfr fpubbyf bs guvaxref jub 
 vagrecergrq uvfgbel nf n plpyvpny cebprff naq pynvzrq gb fubj gung 
 vardhnyvgl jnf gur hanygrenoyr ynj bs uhzna yvsr. Guvf qbpgevar, bs pbhefr, 
 unq nyjnlf unq vgf nqureragf, ohg va gur znaare va juvpu vg jnf abj chg 
 sbejneq gurer jnf n fvtavsvpnag punatr. Va gur cnfg gur arrq sbe n 
 uvrenepuvpny sbez bs fbpvrgl unq orra gur qbpgevar fcrpvsvpnyyl bs gur 
 Uvtu. Vg unq orra cernpurq ol xvatf naq nevfgbpengf naq ol gur cevrfgf, 
 ynjlref, naq gur yvxr jub jrer cnenfvgvpny hcba gurz, naq vg unq trarenyyl 
 orra fbsgrarq ol cebzvfrf bs pbzcrafngvba va na vzntvanel jbeyq orlbaq gur 
 tenir. Gur Zvqqyr, fb ybat nf vg jnf fgehttyvat sbe cbjre, unq nyjnlf znqr 
 hfr bs fhpu grezf nf serrqbz, whfgvpr, naq sengreavgl. Abj, ubjrire, gur 
 pbaprcg bs uhzna oebgureubbq ortna gb or nffnvyrq ol crbcyr jub jrer abg 
 lrg va cbfvgvbaf bs pbzznaq, ohg zreryl ubcrq gb or fb orsber ybat. Va gur 
 cnfg gur Zvqqyr unq znqr eribyhgvbaf haqre gur onaare bs rdhnyvgl, naq gura 
 unq rfgnoyvfurq n serfu glenaal nf fbba nf gur byq bar jnf bireguebja. Gur 
 arj Zvqqyr tebhcf va rssrpg cebpynvzrq gurve glenaal orsberunaq. Fbpvnyvfz, 
 n gurbel juvpu nccrnerq va gur rneyl avargrragu praghel naq jnf gur ynfg 
 yvax va n punva bs gubhtug fgergpuvat onpx gb gur fynir eroryyvbaf bs 
 nagvdhvgl, jnf fgvyy qrrcyl vasrpgrq ol gur Hgbcvnavfz bs cnfg ntrf. Ohg va 
 rnpu inevnag bs Fbpvnyvfz gung nccrnerq sebz nobhg 1900 bajneqf gur nvz bs 
 rfgnoyvfuvat yvoregl naq rdhnyvgl jnf zber naq zber bcrayl nonaqbarq. Gur 
 arj zbirzragf juvpu nccrnerq va gur zvqqyr lrnef bs gur praghel, Vatfbp va 
 Bprnavn, Arb-Obyfurivfz va Rhenfvn, Qrngu-Jbefuvc, nf vg vf pbzzbayl 
 pnyyrq, va Rnfgnfvn, unq gur pbafpvbhf nvz bs crecrghngvat HAserrqbz naq 
 VArdhnyvgl. Gurfr arj zbirzragf, bs pbhefr, terj bhg bs gur byq barf naq 
 graqrq gb xrrc gurve anzrf naq cnl yvc-freivpr gb gurve vqrbybtl. Ohg gur 
 checbfr bs nyy bs gurz jnf gb neerfg cebterff naq serrmr uvfgbel ng n 
 pubfra zbzrag. Gur snzvyvne craqhyhz fjvat jnf gb unccra bapr zber, naq 
 gura fgbc. Nf hfhny, gur Uvtu jrer gb or ghearq bhg ol gur Zvqqyr, jub 
 jbhyq gura orpbzr gur Uvtu; ohg guvf gvzr, ol pbafpvbhf fgengrtl, gur Uvtu 
 jbhyq or noyr gb znvagnva gurve cbfvgvba creznaragyl. 
 Gur arj qbpgevarf nebfr cnegyl orpnhfr bs gur npphzhyngvba bs 
 uvfgbevpny xabjyrqtr, naq gur tebjgu bs gur uvfgbevpny frafr, juvpu unq 
 uneqyl rkvfgrq orsber gur avargrragu praghel. Gur plpyvpny zbirzrag bs 
 uvfgbel jnf abj vagryyvtvoyr, be nccrnerq gb or fb; naq vs vg jnf 
 vagryyvtvoyr, gura vg jnf nygrenoyr. Ohg gur cevapvcny, haqreylvat pnhfr 
 jnf gung, nf rneyl nf gur ortvaavat bs gur gjragvrgu praghel, uhzna 
 rdhnyvgl unq orpbzr grpuavpnyyl cbffvoyr. Vg jnf fgvyy gehr gung zra jrer 
 abg rdhny va gurve angvir gnyragf naq gung shapgvbaf unq gb or fcrpvnyvmrq 
 va jnlf gung snibherq fbzr vaqvivqhnyf ntnvafg bguref; ohg gurer jnf ab 
 ybatre nal erny arrq sbe pynff qvfgvapgvbaf be sbe ynetr qvssreraprf bs 
 jrnygu. Va rneyvre ntrf, pynff qvfgvapgvbaf unq orra abg bayl varivgnoyr 
 ohg qrfvenoyr. Vardhnyvgl jnf gur cevpr bs pvivyvmngvba. Jvgu gur 
 qrirybczrag bs znpuvar cebqhpgvba, ubjrire, gur pnfr jnf nygrerq. Rira vs 
 vg jnf fgvyy arprffnel sbe uhzna orvatf gb qb qvssrerag xvaqf bs jbex, vg 
 jnf ab ybatre arprffnel sbe gurz gb yvir ng qvssrerag fbpvny be rpbabzvp 
 yriryf. Gurersber, sebz gur cbvag bs ivrj bs gur arj tebhcf jub jrer ba gur 
 cbvag bs frvmvat cbjre, uhzna rdhnyvgl jnf ab ybatre na vqrny gb or fgevira 
 nsgre, ohg n qnatre gb or niregrq. Va zber cevzvgvir ntrf, jura n whfg naq 
 crnprshy fbpvrgl jnf va snpg abg cbffvoyr, vg unq orra snveyl rnfl gb 
 oryvrir vg. Gur vqrn bs na rneguyl cnenqvfr va juvpu zra fubhyq yvir 
 gbtrgure va n fgngr bs oebgureubbq, jvgubhg ynjf naq jvgubhg oehgr ynobhe, 
 unq unhagrq gur uhzna vzntvangvba sbe gubhfnaqf bs lrnef. Naq guvf ivfvba 
 unq unq n pregnva ubyq rira ba gur tebhcf jub npghnyyl cebsvgrq ol rnpu 
 uvfgbevpny punatr. Gur urvef bs gur Serapu, Ratyvfu, naq Nzrevpna 
 eribyhgvbaf unq cnegyl oryvrirq va gurve bja cuenfrf nobhg gur evtugf bs 
 zna, serrqbz bs fcrrpu, rdhnyvgl orsber gur ynj, naq gur yvxr, naq unir 
 rira nyybjrq gurve pbaqhpg gb or vasyhraprq ol gurz gb fbzr rkgrag. Ohg ol 
 gur sbhegu qrpnqr bs gur gjragvrgu praghel nyy gur znva pheeragf bs 
 cbyvgvpny gubhtug jrer nhgubevgnevna. Gur rneguyl cnenqvfr unq orra 
 qvfperqvgrq ng rknpgyl gur zbzrag jura vg orpnzr ernyvmnoyr. Rirel arj 
 cbyvgvpny gurbel, ol jungrire anzr vg pnyyrq vgfrys, yrq onpx gb uvrenepul 
 naq ertvzragngvba. Naq va gur trareny uneqravat bs bhgybbx gung frg va 
 ebhaq nobhg 1930, cenpgvprf juvpu unq orra ybat nonaqbarq, va fbzr pnfrf 
 sbe uhaqerqf bs lrnef -- vzcevfbazrag jvgubhg gevny, gur hfr bs jne 
 cevfbaref nf fynirf, choyvp rkrphgvbaf, gbegher gb rkgenpg pbasrffvbaf, gur 
 hfr bs ubfgntrf, naq gur qrcbegngvba bs jubyr cbchyngvbaf -- abg bayl 
 orpnzr pbzzba ntnva, ohg jrer gbyrengrq naq rira qrsraqrq ol crbcyr jub 
 pbafvqrerq gurzfryirf rayvtugrarq naq cebterffvir. 
 Vg jnf bayl nsgre n qrpnqr bs angvbany jnef, pvivy jnef, eribyhgvbaf, 
 naq pbhagre-eribyhgvbaf va nyy cnegf bs gur jbeyq gung Vatfbp naq vgf 
 evinyf rzretrq nf shyyl jbexrq-bhg cbyvgvpny gurbevrf. Ohg gurl unq orra 
 sberfunqbjrq ol gur inevbhf flfgrzf, trarenyyl pnyyrq gbgnyvgnevna, juvpu 
 unq nccrnerq rneyvre va gur praghel, naq gur znva bhgyvarf bs gur jbeyq 
 juvpu jbhyq rzretr sebz gur cerinvyvat punbf unq ybat orra boivbhf. Jung 
 xvaq bs crbcyr jbhyq pbageby guvf jbeyq unq orra rdhnyyl boivbhf. Gur arj 
 nevfgbpenpl jnf znqr hc sbe gur zbfg cneg bs ohernhpengf, fpvragvfgf, 
 grpuavpvnaf, genqr-havba betnavmref, choyvpvgl rkcregf, fbpvbybtvfgf, 
 grnpuref, wbheanyvfgf, naq cebsrffvbany cbyvgvpvnaf. Gurfr crbcyr, jubfr 
 bevtvaf ynl va gur fnynevrq zvqqyr pynff naq gur hccre tenqrf bs gur 
 jbexvat pynff, unq orra funcrq naq oebhtug gbtrgure ol gur oneera jbeyq bs 
 zbabcbyl vaqhfgel naq pragenyvmrq tbireazrag. Nf pbzcnerq jvgu gurve 
 bccbfvgr ahzoref va cnfg ntrf, gurl jrer yrff ninevpvbhf, yrff grzcgrq ol 
 yhkhel, uhatevre sbe cher cbjre, naq, nobir nyy, zber pbafpvbhf bs jung 
 gurl jrer qbvat naq zber vagrag ba pehfuvat bccbfvgvba. Guvf ynfg 
 qvssrerapr jnf pneqvany. Ol pbzcnevfba jvgu gung rkvfgvat gbqnl, nyy gur 
 glenaavrf bs gur cnfg jrer unys-urnegrq naq varssvpvrag. Gur ehyvat tebhcf 
 jrer nyjnlf vasrpgrq gb fbzr rkgrag ol yvoreny vqrnf, naq jrer pbagrag gb 
 yrnir ybbfr raqf rireljurer, gb ertneq bayl gur bireg npg naq gb or 
 havagrerfgrq va jung gurve fhowrpgf jrer guvaxvat. Rira gur Pngubyvp Puhepu 
 bs gur Zvqqyr Ntrf jnf gbyrenag ol zbqrea fgnaqneqf. Cneg bs gur ernfba sbe 
 guvf jnf gung va gur cnfg ab tbireazrag unq gur cbjre gb xrrc vgf pvgvmraf 
 haqre pbafgnag fheirvyynapr. Gur vairagvba bs cevag, ubjrire, znqr vg 
 rnfvre gb znavchyngr choyvp bcvavba, naq gur svyz naq gur enqvb pneevrq gur 
 cebprff shegure. Jvgu gur qrirybczrag bs gryrivfvba, naq gur grpuavpny 
 nqinapr juvpu znqr vg cbffvoyr gb erprvir naq genafzvg fvzhygnarbhfyl ba 
 gur fnzr vafgehzrag, cevingr yvsr pnzr gb na raq. Rirel pvgvmra, be ng 
 yrnfg rirel pvgvmra vzcbegnag rabhtu gb or jbegu jngpuvat, pbhyq or xrcg 
 sbe gjraglsbhe ubhef n qnl haqre gur rlrf bs gur cbyvpr naq va gur fbhaq bs 
 bssvpvny cebcntnaqn, jvgu nyy bgure punaaryf bs pbzzhavpngvba pybfrq. Gur 
 cbffvovyvgl bs rasbepvat abg bayl pbzcyrgr borqvrapr gb gur jvyy bs gur 
 Fgngr, ohg pbzcyrgr havsbezvgl bs bcvavba ba nyy fhowrpgf, abj rkvfgrq sbe 
 gur svefg gvzr. 
 Nsgre gur eribyhgvbanel crevbq bs gur svsgvrf naq fvkgvrf, fbpvrgl 
 ertebhcrq vgfrys, nf nyjnlf, vagb Uvtu, Zvqqyr, naq Ybj. Ohg gur arj Uvtu 
 tebhc, hayvxr nyy vgf sberehaaref, qvq abg npg hcba vafgvapg ohg xarj jung 
 jnf arrqrq gb fnsrthneq vgf cbfvgvba. Vg unq ybat orra ernyvmrq gung gur 
 bayl frpher onfvf sbe byvtnepul vf pbyyrpgvivfz. Jrnygu naq cevivyrtr ner 
 zbfg rnfvyl qrsraqrq jura gurl ner cbffrffrq wbvagyl. Gur fb-pnyyrq 
 'nobyvgvba bs cevingr cebcregl' juvpu gbbx cynpr va gur zvqqyr lrnef bs gur 
 praghel zrnag, va rssrpg, gur pbapragengvba bs cebcregl va sne srjre unaqf 
 guna orsber: ohg jvgu guvf qvssrerapr, gung gur arj bjaref jrer n tebhc 
 vafgrnq bs n znff bs vaqvivqhnyf. Vaqvivqhnyyl, ab zrzore bs gur Cnegl bjaf 
 nalguvat, rkprcg crggl crefbany orybatvatf. Pbyyrpgviryl, gur Cnegl bjaf 
 rirelguvat va Bprnavn, orpnhfr vg pbagebyf rirelguvat, naq qvfcbfrf bs gur 
 cebqhpgf nf vg guvaxf svg. Va gur lrnef sbyybjvat gur Eribyhgvba vg jnf 
 noyr gb fgrc vagb guvf pbzznaqvat cbfvgvba nyzbfg habccbfrq, orpnhfr gur 
 jubyr cebprff jnf ercerfragrq nf na npg bs pbyyrpgvivmngvba. Vg unq nyjnlf 
 orra nffhzrq gung vs gur pncvgnyvfg pynff jrer rkcebcevngrq, Fbpvnyvfz zhfg 
 sbyybj: naq hadhrfgvbanoyl gur pncvgnyvfgf unq orra rkcebcevngrq. 
 Snpgbevrf, zvarf, ynaq, ubhfrf, genafcbeg -- rirelguvat unq orra gnxra njnl 
 sebz gurz: naq fvapr gurfr guvatf jrer ab ybatre cevingr cebcregl, vg 
 sbyybjrq gung gurl zhfg or choyvp cebcregl. Vatfbp, juvpu terj bhg bs gur 
 rneyvre Fbpvnyvfg zbirzrag naq vaurevgrq vgf cuenfrbybtl, unf va snpg 
 pneevrq bhg gur znva vgrz va gur Fbpvnyvfg cebtenzzr; jvgu gur erfhyg, 
 sberfrra naq vagraqrq orsberunaq, gung rpbabzvp vardhnyvgl unf orra znqr 
 creznarag. 
 Ohg gur ceboyrzf bs crecrghngvat n uvrenepuvpny fbpvrgl tb qrrcre guna 
 guvf. Gurer ner bayl sbhe jnlf va juvpu n ehyvat tebhc pna snyy sebz cbjre. 
 Rvgure vg vf pbadhrerq sebz jvgubhg, be vg tbireaf fb varssvpvragyl gung 
 gur znffrf ner fgveerq gb eribyg, be vg nyybjf n fgebat naq qvfpbagragrq 
 Zvqqyr tebhc gb pbzr vagb orvat, be vg ybfrf vgf bja frys-pbasvqrapr naq 
 jvyyvatarff gb tbirea. Gurfr pnhfrf qb abg bcrengr fvatyl, naq nf n ehyr 
 nyy sbhe bs gurz ner cerfrag va fbzr qrterr. N ehyvat pynff juvpu pbhyq 
 thneq ntnvafg nyy bs gurz jbhyq erznva va cbjre creznaragyl. Hygvzngryl gur 
 qrgrezvavat snpgbe vf gur zragny nggvghqr bs gur ehyvat pynff vgfrys. 
 Nsgre gur zvqqyr bs gur cerfrag praghel, gur svefg qnatre unq va 
 ernyvgl qvfnccrnerq. Rnpu bs gur guerr cbjref juvpu abj qvivqr gur jbeyq vf 
 va snpg hapbadhrenoyr, naq pbhyq bayl orpbzr pbadhrenoyr guebhtu fybj 
 qrzbtencuvp punatrf juvpu n tbireazrag jvgu jvqr cbjref pna rnfvyl nireg. 
 Gur frpbaq qnatre, nyfb, vf bayl n gurbergvpny bar. Gur znffrf arire eribyg 
 bs gurve bja nppbeq, naq gurl arire eribyg zreryl orpnhfr gurl ner 
 bccerffrq. Vaqrrq, fb ybat nf gurl ner abg crezvggrq gb unir fgnaqneqf bs 
 pbzcnevfba, gurl arire rira orpbzr njner gung gurl ner bccerffrq. Gur 
 erpheerag rpbabzvp pevfrf bs cnfg gvzrf jrer gbgnyyl haarprffnel naq ner 
 abg abj crezvggrq gb unccra, ohg bgure naq rdhnyyl ynetr qvfybpngvbaf pna 
 naq qb unccra jvgubhg univat cbyvgvpny erfhygf, orpnhfr gurer vf ab jnl va 
 juvpu qvfpbagrag pna orpbzr negvphyngr. Nf sbe gur ceboyrz bs bire- 
 cebqhpgvba, juvpu unf orra yngrag va bhe fbpvrgl fvapr gur qrirybczrag bs 
 znpuvar grpuavdhr, vg vf fbyirq ol gur qrivpr bs pbagvahbhf jnesner (frr 
 Puncgre VVV), juvpu vf nyfb hfrshy va xrlvat hc choyvp zbenyr gb gur 
 arprffnel cvgpu. Sebz gur cbvag bs ivrj bs bhe cerfrag ehyref, gurersber, 
 gur bayl trahvar qnatref ner gur fcyvggvat-bss bs n arj tebhc bs noyr, 
 haqre-rzcyblrq, cbjre-uhatel crbcyr, naq gur tebjgu bs yvorenyvfz naq 
 fprcgvpvfz va gurve bja enaxf. Gur ceboyrz, gung vf gb fnl, vf rqhpngvbany. 
 Vg vf n ceboyrz bs pbagvahbhfyl zbhyqvat gur pbafpvbhfarff obgu bs gur 
 qverpgvat tebhc naq bs gur ynetre rkrphgvir tebhc gung yvrf vzzrqvngryl 
 orybj vg. Gur pbafpvbhfarff bs gur znffrf arrqf bayl gb or vasyhraprq va n 
 artngvir jnl. 
 Tvira guvf onpxtebhaq, bar pbhyq vasre, vs bar qvq abg xabj vg 
 nyernql, gur trareny fgehpgher bs Bprnavp fbpvrgl. Ng gur ncrk bs gur 
 clenzvq pbzrf Ovt Oebgure. Ovt Oebgure vf vasnyyvoyr naq nyy-cbjreshy. 
 Rirel fhpprff, rirel npuvrirzrag, rirel ivpgbel, rirel fpvragvsvp 
 qvfpbirel, nyy xabjyrqtr, nyy jvfqbz, nyy unccvarff, nyy iveghr, ner uryq 
 gb vffhr qverpgyl sebz uvf yrnqrefuvc naq vafcvengvba. Abobql unf rire frra 
 Ovt Oebgure. Ur vf n snpr ba gur ubneqvatf, n ibvpr ba gur gryrfperra. Jr 
 znl or ernfbanoyl fher gung ur jvyy arire qvr, naq gurer vf nyernql 
 pbafvqrenoyr hapregnvagl nf gb jura ur jnf obea. Ovt Oebgure vf gur thvfr 
 va juvpu gur Cnegl pubbfrf gb rkuvovg vgfrys gb gur jbeyq. Uvf shapgvba vf 
 gb npg nf n sbphfvat cbvag sbe ybir, srne, naq erirerapr, rzbgvbaf juvpu 
 ner zber rnfvyl sryg gbjneqf na vaqvivqhny guna gbjneqf na betnavmngvba. 
 Orybj Ovt Oebgure pbzrf gur Vaare Cnegl. Vgf ahzoref yvzvgrq gb fvk 
 zvyyvbaf, be fbzrguvat yrff guna 2 cre prag bs gur cbchyngvba bs Bprnavn. 
 Orybj gur Vaare Cnegl pbzrf gur Bhgre Cnegl, juvpu, vs gur Vaare Cnegl vf 
 qrfpevorq nf gur oenva bs gur Fgngr, znl or whfgyl yvxrarq gb gur unaqf. 
 Orybj gung pbzr gur qhzo znffrf jubz jr unovghnyyl ersre gb nf 'gur 
 cebyrf', ahzorevat creuncf 85 cre prag bs gur cbchyngvba. Va gur grezf bs 
 bhe rneyvre pynffvsvpngvba, gur cebyrf ner gur Ybj: sbe gur fynir 
 cbchyngvba bs gur rdhngbevny ynaqf jub cnff pbafgnagyl sebz pbadhrebe gb 
 pbadhrebe, ner abg n creznarag be arprffnel cneg bs gur fgehpgher. 
 Va cevapvcyr, zrzorefuvc bs gurfr guerr tebhcf vf abg urerqvgnel. Gur 
 puvyq bs Vaare Cnegl cneragf vf va gurbel abg obea vagb gur Vaare Cnegl. 
 Nqzvffvba gb rvgure oenapu bs gur Cnegl vf ol rknzvangvba, gnxra ng gur ntr 
 bs fvkgrra. Abe vf gurer nal enpvny qvfpevzvangvba, be nal znexrq 
 qbzvangvba bs bar cebivapr ol nabgure. Wrjf, Artebrf, Fbhgu Nzrevpnaf bs 
 cher Vaqvna oybbq ner gb or sbhaq va gur uvturfg enaxf bs gur Cnegl, naq 
 gur nqzvavfgengbef bs nal nern ner nyjnlf qenja sebz gur vaunovgnagf bs 
 gung nern. Va ab cneg bs Bprnavn qb gur vaunovgnagf unir gur srryvat gung 
 gurl ner n pbybavny cbchyngvba ehyrq sebz n qvfgnag pncvgny. Bprnavn unf ab 
 pncvgny, naq vgf gvghyne urnq vf n crefba jubfr jurernobhgf abobql xabjf. 
 Rkprcg gung Ratyvfu vf vgf puvrs yvathn senapn naq Arjfcrnx vgf bssvpvny 
 ynathntr, vg vf abg pragenyvmrq va nal jnl. Vgf ehyref ner abg uryq 
 gbtrgure ol oybbq-gvrf ohg ol nqurerapr gb n pbzzba qbpgevar. Vg vf gehr 
 gung bhe fbpvrgl vf fgengvsvrq, naq irel evtvqyl fgengvsvrq, ba jung ng 
 svefg fvtug nccrne gb or urerqvgnel yvarf. Gurer vf sne yrff gb-naq-seb 
 zbirzrag orgjrra gur qvssrerag tebhcf guna unccrarq haqre pncvgnyvfz be 
 rira va gur cer-vaqhfgevny ntr. Orgjrra gur gjb oenapurf bs gur Cnegl gurer 
 vf n pregnva nzbhag bs vagrepunatr, ohg bayl fb zhpu nf jvyy rafher gung 
 jrnxyvatf ner rkpyhqrq sebz gur Vaare Cnegl naq gung nzovgvbhf zrzoref bs 
 gur Bhgre Cnegl ner znqr unezyrff ol nyybjvat gurz gb evfr. Cebyrgnevnaf, 
 va cenpgvpr, ner abg nyybjrq gb tenqhngr vagb gur Cnegl. Gur zbfg tvsgrq 
 nzbat gurz, jub zvtug cbffvoyl orpbzr ahpyrv bs qvfpbagrag, ner fvzcyl 
 znexrq qbja ol gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr naq ryvzvangrq. Ohg guvf fgngr bs nssnvef 
 vf abg arprffnevyl creznarag, abe vf vg n znggre bs cevapvcyr. Gur Cnegl vf 
 abg n pynff va gur byq frafr bs gur jbeq. Vg qbrf abg nvz ng genafzvggvat 
 cbjre gb vgf bja puvyqera, nf fhpu; naq vs gurer jrer ab bgure jnl bs 
 xrrcvat gur noyrfg crbcyr ng gur gbc, vg jbhyq or cresrpgyl cercnerq gb 
 erpehvg na ragver arj trarengvba sebz gur enaxf bs gur cebyrgnevng. Va gur 
 pehpvny lrnef, gur snpg gung gur Cnegl jnf abg n urerqvgnel obql qvq n 
 terng qrny gb arhgenyvmr bccbfvgvba. Gur byqre xvaq bs Fbpvnyvfg, jub unq 
 orra genvarq gb svtug ntnvafg fbzrguvat pnyyrq 'pynff cevivyrtr' nffhzrq 
 gung jung vf abg urerqvgnel pnaabg or creznarag. Ur qvq abg frr gung gur 
 pbagvahvgl bs na byvtnepul arrq abg or culfvpny, abe qvq ur cnhfr gb 
 ersyrpg gung urerqvgnel nevfgbpenpvrf unir nyjnlf orra fubegyvirq, jurernf 
 nqbcgvir betnavmngvbaf fhpu nf gur Pngubyvp Puhepu unir fbzrgvzrf ynfgrq 
 sbe uhaqerqf be gubhfnaqf bs lrnef. Gur rffrapr bs byvtnepuvpny ehyr vf abg 
 sngure-gb-fba vaurevgnapr, ohg gur crefvfgrapr bs n pregnva jbeyq-ivrj naq 
 n pregnva jnl bs yvsr, vzcbfrq ol gur qrnq hcba gur yvivat. N ehyvat tebhc 
 vf n ehyvat tebhc fb ybat nf vg pna abzvangr vgf fhpprffbef. Gur Cnegl vf 
 abg pbaprearq jvgu crecrghngvat vgf oybbq ohg jvgu crecrghngvat vgfrys. Jub 
 jvryqf cbjre vf abg vzcbegnag, cebivqrq gung gur uvrenepuvpny fgehpgher 
 erznvaf nyjnlf gur fnzr. 
 Nyy gur oryvrsf, unovgf, gnfgrf, rzbgvbaf, zragny nggvghqrf gung 
 punenpgrevmr bhe gvzr ner ernyyl qrfvtarq gb fhfgnva gur zlfgvdhr bs gur 
 Cnegl naq cerirag gur gehr angher bs cerfrag-qnl fbpvrgl sebz orvat 
 creprvirq. Culfvpny eroryyvba, be nal ceryvzvanel zbir gbjneqf eroryyvba, 
 vf ng cerfrag abg cbffvoyr. Sebz gur cebyrgnevnaf abguvat vf gb or srnerq. 
 Yrsg gb gurzfryirf, gurl jvyy pbagvahr sebz trarengvba gb trarengvba naq 
 sebz praghel gb praghel, jbexvat, oerrqvat, naq qlvat, abg bayl jvgubhg nal 
 vzchyfr gb erory, ohg jvgubhg gur cbjre bs tenfcvat gung gur jbeyq pbhyq or 
 bgure guna vg vf. Gurl pbhyq bayl orpbzr qnatrebhf vs gur nqinapr bs 
 vaqhfgevny grpuavdhr znqr vg arprffnel gb rqhpngr gurz zber uvtuyl; ohg, 
 fvapr zvyvgnel naq pbzzrepvny evinyel ner ab ybatre vzcbegnag, gur yriry bs 
 cbchyne rqhpngvba vf npghnyyl qrpyvavat. Jung bcvavbaf gur znffrf ubyq, be 
 qb abg ubyq, vf ybbxrq ba nf n znggre bs vaqvssrerapr. Gurl pna or tenagrq 
 vagryyrpghny yvoregl orpnhfr gurl unir ab vagryyrpg. Va n Cnegl zrzore, ba 
 gur bgure unaq, abg rira gur fznyyrfg qrivngvba bs bcvavba ba gur zbfg 
 havzcbegnag fhowrpg pna or gbyrengrq. 
 N Cnegl zrzore yvirf sebz ovegu gb qrngu haqre gur rlr bs gur Gubhtug 
 Cbyvpr. Rira jura ur vf nybar ur pna arire or fher gung ur vf nybar. 
 Jurerire ur znl or, nfyrrc be njnxr, jbexvat be erfgvat, va uvf ongu be va 
 orq, ur pna or vafcrpgrq jvgubhg jneavat naq jvgubhg xabjvat gung ur vf 
 orvat vafcrpgrq. Abguvat gung ur qbrf vf vaqvssrerag. Uvf sevraqfuvcf, uvf 
 erynkngvbaf, uvf orunivbhe gbjneqf uvf jvsr naq puvyqera, gur rkcerffvba bs 
 uvf snpr jura ur vf nybar, gur jbeqf ur zhggref va fyrrc, rira gur 
 punenpgrevfgvp zbirzragf bs uvf obql, ner nyy wrnybhfyl fpehgvavmrq. Abg 
 bayl nal npghny zvfqrzrnabhe, ohg nal rppragevpvgl, ubjrire fznyy, nal 
 punatr bs unovgf, nal areibhf znaarevfz gung pbhyq cbffvoyl or gur flzcgbz 
 bs na vaare fgehttyr, vf pregnva gb or qrgrpgrq. Ur unf ab serrqbz bs 
 pubvpr va nal qverpgvba jungrire. Ba gur bgure unaq uvf npgvbaf ner abg 
 erthyngrq ol ynj be ol nal pyrneyl sbezhyngrq pbqr bs orunivbhe. Va Bprnavn 
 gurer vf ab ynj. Gubhtugf naq npgvbaf juvpu, jura qrgrpgrq, zrna pregnva 
 qrngu ner abg sbeznyyl sbeovqqra, naq gur raqyrff chetrf, neerfgf, 
 gbegherf, vzcevfbazragf, naq incbevmngvbaf ner abg vasyvpgrq nf chavfuzrag 
 sbe pevzrf juvpu unir npghnyyl orra pbzzvggrq, ohg ner zreryl gur jvcvat- 
 bhg bs crefbaf jub zvtug creuncf pbzzvg n pevzr ng fbzr gvzr va gur shgher. 
 N Cnegl zrzore vf erdhverq gb unir abg bayl gur evtug bcvavbaf, ohg gur 
 evtug vafgvapgf. Znal bs gur oryvrsf naq nggvghqrf qrznaqrq bs uvz ner 
 arire cynvayl fgngrq, naq pbhyq abg or fgngrq jvgubhg ynlvat oner gur 
 pbagenqvpgvbaf vaurerag va Vatfbp. Vs ur vf n crefba anghenyyl begubqbk (va 
 Arjfcrnx n tbbqguvaxre), ur jvyy va nyy pvephzfgnaprf xabj, jvgubhg gnxvat 
 gubhtug, jung vf gur gehr oryvrs be gur qrfvenoyr rzbgvba. Ohg va nal pnfr 
 na rynobengr zragny genvavat, haqretbar va puvyqubbq naq tebhcvat vgfrys 
 ebhaq gur Arjfcrnx jbeqf pevzrfgbc, oynpxjuvgr, naq qbhoyrguvax, znxrf uvz 
 hajvyyvat naq hanoyr gb guvax gbb qrrcyl ba nal fhowrpg jungrire. 
 N Cnegl zrzore vf rkcrpgrq gb unir ab cevingr rzbgvbaf naq ab erfcvgrf 
 sebz raguhfvnfz. Ur vf fhccbfrq gb yvir va n pbagvahbhf seraml bs ungerq bs 
 sbervta rarzvrf naq vagreany genvgbef, gevhzcu bire ivpgbevrf, naq frys- 
 nonfrzrag orsber gur cbjre naq jvfqbz bs gur Cnegl. Gur qvfpbagragf 
 cebqhprq ol uvf oner, hafngvfslvat yvsr ner qryvorengryl ghearq bhgjneqf 
 naq qvffvcngrq ol fhpu qrivprf nf gur Gjb Zvahgrf Ungr, naq gur 
 fcrphyngvbaf juvpu zvtug cbffvoyl vaqhpr n fprcgvpny be eroryyvbhf nggvghqr 
 ner xvyyrq va nqinapr ol uvf rneyl npdhverq vaare qvfpvcyvar. Gur svefg naq 
 fvzcyrfg fgntr va gur qvfpvcyvar, juvpu pna or gnhtug rira gb lbhat 
 puvyqera, vf pnyyrq, va Arjfcrnx, pevzrfgbc. Pevzrfgbc zrnaf gur snphygl bs 
 fgbccvat fubeg, nf gubhtu ol vafgvapg, ng gur guerfubyq bs nal qnatrebhf 
 gubhtug. Vg vapyhqrf gur cbjre bs abg tenfcvat nanybtvrf, bs snvyvat gb 
 creprvir ybtvpny reebef, bs zvfhaqrefgnaqvat gur fvzcyrfg nethzragf vs gurl 
 ner vavzvpny gb Vatfbp, naq bs orvat oberq be ercryyrq ol nal genva bs 
 gubhtug juvpu vf pncnoyr bs yrnqvat va n urergvpny qverpgvba. Pevzrfgbc, va 
 fubeg, zrnaf cebgrpgvir fghcvqvgl. Ohg fghcvqvgl vf abg rabhtu. Ba gur 
 pbagenel, begubqbkl va gur shyy frafr qrznaqf n pbageby bire bar'f bja 
 zragny cebprffrf nf pbzcyrgr nf gung bs n pbagbegvbavfg bire uvf obql. 
 Bprnavp fbpvrgl erfgf hygvzngryl ba gur oryvrs gung Ovt Oebgure vf 
 bzavcbgrag naq gung gur Cnegl vf vasnyyvoyr. Ohg fvapr va ernyvgl Ovt 
 Oebgure vf abg bzavcbgrag naq gur cnegl vf abg vasnyyvoyr, gurer vf arrq 
 sbe na hajrnelvat, zbzrag-gb-zbzrag syrkvovyvgl va gur gerngzrag bs snpgf. 
 Gur xrljbeq urer vf oynpxjuvgr. Yvxr fb znal Arjfcrnx jbeqf, guvf jbeq unf 
 gjb zhghnyyl pbagenqvpgbel zrnavatf. Nccyvrq gb na bccbarag, vg zrnaf gur 
 unovg bs vzchqragyl pynvzvat gung oynpx vf juvgr, va pbagenqvpgvba bs gur 
 cynva snpgf. Nccyvrq gb n Cnegl zrzore, vg zrnaf n yblny jvyyvatarff gb fnl 
 gung oynpx vf juvgr jura Cnegl qvfpvcyvar qrznaqf guvf. Ohg vg zrnaf nyfb 
 gur novyvgl gb oryvrir gung oynpx vf juvgr, naq zber, gb xabj gung oynpx vf 
 juvgr, naq gb sbetrg gung bar unf rire oryvrirq gur pbagenel. Guvf qrznaqf 
 n pbagvahbhf nygrengvba bs gur cnfg, znqr cbffvoyr ol gur flfgrz bs gubhtug 
 juvpu ernyyl rzoenprf nyy gur erfg, naq juvpu vf xabja va Arjfcrnx nf 
 qbhoyrguvax. 
 Gur nygrengvba bs gur cnfg vf arprffnel sbe gjb ernfbaf, bar bs juvpu 
 vf fhofvqvnel naq, fb gb fcrnx, cerpnhgvbanel. Gur fhofvqvnel ernfba vf 
 gung gur Cnegl zrzore, yvxr gur cebyrgnevna, gbyrengrf cerfrag-qnl 
 pbaqvgvbaf cnegyl orpnhfr ur unf ab fgnaqneqf bs pbzcnevfba. Ur zhfg or phg 
 bss sebz gur cnfg, whfg nf ur zhfg or phg bss sebz sbervta pbhagevrf, 
 orpnhfr vg vf arprffnel sbe uvz gb oryvrir gung ur vf orggre bss guna uvf 
 naprfgbef naq gung gur nirentr yriry bs zngrevny pbzsbeg vf pbafgnagyl 
 evfvat. Ohg ol sne gur zber vzcbegnag ernfba sbe gur ernqwhfgzrag bs gur 
 cnfg vf gur arrq gb fnsrthneq gur vasnyyvovyvgl bs gur Cnegl. Vg vf abg 
 zreryl gung fcrrpurf, fgngvfgvpf, naq erpbeqf bs rirel xvaq zhfg or 
 pbafgnagyl oebhtug hc gb qngr va beqre gb fubj gung gur cerqvpgvbaf bs gur 
 Cnegl jrer va nyy pnfrf evtug. Vg vf nyfb gung ab punatr va qbpgevar be va 
 cbyvgvpny nyvtazrag pna rire or nqzvggrq. Sbe gb punatr bar'f zvaq, be rira 
 bar'f cbyvpl, vf n pbasrffvba bs jrnxarff. Vs, sbe rknzcyr, Rhenfvn be 
 Rnfgnfvn (juvpurire vg znl or) vf gur rarzl gbqnl, gura gung pbhagel zhfg 
 nyjnlf unir orra gur rarzl. Naq vs gur snpgf fnl bgurejvfr gura gur snpgf 
 zhfg or nygrerq. Guhf uvfgbel vf pbagvahbhfyl erjevggra. Guvf qnl-gb-qnl 
 snyfvsvpngvba bs gur cnfg, pneevrq bhg ol gur Zvavfgel bs Gehgu, vf nf 
 arprffnel gb gur fgnovyvgl bs gur ertvzr nf gur jbex bs ercerffvba naq 
 rfcvbantr pneevrq bhg ol gur Zvavfgel bs Ybir. 
 Gur zhgnovyvgl bs gur cnfg vf gur prageny grarg bs Vatfbp. Cnfg 
 riragf, vg vf nethrq, unir ab bowrpgvir rkvfgrapr, ohg fheivir bayl va 
 jevggra erpbeqf naq va uhzna zrzbevrf. Gur cnfg vf jungrire gur erpbeqf naq 
 gur zrzbevrf nterr hcba. Naq fvapr gur Cnegl vf va shyy pbageby bs nyy 
 erpbeqf naq va rdhnyyl shyy pbageby bs gur zvaqf bs vgf zrzoref, vg sbyybjf 
 gung gur cnfg vf jungrire gur Cnegl pubbfrf gb znxr vg. Vg nyfb sbyybjf 
 gung gubhtu gur cnfg vf nygrenoyr, vg arire unf orra nygrerq va nal 
 fcrpvsvp vafgnapr. Sbe jura vg unf orra erperngrq va jungrire funcr vf 
 arrqrq ng gur zbzrag, gura guvf arj irefvba vf gur cnfg, naq ab qvssrerag 
 cnfg pna rire unir rkvfgrq. Guvf ubyqf tbbq rira jura, nf bsgra unccraf, 
 gur fnzr rirag unf gb or nygrerq bhg bs erpbtavgvba frireny gvzrf va gur 
 pbhefr bs n lrne. Ng nyy gvzrf gur Cnegl vf va cbffrffvba bs nofbyhgr 
 gehgu, naq pyrneyl gur nofbyhgr pna arire unir orra qvssrerag sebz jung vg 
 vf abj. Vg jvyy or frra gung gur pbageby bs gur cnfg qrcraqf nobir nyy ba 
 gur genvavat bs zrzbel. Gb znxr fher gung nyy jevggra erpbeqf nterr jvgu 
 gur begubqbkl bs gur zbzrag vf zreryl n zrpunavpny npg. Ohg vg vf nyfb 
 arprffnel gb erzrzore gung riragf unccrarq va gur qrfverq znaare. Naq vs vg 
 vf arprffnel gb erneenatr bar'f zrzbevrf be gb gnzcre jvgu jevggra erpbeqf, 
 gura vg vf arprffnel gb sbetrg gung bar unf qbar fb. Gur gevpx bs qbvat 
 guvf pna or yrnearq yvxr nal bgure zragny grpuavdhr. Vg vf yrnearq ol gur 
 znwbevgl bs Cnegl zrzoref, naq pregnvayl ol nyy jub ner vagryyvtrag nf jryy 
 nf begubqbk. Va Byqfcrnx vg vf pnyyrq, dhvgr senaxyl, 'ernyvgl pbageby'. Va 
 Arjfcrnx vg vf pnyyrq qbhoyrguvax, gubhtu qbhoyrguvax pbzcevfrf zhpu ryfr 
 nf jryy. 
 Qbhoyrguvax zrnaf gur cbjre bs ubyqvat gjb pbagenqvpgbel oryvrsf va 
 bar'f zvaq fvzhygnarbhfyl, naq npprcgvat obgu bs gurz. Gur Cnegl 
 vagryyrpghny xabjf va juvpu qverpgvba uvf zrzbevrf zhfg or nygrerq; ur 
 gurersber xabjf gung ur vf cynlvat gevpxf jvgu ernyvgl; ohg ol gur rkrepvfr 
 bs qbhoyrguvax ur nyfb fngvfsvrf uvzfrys gung ernyvgl vf abg ivbyngrq. Gur 
 cebprff unf gb or pbafpvbhf, be vg jbhyq abg or pneevrq bhg jvgu fhssvpvrag 
 cerpvfvba, ohg vg nyfb unf gb or hapbafpvbhf, be vg jbhyq oevat jvgu vg n 
 srryvat bs snyfvgl naq urapr bs thvyg. Qbhoyrguvax yvrf ng gur irel urneg 
 bs Vatfbp, fvapr gur rffragvny npg bs gur Cnegl vf gb hfr pbafpvbhf 
 qrprcgvba juvyr ergnvavat gur svezarff bs checbfr gung tbrf jvgu pbzcyrgr 
 ubarfgl. Gb gryy qryvorengr yvrf juvyr trahvaryl oryvrivat va gurz, gb 
 sbetrg nal snpg gung unf orpbzr vapbairavrag, naq gura, jura vg orpbzrf 
 arprffnel ntnva, gb qenj vg onpx sebz boyvivba sbe whfg fb ybat nf vg vf 
 arrqrq, gb qral gur rkvfgrapr bs bowrpgvir ernyvgl naq nyy gur juvyr gb 
 gnxr nppbhag bs gur ernyvgl juvpu bar qravrf -- nyy guvf vf vaqvfcrafnoyl 
 arprffnel. Rira va hfvat gur jbeq qbhoyrguvax vg vf arprffnel gb rkrepvfr 
 qbhoyrguvax. Sbe ol hfvat gur jbeq bar nqzvgf gung bar vf gnzcrevat jvgu 
 ernyvgl; ol n serfu npg bs qbhoyrguvax bar renfrf guvf xabjyrqtr; naq fb ba 
 vaqrsvavgryl, jvgu gur yvr nyjnlf bar yrnc nurnq bs gur gehgu. Hygvzngryl 
 vg vf ol zrnaf bs qbhoyrguvax gung gur Cnegl unf orra noyr -- naq znl, sbe 
 nyy jr xabj, pbagvahr gb or noyr sbe gubhfnaqf bs lrnef -- gb neerfg gur 
 pbhefr bs uvfgbel. 
 Nyy cnfg byvtnepuvrf unir snyyra sebz cbjre rvgure orpnhfr gurl 
 bffvsvrq be orpnhfr gurl terj fbsg. Rvgure gurl orpnzr fghcvq naq neebtnag, 
 snvyrq gb nqwhfg gurzfryirf gb punatvat pvephzfgnaprf, naq jrer bireguebja; 
 be gurl orpnzr yvoreny naq pbjneqyl, znqr pbaprffvbaf jura gurl fubhyq unir 
 hfrq sbepr, naq bapr ntnva jrer bireguebja. Gurl sryy, gung vf gb fnl, 
 rvgure guebhtu pbafpvbhfarff be guebhtu hapbafpvbhfarff. Vg vf gur 
 npuvrirzrag bs gur Cnegl gb unir cebqhprq n flfgrz bs gubhtug va juvpu obgu 
 pbaqvgvbaf pna rkvfg fvzhygnarbhfyl. Naq hcba ab bgure vagryyrpghny onfvf 
 pbhyq gur qbzvavba bs gur Cnegl or znqr creznarag. Vs bar vf gb ehyr, naq 
 gb pbagvahr ehyvat, bar zhfg or noyr gb qvfybpngr gur frafr bs ernyvgl. Sbe 
 gur frperg bs ehyrefuvc vf gb pbzovar n oryvrs va bar'f bja vasnyyvovyvgl 
 jvgu gur Cbjre gb yrnea sebz cnfg zvfgnxrf. 
 Vg arrq uneqyl or fnvq gung gur fhogyrfg cenpgvgvbaref bs qbhoyrguvax 
 ner gubfr jub vairagrq qbhoyrguvax naq xabj gung vg vf n infg flfgrz bs 
 zragny purngvat. Va bhe fbpvrgl, gubfr jub unir gur orfg xabjyrqtr bs jung 
 vf unccravat ner nyfb gubfr jub ner shegurfg sebz frrvat gur jbeyq nf vg 
 vf. Va trareny, gur terngre gur haqrefgnaqvat, gur terngre gur qryhfvba; 
 gur zber vagryyvtrag, gur yrff fnar. Bar pyrne vyyhfgengvba bs guvf vf gur 
 snpg gung jne ulfgrevn vapernfrf va vagrafvgl nf bar evfrf va gur fbpvny 
 fpnyr. Gubfr jubfr nggvghqr gbjneqf gur jne vf zbfg arneyl engvbany ner gur 
 fhowrpg crbcyrf bs gur qvfchgrq greevgbevrf. Gb gurfr crbcyr gur jne vf 
 fvzcyl n pbagvahbhf pnynzvgl juvpu fjrrcf gb naq seb bire gurve obqvrf yvxr 
 n gvqny jnir. Juvpu fvqr vf jvaavat vf n znggre bs pbzcyrgr vaqvssrerapr gb 
 gurz. Gurl ner njner gung n punatr bs bireybeqfuvc zrnaf fvzcyl gung gurl 
 jvyy or qbvat gur fnzr jbex nf orsber sbe arj znfgref jub gerng gurz va gur 
 fnzr znaare nf gur byq barf. Gur fyvtugyl zber snibherq jbexref jubz jr 
 pnyy 'gur cebyrf' ner bayl vagrezvggragyl pbafpvbhf bs gur jne. Jura vg vf 
 arprffnel gurl pna or cebqqrq vagb seramvrf bs srne naq ungerq, ohg jura 
 yrsg gb gurzfryirf gurl ner pncnoyr bs sbetrggvat sbe ybat crevbqf gung gur 
 jne vf unccravat. Vg vf va gur enaxf bs gur Cnegl, naq nobir nyy bs gur 
 Vaare Cnegl, gung gur gehr jne raguhfvnfz vf sbhaq. Jbeyq-pbadhrfg vf 
 oryvrirq va zbfg svezyl ol gubfr jub xabj vg gb or vzcbffvoyr. Guvf 
 crphyvne yvaxvat-gbtrgure bs bccbfvgrf -- xabjyrqtr jvgu vtabenapr, 
 plavpvfz jvgu snangvpvfz -- vf bar bs gur puvrs qvfgvathvfuvat znexf bs 
 Bprnavp fbpvrgl. Gur bssvpvny vqrbybtl nobhaqf jvgu pbagenqvpgvbaf rira 
 jura gurer vf ab cenpgvpny ernfba sbe gurz. Guhf, gur Cnegl erwrpgf naq 
 ivyvsvrf rirel cevapvcyr sbe juvpu gur Fbpvnyvfg zbirzrag bevtvanyyl fgbbq, 
 naq vg pubbfrf gb qb guvf va gur anzr bs Fbpvnyvfz. Vg cernpurf n pbagrzcg 
 sbe gur jbexvat pynff harknzcyrq sbe praghevrf cnfg, naq vg qerffrf vgf 
 zrzoref va n havsbez juvpu jnf ng bar gvzr crphyvne gb znahny jbexref naq 
 jnf nqbcgrq sbe gung ernfba. Vg flfgrzngvpnyyl haqrezvarf gur fbyvqnevgl bs 
 gur snzvyl, naq vg pnyyf vgf yrnqre ol n anzr juvpu vf n qverpg nccrny gb 
 gur fragvzrag bs snzvyl yblnygl. Rira gur anzrf bs gur sbhe Zvavfgevrf ol 
 juvpu jr ner tbirearq rkuvovg n fbeg bs vzchqrapr va gurve qryvorengr 
 erirefny bs gur snpgf. Gur Zvavfgel bs Crnpr pbapreaf vgfrys jvgu jne, gur 
 Zvavfgel bs Gehgu jvgu yvrf, gur Zvavfgel bs Ybir jvgu gbegher naq gur 
 Zvavfgel bs Cyragl jvgu fgneingvba. Gurfr pbagenqvpgvbaf ner abg 
 nppvqragny, abe qb gurl erfhyg sebz beqvanel ulcbpevfl; gurl ner qryvorengr 
 rkrepvfrf va qbhoyrguvax. Sbe vg vf bayl ol erpbapvyvat pbagenqvpgvbaf gung 
 cbjre pna or ergnvarq vaqrsvavgryl. Va ab bgure jnl pbhyq gur napvrag plpyr 
 or oebxra. Vs uhzna rdhnyvgl vf gb or sbe rire niregrq -- vs gur Uvtu, nf 
 jr unir pnyyrq gurz, ner gb xrrc gurve cynprf creznaragyl -- gura gur 
 cerinvyvat zragny pbaqvgvba zhfg or pbagebyyrq vafnavgl. 
 Ohg gurer vf bar dhrfgvba juvpu hagvy guvf zbzrag jr unir nyzbfg 
 vtaberq. Vg vf; jul fubhyq uhzna rdhnyvgl or niregrq? Fhccbfvat gung gur 
 zrpunavpf bs gur cebprff unir orra evtugyl qrfpevorq, jung vf gur zbgvir 
 sbe guvf uhtr, npphengryl cynaarq rssbeg gb serrmr uvfgbel ng n cnegvphyne 
 zbzrag bs gvzr? 
 Urer jr ernpu gur prageny frperg. Nf jr unir frra. gur zlfgvdhr bs gur 
 Cnegl, naq nobir nyy bs gur Vaare Cnegl, qrcraqf hcba qbhoyrguvax. Ohg 
 qrrcre guna guvf yvrf gur bevtvany zbgvir, gur arire-dhrfgvbarq vafgvapg 
 gung svefg yrq gb gur frvmher bs cbjre naq oebhtug qbhoyrguvax, gur Gubhtug 
 Cbyvpr, pbagvahbhf jnesner, naq nyy gur bgure arprffnel cnencureanyvn vagb 
 rkvfgrapr nsgrejneqf. Guvf zbgvir ernyyl pbafvfgf... 
 Jvafgba orpnzr njner bs fvyrapr, nf bar orpbzrf njner bs n arj fbhaq. 
 Vg frrzrq gb uvz gung Whyvn unq orra irel fgvyy sbe fbzr gvzr cnfg. Fur jnf 
 ylvat ba ure fvqr, anxrq sebz gur jnvfg hcjneqf, jvgu ure purrx cvyybjrq ba 
 ure unaq naq bar qnex ybpx ghzoyvat npebff ure rlrf. Ure oernfg ebfr naq 
 sryy fybjyl naq erthyneyl. 
 'Whyvn.' 
 Ab nafjre. 
 'Whyvn, ner lbh njnxr?' 
 Ab nafjre. Fur jnf nfyrrc. Ur fuhg gur obbx, chg vg pnershyyl ba gur 
 sybbe, ynl qbja, naq chyyrq gur pbireyrg bire obgu bs gurz. 
 Ur unq fgvyy, ur ersyrpgrq, abg yrnearq gur hygvzngr frperg. Ur 
 haqrefgbbq ubj; ur qvq abg haqrefgnaq jul. Puncgre V, yvxr Puncgre VVV, unq 
 abg npghnyyl gbyq uvz nalguvat gung ur qvq abg xabj, vg unq zreryl 
 flfgrzngvmrq gur xabjyrqtr gung ur cbffrffrq nyernql. Ohg nsgre ernqvat vg 
 ur xarj orggre guna orsber gung ur jnf abg znq. Orvat va n zvabevgl, rira n 
 zvabevgl bs bar, qvq abg znxr lbh znq. Gurer jnf gehgu naq gurer jnf 
 hagehgu, naq vs lbh pyhat gb gur gehgu rira ntnvafg gur jubyr jbeyq, lbh 
 jrer abg znq. N lryybj ornz sebz gur fvaxvat fha fynagrq va guebhtu gur 
 jvaqbj naq sryy npebff gur cvyybj. Ur fuhg uvf rlrf. Gur fha ba uvf snpr 
 naq gur tvey'f fzbbgu obql gbhpuvat uvf bja tnir uvz n fgebat, fyrrcl, 
 pbasvqrag srryvat. Ur jnf fnsr, rirelguvat jnf nyy evtug. Ur sryy nfyrrc 
 zhezhevat 'Fnavgl vf abg fgngvfgvpny,' jvgu gur srryvat gung guvf erznex 
 pbagnvarq va vg n cebsbhaq jvfqbz. 
 
 K 
 
 Jura ur jbxr vg jnf jvgu gur frafngvba bs univat fyrcg sbe n ybat 
 gvzr, ohg n tynapr ng gur byq-snfuvbarq pybpx gbyq uvz gung vg jnf bayl 
 gjragl-guvegl. Ur ynl qbmvat sbe n juvyr; gura gur hfhny qrrc-yhatrq 
 fvatvat fgehpx hc sebz gur lneq orybj: 
 
 Vg jnf bayl na 'bcryrff snapl, 
 Vg cnffrq yvxr na Vcevy qlr, 
 Ohg n ybbx na' n jbeq na' gur qernzf gurl fgveerq 
 Gurl 'nir fgbyra zl 'rneg njlr! 
 
 Gur qeviryvat fbat frrzrq gb unir xrcg vgf cbchynevgl. Lbh fgvyy urneq 
 vg nyy bire gur cynpr. Vg unq bhgyvirq gur Ungr Fbat. Whyvn jbxr ng gur 
 fbhaq, fgergpurq urefrys yhkhevbhfyl, naq tbg bhg bs orq. 
 'V'z uhatel,' fur fnvq. 'Yrg'f znxr fbzr zber pbssrr. Qnza! Gur 
 fgbir'f tbar bhg naq gur jngre'f pbyq.' Fur cvpxrq gur fgbir hc naq fubbx 
 vg. 'Gurer'f ab bvy va vg.' 
 'Jr pna trg fbzr sebz byq Puneevatgba, V rkcrpg.' 
 'Gur shaal guvat vf V znqr fher vg jnf shyy. V'z tbvat gb chg zl 
 pybgurf ba,' fur nqqrq. 'Vg frrzf gb unir tbg pbyqre.' 
 Jvafgba nyfb tbg hc naq qerffrq uvzfrys. Gur vaqrsngvtnoyr ibvpr fnat 
 ba: 
 
 Gurl flr gung gvzr 'rnyf nyy guvatf, 
 Gurl flr lbh pna nyjnlf sbetrg; 
 Ohg gur fzvyrf na' gur grnef npebeff gur lrnef 
 Gurl gjvfg zl 'rneg-fgevatf lrg! 
 
 Nf ur snfgrarq gur oryg bs uvf birenyyf ur fgebyyrq npebff gb gur 
 jvaqbj. Gur fha zhfg unir tbar qbja oruvaq gur ubhfrf; vg jnf abg fuvavat 
 vagb gur lneq nal ybatre. Gur syntfgbarf jrer jrg nf gubhtu gurl unq whfg 
 orra jnfurq, naq ur unq gur srryvat gung gur fxl unq orra jnfurq gbb, fb 
 serfu naq cnyr jnf gur oyhr orgjrra gur puvzarl-cbgf. Gveryrffyl gur jbzna 
 znepurq gb naq seb, pbexvat naq hapbexvat urefrys, fvatvat naq snyyvat 
 fvyrag, naq crttvat bhg zber qvncref, naq zber naq lrg zber. Ur jbaqrerq 
 jurgure fur gbbx va jnfuvat sbe n yvivat be jnf zreryl gur fynir bs gjragl 
 be guvegl tenaqpuvyqera. Whyvn unq pbzr npebff gb uvf fvqr; gbtrgure gurl 
 tnmrq qbja jvgu n fbeg bs snfpvangvba ng gur fgheql svther orybj. Nf ur 
 ybbxrq ng gur jbzna va ure punenpgrevfgvp nggvghqr, ure guvpx nezf ernpuvat 
 hc sbe gur yvar, ure cbjreshy zner-yvxr ohggbpxf cebgehqrq, vg fgehpx uvz 
 sbe gur svefg gvzr gung fur jnf ornhgvshy. Vg unq arire orsber bppheerq gb 
 uvz gung gur obql bs n jbzna bs svsgl, oybja hc gb zbafgebhf qvzrafvbaf ol 
 puvyqornevat, gura uneqrarq, ebhturarq ol jbex gvyy vg jnf pbnefr va gur 
 tenva yvxr na bire-evcr gheavc, pbhyq or ornhgvshy. Ohg vg jnf fb, naq 
 nsgre nyy, ur gubhtug, jul abg? Gur fbyvq, pbagbheyrff obql, yvxr n oybpx 
 bs tenavgr, naq gur enfcvat erq fxva, ober gur fnzr eryngvba gb gur obql bs 
 n tvey nf gur ebfr-uvc gb gur ebfr. Jul fubhyq gur sehvg or uryq vasrevbe 
 gb gur sybjre? 
 'Fur'f ornhgvshy,' ur zhezherq. 
 'Fur'f n zrger npebff gur uvcf, rnfvyl,' fnvq Whyvn. 
 'Gung vf ure fglyr bs ornhgl,' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 Ur uryq Whyvn'f fhccyr jnvfg rnfvyl rapvepyrq ol uvf nez. Sebz gur uvc 
 gb gur xarr ure synax jnf ntnvafg uvf. Bhg bs gurve obqvrf ab puvyq jbhyq 
 rire pbzr. Gung jnf gur bar guvat gurl pbhyq arire qb. Bayl ol jbeq bs 
 zbhgu, sebz zvaq gb zvaq, pbhyq gurl cnff ba gur frperg. Gur jbzna qbja 
 gurer unq ab zvaq, fur unq bayl fgebat nezf, n jnez urneg, naq n sregvyr 
 oryyl. Ur jbaqrerq ubj znal puvyqera fur unq tvira ovegu gb. Vg zvtug 
 rnfvyl or svsgrra. Fur unq unq ure zbzragnel sybjrevat, n lrne, creuncf, bs 
 jvyq-ebfr ornhgl naq gura fur unq fhqqrayl fjbyyra yvxr n sregvyvmrq sehvg 
 naq tebja uneq naq erq naq pbnefr, naq gura ure yvsr unq orra ynhaqrevat, 
 fpehoovat, qneavat, pbbxvat, fjrrcvat, cbyvfuvat, zraqvat, fpehoovat, 
 ynhaqrevat, svefg sbe puvyqera, gura sbe tenaqpuvyqera, bire guvegl 
 haoebxra lrnef. Ng gur raq bs vg fur jnf fgvyy fvatvat. Gur zlfgvpny 
 erirerapr gung ur sryg sbe ure jnf fbzrubj zvkrq hc jvgu gur nfcrpg bs gur 
 cnyr, pybhqyrff fxl, fgergpuvat njnl oruvaq gur puvzarl-cbgf vagb 
 vagrezvanoyr qvfgnapr. Vg jnf phevbhf gb guvax gung gur fxl jnf gur fnzr 
 sbe rirelobql, va Rhenfvn be Rnfgnfvn nf jryy nf urer. Naq gur crbcyr haqre 
 gur fxl jrer nyfb irel zhpu gur fnzr -- rireljurer, nyy bire gur jbeyq, 
 uhaqerqf bs gubhfnaqf bs zvyyvbaf bs crbcyr whfg yvxr guvf, crbcyr vtabenag 
 bs bar nabgure'f rkvfgrapr, uryq ncneg ol jnyyf bs ungerq naq yvrf, naq lrg 
 nyzbfg rknpgyl gur fnzr -- crbcyr jub unq arire yrnearq gb guvax ohg jub 
 jrer fgbevat hc va gurve urnegf naq oryyvrf naq zhfpyrf gur cbjre gung 
 jbhyq bar qnl bireghea gur jbeyq. Vs gurer jnf ubcr, vg ynl va gur cebyrf! 
 Jvgubhg univat ernq gb gur raq bs gur obbx, ur xarj gung gung zhfg or 
 Tbyqfgrva'f svany zrffntr. Gur shgher orybatrq gb gur cebyrf. Naq pbhyq ur 
 or fher gung jura gurve gvzr pnzr gur jbeyq gurl pbafgehpgrq jbhyq abg or 
 whfg nf nyvra gb uvz, Jvafgba Fzvgu, nf gur jbeyq bs gur Cnegl? Lrf, 
 orpnhfr ng gur yrnfg vg jbhyq or n jbeyq bs fnavgl. Jurer gurer vf rdhnyvgl 
 gurer pna or fnavgl. Fbbare be yngre vg jbhyq unccra, fgeratgu jbhyq punatr 
 vagb pbafpvbhfarff. Gur cebyrf jrer vzzbegny, lbh pbhyq abg qbhog vg jura 
 lbh ybbxrq ng gung inyvnag svther va gur lneq. Va gur raq gurve njnxravat 
 jbhyq pbzr. Naq hagvy gung unccrarq, gubhtu vg zvtug or n gubhfnaq lrnef, 
 gurl jbhyq fgnl nyvir ntnvafg nyy gur bqqf, yvxr oveqf, cnffvat ba sebz 
 obql gb obql gur ivgnyvgl juvpu gur Cnegl qvq abg funer naq pbhyq abg xvyy. 
 'Qb lbh erzrzore,' ur fnvq, 'gur guehfu gung fnat gb hf, gung svefg 
 qnl, ng gur rqtr bs gur jbbq?' 
 'Ur jnfa'g fvatvat gb hf,' fnvq Whyvn. 'Ur jnf fvatvat gb cyrnfr 
 uvzfrys. Abg rira gung. Ur jnf whfg fvatvat.' 
 Gur oveqf fnat, gur cebyrf fnat. gur Cnegl qvq abg fvat. Nyy ebhaq gur 
 jbeyq, va Ybaqba naq Arj Lbex, va Nsevpn naq Oenmvy, naq va gur zlfgrevbhf, 
 sbeovqqra ynaqf orlbaq gur sebagvref, va gur fgerrgf bs Cnevf naq Oreyva, 
 va gur ivyyntrf bs gur raqyrff Ehffvna cynva, va gur onmnnef bs Puvan naq 
 Wncna -- rireljurer fgbbq gur fnzr fbyvq hapbadhrenoyr svther, znqr 
 zbafgebhf ol jbex naq puvyqornevat, gbvyvat sebz ovegu gb qrngu naq fgvyy 
 fvatvat. Bhg bs gubfr zvtugl ybvaf n enpr bs pbafpvbhf orvatf zhfg bar qnl 
 pbzr. Lbh jrer gur qrnq, gurvef jnf gur shgher. Ohg lbh pbhyq funer va gung 
 shgher vs lbh xrcg nyvir gur zvaq nf gurl xrcg nyvir gur obql, naq cnffrq 
 ba gur frperg qbpgevar gung gjb cyhf gjb znxr sbhe. 
 'Jr ner gur qrnq,' ur fnvq. 
 'Jr ner gur qrnq,' rpubrq Whyvn qhgvshyyl. 
 'Lbh ner gur qrnq,' fnvq na veba ibvpr oruvaq gurz. 
 Gurl fcenat ncneg. Jvafgba'f ragenvyf frrzrq gb unir ghearq vagb vpr. 
 Ur pbhyq frr gur juvgr nyy ebhaq gur vevfrf bs Whyvn'f rlrf. Ure snpr unq 
 ghearq n zvyxl lryybj. Gur fzrne bs ebhtr gung jnf fgvyy ba rnpu purrxobar 
 fgbbq bhg funecyl, nyzbfg nf gubhtu hapbaarpgrq jvgu gur fxva orarngu. 
 'Lbh ner gur qrnq,' ercrngrq gur veba ibvpr. 
 'Vg jnf oruvaq gur cvpgher,' oerngurq Whyvn. 
 'Vg jnf oruvaq gur cvpgher,' fnvq gur ibvpr. 'Erznva rknpgyl jurer lbh 
 ner. Znxr ab zbirzrag hagvy lbh ner beqrerq.' 
 Vg jnf fgnegvat, vg jnf fgnegvat ng ynfg! Gurl pbhyq qb abguvat rkprcg 
 fgnaq tnmvat vagb bar nabgure'f rlrf. Gb eha sbe yvsr, gb trg bhg bs gur 
 ubhfr orsber vg jnf gbb yngr -- ab fhpu gubhtug bppheerq gb gurz. 
 Haguvaxnoyr gb qvfborl gur veba ibvpr sebz gur jnyy. Gurer jnf n fanc nf 
 gubhtu n pngpu unq orra ghearq onpx, naq n penfu bs oernxvat tynff. Gur 
 cvpgher unq snyyra gb gur sybbe hapbirevat gur gryrfperra oruvaq vg. 
 'Abj gurl pna frr hf,' fnvq Whyvn. 
 'Abj jr pna frr lbh,' fnvq gur ibvpr. 'Fgnaq bhg va gur zvqqyr bs gur 
 ebbz. Fgnaq onpx gb onpx. Pynfc lbhe unaqf oruvaq lbhe urnqf. Qb abg gbhpu 
 bar nabgure.' 
 Gurl jrer abg gbhpuvat, ohg vg frrzrq gb uvz gung ur pbhyq srry 
 Whyvn'f obql funxvat. Be creuncf vg jnf zreryl gur funxvat bs uvf bja. Ur 
 pbhyq whfg fgbc uvf grrgu sebz punggrevat, ohg uvf xarrf jrer orlbaq uvf 
 pbageby. Gurer jnf n fbhaq bs genzcyvat obbgf orybj, vafvqr gur ubhfr naq 
 bhgfvqr. Gur lneq frrzrq gb or shyy bs zra. Fbzrguvat jnf orvat qenttrq 
 npebff gur fgbarf. Gur jbzna'f fvatvat unq fgbccrq noehcgyl. Gurer jnf n 
 ybat, ebyyvat pynat, nf gubhtu gur jnfugho unq orra syhat npebff gur lneq, 
 naq gura n pbashfvba bs natel fubhgf juvpu raqrq va n lryy bs cnva. 
 'Gur ubhfr vf fheebhaqrq,' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 'Gur ubhfr vf fheebhaqrq,' fnvq gur ibvpr. 
 Ur urneq Whyvn fanc ure grrgu gbtrgure. 'V fhccbfr jr znl nf jryy fnl 
 tbbq-olr,' fur fnvq. 
 'Lbh znl nf jryy fnl tbbq-olr,' fnvq gur ibvpr. Naq gura nabgure dhvgr 
 qvssrerag ibvpr, n guva, phygvingrq ibvpr juvpu Jvafgba unq gur vzcerffvba 
 bs univat urneq orsber, fgehpx va; 'Naq ol gur jnl, juvyr jr ner ba gur 
 fhowrpg, Urer pbzrf n pnaqyr gb yvtug lbh gb orq, urer pbzrf n pubccre gb 
 pubc bss lbhe urnq!' 
 Fbzrguvat penfurq ba gb gur orq oruvaq Jvafgba'f onpx. Gur urnq bs n 
 ynqqre unq orra guehfg guebhtu gur jvaqbj naq unq ohefg va gur senzr. 
 Fbzrbar jnf pyvzovat guebhtu gur jvaqbj. Gurer jnf n fgnzcrqr bs obbgf hc 
 gur fgnvef. Gur ebbz jnf shyy bs fbyvq zra va oynpx havsbezf, jvgu veba- 
 fubq obbgf ba gurve srrg naq gehapurbaf va gurve unaqf. 
 Jvafgba jnf abg gerzoyvat nal ybatre. Rira uvf rlrf ur oneryl zbirq. 
 Bar guvat nybar znggrerq; gb xrrc fgvyy, gb xrrc fgvyy naq abg tvir gurz na 
 rkphfr gb uvg lbh! N zna jvgu n fzbbgu cevmr-svtugre'f wbjy va juvpu gur 
 zbhgu jnf bayl n fyvg cnhfrq bccbfvgr uvz onynapvat uvf gehapurba 
 zrqvgngviryl orgjrra guhzo naq sbersvatre. Jvafgba zrg uvf rlrf. Gur 
 srryvat bs anxrqarff, jvgu bar'f unaqf oruvaq bar'f urnq naq bar'f snpr naq 
 obql nyy rkcbfrq, jnf nyzbfg haornenoyr. Gur zna cebgehqrq gur gvc bs n 
 juvgr gbathr, yvpxrq gur cynpr jurer uvf yvcf fubhyq unir orra, naq gura 
 cnffrq ba. Gurer jnf nabgure penfu. Fbzrbar unq cvpxrq hc gur tynff 
 cncrejrvtug sebz gur gnoyr naq fznfurq vg gb cvrprf ba gur urnegu-fgbar. 
 Gur sentzrag bs pbeny, n gval pevaxyr bs cvax yvxr n fhtne ebfrohq 
 sebz n pnxr, ebyyrq npebff gur zng. Ubj fznyy, gubhtug Jvafgba, ubj fznyy 
 vg nyjnlf jnf! Gurer jnf n tnfc naq n guhzc oruvaq uvz, naq ur erprvirq n 
 ivbyrag xvpx ba gur naxyr juvpu arneyl syhat uvz bss uvf onynapr. Bar bs 
 gur zra unq fznfurq uvf svfg vagb Whyvn'f fbyne cyrkhf, qbhoyvat ure hc 
 yvxr n cbpxrg ehyre. Fur jnf guenfuvat nobhg ba gur sybbe, svtugvat sbe 
 oerngu. Jvafgba qnerq abg ghea uvf urnq rira ol n zvyyvzrger, ohg fbzrgvzrf 
 ure yvivq, tnfcvat snpr pnzr jvguva gur natyr bs uvf ivfvba. Rira va uvf 
 greebe vg jnf nf gubhtu ur pbhyq srry gur cnva va uvf bja obql, gur qrnqyl 
 cnva juvpu arireguryrff jnf yrff hetrag guna gur fgehttyr gb trg onpx ure 
 oerngu. Ur xarj jung vg jnf yvxr; gur greevoyr, ntbavmvat cnva juvpu jnf 
 gurer nyy gur juvyr ohg pbhyq abg or fhssrerq lrg, orpnhfr orsber nyy ryfr 
 vg jnf arprffnel gb or noyr gb oerngur. Gura gjb bs gur zra ubvfgrq ure hc 
 ol xarrf naq fubhyqref, naq pneevrq ure bhg bs gur ebbz yvxr n fnpx. 
 Jvafgba unq n tyvzcfr bs ure snpr, hcfvqr qbja, lryybj naq pbagbegrq, jvgu 
 gur rlrf fuhg, naq fgvyy jvgu n fzrne bs ebhtr ba rvgure purrx; naq gung 
 jnf gur ynfg ur fnj bs ure. 
 Ur fgbbq qrnq fgvyy. Ab bar unq uvg uvz lrg. Gubhtugf juvpu pnzr bs 
 gurve bja nppbeq ohg frrzrq gbgnyyl havagrerfgvat ortna gb syvg guebhtu uvf 
 zvaq. Ur jbaqrerq jurgure gurl unq tbg Ze. Puneevatgba. Ur jbaqrerq jung 
 gurl unq qbar gb gur jbzna va gur lneq. Ur abgvprq gung ur onqyl jnagrq gb 
 hevangr, naq sryg n snvag fhecevfr, orpnhfr ur unq qbar fb bayl gjb be 
 guerr ubhef ntb. Ur abgvprq gung gur pybpx ba gur znagrycvrpr fnvq avar, 
 zrnavat gjragl-bar. Ohg gur yvtug frrzrq gbb fgebat. Jbhyq abg gur yvtug or 
 snqvat ng gjragl-bar ubhef ba na Nhthfg riravat? Ur jbaqrerq jurgure nsgre 
 nyy ur naq Whyvn unq zvfgnxra gur gvzr -- unq fyrcg gur pybpx ebhaq naq 
 gubhtug vg jnf gjragl-guvegl jura ernyyl vg jnf abhtug rvtug-guvegl ba gur 
 sbyybjvat zbeavat. Ohg ur qvq abg chefhr gur gubhtug shegure. Vg jnf abg 
 vagrerfgvat. 
 Gurer jf nabgure, yvtugre fgrc va gur cnffntr. Ze. Puneevatgba pnzr 
 vagb gur ebbz. Gur qrzrnabhe bs gur oynpx-havsbezrq zra fhqqrayl orpnzr 
 zber fhoqhrq. Fbzrguvat unq nyfb punatrq va Ze. Puneevatgba'f nccrnenapr. 
 Uvf rlr sryy ba gur sentzragf bs gur tynff cncrejrvtug. 
 'Cvpx hc gubfr cvrprf,' ur fnvq funecyl. 
 N zna fgbbcrq gb borl. Gur pbpxarl npprag unq qvfnccrnerq; Jvafgba 
 fhqqrayl ernyvmrq jubfr ibvpr vg jnf gung ur unq urneq n srj zbzragf ntb ba 
 gur gryrfperra. Ze. Puneevatgba jnf fgvyy jrnevat uvf byq iryirg wnpxrg, 
 ohg uvf unve, juvpu unq orra nyzbfg juvgr, unq ghearq oynpx. Nyfb ur jnf 
 abg jrnevat uvf fcrpgnpyrf. Ur tnir Jvafgba n fvatyr funec tynapr, nf 
 gubhtu irevslvat uvf vqragvgl, naq gura cnvq ab zber nggragvba gb uvz. Ur 
 jnf fgvyy erpbtavmnoyr, ohg ur jnf abg gur fnzr crefba nal ybatre. Uvf obql 
 unq fgenvtugrarq, naq frrzrq gb unir tebja ovttre. Uvf snpr unq haqretbar 
 bayl gval punatrf gung unq arireguryrff jbexrq n pbzcyrgr genafsbezngvba. 
 Gur oynpx rlroebjf jrer yrff ohful, gur jevaxyrf jrer tbar, gur jubyr yvarf 
 bs gur snpr frrzrq gb unir nygrerq; rira gur abfr frrzrq fubegre. Vg jnf 
 gur nyreg, pbyq snpr bs n zna bs nobhg svir-naq-guvegl. Vg bppheerq gb 
 Jvafgba gung sbe gur svefg gvzr va uvf yvsr ur jnf ybbxvat, jvgu xabjyrqtr, 
 ng n zrzore bs gur Gubhtug Cbyvpr. 
 
 * * * 
 
 CNEG VVV 
 
 V 
 
 Ur qvq abg xabj jurer ur jnf. Cerfhznoyl ur jnf va gur Zvavfgel bs 
 Ybir, ohg gurer jnf ab jnl bs znxvat pregnva. Ur jnf va n uvtu-prvyvatrq 
 jvaqbjyrff pryy jvgu jnyyf bs tyvggrevat juvgr cbeprynva. Pbaprnyrq ynzcf 
 sybbqrq vg jvgu pbyq yvtug, naq gurer jnf n ybj, fgrnql uhzzvat fbhaq juvpu 
 ur fhccbfrq unq fbzrguvat gb qb jvgu gur nve fhccyl. N orapu, be furys, 
 whfg jvqr rabhtu gb fvg ba ena ebhaq gur jnyy, oebxra bayl ol gur qbbe naq, 
 ng gur raq bccbfvgr gur qbbe, n yningbel cna jvgu ab jbbqra frng. Gurer 
 jrer sbhe gryrfperraf, bar va rnpu jnyy. 
 Gurer jnf n qhyy npuvat va uvf oryyl. Vg unq orra gurer rire fvapr 
 gurl unq ohaqyrq uvz vagb gur pybfrq ina naq qevira uvz njnl. Ohg ur jnf 
 nyfb uhatel, jvgu n tanjvat, hajubyrfbzr xvaq bs uhatre. Vg zvtug or 
 gjragl-sbhe ubhef fvapr ur unq rngra, vg zvtug or guvegl-fvk. Ur fgvyy qvq 
 abg xabj, cebonoyl arire jbhyq xabj, jurgure vg unq orra zbeavat be riravat 
 jura gurl neerfgrq uvz. Fvapr ur jnf neerfgrq ur unq abg orra srq. 
 Ur fng nf fgvyy nf ur pbhyq ba gur aneebj orapu, jvgu uvf unaqf 
 pebffrq ba uvf xarr. Ur unq nyernql yrnearq gb fvg fgvyy. Vs lbh znqr 
 harkcrpgrq zbirzragf gurl lryyrq ng lbh sebz gur gryrfperra. Ohg gur 
 penivat sbe sbbq jnf tebjvat hcba uvz. Jung ur ybatrq sbe nobir nyy jnf n 
 cvrpr bs oernq. Ur unq na vqrn gung gurer jrer n srj oernqpehzof va gur 
 cbpxrg bs uvf birenyyf. Vg jnf rira cbffvoyr -- ur gubhtug guvf orpnhfr 
 sebz gvzr gb gvzr fbzrguvat frrzrq gb gvpxyr uvf yrt -- gung gurer zvtug or 
 n fvmrnoyr ovg bs pehfg gurer. Va gur raq gur grzcgngvba gb svaq bhg 
 birepnzr uvf srne; ur fyvccrq n unaq vagb uvf cbpxrg. 
 'Fzvgu!' lryyrq n ibvpr sebz gur gryrfperra. '6079 Fzvgu J! Unaqf bhg 
 bs cbpxrgf va gur pryyf!' 
 Ur fng fgvyy ntnva, uvf unaqf pebffrq ba uvf xarr. Orsber orvat 
 oebhtug urer ur unq orra gnxra gb nabgure cynpr juvpu zhfg unir orra na 
 beqvanel cevfba be n grzcbenel ybpx-hc hfrq ol gur cngebyf. Ur qvq abg xabj 
 ubj ybat ur unq orra gurer; fbzr ubhef ng nal engr; jvgu ab pybpxf naq ab 
 qnlyvtug vg jnf uneq gb tnhtr gur gvzr. Vg jnf n abvfl, rivy-fzryyvat 
 cynpr. Gurl unq chg uvz vagb n pryy fvzvyne gb gur bar ur jnf abj va, ohg 
 svyguvyl qvegl naq ng nyy gvzrf pebjqrq ol gra be svsgrra crbcyr. Gur 
 znwbevgl bs gurz jrer pbzzba pevzvanyf, ohg gurer jrer n srj cbyvgvpny 
 cevfbaref nzbat gurz. Ur unq fng fvyrag ntnvafg gur jnyy, wbfgyrq ol qvegl 
 obqvrf, gbb cerbpphcvrq ol srne naq gur cnva va uvf oryyl gb gnxr zhpu 
 vagrerfg va uvf fheebhaqvatf, ohg fgvyy abgvpvat gur nfgbavfuvat qvssrerapr 
 va qrzrnabhe orgjrra gur Cnegl cevfbaref naq gur bguref. Gur Cnegl 
 cevfbaref jrer nyjnlf fvyrag naq greevsvrq, ohg gur beqvanel pevzvanyf 
 frrzrq gb pner abguvat sbe nalobql. Gurl lryyrq vafhygf ng gur thneqf, 
 sbhtug onpx svrepryl jura gurve orybatvatf jrer vzcbhaqrq, jebgr bofprar 
 jbeqf ba gur sybbe, ngr fzhttyrq sbbq juvpu gurl cebqhprq sebz zlfgrevbhf 
 uvqvat-cynprf va gurve pybgurf, naq rira fubhgrq qbja gur gryrfperra jura 
 vg gevrq gb erfgber beqre. Ba gur bgure unaq fbzr bs gurz frrzrq gb or ba 
 tbbq grezf jvgu gur thneqf, pnyyrq gurz ol avpxanzrf, naq gevrq gb jurrqyr 
 pvtnerggrf guebhtu gur fclubyr va gur qbbe. Gur thneqf, gbb, gerngrq gur 
 pbzzba pevzvanyf jvgu n pregnva sbeornenapr, rira jura gurl unq gb unaqyr 
 gurz ebhtuyl. Gurer jnf zhpu gnyx nobhg gur sbeprq-ynobhe pnzcf gb juvpu 
 zbfg bs gur cevfbaref rkcrpgrq gb or frag. Vg jnf 'nyy evtug' va gur pnzcf, 
 ur tngurerq, fb ybat nf lbh unq tbbq pbagnpgf naq xarj gur ebcrf. Gurer jnf 
 oevorel, snibhevgvfz, naq enpxrgrrevat bs rirel xvaq, gurer jnf 
 ubzbfrkhnyvgl naq cebfgvghgvba, gurer jnf rira vyyvpvg nypbuby qvfgvyyrq 
 sebz cbgngbrf. Gur cbfvgvbaf bs gehfg jrer tvira bayl gb gur pbzzba 
 pevzvanyf, rfcrpvnyyl gur tnatfgref naq gur zheqreref, jub sbezrq n fbeg bs 
 nevfgbpenpl. Nyy gur qvegl wbof jrer qbar ol gur cbyvgvpnyf. 
 Gurer jnf n pbafgnag pbzr-naq-tb bs cevfbaref bs rirel qrfpevcgvba: 
 qeht-crqqyref, guvrirf, onaqvgf, oynpx-znexrgrref, qehaxf, cebfgvghgrf. 
 Fbzr bs gur qehaxf jrer fb ivbyrag gung gur bgure cevfbaref unq gb pbzovar 
 gb fhccerff gurz. Na rabezbhf jerpx bs n jbzna, ntrq nobhg fvkgl, jvgu 
 terng ghzoyvat oernfgf naq guvpx pbvyf bs juvgr unve juvpu unq pbzr qbja va 
 ure fgehttyrf, jnf pneevrq va, xvpxvat naq fubhgvat, ol sbhe thneqf, jub 
 unq ubyq bs ure bar ng rnpu pbeare. Gurl jerapurq bss gur obbgf jvgu juvpu 
 fur unq orra gelvat gb xvpx gurz, naq qhzcrq ure qbja npebff Jvafgba'f ync, 
 nyzbfg oernxvat uvf guvtu-obarf. Gur jbzna ubvfgrq urefrys hcevtug naq 
 sbyybjrq gurz bhg jvgu n lryy bs 'S-- onfgneqf!' Gura, abgvpvat gung fur 
 jnf fvggvat ba fbzrguvat harira, fur fyvq bss Jvafgba'f xarrf ba gb gur 
 orapu. 
 'Ort cneqba, qrnevr,' fur fnvq. 'V jbhyqa'g 'n fng ba lbh, bayl gur 
 ohttref chg zr gurer. Gurl qbab 'bj gb gerng n ynql, qb gurl?' Fur cnhfrq, 
 cnggrq ure oernfg, naq orypurq. 'Cneqba,' fur fnvq, 'V nva'g zrfrys, 
 dhvgr.' 
 Fur yrnag sbejneq naq ibzvgrq pbcvbhfyl ba gur sybbe. 
 'Gunff orggre,' fur fnvq, yrnavat onpx jvgu pybfrq rlrf. 'Arire xrrc 
 vg qbja, gunff jung V fnl. Trg vg hc juvyr vg'f serfu ba lbhe fgbznpu, 
 yvxr.' 
 Fur erivirq, ghearq gb unir nabgure ybbx ng Jvafgba naq frrzrq 
 vzzrqvngryl gb gnxr n snapl gb uvz. Fur chg n infg nez ebhaq uvf fubhyqre 
 naq qerj uvz gbjneqf ure, oernguvat orre naq ibzvg vagb uvf snpr. 
 'Jnff lbhe anzr, qrnevr?' fur fnvq. 
 'Fzvgu,' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 'Fzvgu?' fnvq gur jbzna. 'Gunff shaal. Zl anzr'f Fzvgu gbb. Jul,' fur 
 nqqrq fragvzragnyyl, 'V zvtug or lbhe zbgure!' 
 Fur zvtug, gubhtug Jvafgba, or uvf zbgure. Fur jnf nobhg gur evtug ntr 
 naq culfvdhr, naq vg jnf cebonoyr gung crbcyr punatrq fbzrjung nsgre gjragl 
 lrnef va n sbeprq-ynobhe pnzc. 
 Ab bar ryfr unq fcbxra gb uvz. Gb n fhecevfvat rkgrag gur beqvanel 
 pevzvanyf vtaberq gur Cnegl cevfbaref. 'Gur cbyvgf,' gurl pnyyrq gurz, jvgu 
 n fbeg bs havagrerfgrq pbagrzcg. Gur Cnegl cevfbaref frrzrq greevsvrq bs 
 fcrnxvat gb nalobql, naq nobir nyy bs fcrnxvat gb bar nabgure. Bayl bapr, 
 jura gjb Cnegl zrzoref, obgu jbzra, jrer cerffrq pybfr gbtrgure ba gur 
 orapu, ur bireurneq nzvq gur qva bs ibvprf n srj uheevrqyl-juvfcrerq jbeqf; 
 naq va cnegvphyne n ersrerapr gb fbzrguvat pnyyrq 'ebbz bar-bu-bar', juvpu 
 ur qvq abg haqrefgnaq. 
 Vg zvtug or gjb be guerr ubhef ntb gung gurl unq oebhtug uvz urer. Gur 
 qhyy cnva va uvf oryyl arire jrag njnl, ohg fbzrgvzrf vg terj orggre naq 
 fbzrgvzrf jbefr, naq uvf gubhtugf rkcnaqrq be pbagenpgrq nppbeqvatyl. Jura 
 vg terj jbefr ur gubhtug bayl bs gur cnva vgfrys, naq bs uvf qrfver sbe 
 sbbq. Jura vg terj orggre, cnavp gbbx ubyq bs uvz. Gurer jrer zbzragf jura 
 ur sberfnj gur guvatf gung jbhyq unccra gb uvz jvgu fhpu npghnyvgl gung uvf 
 urneg tnyybcrq naq uvf oerngu fgbccrq. Ur sryg gur fznfu bs gehapurbaf ba 
 uvf ryobjf naq veba-fubq obbgf ba uvf fuvaf; ur fnj uvzfrys tebiryyvat ba 
 gur sybbe, fpernzvat sbe zrepl guebhtu oebxra grrgu. Ur uneqyl gubhtug bs 
 Whyvn. Ur pbhyq abg svk uvf zvaq ba ure. Ur ybirq ure naq jbhyq abg orgenl 
 ure; ohg gung jnf bayl n snpg, xabja nf ur xarj gur ehyrf bs nevguzrgvp. Ur 
 sryg ab ybir sbe ure, naq ur uneqyl rira jbaqrerq jung jnf unccravat gb 
 ure. Ur gubhtug bsgrare bs B'Oevra, jvgu n syvpxrevat ubcr. B'Oevra zvtug 
 xabj gung ur unq orra neerfgrq. Gur Oebgureubbq, ur unq fnvq, arire gevrq 
 gb fnir vgf zrzoref. Ohg gurer jnf gur enmbe oynqr; gurl jbhyq fraq gur 
 enmbe oynqr vs gurl pbhyq. Gurer jbhyq or creuncf svir frpbaqf orsber gur 
 thneq pbhyq ehfu vagb gur pryy. Gur oynqr jbhyq ovgr vagb uvz jvgu n fbeg 
 bs oheavat pbyqarff, naq rira gur svatref gung uryq vg jbhyq or phg gb gur 
 obar. Rirelguvat pnzr onpx gb uvf fvpx obql, juvpu fuenax gerzoyvat sebz 
 gur fznyyrfg cnva. Ur jnf abg pregnva gung ur jbhyq hfr gur enmbe oynqr 
 rira vs ur tbg gur punapr. Vg jnf zber angheny gb rkvfg sebz zbzrag gb 
 zbzrag, npprcgvat nabgure gra zvahgrf" yvsr rira jvgu gur pregnvagl gung 
 gurer jnf gbegher ng gur raq bs vg. 
 Fbzrgvzrf ur gevrq gb pnyphyngr gur ahzore bs cbeprynva oevpxf va gur 
 jnyyf bs gur pryy. Vg fubhyq unir orra rnfl, ohg ur nyjnlf ybfg pbhag ng 
 fbzr cbvag be nabgure. Zber bsgra ur jbaqrerq jurer ur jnf, naq jung gvzr 
 bs qnl vg jnf. Ng bar zbzrag ur sryg pregnva gung vg jnf oebnq qnlyvtug 
 bhgfvqr, naq ng gur arkg rdhnyyl pregnva gung vg jnf cvgpu qnexarff. Va 
 guvf cynpr, ur xarj vafgvapgviryl, gur yvtugf jbhyq arire or ghearq bhg. Vg 
 jnf gur cynpr jvgu ab qnexarff: ur fnj abj jul B'Oevra unq frrzrq gb 
 erpbtavmr gur nyyhfvba. Va gur Zvavfgel bs Ybir gurer jrer ab jvaqbjf. Uvf 
 pryy zvtug or ng gur urneg bs gur ohvyqvat be ntnvafg vgf bhgre jnyy; vg 
 zvtug or gra sybbef orybj tebhaq, be guvegl nobir vg. Ur zbirq uvzfrys 
 zragnyyl sebz cynpr gb cynpr, naq gevrq gb qrgrezvar ol gur srryvat bs uvf 
 obql jurgure ur jnf crepurq uvtu va gur nve be ohevrq qrrc haqretebhaq. 
 Gurer jnf n fbhaq bs znepuvat obbgf bhgfvqr. Gur fgrry qbbe bcrarq 
 jvgu n pynat. N lbhat bssvpre, n gevz oynpx-havsbezrq svther jub frrzrq gb 
 tyvggre nyy bire jvgu cbyvfurq yrngure, naq jubfr cnyr, fgenvtug-srngherq 
 snpr jnf yvxr n jnk znfx, fgrccrq fznegyl guebhtu gur qbbejnl. Ur zbgvbarq 
 gb gur thneqf bhgfvqr gb oevat va gur cevfbare gurl jrer yrnqvat. Gur cbrg 
 Nzcyrsbegu funzoyrq vagb gur pryy. Gur qbbe pynatrq fuhg ntnva. 
 Nzcyrsbegu znqr bar be gjb hapregnva zbirzragf sebz fvqr gb fvqr, nf 
 gubhtu univat fbzr vqrn gung gurer jnf nabgure qbbe gb tb bhg bs, naq gura 
 ortna gb jnaqre hc naq qbja gur pryy. Ur unq abg lrg abgvprq Jvafgba'f 
 cerfrapr. Uvf gebhoyrq rlrf jrer tnmvat ng gur jnyy nobhg n zrger nobir gur 
 yriry bs Jvafgba'f urnq. Ur jnf fubryrff; ynetr, qvegl gbrf jrer fgvpxvat 
 bhg bs gur ubyrf va uvf fbpxf. Ur jnf nyfb frireny qnlf njnl sebz n funir. 
 N fpehool orneq pbirerq uvf snpr gb gur purrxobarf, tvivat uvz na nve bs 
 ehssvnavfz gung jrag bqqyl jvgu uvf ynetr jrnx senzr naq areibhf zbirzragf. 
 Jvafgba ebhfrq uveafrys n yvggyr sebz uvf yrgunetl. Ur zhfg fcrnx gb 
 Nzcyrsbegu, naq evfx gur lryy sebz gur gryrfperra. Vg jnf rira pbaprvinoyr 
 gung Nzcyrsbegu jnf gur ornere bs gur enmbe oynqr. 
 'Nzcyrsbegu,' ur fnvq. 
 Gurer jnf ab lryy sebz gur gryrfperra. Nzcyrsbegu cnhfrq, zvyqyl 
 fgnegyrq. Uvf rlrf sbphfrq gurzfryirf fybjyl ba Jvafgba. 
 'Nu, Fzvgu!' ur fnvq. 'Lbh gbb!' 
 'Jung ner lbh va sbe?' 
 'Gb gryy lbh gur gehgu --.' Ur fng qbja njxjneqyl ba gur orapu 
 bccbfvgr Jvafgba. 'Gurer vf bayl bar bssrapr, vf gurer abg?' ur fnvq. 
 'Naq unir lbh pbzzvggrq vg?' 
 'Nccneragyl V unir.' 
 Ur chg n unaq gb uvf sberurnq naq cerffrq uvf grzcyrf sbe n zbzrag, nf 
 gubhtu gelvat gb erzrzore fbzrguvat. 
 'Gurfr guvatf unccra,' ur ortna inthryl. 'V unir orra noyr gb erpnyy 
 bar vafgnapr -- n cbffvoyr vafgnapr. Vg jnf na vaqvfpergvba, haqbhogrqyl. 
 Jr jrer cebqhpvat n qrsvavgvir rqvgvba bs gur cbrzf bs Xvcyvat. V nyybjrq 
 gur jbeq "Tbq" gb erznva ng gur raq bs n yvar. V pbhyq abg uryc vg!' ur 
 nqqrq nyzbfg vaqvtanagyl, envfvat uvf snpr gb ybbx ng Jvafgba. 'Vg jnf 
 vzcbffvoyr gb punatr gur yvar. Gur eulzr jnf "ebq". Qb lbh ernyvmr gung 
 gurer ner bayl gjryir eulzrf gb "ebq" va gur ragver ynathntr? Sbe qnlf V 
 unq enpxrq zl oenvaf. Gurer jnf ab bgure eulzr.' 
 Gur rkcerffvba ba uvf snpr punatrq. Gur naablnapr cnffrq bhg bs vg naq 
 sbe n zbzrag ur ybbxrq nyzbfg cyrnfrq. N fbeg bs vagryyrpghny jnezgu, gur 
 wbl bs gur crqnag jub unf sbhaq bhg fbzr hfryrff snpg, fubar guebhtu gur 
 qveg naq fpehool unve. 
 'Unf vg rire bppheerq gb lbh,' ur fnvq, 'gung gur jubyr uvfgbel bs 
 Ratyvfu cbrgel unf orra qrgrezvarq ol gur snpg gung gur Ratyvfu ynathntr 
 ynpxf eulzrf?' 
 Ab, gung cnegvphyne gubhtug unq arire bppheerq gb Jvafgba. Abe, va gur 
 pvephzfgnaprf, qvq vg fgevxr uvz nf irel vzcbegnag be vagrerfgvat. 
 'Qb lbh xabj jung gvzr bs qnl vg vf?' ur fnvq. 
 Nzcyrsbegu ybbxrq fgnegyrq ntnva. 'V unq uneqyl gubhtug nobhg vg. Gurl 
 neerfgrq zr -- vg pbhyq or gjb qnlf ntb -- creuncf guerr.' Uvf rlrf syvggrq 
 ebhaq gur jnyyf, nf gubhtu ur unys rkcrpgrq gb svaq n jvaqbj fbzrjurer. 
 'Gurer vf ab qvssrerapr orgjrra avtug naq qnl va guvf cynpr. V qb abg frr 
 ubj bar pna pnyphyngr gur gvzr.' 
 Gurl gnyxrq qrfhygbevyl sbe fbzr zvahgrf, gura, jvgubhg nccnerag 
 ernfba, n lryy sebz gur gryrfperra onqr gurz or fvyrag. Jvafgba fng 
 dhvrgyl, uvf unaqf pebffrq. Nzcyrsbegu, gbb ynetr gb fvg va pbzsbeg ba gur 
 aneebj orapu, svqtrgrq sebz fvqr gb fvqr, pynfcvat uvf ynax unaqf svefg 
 ebhaq bar xarr, gura ebhaq gur bgure. Gur gryrfperra onexrq ng uvz gb xrrc 
 fgvyy. Gvzr cnffrq. Gjragl zvahgrf, na ubhe -- vg jnf qvssvphyg gb whqtr. 
 Bapr zber gurer jnf n fbhaq bs obbgf bhgfvqr. Jvafgba'f ragenvyf 
 pbagenpgrq. Fbba, irel fbba, creuncf va svir zvahgrf, creuncf abj, gur 
 genzc bs obbgf jbhyq zrna gung uvf bja ghea unq pbzr. 
 Gur qbbe bcrarq. Gur pbyq-snprq lbhat bssvpre fgrccrq vagb gur pryy. 
 Jvgu n oevrs zbirzrag bs gur unaq ur vaqvpngrq Nzcyrsbegu. 
 'Ebbz 101,' ur fnvq. 
 Nzcyrsbegu znepurq pyhzfvyl bhg orgjrra gur thneqf, uvf snpr inthryl 
 cregheorq, ohg hapbzceruraqvat. 
 Jung frrzrq yvxr n ybat gvzr cnffrq. Gur cnva va Jvafgba'f oryyl unq 
 erivirq. Uvf zvaq fnttrq ebhaq naq ebhaq ba gur fnzr gevpx, yvxr n onyy 
 snyyvat ntnva naq ntnva vagb gur fnzr frevrf bs fybgf. Ur unq bayl fvk 
 gubhtugf. Gur cnva va uvf oryyl; n cvrpr bs oernq; gur oybbq naq gur 
 fpernzvat; B'Oevra; Whyvn; gur enmbe oynqr. Gurer jnf nabgure fcnfz va uvf 
 ragenvyf, gur urnil obbgf jrer nccebnpuvat. Nf gur qbbe bcrarq, gur jnir bs 
 nve gung vg perngrq oebhtug va n cbjreshy fzryy bs pbyq fjrng. Cnefbaf 
 jnyxrq vagb gur pryy. Ur jnf jrnevat xunxv fubegf naq n fcbegf-fuveg. 
 Guvf gvzr Jvafgba jnf fgnegyrq vagb frys-sbetrgshyarff. 
 'Lbh urer!' ur fnvq. 
 Cnefbaf tnir Jvafgba n tynapr va juvpu gurer jnf arvgure vagrerfg abe 
 fhecevfr, ohg bayl zvfrel. Ur ortna jnyxvat wrexvyl hc naq qbja, rivqragyl 
 hanoyr gb xrrc fgvyy. Rnpu gvzr ur fgenvtugrarq uvf chqtl xarrf vg jnf 
 nccnerag gung gurl jrer gerzoyvat. Uvf rlrf unq n jvqr-bcra, fgnevat ybbx, 
 nf gubhtu ur pbhyq abg cerirag uvzfrys sebz tnmvat ng fbzrguvat va gur 
 zvqqyr qvfgnapr. 
 'Jung ner lbh va sbe?' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 'Gubhtugpevzr!' fnvq Cnefbaf, nyzbfg oyhoorevat. Gur gbar bs uvf ibvpr 
 vzcyvrq ng bapr n pbzcyrgr nqzvffvba bs uvf thvyg naq n fbeg bs vaperqhybhf 
 ubeebe gung fhpu n jbeq pbhyq or nccyvrq gb uvzfrys. Ur cnhfrq bccbfvgr 
 Jvafgba naq ortna rntreyl nccrnyvat gb uvz: 'Lbh qba'g guvax gurl'yy fubbg 
 zr, qb lbh, byq punc? Gurl qba'g fubbg lbh vs lbh unira'g npghnyyl qbar 
 nalguvat -- bayl gubhtugf, juvpu lbh pna'g uryc? V xabj gurl tvir lbh n 
 snve urnevat. Bu, V gehfg gurz sbe gung! Gurl'yy xabj zl erpbeq, jba'g 
 gurl? Lbh xabj jung xvaq bs punc V jnf. Abg n onq punc va zl jnl. Abg 
 oenval, bs pbhefr, ohg xrra. V gevrq gb qb zl orfg sbe gur Cnegl, qvqa'g V? 
 V'yy trg bss jvgu svir lrnef, qba'g lbh guvax? Be rira gra lrnef? N punc 
 yvxr zr pbhyq znxr uvzfrys cerggl hfrshy va n ynobhe-pnzc. Gurl jbhyqa'g 
 fubbg zr sbe tbvat bss gur envyf whfg bapr?' 
 'Ner lbh thvygl?' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 'Bs pbhefr V'z thvygl!' pevrq Cnefbaf jvgu n freivyr tynapr ng gur 
 gryrfperra. 'Lbh qba'g guvax gur Cnegl jbhyq neerfg na vaabprag zna, qb 
 lbh?' Uvf sebt-yvxr snpr terj pnyzre, naq rira gbbx ba n fyvtugyl 
 fnapgvzbavbhf rkcerffvba. 'Gubhtugpevzr vf n qernqshy guvat, byq zna,' ur 
 fnvq fragragvbhfyl. 'Vg'f vafvqvbhf. Vg pna trg ubyq bs lbh jvgubhg lbhe 
 rira xabjvat vg. Qb lbh xabj ubj vg tbg ubyq bs zr? Va zl fyrrc! Lrf, 
 gung'f n snpg. Gurer V jnf, jbexvat njnl, gelvat gb qb zl ovg -- arire xarj 
 V unq nal onq fghss va zl zvaq ng nyy. Naq gura V fgnegrq gnyxvat va zl 
 fyrrc. Qb lbh xabj jung gurl urneq zr fnlvat?' 
 Ur fnax uvf ibvpr, yvxr fbzrbar jub vf boyvtrq sbe zrqvpny ernfbaf gb 
 hggre na bofpravgl. 
 '"Qbja jvgu Ovt Oebgure!" Lrf, V fnvq gung! Fnvq vg bire naq bire 
 ntnva, vg frrzf. Orgjrra lbh naq zr, byq zna, V'z tynq gurl tbg zr orsber 
 vg jrag nal shegure. Qb lbh xabj jung V'z tbvat gb fnl gb gurz jura V tb hc 
 orsber gur gevohany? "Gunax lbh," V'z tbvat gb fnl, "gunax lbh sbe fnivat 
 zr orsber vg jnf gbb yngr."' 
 'Jub qrabhaprq lbh?' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 'Vg jnf zl yvggyr qnhtugre,' fnvq Cnefbaf jvgu n fbeg bs qbyrshy 
 cevqr. 'Fur yvfgrarq ng gur xrlubyr. Urneq jung V jnf fnlvat, naq avccrq 
 bss gb gur cngebyf gur irel arkg qnl. Cerggl fzneg sbe n avccre bs frira, 
 ru? V qba'g orne ure nal tehqtr sbe vg. Va snpg V'z cebhq bs ure. Vg fubjf 
 V oebhtug ure hc va gur evtug fcvevg, naljnl.' 
 Ur znqr n srj zber wrexl zbirzragf hc naq qbja, frireny gvzrf, pnfgvat 
 n ybatvat tynapr ng gur yningbel cna. Gura ur fhqqrayl evccrq qbja uvf 
 fubegf. 
 'Rkphfr zr, byq zna,' ur fnvq. 'V pna'g uryc vg. Vg'f gur jnvgvat.' 
 Ur cyhzcrq uvf ynetr cbfgrevbe vagb gur yningbel cna. Jvafgba pbirerq 
 uvf snpr jvgu uvf unaqf. 
 'Fzvgu!' lryyrq gur ibvpr sebz gur gryrfperra. '6079 Fzvgu J! Hapbire 
 lbhe snpr. Ab snprf pbirerq va gur pryyf.' 
 Jvafgba hapbirerq uvf snpr. Cnefbaf hfrq gur yningbel, ybhqyl naq 
 nohaqnagyl. Vg gura ghearq bhg gung gur cyht jnf qrsrpgvir naq gur pryy 
 fgnax nobzvanoyl sbe ubhef nsgrejneqf. 
 Cnefbaf jnf erzbirq. Zber cevfbaref pnzr naq jrag, zlfgrevbhfyl. Bar, 
 n jbzna, jnf pbafvtarq gb 'Ebbz 101', naq, Jvafgba abgvprq, frrzrq gb 
 fueviry naq ghea n qvssrerag pbybhe jura fur urneq gur jbeqf. N gvzr pnzr 
 jura, vs vg unq orra zbeavat jura ur jnf oebhtug urer, vg jbhyq or 
 nsgreabba; be vs vg unq orra nsgreabba, gura vg jbhyq or zvqavtug. Gurer 
 jrer fvk cevfbaref va gur pryy, zra naq jbzra. Nyy fng irel fgvyy. Bccbfvgr 
 Jvafgba gurer fng n zna jvgu n puvayrff, gbbgul snpr rknpgyl yvxr gung bs 
 fbzr ynetr, unezyrff ebqrag. Uvf sng, zbggyrq purrxf jrer fb cbhpurq ng gur 
 obggbz gung vg jnf qvssvphyg abg gb oryvrir gung ur unq yvggyr fgberf bs 
 sbbq ghpxrq njnl gurer. Uvf cnyr-terl rlrf syvggrq gvzbebhfyl sebz snpr gb 
 snpr naq ghearq dhvpxyl njnl ntnva jura ur pnhtug nalbar'f rlr. 
 Gur qbbe bcrarq, naq nabgure cevfbare jnf oebhtug va jubfr nccrnenapr 
 frag n zbzragnel puvyy guebhtu Jvafgba. Ur jnf n pbzzbacynpr, zrna-ybbxvat 
 zna jub zvtug unir orra na ratvarre be grpuavpvna bs fbzr xvaq. Ohg jung 
 jnf fgnegyvat jnf gur rznpvngvba bs uvf snpr. Vg jnf yvxr n fxhyy. Orpnhfr 
 bs vgf guvaarff gur zbhgu naq rlrf ybbxrq qvfcebcbegvbangryl ynetr, naq gur 
 rlrf frrzrq svyyrq jvgu n zheqrebhf, hanccrnfnoyr ungerq bs fbzrobql be 
 fbzrguvat. 
 Gur zna fng qbja ba gur orapu ng n yvggyr qvfgnapr sebz Jvafgba. 
 Jvafgba qvq abg ybbx ng uvz ntnva, ohg gur gbezragrq, fxhyy-yvxr snpr jnf 
 nf ivivq va uvf zvaq nf gubhtu vg unq orra fgenvtug va sebag bs uvf rlrf. 
 Fhqqrayl ur ernyvmrq jung jnf gur znggre. Gur zna jnf qlvat bs fgneingvba. 
 Gur fnzr gubhtug frrzrq gb bpphe nyzbfg fvzhygnarbhfyl gb rirelbar va gur 
 pryy. Gurer jnf n irel snvag fgveevat nyy gur jnl ebhaq gur orapu. Gur rlrf 
 bs gur puvayrff zna xrcg syvggvat gbjneqf gur fxhyy-snprq zna, gura gheavat 
 thvygvyl njnl, gura orvat qenttrq onpx ol na veerfvfgvoyr nggenpgvba. 
 Cerfragyl ur ortna gb svqtrg ba uvf frng. Ng ynfg ur fgbbq hc, jnqqyrq 
 pyhzfvyl npebff gur pryy, qht qbja vagb gur cbpxrg bs uvf birenyyf, naq, 
 jvgu na nonfurq nve, uryq bhg n tevzl cvrpr bs oernq gb gur fxhyy-snprq 
 zna. 
 Gurer jnf n shevbhf, qrnsravat ebne sebz gur gryrfperra. Gur puvayrff 
 zna whzcrq va uvf genpxf. Gur fxhyy-snprq zna unq dhvpxyl guehfg uvf unaqf 
 oruvaq uvf onpx, nf gubhtu qrzbafgengvat gb nyy gur jbeyq gung ur ershfrq 
 gur tvsg. 
 'Ohzfgrnq!' ebnerq gur ibvpr. '2713 Ohzfgrnq W! Yrg snyy gung cvrpr bs 
 oernq!' 
 Gur puvayrff zna qebccrq gur cvrpr bs oernq ba gur sybbe. 
 'Erznva fgnaqvat jurer lbh ner,' fnvq gur ibvpr. 'Snpr gur qbbe. Znxr 
 ab zbirzrag.' 
 Gur puvayrff zna borlrq. Uvf ynetr cbhpul purrxf jrer dhvirevat 
 hapbagebyynoyl. Gur qbbe pynatrq bcra. Nf gur lbhat bssvpre ragrerq naq 
 fgrccrq nfvqr, gurer rzretrq sebz oruvaq uvz n fubeg fghzcl thneq jvgu 
 rabezbhf nezf naq fubhyqref. Ur gbbx uvf fgnaq bccbfvgr gur puvayrff zna, 
 naq gura, ng n fvtany sebz gur bssvpre, yrg serr n sevtugshy oybj, jvgu nyy 
 gur jrvtug bs uvf obql oruvaq vg, shyy va gur puvayrff zna'f zbhgu. Gur 
 sbepr bs vg frrzrq nyzbfg gb xabpx uvz pyrne bs gur sybbe. Uvf obql jnf 
 syhat npebff gur pryy naq srgpurq hc ntnvafg gur onfr bs gur yningbel frng. 
 Sbe n zbzrag ur ynl nf gubhtu fghaarq, jvgu qnex oybbq bbmvat sebz uvf 
 zbhgu naq abfr. N irel snvag juvzcrevat be fdhrnxvat, juvpu frrzrq 
 hapbafpvbhf, pnzr bhg bs uvz. Gura ur ebyyrq bire naq envfrq uvzfrys 
 hafgrnqvyl ba unaqf naq xarrf. Nzvq n fgernz bs oybbq naq fnyvin, gur gjb 
 unyirf bs n qragny cyngr sryy bhg bs uvf zbhgu. 
 Gur cevfbaref fng irel fgvyy, gurve unaqf pebffrq ba gurve xarrf. Gur 
 puvayrff zna pyvzorq onpx vagb uvf cynpr. Qbja bar fvqr bs uvf snpr gur 
 syrfu jnf qnexravat. Uvf zbhgu unq fjbyyra vagb n funcryrff pureel-pbybherq 
 znff jvgu n oynpx ubyr va gur zvqqyr bs vg. 
 Sebz gvzr gb gvzr n yvggyr oybbq qevccrq ba gb gur oernfg bs uvf 
 birenyyf. Uvf terl rlrf fgvyy syvggrq sebz snpr gb snpr, zber thvygvyl guna 
 rire, nf gubhtu ur jrer gelvat gb qvfpbire ubj zhpu gur bguref qrfcvfrq uvz 
 sbe uvf uhzvyvngvba. 
 Gur qbbe bcrarq. Jvgu n fznyy trfgher gur bssvpre vaqvpngrq gur fxhyy- 
 snprq zna. 
 'Ebbz 101,' ur fnvq. 
 Gurer jnf n tnfc naq n syheel ng Jvafgba'f fvqr. Gur zna unq npghnyyl 
 syhat uvzfrys ba uvf xarrf ba gur sybbe, jvgu uvf unaq pynfcrq gbtrgure. 
 'Pbzenqr! Bssvpre!' ur pevrq. 'Lbh qba'g unir gb gnxr zr gb gung 
 cynpr! Unira'g V gbyq lbh rirelguvat nyernql? Jung ryfr vf vg lbh jnag gb 
 xabj? Gurer'f abguvat V jbhyqa'g pbasrff, abguvat! Whfg gryy zr jung vg vf 
 naq V'yy pbasrff fgenvtug bss. Jevgr vg qbja naq V'yy fvta vg -- nalguvat! 
 Abg ebbz 101!' 
 'Ebbz 101,' fnvq gur bssvpre. 
 Gur zna'f snpr, nyernql irel cnyr, ghearq n pbybhe Jvafgba jbhyq abg 
 unir oryvrirq cbffvoyr. Vg jnf qrsvavgryl, hazvfgnxnoyl, n funqr bs terra. 
 'Qb nalguvat gb zr!' ur lryyrq. 'Lbh'ir orra fgneivat zr sbe jrrxf. 
 Svavfu vg bss naq yrg zr qvr. Fubbg zr. Unat zr. Fragrapr zr gb gjragl-svir 
 lrnef. Vf gurer fbzrobql ryfr lbh jnag zr gb tvir njnl? Whfg fnl jub vg vf 
 naq V'yy gryy lbh nalguvat lbh jnag. V qba'g pner jub vg vf be jung lbh qb 
 gb gurz. V'ir tbg n jvsr naq guerr puvyqera. Gur ovttrfg bs gurz vfa'g fvk 
 lrnef byq. Lbh pna gnxr gur jubyr ybg bs gurz naq phg gurve guebngf va 
 sebag bs zl rlrf, naq V'yy fgnaq ol naq jngpu vg. Ohg abg Ebbz 101!' 
 'Ebbz 101,' fnvq gur bssvpre. 
 Gur zna ybbxrq senagvpnyyl ebhaq ng gur bgure cevfbaref, nf gubhtu 
 jvgu fbzr vqrn gung ur pbhyq chg nabgure ivpgvz va uvf bja cynpr. Uvf rlrf 
 frggyrq ba gur fznfurq snpr bs gur puvayrff zna. Ur syhat bhg n yrna nez. 
 'Gung'f gur bar lbh bhtug gb or gnxvat, abg zr!' ur fubhgrq. 'Lbh 
 qvqa'g urne jung ur jnf fnlvat nsgre gurl onfurq uvf snpr. Tvir zr n punapr 
 naq V'yy gryy lbh rirel jbeq bs vg. Ur'f gur bar gung'f ntnvafg gur Cnegl, 
 abg zr.' Gur thneqf fgrccrq sbejneq. Gur zna'f ibvpr ebfr gb n fuevrx. 'Lbh 
 qvqa'g urne uvz!' ur ercrngrq. 'Fbzrguvat jrag jebat jvgu gur gryrfperra. 
 Ur'f gur bar lbh jnag. Gnxr uvz, abg zr!' 
 Gur gjb fgheql thneqf unq fgbbcrq gb gnxr uvz ol gur nezf. Ohg whfg ng 
 guvf zbzrag ur syhat uvzfrys npebff gur sybbe bs gur pryy naq tenoorq bar 
 bs gur veba yrtf gung fhccbegrq gur orapu. Ur unq frg hc n jbeqyrff 
 ubjyvat, yvxr na navzny. Gur thneqf gbbx ubyq bs uvz gb jerapu uvz ybbfr, 
 ohg ur pyhat ba jvgu nfgbavfuvat fgeratgu. Sbe creuncf gjragl frpbaqf gurl 
 jrer unhyvat ng uvz. Gur cevfbaref fng dhvrg, gurve unaqf pebffrq ba gurve 
 xarrf, ybbxvat fgenvtug va sebag bs gurz. Gur ubjyvat fgbccrq; gur zna unq 
 ab oerngu yrsg sbe nalguvat rkprcg unatvat ba. Gura gurer jnf n qvssrerag 
 xvaq bs pel. N xvpx sebz n thneq'f obbg unq oebxra gur svatref bs bar bs 
 uvf unaqf. Gurl qenttrq uvz gb uvf srrg. 
 'Ebbz 101,' fnvq gur bssvpre. 
 Gur zna jnf yrq bhg, jnyxvat hafgrnqvyl, jvgu urnq fhaxra, ahefvat uvf 
 pehfurq unaq, nyy gur svtug unq tbar bhg bs uvz. 
 N ybat gvzr cnffrq. Vs vg unq orra zvqavtug jura gur fxhyy-snprq zna 
 jnf gnxra njnl, vg jnf zbeavat: vs zbeavat, vg jnf nsgreabba. Jvafgba jnf 
 nybar, naq unq orra nybar sbe ubhef. Gur cnva bs fvggvat ba gur aneebj 
 orapu jnf fhpu gung bsgra ur tbg hc naq jnyxrq nobhg, haercebirq ol gur 
 gryrfperra. Gur cvrpr bs oernq fgvyy ynl jurer gur puvayrff zna unq qebccrq 
 vg. Ng gur ortvaavat vg arrqrq n uneq rssbeg abg gb ybbx ng vg, ohg 
 cerfragyl uhatre tnir jnl gb guvefg. Uvf zbhgu jnf fgvpxl naq rivy-gnfgvat. 
 Gur uhzzvat fbhaq naq gur hainelvat juvgr yvtug vaqhprq n fbeg bs 
 snvagarff, na rzcgl srryvat vafvqr uvf urnq. Ur jbhyq trg hc orpnhfr gur 
 npur va uvf obarf jnf ab ybatre ornenoyr, naq gura jbhyq fvg qbja ntnva 
 nyzbfg ng bapr orpnhfr ur jnf gbb qvmml gb znxr fher bs fgnlvat ba uvf 
 srrg. Jurarire uvf culfvpny frafngvbaf jrer n yvggyr haqre pbageby gur 
 greebe erghearq. Fbzrgvzrf jvgu n snqvat ubcr ur gubhtug bs B'Oevra naq gur 
 enmbe oynqr. Vg jnf guvaxnoyr gung gur enmbe oynqr zvtug neevir pbaprnyrq 
 va uvf sbbq, vs ur jrer rire srq. Zber qvzyl ur gubhtug bs Whyvn. Fbzrjurer 
 be bgure fur jnf fhssrevat creuncf sne jbefr guna ur. Fur zvtug or 
 fpernzvat jvgu cnva ng guvf zbzrag. Ur gubhtug: 'Vs V pbhyq fnir Whyvn ol 
 qbhoyvat zl bja cnva, jbhyq V qb vg? Lrf, V jbhyq.' Ohg gung jnf zreryl na 
 vagryyrpghny qrpvfvba, gnxra orpnhfr ur xarj gung ur bhtug gb gnxr vg. Ur 
 qvq abg srry vg. Va guvf cynpr lbh pbhyq abg srry nalguvat, rkprcg cnva naq 
 sberxabjyrqtr bs cnva. Orfvqrf, jnf vg cbffvoyr, jura lbh jrer npghnyyl 
 fhssrevat vg, gb jvfu sbe nal ernfba gung lbhe bja cnva fubhyq vapernfr? 
 Ohg gung dhrfgvba jnf abg nafjrenoyr lrg. 
 Gur obbgf jrer nccebnpuvat ntnva. Gur qbbe bcrarq. B'Oevra pnzr va. 
 Jvafgba fgnegrq gb uvf srrg. Gur fubpx bs gur fvtug unq qevira nyy 
 pnhgvba bhg bs uvz. Sbe gur svefg gvzr va znal lrnef ur sbetbg gur cerfrapr 
 bs gur gryrfperra. 
 'Gurl'ir tbg lbh gbb!' ur pevrq. 
 'Gurl tbg zr n ybat gvzr ntb,' fnvq B'Oevra jvgu n zvyq, nyzbfg 
 ertergshy vebal. Ur fgrccrq nfvqr. Sebz oruvaq uvz gurer rzretrq n oebnq- 
 purfgrq thneq jvgu n ybat oynpx gehapurba va uvf unaq. 
 'Lbh xabj guvf, Jvafgba,' fnvq B'Oevra. 'Qba'g qrprvir lbhefrys. Lbh 
 qvq xabj vg -- lbh unir nyjnlf xabja vg.' 
 Lrf, ur fnj abj, ur unq nyjnlf xabja vg. Ohg gurer jnf ab gvzr gb 
 guvax bs gung. Nyy ur unq rlrf sbe jnf gur gehapurba va gur thneq'f unaq. 
 Vg zvtug snyy naljurer; ba gur pebja, ba gur gvc bs gur rne, ba gur hccre 
 nez, ba gur ryobj-- 
 Gur ryobj! Ur unq fyhzcrq gb uvf xarrf, nyzbfg cnenylfrq, pynfcvat gur 
 fgevpxra ryobj jvgu uvf bgure unaq. Rirelguvat unq rkcybqrq vagb lryybj 
 yvtug. Vapbaprvinoyr, vapbaprvinoyr gung bar oybj pbhyq pnhfr fhpu cnva! 
 Gur yvtug pyrnerq naq ur pbhyq frr gur bgure gjb ybbxvat qbja ng uvz. Gur 
 thneq jnf ynhtuvat ng uvf pbagbegvbaf. Bar dhrfgvba ng nal engr jnf 
 nafjrerq. Arire, sbe nal ernfba ba rnegu, pbhyq lbh jvfu sbe na vapernfr bs 
 cnva. Bs cnva lbh pbhyq jvfu bayl bar guvat: gung vg fubhyq fgbc. Abguvat 
 va gur jbeyq jnf fb onq nf culfvpny cnva. Va gur snpr bs cnva gurer ner ab 
 urebrf, ab urebrf, ur gubhtug bire naq bire nf ur jevgurq ba gur sybbe, 
 pyhgpuvat hfryrffyl ng uvf qvfnoyrq yrsg nez. 
 
 VV 
 
 Ur jnf ylvat ba fbzrguvat gung sryg yvxr n pnzc orq, rkprcg gung vg 
 jnf uvture bss gur tebhaq naq gung ur jnf svkrq qbja va fbzr jnl fb gung ur 
 pbhyq abg zbir. Yvtug gung frrzrq fgebatre guna hfhny jnf snyyvat ba uvf 
 snpr. B'Oevra jnf fgnaqvat ng uvf fvqr, ybbxvat qbja ng uvz vagragyl. Ng 
 gur bgure fvqr bs uvz fgbbq n zna va n juvgr pbng, ubyqvat n ulcbqrezvp 
 flevatr. 
 Rira nsgre uvf rlrf jrer bcra ur gbbx va uvf fheebhaqvatf bayl 
 tenqhnyyl. Ur unq gur vzcerffvba bs fjvzzvat hc vagb guvf ebbz sebz fbzr 
 dhvgr qvssrerag jbeyq, n fbeg bs haqrejngre jbeyq sne orarngu vg. Ubj ybat 
 ur unq orra qbja gurer ur qvq abg xabj. Fvapr gur zbzrag jura gurl neerfgrq 
 uvz ur unq abg frra qnexarff be qnlyvtug. Orfvqrf, uvf zrzbevrf jrer abg 
 pbagvahbhf. Gurer unq orra gvzrf jura pbafpvbhfarff, rira gur fbeg bs 
 pbafpvbhfarff gung bar unf va fyrrc, unq fgbccrq qrnq naq fgnegrq ntnva 
 nsgre n oynax vagreiny. Ohg jurgure gur vagreinyf jrer bs qnlf be jrrxf be 
 bayl frpbaqf, gurer jnf ab jnl bs xabjvat. 
 Jvgu gung svefg oybj ba gur ryobj gur avtugzner unq fgnegrq. Yngre ur 
 jnf gb ernyvmr gung nyy gung gura unccrarq jnf zreryl n ceryvzvanel, n 
 ebhgvar vagreebtngvba gb juvpu arneyl nyy cevfbaref jrer fhowrpgrq. Gurer 
 jnf n ybat enatr bs pevzrf -- rfcvbantr, fnobgntr, naq gur yvxr -- gb juvpu 
 rirelbar unq gb pbasrff nf n znggre bs pbhefr. Gur pbasrffvba jnf n 
 sbeznyvgl, gubhtu gur gbegher jnf erny. Ubj znal gvzrf ur unq orra orngra, 
 ubj ybat gur orngvatf unq pbagvahrq, ur pbhyq abg erzrzore. Nyjnlf gurer 
 jrer svir be fvk zra va oynpx havsbezf ng uvz fvzhygnarbhfyl. Fbzrgvzrf vg 
 jnf svfgf, fbzrgvzrf vg jnf gehapurbaf, fbzrgvzrf vg jnf fgrry ebqf, 
 fbzrgvzrf vg jnf obbgf. Gurer jrer gvzrf jura ur ebyyrq nobhg gur sybbe, nf 
 funzryrff nf na navzny, jevguvat uvf obql guvf jnl naq gung va na raqyrff, 
 ubcryrff rssbeg gb qbqtr gur xvpxf, naq fvzcyl vaivgvat zber naq lrg zber 
 xvpxf, va uvf evof, va uvf oryyl, ba uvf ryobjf, ba uvf fuvaf, va uvf 
 tebva, va uvf grfgvpyrf, ba gur obar ng gur onfr bs uvf fcvar. Gurer jrer 
 gvzrf jura vg jrag ba naq ba hagvy gur pehry, jvpxrq, hasbetvinoyr guvat 
 frrzrq gb uvz abg gung gur thneqf pbagvahrq gb orng uvz ohg gung ur pbhyq 
 abg sbepr uveafrys vagb ybfvat pbafpvbhfarff. Gurer jrer gvzrf jura uvf 
 areir fb sbefbbx uvz gung ur ortna fubhgvat sbe zrepl rira orsber gur 
 orngvat ortna, jura gur zrer fvtug bs n svfg qenja onpx sbe n oybj jnf 
 rabhtu gb znxr uvz cbhe sbegu n pbasrffvba bs erny naq vzntvanel pevzrf. 
 Gurer jrer bgure gvzrf jura ur fgnegrq bhg jvgu gur erfbyir bs pbasrffvat 
 abguvat, jura rirel jbeq unq gb or sbeprq bhg bs uvz orgjrra tnfcf bs cnva, 
 naq gurer jrer gvzrf jura ur srroyl gevrq gb pbzcebzvfr, jura ur fnvq gb 
 uvzfrys: 'V jvyy pbasrff, ohg abg lrg. V zhfg ubyq bhg gvyy gur cnva 
 orpbzrf haornenoyr. Guerr zber xvpxf, gjb zber xvpxf, naq gura V jvyy gryy 
 gurz jung gurl jnag.' Fbzrgvzrf ur jnf orngra gvyy ur pbhyq uneqyl fgnaq, 
 gura syhat yvxr n fnpx bs cbgngbrf ba gb gur fgbar sybbe bs n pryy, yrsg gb 
 erphcrengr sbe n srj ubhef, naq gura gnxra bhg naq orngra ntnva. Gurer jrer 
 nyfb ybatre crevbqf bs erpbirel. Ur erzrzorerq gurz qvzyl, orpnhfr gurl 
 jrer fcrag puvrsyl va fyrrc be fghcbe. Ur erzrzorerq n pryy jvgu n cynax 
 orq, n fbeg bs furys fgvpxvat bhg sebz gur jnyy, naq n gva jnfu-onfva, naq 
 zrnyf bs ubg fbhc naq oernq naq fbzrgvzrf pbssrr. Ur erzrzorerq n fheyl 
 oneore neevivat gb fpencr uvf puva naq pebc uvf unve, naq ohfvarffyvxr, 
 haflzcngurgvp zra va juvgr pbngf srryvat uvf chyfr, gnccvat uvf ersyrkrf, 
 gheavat hc uvf rlryvqf, ehaavat unefu svatref bire uvz va frnepu sbe oebxra 
 obarf, naq fubbgvat arrqyrf vagb uvf nez gb znxr uvz fyrrc. 
 Gur orngvatf terj yrff serdhrag, naq orpnzr znvayl n guerng, n ubeebe 
 gb juvpu ur pbhyq or frag onpx ng nal zbzrag jura uvf nafjref jrer 
 hafngvfsnpgbel. Uvf dhrfgvbaref abj jrer abg ehssvnaf va oynpx havsbezf ohg 
 Cnegl vagryyrpghnyf, yvggyr ebghaq zra jvgu dhvpx zbirzragf naq synfuvat 
 fcrpgnpyrf, jub jbexrq ba uvz va erynlf bire crevbqf juvpu ynfgrq -- ur 
 gubhtug, ur pbhyq abg or fher -- gra be gjryir ubhef ng n fgergpu. Gurfr 
 bgure dhrfgvbaref fnj gb vg gung ur jnf va pbafgnag fyvtug cnva, ohg vg jnf 
 abg puvrsyl cnva gung gurl eryvrq ba. Gurl fynccrq uvf snpr, jehat uvf 
 rnef. chyyrq uvf unve, znqr uvz fgnaq ba bar yrt, ershfrq uvz yrnir gb 
 hevangr, fubar tynevat yvtugf va uvf snpr hagvy uvf rlrf ena jvgu jngre; 
 ohg gur nvz bs guvf jnf fvzcyl gb uhzvyvngr uvz naq qrfgebl uvf cbjre bs 
 nethvat naq ernfbavat. Gurve erny jrncba jnf gur zrepvyrff dhrfgvbavat gung 
 jrag ba naq ba, ubhe nsgre ubhe, gevccvat uvz hc, ynlvat gencf sbe uvz, 
 gjvfgvat rirelguvat gung ur fnvq, pbaivpgvat uvz ng rirel fgrc bs yvrf naq 
 frys-pbagenqvpgvba hagvy ur ortna jrrcvat nf zhpu sebz funzr nf sebz 
 areibhf sngvthr Fbzrgvzrf ur jbhyq jrrc unys n qbmra gvzrf va n fvatyr 
 frffvba. Zbfg bs gur gvzr gurl fpernzrq nohfr ng uvz naq guerngrarq ng 
 rirel urfvgngvba gb qryvire uvz bire gb gur thneqf ntnva; ohg fbzrgvzrf 
 gurl jbhyq fhqqrayl punatr gurve ghar, pnyy uvz pbzenqr, nccrny gb uvz va 
 gur anzr bs Vatfbp naq Ovt Oebgure, naq nfx uvz fbeebjshyyl jurgure rira 
 abj ur unq abg rabhtu yblnygl gb gur Cnegl yrsg gb znxr uvz jvfu gb haqb 
 gur rivy ur unq qbar. Jura uvf areirf jrer va entf nsgre ubhef bs 
 dhrfgvbavat, rira guvf nccrny pbhyq erqhpr uvz gb faviryyvat grnef. Va gur 
 raq gur anttvat ibvprf oebxr uvz qbja zber pbzcyrgryl guna gur obbgf naq 
 svfgf bs gur thneqf. Ur orpnzr fvzcyl n zbhgu gung hggrerq, n unaq gung 
 fvtarq, jungrire jnf qrznaqrq bs uvz. Uvf fbyr pbaprea jnf gb svaq bhg jung 
 gurl jnagrq uvz gb pbasrff, naq gura pbasrff vg dhvpxyl, orsber gur 
 ohyylvat fgnegrq narj. Ur pbasrffrq gb gur nffnffvangvba bs rzvarag Cnegl 
 zrzoref, gur qvfgevohgvba bs frqvgvbhf cnzcuyrgf, rzormmyrzrag bs choyvp 
 shaqf, fnyr bs zvyvgnel frpergf, fnobgntr bs rirel xvaq. Ur pbasrffrq gung 
 ur unq orra n fcl va gur cnl bs gur Rnfgnfvna tbireazrag nf sne onpx nf 
 1968. Ur pbasrffrq gung ur jnf n eryvtvbhf oryvrire, na nqzvere bs 
 pncvgnyvfz, naq n frkhny creireg. Ur pbasrffrq gung ur unq zheqrerq uvf 
 jvsr, nygubhtu ur xarj, naq uvf dhrfgvbaref zhfg unir xabja, gung uvf jvsr 
 jnf fgvyy nyvir. Ur pbasrffrq gung sbe lrnef ur unq orra va crefbany gbhpu 
 jvgu Tbyqfgrva naq unq orra n zrzore bs na haqretebhaq betnavmngvba juvpu 
 unq vapyhqrq nyzbfg rirel uhzna orvat ur unq rire xabja. Vg jnf rnfvre gb 
 pbasrff rirelguvat naq vzcyvpngr rirelobql. Orfvqrf, va n frafr vg jnf nyy 
 gehr. Vg jnf gehr gung ur unq orra gur rarzl bs gur Cnegl, naq va gur rlrf 
 bs gur Cnegl gurer jnf ab qvfgvapgvba orgjrra gur gubhtug naq gur qrrq. 
 Gurer jrer nyfb zrzbevrf bs nabgure xvaq. Gurl fgbbq bhg va uvf zvaq 
 qvfpbaarpgrqyl, yvxr cvpgherf jvgu oynpxarff nyy ebhaq gurz. 
 Ur jnf va n pryy juvpu zvtug unir orra rvgure qnex be yvtug, orpnhfr 
 ur pbhyq frr abguvat rkprcg n cnve bs rlrf. Arne ng unaq fbzr xvaq bs 
 vafgehzrag jnf gvpxvat fybjyl naq erthyneyl. Gur rlrf terj ynetre naq zber 
 yhzvabhf. Fhqqrayl ur sybngrq bhg bs uvf frng, qvirq vagb gur rlrf, naq jnf 
 fjnyybjrq hc. 
 Ur jnf fgenccrq vagb n punve fheebhaqrq ol qvnyf, haqre qnmmyvat 
 yvtugf. N zna va n juvgr pbng jnf ernqvat gur qvnyf. Gurer jnf n genzc bs 
 urnil obbgf bhgfvqr. Gur qbbe pynatrq bcra. Gur jnkrq-snprq bssvpre znepurq 
 va, sbyybjrq ol gjb thneqf. 
 'Ebbz 101,' fnvq gur bssvpre. 
 Gur zna va gur juvgr pbng qvq abg ghea ebhaq. Ur qvq abg ybbx ng 
 Jvafgba rvgure; ur jnf ybbxvat bayl ng gur qvnyf. 
 Ur jnf ebyyvat qbja n zvtugl pbeevqbe, n xvybzrger jvqr, shyy bs 
 tybevbhf, tbyqra yvtug, ebnevat jvgu ynhtugre naq fubhgvat bhg pbasrffvbaf 
 ng gur gbc bs uvf ibvpr. Ur jnf pbasrffvat rirelguvat, rira gur guvatf ur 
 unq fhpprrqrq va ubyqvat onpx haqre gur gbegher. Ur jnf eryngvat gur ragver 
 uvfgbel bs uvf yvsr gb na nhqvrapr jub xarj vg nyernql. Jvgu uvz jrer gur 
 thneqf, gur bgure dhrfgvbaref, gur zra va juvgr pbngf, B'Oevra, Whyvn, Ze 
 Puneevatgba, nyy ebyyvat qbja gur pbeevqbe gbtrgure naq fubhgvat jvgu 
 ynhtugre. Fbzr qernqshy guvat juvpu unq ynva rzorqqrq va gur shgher unq 
 fbzrubj orra fxvccrq bire naq unq abg unccrarq. Rirelguvat jnf nyy evtug, 
 gurer jnf ab zber cnva, gur ynfg qrgnvy bs uvf yvsr jnf ynvq oner, 
 haqrefgbbq, sbetvira. 
 Ur jnf fgnegvat hc sebz gur cynax orq va gur unys-pregnvagl gung ur 
 unq urneq B'Oevra'f ibvpr. Nyy guebhtu uvf vagreebtngvba, nygubhtu ur unq 
 arire frra uvz, ur unq unq gur srryvat gung B'Oevra jnf ng uvf ryobj, whfg 
 bhg bs fvtug. Vg jnf B'Oevra jub jnf qverpgvat rirelguvat. Vg jnf ur jub 
 frg gur thneqf ba gb Jvafgba naq jub ceriragrq gurz sebz xvyyvat uvz. Vg 
 jnf ur jub qrpvqrq jura Jvafgba fubhyq fpernz jvgu cnva, jura ur fubhyq 
 unir n erfcvgr, jura ur fubhyq or srq, jura ur fubhyq fyrrc, jura gur qehtf 
 fubhyq or chzcrq vagb uvf nez. Vg jnf ur jub nfxrq gur dhrfgvbaf naq 
 fhttrfgrq gur nafjref. Ur jnf gur gbezragbe, ur jnf gur cebgrpgbe, ur jnf 
 gur vadhvfvgbe, ur jnf gur sevraq. Naq bapr -- Jvafgba pbhyq abg erzrzore 
 jurgure vg jnf va qehttrq fyrrc, be va abezny fyrrc, be rira va n zbzrag bs 
 jnxrshyarff -- n ibvpr zhezherq va uvf rne: 'Qba'g jbeel, Jvafgba; lbh ner 
 va zl xrrcvat. Sbe frira lrnef V unir jngpurq bire lbh. Abj gur gheavat- 
 cbvag unf pbzr. V funyy fnir lbh, V funyy znxr lbh cresrpg.' Ur jnf abg 
 fher jurgure vg jnf B'Oevra'f ibvpr; ohg vg jnf gur fnzr ibvpr gung unq 
 fnvq gb uvz, 'Jr funyy zrrg va gur cynpr jurer gurer vf ab qnexarff,' va 
 gung bgure qernz, frira lrnef ntb. 
 Ur qvq abg erzrzore nal raqvat gb uvf vagreebtngvba. Gurer jnf n 
 crevbq bs oynpxarff naq gura gur pryy, be ebbz, va juvpu ur abj jnf unq 
 tenqhnyyl zngrevnyvmrq ebhaq uvz. Ur jnf nyzbfg syng ba uvf onpx, naq 
 hanoyr gb zbir. Uvf obql jnf uryq qbja ng rirel rffragvny cbvag. Rira gur 
 onpx bs uvf urnq jnf tevccrq va fbzr znaare. B'Oevra jnf ybbxvat qbja ng 
 uvz teniryl naq engure fnqyl. Uvf snpr, frra sebz orybj, ybbxrq pbnefr naq 
 jbea, jvgu cbhpurf haqre gur rlrf naq gverq yvarf sebz abfr gb puva. Ur jnf 
 byqre guna Jvafgba unq gubhtug uvz; ur jnf creuncf sbegl-rvtug be svsgl. 
 Haqre uvf unaq gurer jnf n qvny jvgu n yrire ba gbc naq svtherf ehaavat 
 ebhaq gur snpr. 
 'V gbyq lbh,' fnvq B'Oevra, 'gung vs jr zrg ntnva vg jbhyq or urer.' 
 'Lrf,' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 Jvgubhg nal jneavat rkprcg n fyvtug zbirzrag bs B'Oevra'f unaq, n jnir 
 bs cnva sybbqrq uvf obql. Vg jnf n sevtugravat cnva, orpnhfr ur pbhyq abg 
 frr jung jnf unccravat, naq ur unq gur srryvat gung fbzr zbegny vawhel jnf 
 orvat qbar gb uvz. Ur qvq abg xabj jurgure gur guvat jnf ernyyl unccravat, 
 be jurgure gur rssrpg jnf ryrpgevpnyyl cebqhprq; ohg uvf obql jnf orvat 
 jerapurq bhg bs funcr, gur wbvagf jrer orvat fybjyl gbea ncneg. Nygubhtu 
 gur cnva unq oebhtug gur fjrng bhg ba uvf sberurnq, gur jbefg bs nyy jnf 
 gur srne gung uvf onpxobar jnf nobhg gb fanc. Ur frg uvf grrgu naq oerngurq 
 uneq guebhtu uvf abfr, gelvat gb xrrc fvyrag nf ybat nf cbffvoyr. 
 'Lbh ner nsenvq,' fnvq B'Oevra, jngpuvat uvf snpr, 'gung va nabgure 
 zbzrag fbzrguvat vf tbvat gb oernx. Lbhe rfcrpvny srne vf gung vg jvyy or 
 lbhe onpxobar. Lbh unir n ivivq zragny cvpgher bs gur iregroenr fanccvat 
 ncneg naq gur fcvany syhvq qevccvat bhg bs gurz. Gung vf jung lbh ner 
 guvaxvat, vf vg abg, Jvafgba?' 
 Jvafgba qvq abg nafjre. B'Oevra qerj onpx gur yrire ba gur qvny. Gur 
 jnir bs cnva erprqrq nyzbfg nf dhvpxyl nf vg unq pbzr. 
 'Gung jnf sbegl,' fnvq B'Oevra. 'Lbh pna frr gung gur ahzoref ba guvf 
 qvny eha hc gb n uhaqerq. Jvyy lbh cyrnfr erzrzore, guebhtubhg bhe 
 pbairefngvba, gung V unir vg va zl cbjre gb vasyvpg cnva ba lbh ng nal 
 zbzrag naq gb jungrire qrterr V pubbfr? Vs lbh gryy zr nal yvrf, be nggrzcg 
 gb cerinevpngr va nal jnl, be rira snyy orybj lbhe hfhny yriry bs 
 vagryyvtrapr, lbh jvyy pel bhg jvgu cnva, vafgnagyl. Qb lbh haqrefgnaq 
 gung?' 
 'Lrf,' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 B'Oevra'f znaare orpnzr yrff frirer. Ur erfrggyrq uvf fcrpgnpyrf 
 gubhtugshyyl, naq gbbx n cnpr be gjb hc naq qbja. Jura ur fcbxr uvf ibvpr 
 jnf tragyr naq cngvrag. Ur unq gur nve bs n qbpgbe, n grnpure, rira n 
 cevrfg, nakvbhf gb rkcynva naq crefhnqr engure guna gb chavfu. 
 'V nz gnxvat gebhoyr jvgu lbh, Jvafgba,' ur fnvq, 'orpnhfr lbh ner 
 jbegu gebhoyr. Lbh xabj cresrpgyl jryy jung vf gur znggre jvgu lbh. Lbh 
 unir xabja vg sbe lrnef, gubhtu lbh unir sbhtug ntnvafg gur xabjyrqtr. Lbh 
 ner zragnyyl qrenatrq. Lbh fhssre sebz n qrsrpgvir zrzbel. Lbh ner hanoyr 
 gb erzrzore erny riragf naq lbh crefhnqr lbhefrys gung lbh erzrzore bgure 
 riragf juvpu arire unccrarq. Sbeghangryl vg vf phenoyr. Lbh unir arire 
 pherq lbhefrys bs vg, orpnhfr lbh qvq abg pubbfr gb. Gurer jnf n fznyy 
 rssbeg bs gur jvyy gung lbh jrer abg ernql gb znxr. Rira abj, V nz jryy 
 njner, lbh ner pyvatvat gb lbhe qvfrnfr haqre gur vzcerffvba gung vg vf n 
 iveghr. Abj jr jvyy gnxr na rknzcyr. Ng guvf zbzrag, juvpu cbjre vf Bprnavn 
 ng jne jvgu?' 
 'Jura V jnf neerfgrq, Bprnavn jnf ng jne jvgu Rnfgnfvn.' 
 'Jvgu Rnfgnfvn. Tbbq. Naq Bprnavn unf nyjnlf orra ng jne jvgu 
 Rnfgnfvn, unf vg abg?' 
 Jvafgba qerj va uvf oerngu. Ur bcrarq uvf zbhgu gb fcrnx naq gura qvq 
 abg fcrnx. Ur pbhyq abg gnxr uvf rlrf njnl sebz gur qvny. 
 'Gur gehgu, cyrnfr, Jvafgba. Lbhe gehgu. Gryy zr jung lbh guvax lbh 
 erzrzore.' 
 'V erzrzore gung hagvy bayl n jrrx orsber V jnf neerfgrq, jr jrer abg 
 ng jne jvgu Rnfgnfvn ng nyy. Jr jrer va nyyvnapr jvgu gurz. Gur jne jnf 
 ntnvafg Rhenfvn. Gung unq ynfgrq sbe sbhe lrnef. Orsber gung--' 
 B'Oevra fgbccrq uvz jvgu n zbirzrag bs gur unaq. 
 'Nabgure rknzcyr,' ur fnvq. 'Fbzr lrnef ntb lbh unq n irel frevbhf 
 qryhfvba vaqrrq. Lbh oryvrirq gung guerr zra, guerr bar-gvzr Cnegl zrzoref 
 anzrq Wbarf, Nnebafba, naq Ehguresbeq zra jub jrer rkrphgrq sbe gernpurel 
 naq fnobgntr nsgre znxvat gur shyyrfg cbffvoyr pbasrffvba -- jrer abg 
 thvygl bs gur pevzrf gurl jrer punetrq jvgu. Lbh oryvrirq gung lbh unq frra 
 hazvfgnxnoyr qbphzragnel rivqrapr cebivat gung gurve pbasrffvbaf jrer 
 snyfr. Gurer jnf n pregnva cubgbtencu nobhg juvpu lbh unq n unyyhpvangvba. 
 Lbh oryvrirq gung lbh unq npghnyyl uryq vg va lbhe unaqf. Vg jnf n 
 cubgbtencu fbzrguvat yvxr guvf.' 
 Na boybat fyvc bs arjfcncre unq nccrnerq orgjrra B'Oevra'f svatref. 
 Sbe creuncf svir frpbaqf vg jnf jvguva gur natyr bs Jvafgba'f ivfvba. Vg 
 jnf n cubgbtencu, naq gurer jnf ab dhrfgvba bs vgf vqragvgl. Vg jnf GUR 
 cubgbtencu. Vg jnf nabgure pbcl bs gur cubgbtencu bs Wbarf, Nnebafba, naq 
 Ehguresbeq ng gur cnegl shapgvba va Arj Lbex, juvpu ur unq punaprq hcba 
 ryrira lrnef ntb naq cebzcgyl qrfgeblrq. Sbe bayl na vafgnag vg jnf orsber 
 uvf rlrf, gura vg jnf bhg bs fvtug ntnva. Ohg ur unq frra vg, 
 hadhrfgvbanoyl ur unq frra vg! Ur znqr n qrfcrengr, ntbavmvat rssbeg gb 
 jerapu gur gbc unys bs uvf obql serr. Vg jnf vzcbffvoyr gb zbir fb zhpu nf 
 n pragvzrger va nal qverpgvba. Sbe gur zbzrag ur unq rira sbetbggra gur 
 qvny. Nyy ur jnagrq jnf gb ubyq gur cubgbtencu va uvf svatref ntnva, be ng 
 yrnfg gb frr vg. 
 'Vg rkvfgf!' ur pevrq. 
 'Ab,' fnvq B'Oevra. 
 Ur fgrccrq npebff gur ebbz. Gurer jnf n zrzbel ubyr va gur bccbfvgr 
 jnyy. B'Oevra yvsgrq gur tengvat. Hafrra, gur senvy fyvc bs cncre jnf 
 juveyvat njnl ba gur pheerag bs jnez nve; vg jnf inavfuvat va n synfu bs 
 synzr. B'Oevra ghearq njnl sebz gur jnyy. 
 'Nfurf,' ur fnvq. 'Abg rira vqragvsvnoyr nfurf. Qhfg. Vg qbrf abg 
 rkvfg. Vg arire rkvfgrq.' 
 'Ohg vg qvq rkvfg! Vg qbrf rkvfg! Vg rkvfgf va zrzbel. V erzrzore vg. 
 Lbh erzrzore vg.' 
 'V qb abg erzrzore vg,' fnvq B'Oevra. 
 Jvafgba'f urneg fnax. Gung jnf qbhoyrguvax. Ur unq n srryvat bs qrnqyl 
 urycyrffarff. Vs ur pbhyq unir orra pregnva gung B'Oevra jnf ylvat, vg 
 jbhyq abg unir frrzrq gb znggre. Ohg vg jnf cresrpgyl cbffvoyr gung B'Oevra 
 unq ernyyl sbetbggra gur cubgbtencu. Naq vs fb, gura nyernql ur jbhyq unir 
 sbetbggra uvf qravny bs erzrzorevat vg, naq sbetbggra gur npg bs 
 sbetrggvat. Ubj pbhyq bar or fher gung vg jnf fvzcyr gevpxrel? Creuncf gung 
 yhangvp qvfybpngvba va gur zvaq pbhyq ernyyl unccra: gung jnf gur gubhtug 
 gung qrsrngrq uvz. 
 B'Oevra jnf ybbxvat qbja ng uvz fcrphyngviryl. Zber guna rire ur unq 
 gur nve bs n grnpure gnxvat cnvaf jvgu n jnljneq ohg cebzvfvat puvyq. 
 'Gurer vf n Cnegl fybtna qrnyvat jvgu gur pbageby bs gur cnfg,' ur 
 fnvq. 'Ercrng vg, vs lbh cyrnfr.' 
 '"Jub pbagebyf gur cnfg pbagebyf gur shgher: jub pbagebyf gur cerfrag 
 pbagebyf gur cnfg,"' ercrngrq Jvafgba borqvragyl. 
 "'Jub pbagebyf gur cerfrag pbagebyf gur cnfg,"' fnvq B'Oevra, abqqvat 
 uvf urnq jvgu fybj nccebiny. 'Vf vg lbhe bcvavba, Jvafgba, gung gur cnfg 
 unf erny rkvfgrapr?' 
 Ntnva gur srryvat bs urycyrffarff qrfpraqrq hcba Jvafgba. Uvf rlrf 
 syvggrq gbjneqf gur qvny. Ur abg bayl qvq abg xabj jurgure 'lrf' be 'ab' 
 jnf gur nafjre gung jbhyq fnir uvz sebz cnva; ur qvq abg rira xabj juvpu 
 nafjre ur oryvrirq gb or gur gehr bar. 
 B'Oevra fzvyrq snvagyl. 'Lbh ner ab zrgnculfvpvna, Jvafgba,' ur fnvq. 
 'Hagvy guvf zbzrag lbh unq arire pbafvqrerq jung vf zrnag ol rkvfgrapr. V 
 jvyy chg vg zber cerpvfryl. Qbrf gur cnfg rkvfg pbapergryl, va fcnpr? Vf 
 gurer fbzrjurer be bgure n cynpr, n jbeyq bs fbyvq bowrpgf, jurer gur cnfg 
 vf fgvyy unccravat?' 
 'Ab.' 
 'Gura jurer qbrf gur cnfg rkvfg, vs ng nyy?' 
 'Va erpbeqf. Vg vf jevggra qbja.' 
 'Va erpbeqf. Naq--?' 
 'Va gur zvaq. Va uhzna zrzbevrf.' 
 'Va zrzbel. Irel jryy, gura. Jr, gur Cnegl, pbageby nyy erpbeqf, naq 
 jr pbageby nyy zrzbevrf. Gura jr pbageby gur cnfg, qb jr abg?' 
 'Ohg ubj pna lbh fgbc crbcyr erzrzorevat guvatf?' pevrq Jvafgba ntnva 
 zbzragnevyl sbetrggvat gur qvny. 'Vg vf vaibyhagnel. Vg vf bhgfvqr barfrys. 
 Ubj pna lbh pbageby zrzbel? Lbh unir abg pbagebyyrq zvar!' 
 B'Oevra'f znaare terj fgrea ntnva. Ur ynvq uvf unaq ba gur qvny. 
 'Ba gur pbagenel,' ur fnvq, 'lbh unir abg pbagebyyrq vg. Gung vf jung 
 unf oebhtug lbh urer. Lbh ner urer orpnhfr lbh unir snvyrq va uhzvyvgl, va 
 frys-qvfpvcyvar. Lbh jbhyq abg znxr gur npg bs fhozvffvba juvpu vf gur 
 cevpr bs fnavgl. Lbh cersreerq gb or n yhangvp, n zvabevgl bs bar. Bayl gur 
 qvfpvcyvarq zvaq pna frr ernyvgl, Jvafgba. Lbh oryvrir gung ernyvgl vf 
 fbzrguvat bowrpgvir, rkgreany, rkvfgvat va vgf bja evtug. Lbh nyfb oryvrir 
 gung gur angher bs ernyvgl vf frys-rivqrag. Jura lbh qryhqr lbhefrys vagb 
 guvaxvat gung lbh frr fbzrguvat, lbh nffhzr gung rirelbar ryfr frrf gur 
 fnzr guvat nf lbh. Ohg V gryy lbh, Jvafgba, gung ernyvgl vf abg rkgreany. 
 Ernyvgl rkvfgf va gur uhzna zvaq, naq abjurer ryfr. Abg va gur vaqvivqhny 
 zvaq, juvpu pna znxr zvfgnxrf, naq va nal pnfr fbba crevfurf: bayl va gur 
 zvaq bs gur Cnegl, juvpu vf pbyyrpgvir naq vzzbegny. Jungrire gur Cnegl 
 ubyqf gb or gur gehgu, vf gehgu. Vg vf vzcbffvoyr gb frr ernyvgl rkprcg ol 
 ybbxvat guebhtu gur rlrf bs gur Cnegl. Gung vf gur snpg gung lbh unir tbg 
 gb eryrnea, Jvafgba. Vg arrqf na npg bs frys-qrfgehpgvba, na rssbeg bs gur 
 jvyy. Lbh zhfg uhzoyr lbhefrys orsber lbh pna orpbzr fnar.' 
 Ur cnhfrq sbe n srj zbzragf, nf gubhtu gb nyybj jung ur unq orra 
 fnlvat gb fvax va. 
 'Qb lbh erzrzore,' ur jrag ba, 'jevgvat va lbhe qvnel, "Serrqbz vf gur 
 serrqbz gb fnl gung gjb cyhf gjb znxr sbhe"?' 
 'Lrf,' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 B'Oevra uryq hc uvf yrsg unaq, vgf onpx gbjneqf Jvafgba, jvgu gur 
 guhzo uvqqra naq gur sbhe svatref rkgraqrq. 
 'Ubj znal svatref nz V ubyqvat hc, Jvafgba?' 
 'Sbhe.' 
 'Naq vs gur cnegl fnlf gung vg vf abg sbhe ohg svir -- gura ubj znal?' 
 'Sbhe.' 
 Gur jbeq raqrq va n tnfc bs cnva. Gur arrqyr bs gur qvny unq fubg hc 
 gb svsgl-svir. Gur fjrng unq fcehat bhg nyy bire Jvafgba'f obql. Gur nve 
 gber vagb uvf yhatf naq vffhrq ntnva va qrrc tebnaf juvpu rira ol pyrapuvat 
 uvf grrgu ur pbhyq abg fgbc. B'Oevra jngpurq uvz, gur sbhe svatref fgvyy 
 rkgraqrq. Ur qerj onpx gur yrire. Guvf gvzr gur cnva jnf bayl fyvtugyl 
 rnfrq. 
 'Ubj znal svatref, Jvafgba?' 
 'Sbhe.' 
 Gur arrqyr jrag hc gb fvkgl. 
 'Ubj znal svatref, Jvafgba?' 
 'Sbhe! Sbhe! Jung ryfr pna V fnl? Sbhe!' 
 Gur arrqyr zhfg unir evfra ntnva, ohg ur qvq abg ybbx ng vg. Gur 
 urnil, fgrea snpr naq gur sbhe svatref svyyrq uvf ivfvba. Gur svatref fgbbq 
 hc orsber uvf rlrf yvxr cvyynef, rabezbhf, oyheel, naq frrzvat gb ivoengr, 
 ohg hazvfgnxnoyl sbhe. 
 'Ubj znal svatref, Jvafgba?' 
 'Sbhe! Fgbc vg, fgbc vg! Ubj pna lbh tb ba? Sbhe! Sbhe!' 
 'Ubj znal svatref, Jvafgba?' 
 'Svir! Svir! Svir!' 
 'Ab, Jvafgba, gung vf ab hfr. Lbh ner ylvat. Lbh fgvyy guvax gurer ner 
 sbhe. Ubj znal svatref, cyrnfr?' 
 'Sbhe! svir! Sbhe! Nalguvat lbh yvxr. Bayl fgbc vg, fgbc gur cnva!' 
 Noehcgyl ur jnf fvggvat hc jvgu B'Oevra'f nez ebhaq uvf fubhyqref. Ur 
 unq creuncf ybfg pbafpvbhfarff sbe n srj frpbaqf. Gur obaqf gung unq uryq 
 uvf obql qbja jrer ybbfrarq. Ur sryg irel pbyq, ur jnf funxvat 
 hapbagebyynoyl, uvf grrgu jrer punggrevat, gur grnef jrer ebyyvat qbja uvf 
 purrxf. Sbe n zbzrag ur pyhat gb B'Oevra yvxr n onol, phevbhfyl pbzsbegrq 
 ol gur urnil nez ebhaq uvf fubhyqref. Ur unq gur srryvat gung B'Oevra jnf 
 uvf cebgrpgbe, gung gur cnva jnf fbzrguvat gung pnzr sebz bhgfvqr, sebz 
 fbzr bgure fbhepr, naq gung vg jnf B'Oevra jub jbhyq fnir uvz sebz vg. 
 'Lbh ner n fybj yrneare, Jvafgba,' fnvq B'Oevra tragyl. 
 'Ubj pna V uryc vg?' ur oyhoorerq. 'Ubj pna V uryc frrvat jung vf va 
 sebag bs zl rlrf? Gjb naq gjb ner sbhe.' 
 'Fbzrgvzrf, Jvafgba. Fbzrgvzrf gurl ner svir. Fbzrgvzrf gurl ner 
 guerr. Fbzrgvzrf gurl ner nyy bs gurz ng bapr. Lbh zhfg gel uneqre. Vg vf 
 abg rnfl gb orpbzr fnar.' 
 Ur ynvq Jvafgba qbja ba gur orq. Gur tevc bs uvf yvzof gvtugrarq 
 ntnva, ohg gur cnva unq roorq njnl naq gur gerzoyvat unq fgbccrq, yrnivat 
 uvz zreryl jrnx naq pbyq. B'Oevra zbgvbarq jvgu uvf urnq gb gur zna va gur 
 juvgr pbng, jub unq fgbbq vzzbovyr guebhtubhg gur cebprrqvatf. Gur zna va 
 gur juvgr pbng orag qbja naq ybbxrq pybfryl vagb Jvafgba'f rlrf, sryg uvf 
 chyfr, ynvq na rne ntnvafg uvf purfg, gnccrq urer naq gurer, gura ur abqqrq 
 gb B'Oevra. 
 'Ntnva,' fnvq B'Oevra. 
 Gur cnva sybjrq vagb Jvafgba'f obql. Gur arrqyr zhfg or ng friragl, 
 friragl-svir. Ur unq fuhg uvf rlrf guvf gvzr. Ur xarj gung gur svatref jrer 
 fgvyy gurer, naq fgvyy sbhe. Nyy gung znggrerq jnf fbzrubj gb fgnl nyvir 
 hagvy gur fcnfz jnf bire. Ur unq prnfrq gb abgvpr jurgure ur jnf pelvat bhg 
 be abg. Gur cnva yrffrarq ntnva. Ur bcrarq uvf rlrf. B'Oevra unq qenja onpx 
 gur yrire. 
 'Ubj znal svatref, Jvafgba?' 
 'Sbhe. V fhccbfr gurer ner sbhe. V jbhyq frr svir vs V pbhyq. V nz 
 gelvat gb frr svir.' 
 'Juvpu qb lbh jvfu: gb crefhnqr zr gung lbh frr svir, be ernyyl gb frr 
 gurz?' 
 'Ernyyl gb frr gurz.' 
 'Ntnva,' fnvq B'Oevra. 
 Creuncf gur arrqyr jnf rvtugl -- avargl. Jvafgba pbhyq abg 
 vagrezvggragyl erzrzore jul gur cnva jnf unccravat. Oruvaq uvf fperjrq-hc 
 rlryvqf n sberfg bs svatref frrzrq gb or zbivat va n fbeg bs qnapr, jrnivat 
 va naq bhg, qvfnccrnevat oruvaq bar nabgure naq ernccrnevat ntnva. Ur jnf 
 gelvat gb pbhag gurz, ur pbhyq abg erzrzore jul. Ur xarj bayl gung vg jnf 
 vzcbffvoyr gb pbhag gurz, naq gung guvf jnf fbzrubj qhr gb gur zlfgrevbhf 
 vqragvgl orgjrra svir naq sbhe. Gur cnva qvrq qbja ntnva. Jura ur bcrarq 
 uvf rlrf vg jnf gb svaq gung ur jnf fgvyy frrvat gur fnzr guvat. 
 Vaahzrenoyr svatref, yvxr zbivat gerrf, jrer fgvyy fgernzvat cnfg va rvgure 
 qverpgvba, pebffvat naq erpebffvat. Ur fuhg uvf rlrf ntnva. 
 'Ubj znal svatref nz V ubyqvat hc, Jvafgba?' 
 'V qba'g xabj. V qba'g xabj. Lbh jvyy xvyy zr vs lbh qb gung ntnva. 
 Sbhe, svir, fvk -- va nyy ubarfgl V qba'g xabj.' 
 'Orggre,' fnvq B'Oevra. 
 N arrqyr fyvq vagb Jvafgba'f nez. Nyzbfg va gur fnzr vafgnag n 
 oyvffshy, urnyvat jnezgu fcernq nyy guebhtu uvf obql. Gur cnva jnf nyernql 
 unys-sbetbggra. Ur bcrarq uvf rlrf naq ybbxrq hc tengrshyyl ng B'Oevra. Ng 
 fvtug bs gur urnil, yvarq snpr, fb htyl naq fb vagryyvtrag, uvf urneg 
 frrzrq gb ghea bire. Vs ur pbhyq unir zbirq ur jbhyq unir fgergpurq bhg n 
 unaq naq ynvq vg ba B'Oevra nez. Ur unq arire ybirq uvz fb qrrcyl nf ng 
 guvf zbzrag, naq abg zreryl orpnhfr ur unq fgbccrq gur cnva. Gur byq 
 srryvat, gung ng obggbz vg qvq abg znggre jurgure B'Oevra jnf n sevraq be 
 na rarzl, unq pbzr onpx. B'Oevra jnf n crefba jub pbhyq or gnyxrq gb. 
 Creuncf bar qvq abg jnag gb or ybirq fb zhpu nf gb or haqrefgbbq. B'Oevra 
 unq gbegherq uvz gb gur rqtr bs yhanpl, naq va n yvggyr juvyr, vg jnf 
 pregnva, ur jbhyq fraq uvz gb uvf qrngu. Vg znqr ab qvssrerapr. Va fbzr 
 frafr gung jrag qrrcre guna sevraqfuvc, gurl jrer vagvzngrf: fbzrjurer be 
 bgure, nygubhtu gur npghny jbeqf zvtug arire or fcbxra, gurer jnf n cynpr 
 jurer gurl pbhyq zrrg naq gnyx. B'Oevra jnf ybbxvat qbja ng uvz jvgu na 
 rkcerffvba juvpu fhttrfgrq gung gur fnzr gubhtug zvtug or va uvf bja zvaq. 
 Jura ur fcbxr vg jnf va na rnfl, pbairefngvbany gbar. 
 'Qb lbh xabj jurer lbh ner, Jvafgba?' ur fnvq. 
 'V qba'g xabj. V pna thrff. Va gur Zvavfgel bs Ybir.' 
 'Qb lbh xabj ubj ybat lbh unir orra urer?' 
 'V qba'g xabj. Qnlf, jrrxf, zbaguf -- V guvax vg vf zbaguf.' 
 'Naq jul qb lbh vzntvar gung jr oevat crbcyr gb guvf cynpr?' 
 'Gb znxr gurz pbasrff.' 
 'Ab, gung vf abg gur ernfba. Gel ntnva.' 
 'Gb chavfu gurz.' 
 'Ab!' rkpynvzrq B'Oevra. Uvf ibvpr unq punatrq rkgenbeqvanevyl, naq 
 uvf snpr unq fhqqrayl orpbzr obgu fgrea naq navzngrq. 'Ab! Abg zreryl gb 
 rkgenpg lbhe pbasrffvba, abg gb chavfu lbh. Funyy V gryy lbh jul jr unir 
 oebhtug lbh urer? Gb pher lbh! Gb znxr lbh fnar! Jvyy lbh haqrefgnaq, 
 Jvafgba, gung ab bar jubz jr oevat gb guvf cynpr rire yrnirf bhe unaqf 
 hapherq? Jr ner abg vagrerfgrq va gubfr fghcvq pevzrf gung lbh unir 
 pbzzvggrq. Gur Cnegl vf abg vagrerfgrq va gur bireg npg: gur gubhtug vf nyy 
 jr pner nobhg. Jr qb abg zreryl qrfgebl bhe rarzvrf, jr punatr gurz. Qb lbh 
 haqrefgnaq jung V zrna ol gung?' 
 Ur jnf oraqvat bire Jvafgba. Uvf snpr ybbxrq rabezbhf orpnhfr bs vgf 
 arnearff, naq uvqrbhfyl htyl orpnhfr vg jnf frra sebz orybj. Zberbire vg 
 jnf svyyrq jvgu n fbeg bs rknygngvba, n yhangvp vagrafvgl. Ntnva Jvafgba'f 
 urneg fuenax. Vs vg unq orra cbffvoyr ur jbhyq unir pbjrerq qrrcre vagb gur 
 orq. Ur sryg pregnva gung B'Oevra jnf nobhg gb gjvfg gur qvny bhg bs furre 
 jnagbaarff. Ng guvf zbzrag, ubjrire, B'Oevra ghearq njnl. Ur gbbx n cnpr be 
 gjb hc naq qbja. Gura ur pbagvahrq yrff irurzragyl: 
 'Gur svefg guvat sbe lbh gb haqrefgnaq vf gung va guvf cynpr gurer ner 
 ab znegleqbzf. Lbh unir ernq bs gur eryvtvbhf crefrphgvbaf bs gur cnfg. Va 
 gur Zvqqyr Ntrf gurer jnf gur Vadhvfvgyba. Vg jnf n snvyher. Vg frg bhg gb 
 renqvpngr urerfl, naq raqrq ol crecrghngvat vg. Sbe rirel urergvp vg ohearq 
 ng gur fgnxr, gubhfnaqf bs bguref ebfr hc. Jul jnf gung? Orpnhfr gur 
 Vadhvfvgvba xvyyrq vgf rarzvrf va gur bcra, naq xvyyrq gurz juvyr gurl jrer 
 fgvyy haercragnag: va snpg, vg xvyyrq gurz orpnhfr gurl jrer haercragnag. 
 Zra jrer qlvat orpnhfr gurl jbhyq abg nonaqba gurve gehr oryvrsf. Anghenyyl 
 nyy gur tybel orybatrq gb gur ivpgvz naq nyy gur funzr gb gur Vadhvfvgbe 
 jub ohearq uvz. Yngre, va gur gjragvrgu praghel, gurer jrer gur 
 gbgnyvgnevnaf, nf gurl jrer pnyyrq. Gurer jrer gur Trezna Anmvf naq gur 
 Ehffvna Pbzzhavfgf. Gur Ehffvnaf crefrphgrq urerfl zber pehryyl guna gur 
 Vadhvfvgvba unq qbar. Naq gurl vzntvarq gung gurl unq yrnearq sebz gur 
 zvfgnxrf bs gur cnfg; gurl xarj, ng nal engr, gung bar zhfg abg znxr 
 zneglef. Orsber gurl rkcbfrq gurve ivpgvzf gb choyvp gevny, gurl 
 qryvorengryl frg gurzfryirf gb qrfgebl gurve qvtavgl. Gurl jber gurz qbja 
 ol gbegher naq fbyvghqr hagvy gurl jrer qrfcvpnoyr, pevatvat jergpurf, 
 pbasrffvat jungrire jnf chg vagb gurve zbhguf, pbirevat gurzfryirf jvgu 
 nohfr, npphfvat naq furygrevat oruvaq bar nabgure, juvzcrevat sbe zrepl. 
 Naq lrg nsgre bayl n srj lrnef gur fnzr guvat unq unccrarq bire ntnva. Gur 
 qrnq zra unq orpbzr zneglef naq gurve qrtenqngvba jnf sbetbggra. Bapr 
 ntnva, jul jnf vg? Va gur svefg cynpr, orpnhfr gur pbasrffvbaf gung gurl 
 unq znqr jrer boivbhfyl rkgbegrq naq hagehr. Jr qb abg znxr zvfgnxrf bs 
 gung xvaq. Nyy gur pbasrffvbaf gung ner hggrerq urer ner gehr. Jr znxr gurz 
 gehr. Naq nobir nyy jr qb abg nyybj gur qrnq gb evfr hc ntnvafg hf. Lbh 
 zhfg fgbc vzntvavat gung cbfgrevgl jvyy ivaqvpngr lbh, Jvafgba. Cbfgrevgl 
 jvyy arire urne bs lbh. Lbh jvyy or yvsgrq pyrna bhg sebz gur fgernz bs 
 uvfgbel. Jr funyy ghea lbh vagb tnf naq cbhe lbh vagb gur fgengbfcurer. 
 Abguvat jvyy erznva bs lbh, abg n anzr va n ertvfgre, abg n zrzbel va n 
 yvivat oenva. Lbh jvyy or naavuvyngrq va gur cnfg nf jryy nf va gur shgher. 
 Lbh jvyy arire unir rkvfgrq.' 
 Gura jul obgure gb gbegher zr? gubhtug Jvafgba, jvgu n zbzragnel 
 ovggrearff. B'Oevra purpxrq uvf fgrc nf gubhtu Jvafgba unq hggrerq gur 
 gubhtug nybhq. Uvf ynetr htyl snpr pnzr arnere, jvgu gur rlrf n yvggyr 
 aneebjrq. 
 'Lbh ner guvaxvat,' ur fnvq, 'gung fvapr jr vagraq gb qrfgebl lbh 
 hggreyl, fb gung abguvat gung lbh fnl be qb pna znxr gur fznyyrfg 
 qvssrerapr -- va gung pnfr, jul qb jr tb gb gur gebhoyr bs vagreebtngvat 
 lbh svefg? Gung vf jung lbh jrer guvaxvat, jnf vg abg?' 
 'Lrf,' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 B'Oevra fzvyrq fyvtugyl. 'Lbh ner n synj va gur cnggrea, Jvafgba. Lbh 
 ner n fgnva gung zhfg or jvcrq bhg. Qvq V abg gryy lbh whfg abj gung jr ner 
 qvssrerag sebz gur crefrphgbef bs gur cnfg? Jr ner abg pbagrag jvgu 
 artngvir borqvrapr, abe rira jvgu gur zbfg nowrpg fhozvffvba. Jura svanyyl 
 lbh fheeraqre gb hf, vg zhfg or bs lbhe bja serr jvyy. Jr qb abg qrfgebl 
 gur urergvp orpnhfr ur erfvfgf hf: fb ybat nf ur erfvfgf hf jr arire 
 qrfgebl uvz. Jr pbaireg uvz, jr pncgher uvf vaare zvaq, jr erfuncr uvz. Jr 
 ohea nyy rivy naq nyy vyyhfvba bhg bs uvz; jr oevat uvz bire gb bhe fvqr, 
 abg va nccrnenapr, ohg trahvaryl, urneg naq fbhy. Jr znxr uvz bar bs 
 bhefryirf orsber jr xvyy uvz. Vg vf vagbyrenoyr gb hf gung na reebarbhf 
 gubhtug fubhyq rkvfg naljurer va gur jbeyq, ubjrire frperg naq cbjreyrff vg 
 znl or. Rira va gur vafgnag bs qrngu jr pnaabg crezvg nal qrivngvba. Va gur 
 byq qnlf gur urergvp jnyxrq gb gur fgnxr fgvyy n urergvp, cebpynvzvat uvf 
 urerfl, rkhygvat va vg. Rira gur ivpgvz bs gur Ehffvna chetrf pbhyq pneel 
 eroryyvba ybpxrq hc va uvf fxhyy nf ur jnyxrq qbja gur cnffntr jnvgvat sbe 
 gur ohyyrg. Ohg jr znxr gur oenva cresrpg orsber jr oybj vg bhg. Gur 
 pbzznaq bs gur byq qrfcbgvfzf jnf "Gubh funyg abg". Gur pbzznaq bs gur 
 gbgnyvgnevnaf jnf "Gubh funyg". Bhe pbzznaq vf "Gubh neg". Ab bar jubz jr 
 oevat gb guvf cynpr rire fgnaqf bhg ntnvafg hf. Rirelbar vf jnfurq pyrna. 
 Rira gubfr guerr zvfrenoyr genvgbef va jubfr vaabprapr lbh bapr oryvrirq -- 
 Wbarf, Nnebafba, naq Ehguresbeq -- va gur raq jr oebxr gurz qbja. V gbbx 
 cneg va gurve vagreebtngvba zlfrys. V fnj gurz tenqhnyyl jbea qbja, 
 juvzcrevat, tebiryyvat, jrrcvat -- naq va gur raq vg jnf abg jvgu cnva be 
 srne, bayl jvgu cravgrapr. Ol gur gvzr jr unq svavfurq jvgu gurz gurl jrer 
 bayl gur furyyf bs zra. Gurer jnf abguvat yrsg va gurz rkprcg fbeebj sbe 
 jung gurl unq qbar, naq ybir bs Ovt Oebgure. Vg jnf gbhpuvat gb frr ubj 
 gurl ybirq uvz. Gurl orttrq gb or fubg dhvpxyl, fb gung gurl pbhyq qvr 
 juvyr gurve zvaqf jrer fgvyy pyrna.' 
 Uvf ibvpr unq tebja nyzbfg qernzl. Gur rknygngvba, gur yhangvp 
 raguhfvnfz, jnf fgvyy va uvf snpr. Ur vf abg cergraqvat, gubhtug Jvafgba, 
 ur vf abg n ulcbpevgr, ur oryvrirf rirel jbeq ur fnlf. Jung zbfg bccerffrq 
 uvz jnf gur pbafpvbhfarff bs uvf bja vagryyrpghny vasrevbevgl. Ur jngpurq 
 gur urnil lrg tenprshy sbez fgebyyvat gb naq seb, va naq bhg bs gur enatr 
 bs uvf ivfvba. B'Oevra jnf n orvat va nyy jnlf ynetre guna uvzfrys. Gurer 
 jnf ab vqrn gung ur unq rire unq, be pbhyq unir, gung B'Oevra unq abg ybat 
 ntb xabja, rknzvarq, naq erwrpgrq. Uvf zvaq pbagnvarq Jvafgba'f zvaq. Ohg 
 va gung pnfr ubj pbhyq vg or gehr gung B'Oevra jnf znq? Vg zhfg or ur, 
 Jvafgba, jub jnf znq. B'Oevra unygrq naq ybbxrq qbja ng uvz. Uvf ibvpr unq 
 tebja fgrea ntnva. 
 'Qb abg vzntvar gung lbh jvyy fnir lbhefrys, Jvafgba, ubjrire 
 pbzcyrgryl lbh fheeraqre gb hf. Ab bar jub unf bapr tbar nfgenl vf rire 
 fcnerq. Naq rira vs jr pubfr gb yrg lbh yvir bhg gur angheny grez bs lbhe 
 yvsr, fgvyy lbh jbhyq arire rfpncr sebz hf. Jung unccraf gb lbh urer vf sbe 
 rire. Haqrefgnaq gung va nqinapr. Jr funyy pehfu lbh qbja gb gur cbvag sebz 
 juvpu gurer vf ab pbzvat onpx. Guvatf jvyy unccra gb lbh sebz juvpu lbh 
 pbhyq abg erpbire, vs lbh yvirq n gubhfnaq lrnef. Arire ntnva jvyy lbh or 
 pncnoyr bs beqvanel uhzna srryvat. Rirelguvat jvyy or qrnq vafvqr lbh. 
 Arire ntnva jvyy lbh or pncnoyr bs ybir, be sevraqfuvc, be wbl bs yvivat, 
 be ynhtugre, be phevbfvgl, be pbhentr, be vagrtevgl. Lbh jvyy or ubyybj. Jr 
 funyy fdhrrmr lbh rzcgl, naq gura jr funyy svyy lbh jvgu bhefryirf.' 
 Ur cnhfrq naq fvtarq gb gur zna va gur juvgr pbng. Jvafgba jnf njner 
 bs fbzr urnil cvrpr bs nccnenghf orvat chfurq vagb cynpr oruvaq uvf urnq. 
 B'Oevra unq fng qbja orfvqr gur orq, fb gung uvf snpr jnf nyzbfg ba n yriry 
 jvgu Jvafgba'f. 
 'Guerr gubhfnaq,' ur fnvq, fcrnxvat bire Jvafgba'f urnq gb gur zna va 
 gur juvgr pbng. 
 Gjb fbsg cnqf, juvpu sryg fyvtugyl zbvfg, pynzcrq gurzfryirf ntnvafg 
 Jvafgba'f grzcyrf. Ur dhnvyrq. Gurer jnf cnva pbzvat, n arj xvaq bs cnva. 
 B'Oevra ynvq n unaq ernffhevatyl, nyzbfg xvaqyl, ba uvf. 
 'Guvf gvzr vg jvyy abg uheg,' ur fnvq. 'Xrrc lbhe rlrf svkrq ba zvar.' 
 Ng guvf zbzrag gurer jnf n qrinfgngvat rkcybfvba, be jung frrzrq yvxr 
 na rkcybfvba, gubhtu vg jnf abg pregnva jurgure gurer jnf nal abvfr. Gurer 
 jnf haqbhogrqyl n oyvaqvat synfu bs yvtug. Jvafgba jnf abg uheg, bayl 
 cebfgengrq. Nygubhtu ur unq nyernql orra ylvat ba uvf onpx jura gur guvat 
 unccrarq, ur unq n phevbhf srryvat gung ur unq orra xabpxrq vagb gung 
 cbfvgvba. N greevsvp cnvayrff oybj unq synggrarq uvz bhg. Nyfb fbzrguvat 
 unq unccrarq vafvqr uvf urnq. Nf uvf rlrf ertnvarq gurve sbphf ur 
 erzrzorerq jub ur jnf, naq jurer ur jnf, naq erpbtavmrq gur snpr gung jnf 
 tnmvat vagb uvf bja; ohg fbzrjurer be bgure gurer jnf n ynetr cngpu bs 
 rzcgvarff, nf gubhtu n cvrpr unq orra gnxra bhg bs uvf oenva. 
 'Vg jvyy abg ynfg,' fnvq B'Oevra. 'Ybbx zr va gur rlrf. Jung pbhagel 
 vf Bprnavn ng jne jvgu?' 
 Jvafgba gubhtug. Ur xarj jung jnf zrnag ol Bprnavn naq gung ur uvzfrys 
 jnf n pvgvmra bs Bprnavn. Ur nyfb erzrzorerq Rhenfvn naq Rnfgnfvn; ohg jub 
 jnf ng jne jvgu jubz ur qvq abg xabj. Va snpg ur unq abg orra njner gung 
 gurer jnf nal jne. 
 'V qba'g erzrzore.' 
 'Bprnavn vf ng jne jvgu Rnfgnfvn. Qb lbh erzrzore gung abj?' 
 'Lrf.' 
 'Bprnavn unf nyjnlf orra ng jne jvgu Rnfgnfvn. Fvapr gur ortvaavat bs 
 lbhe yvsr, fvapr gur ortvaavat bs gur Cnegl, fvapr gur ortvaavat bs 
 uvfgbel, gur jne unf pbagvahrq jvgubhg n oernx, nyjnlf gur fnzr jne. Qb lbh 
 erzrzore gung?' 
 'Lrf.' 
 'Ryrira lrnef ntb lbh perngrq n yrtraq nobhg guerr zra jub unq orra 
 pbaqrzarq gb qrngu sbe gernpurel. Lbh cergraqrq gung lbh unq frra n cvrpr 
 bs cncre juvpu cebirq gurz vaabprag. Ab fhpu cvrpr bs cncre rire rkvfgrq. 
 Lbh vairagrq vg, naq yngre lbh terj gb oryvrir va vg. Lbh erzrzore abj gur 
 irel zbzrag ng juvpu lbh svefg vairagrq vg. Qb lbh erzrzore gung?' 
 'Lrf.' 
 'Whfg abj V uryq hc gur svatref bs zl unaq gb lbh. Lbh fnj svir 
 svatref. Qb lbh erzrzore gung?' 
 'Lrf.' 
 B'Oevra uryq hc gur svatref bs uvf yrsg unaq, jvgu gur guhzo 
 pbaprnyrq. 
 'Gurer ner svir svatref gurer. Qb lbh frr svir svatref?' 
 'Lrf.' 
 Naq ur qvq frr gurz, sbe n syrrgvat vafgnag, orsber gur fprarel bs uvf 
 zvaq punatrq. Ur fnj svir svatref, naq gurer jnf ab qrsbezvgl. Gura 
 rirelguvat jnf abezny ntnva, naq gur byq srne, gur ungerq, naq gur 
 orjvyqrezrag pnzr pebjqvat onpx ntnva. Ohg gurer unq orra n zbzrag -- ur 
 qvq abg xabj ubj ybat, guvegl frpbaqf, creuncf -- bs yhzvabhf pregnvagl, 
 jura rnpu arj fhttrfgvba bs B'Oevra'f unq svyyrq hc n cngpu bs rzcgvarff 
 naq orpbzr nofbyhgr gehgu, naq jura gjb naq gjb pbhyq unir orra guerr nf 
 rnfvyl nf svir, vs gung jrer jung jnf arrqrq. Vg unq snqrq ohg orsber 
 B'Oevra unq qebccrq uvf unaq; ohg gubhtu ur pbhyq abg erpncgher vg, ur 
 pbhyq erzrzore vg, nf bar erzrzoref n ivivq rkcrevrapr ng fbzr crevbq bs 
 bar'f yvsr jura bar jnf va rssrpg n qvssrerag crefba. 
 'Lbh frr abj,' fnvq B'Oevra, 'gung vg vf ng nal engr cbffvoyr.' 
 'Lrf,' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 B'Oevra fgbbq hc jvgu n fngvfsvrq nve. Bire gb uvf yrsg Jvafgba fnj 
 gur zna va gur juvgr pbng oernx na nzcbhyr naq qenj onpx gur cyhatre bs n 
 flevatr. B'Oevra ghearq gb Jvafgba jvgu n fzvyr. Va nyzbfg gur byq znaare 
 ur erfrggyrq uvf fcrpgnpyrf ba uvf abfr. 
 'Qb lbh erzrzore jevgvat va lbhe qvnel,' ur fnvq, 'gung vg qvq abg 
 znggre jurgure V jnf n sevraq be na rarzl, fvapr V jnf ng yrnfg n crefba 
 jub haqrefgbbq lbh naq pbhyq or gnyxrq gb? Lbh jrer evtug. V rawbl gnyxvat 
 gb lbh. Lbhe zvaq nccrnyf gb zr. Vg erfrzoyrf zl bja zvaq rkprcg gung lbh 
 unccra gb or vafnar. Orsber jr oevat gur frffvba gb na raq lbh pna nfx zr n 
 srj dhrfgvbaf, vs lbh pubbfr.' 
 'Nal dhrfgvba V yvxr?' 
 'Nalguvat.' Ur fnj gung Jvafgba'f rlrf jrer hcba gur qvny. 'Vg vf 
 fjvgpurq bss. Jung vf lbhe svefg dhrfgvba?' 
 'Jung unir lbh qbar jvgu Whyvn?' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 B'Oevra fzvyrq ntnva. 'Fur orgenlrq lbh, Jvafgba. Vzzrqvngryl- 
 haerfreirqyl. V unir fryqbz frra nalbar pbzr bire gb hf fb cebzcgyl. Lbh 
 jbhyq uneqyl erpbtavmr ure vs lbh fnj ure. Nyy ure eroryyvbhfarff, ure 
 qrprvg, ure sbyyl, ure qvegl-zvaqrqarff -- rirelguvat unf orra ohearq bhg 
 bs ure. Vg jnf n cresrpg pbairefvba, n grkgobbx pnfr.' 
 'Lbh gbegherq ure?' 
 B'Oevra yrsg guvf hanafjrerq. 'Arkg dhrfgvba,' ur fnvq. 
 'Qbrf Ovt Oebgure rkvfg?' 
 'Bs pbhefr ur rkvfgf. Gur Cnegl rkvfgf. Ovt Oebgure vf gur rzobqvzrag 
 bs gur Cnegl.' 
 'Qbrf ur rkvfg va gur fnzr jnl nf V rkvfg?' 
 'Lbh qb abg rkvfg,' fnvq B'Oevra. 
 Bapr ntnva gur frafr bs urycyrffarff nffnvyrq uvz. Ur xarj, be ur 
 pbhyq vzntvar, gur nethzragf juvpu cebirq uvf bja abarkvfgrapr; ohg gurl 
 jrer abafrafr, gurl jrer bayl n cynl ba jbeqf. Qvq abg gur fgngrzrag, 'Lbh 
 qb abg rkvfg', pbagnva n ybtvpny nofheqvgl? Ohg jung hfr jnf vg gb fnl fb? 
 Uvf zvaq fueviryyrq nf ur gubhtug bs gur hanafjrenoyr, znq nethzragf jvgu 
 juvpu B'Oevra jbhyq qrzbyvfu uvz. 
 'V guvax V rkvfg,' ur fnvq jrnevyl. 'V nz pbafpvbhf bs zl bja 
 vqragvgl. V jnf obea naq V funyy qvr. V unir nezf naq yrtf. V bpphcl n 
 cnegvphyne cbvag va fcnpr. Ab bgure fbyvq bowrpg pna bpphcl gur fnzr cbvag 
 fvzhygnarbhfyl. Va gung frafr, qbrf Ovt Oebgure rkvfg?' 
 'Vg vf bs ab vzcbegnapr. Ur rkvfgf.' 
 'Jvyy Ovt Oebgure rire qvr?' 
 'Bs pbhefr abg. Ubj pbhyq ur qvr? Arkg dhrfgvba.' 
 'Qbrf gur Oebgureubbq rkvfg?' 
 'Gung, Jvafgba, lbh jvyy arire xabj. Vs jr pubbfr gb frg lbh serr jura 
 jr unir svavfurq jvgu lbh, naq vs lbh yvir gb or avargl lrnef byq, fgvyy 
 lbh jvyy arire yrnea jurgure gur nafjre gb gung dhrfgvba vf Lrf be Ab. Nf 
 ybat nf lbh yvir vg jvyy or na hafbyirq evqqyr va lbhe zvaq.' 
 Jvafgba ynl fvyrag. Uvf oernfg ebfr naq sryy n yvggyr snfgre. Ur fgvyy 
 unq abg nfxrq gur dhrfgvba gung unq pbzr vagb uvf zvaq gur svefg. Ur unq 
 tbg gb nfx vg, naq lrg vg jnf nf gubhtu uvf gbathr jbhyq abg hggre vg. 
 Gurer jnf n genpr bs nzhfrzrag va B'Oevra'f snpr. Rira uvf fcrpgnpyrf 
 frrzrq gb jrne na vebavpny tyrnz. Ur xabjf, gubhtug Jvafgba fhqqrayl, ur 
 xabjf jung V nz tbvat gb nfx! Ng gur gubhtug gur jbeqf ohefg bhg bs uvz: 
 'Jung vf va Ebbz 101?' 
 Gur rkcerffvba ba B'Oevra'f snpr qvq abg punatr. Ur nafjrerq qevyl: 
 'Lbh xabj jung vf va Ebbz 101, Jvafgba. Rirelbar xabjf jung vf va Ebbz 
 101.' 
 Ur envfrq n svatre gb gur zna va gur juvgr pbng. Rivqragyl gur frffvba 
 jnf ng na raq. N arrqyr wrexrq vagb Jvafgba'f nez. Ur fnax nyzbfg vafgnagyl 
 vagb qrrc fyrrc. 
 
 VVV 
 
 'Gurer ner guerr fgntrf va lbhe ervagrtengvba,' fnvq B'Oevra. 'Gurer 
 vf yrneavat, gurer vf haqrefgnaqvat, naq gurer vf npprcgnapr. Vg vf gvzr 
 sbe lbh gb ragre hcba gur frpbaq fgntr.' 
 Nf nyjnlf, Jvafgba jnf ylvat syng ba uvf onpx. Ohg bs yngr uvf obaqf 
 jrer ybbfre. Gurl fgvyy uryq uvz gb gur orq, ohg ur pbhyq zbir uvf xarrf n 
 yvggyr naq pbhyq ghea uvf urnq sebz fvqr gb fvqr naq envfr uvf nezf sebz 
 gur ryobj. Gur qvny, nyfb, unq tebja gb or yrff bs n greebe. Ur pbhyq rinqr 
 vgf cnatf vs ur jnf dhvpx-jvggrq rabhtu: vg jnf puvrsyl jura ur fubjrq 
 fghcvqvgl gung B'Oevra chyyrq gur yrire. Fbzrgvzrf gurl tbg guebhtu n jubyr 
 frffvba jvgubhg hfr bs gur qvny. Ur pbhyq abg erzrzore ubj znal frffvbaf 
 gurer unq orra. Gur jubyr cebprff frrzrq gb fgergpu bhg bire n ybat, 
 vaqrsvavgr gvzr -- jrrxf, cbffvoyl -- naq gur vagreinyf orgjrra gur 
 frffvbaf zvtug fbzrgvzrf unir orra qnlf, fbzrgvzrf bayl na ubhe be gjb. 
 'Nf lbh yvr gurer,' fnvq B'Oevra, 'lbh unir bsgra jbaqrerq -- lbh unir 
 rira nfxrq zr -- jul gur Zvavfgel bs Ybir fubhyq rkcraq fb zhpu gvzr naq 
 gebhoyr ba lbh. Naq jura lbh jrer serr lbh jrer chmmyrq ol jung jnf 
 rffragvnyyl gur fnzr dhrfgvba. Lbh pbhyq tenfc gur zrpunavpf bs gur Fbpvrgl 
 lbh yvirq va, ohg abg vgf haqreylvat zbgvirf. Qb lbh erzrzore jevgvat va 
 lbhe qvnel, "V haqrefgnaq ubj: V qb abg haqrefgnaq jul"? Vg jnf jura lbh 
 gubhtug nobhg "jul" gung lbh qbhogrq lbhe bja fnavgl. Lbh unir ernq gur 
 obbx, Tbyqfgrva'f obbx, be cnegf bs vg, ng yrnfg. Qvq vg gryy lbh nalguvat 
 gung lbh qvq abg xabj nyernql?' 
 'Lbh unir ernq vg?' fnvq Jvafgba. 
 'V jebgr vg. Gung vf gb fnl, V pbyynobengrq va jevgvat vg. Ab obbx vf 
 cebqhprq vaqvivqhnyyl, nf lbh xabj.' 
 'Vf vg gehr, jung vg fnlf?' 
 'N qrfpevcgvba, lrf. Gur cebtenzzr vg frgf sbegu vf abafrafr. Gur 
 frperg npphzhyngvba bs xabjyrqtr -- n tenqhny fcernq bs rayvtugrazrag -- 
 hygvzngryl n cebyrgnevna eroryyvba -- gur bireguebj bs gur Cnegl. Lbh 
 sberfnj lbhefrys gung gung jnf jung vg jbhyq fnl. Vg vf nyy abafrafr. Gur 
 cebyrgnevnaf jvyy arire eribyg, abg va n gubhfnaq lrnef be n zvyyvba. Gurl 
 pnaabg. V qb abg unir gb gryy lbh gur ernfba: lbh xabj vg nyernql. Vs lbh 
 unir rire purevfurq nal qernzf bs ivbyrag vafheerpgvba, lbh zhfg nonaqba 
 gurz. Gurer vf ab jnl va juvpu gur Cnegl pna or bireguebja. Gur ehyr bs gur 
 Cnegl vf sbe rire. Znxr gung gur fgnegvat-cbvag bs lbhe gubhtugf.' 
 Ur pnzr pybfre gb gur orq. 'Sbe rire!' ur ercrngrq. 'Naq abj yrg hf 
 trg onpx gb gur dhrfgvba bs "ubj" naq "jul". Lbh haqrefgnaq jryy rabhtu ubj 
 gur Cnegl znvagnvaf vgfrys va cbjre. Abj gryy zr jul jr pyvat gb cbjre. 
 Jung vf bhe zbgvir? Jul fubhyq jr jnag cbjre? Tb ba, fcrnx,' ur nqqrq nf 
 Jvafgba erznvarq fvyrag. 
 Arireguryrff Jvafgba qvq abg fcrnx sbe nabgure zbzrag be gjb. N 
 srryvat bs jrnevarff unq birejuryzrq uvz. Gur snvag, znq tyrnz bs 
 raguhfvnfz unq pbzr onpx vagb B'Oevra'f snpr. Ur xarj va nqinapr jung 
 B'Oevra jbhyq fnl. Gung gur Cnegl qvq abg frrx cbjre sbe vgf bja raqf, ohg 
 bayl sbe gur tbbq bs gur znwbevgl. Gung vg fbhtug cbjre orpnhfr zra va gur 
 znff jrer senvy pbjneqyl perngherf jub pbhyq abg raqher yvoregl be snpr gur 
 gehgu, naq zhfg or ehyrq bire naq flfgrzngvpnyyl qrprvirq ol bguref jub 
 jrer fgebatre guna gurzfryirf. Gung gur pubvpr sbe znaxvaq ynl orgjrra 
 serrqbz naq unccvarff, naq gung, sbe gur terng ohyx bs znaxvaq, unccvarff 
 jnf orggre. Gung gur cnegl jnf gur rgreany thneqvna bs gur jrnx, n 
 qrqvpngrq frpg qbvat rivy gung tbbq zvtug pbzr, fnpevsvpvat vgf bja 
 unccvarff gb gung bs bguref. Gur greevoyr guvat, gubhtug Jvafgba, gur 
 greevoyr guvat jnf gung jura B'Oevra fnvq guvf ur jbhyq oryvrir vg. Lbh 
 pbhyq frr vg va uvf snpr. B'Oevra xarj rirelguvat. N gubhfnaq gvzrf orggre 
 guna Jvafgba ur xarj jung gur jbeyq jnf ernyyl yvxr, va jung qrtenqngvba 
 gur znff bs uhzna orvatf yvirq naq ol jung yvrf naq oneonevgvrf gur Cnegl 
 xrcg gurz gurer. Ur unq haqrefgbbq vg nyy, jrvturq vg nyy, naq vg znqr ab 
 qvssrerapr: nyy jnf whfgvsvrq ol gur hygvzngr checbfr. Jung pna lbh qb, 
 gubhtug Jvafgba, ntnvafg gur yhangvp jub vf zber vagryyvtrag guna lbhefrys, 
 jub tvirf lbhe nethzragf n snve urnevat naq gura fvzcyl crefvfgf va uvf 
 yhanpl? 
 'Lbh ner ehyvat bire hf sbe bhe bja tbbq,' ur fnvq srroyl. 'Lbh 
 oryvrir gung uhzna orvatf ner abg svg gb tbirea gurzfryirf, naq 
 gurersber--' 
 Ur fgnegrq naq nyzbfg pevrq bhg. N cnat bs cnva unq fubg guebhtu uvf 
 obql. B'Oevra unq chfurq gur yrire bs gur qvny hc gb guvegl-svir. 
 'Gung jnf fghcvq, Jvafgba, fghcvq!' ur fnvq. 'Lbh fubhyq xabj orggre 
 guna gb fnl n guvat yvxr gung.' 
 Ur chyyrq gur yrire onpx naq pbagvahrq: 
 'Abj V jvyy gryy lbh gur nafjre gb zl dhrfgvba. Vg vf guvf. Gur Cnegl 
 frrxf cbjre ragveryl sbe vgf bja fnxr. Jr ner abg vagrerfgrq va gur tbbq bs 
 bguref; jr ner vagrerfgrq fbyryl va cbjre. Abg jrnygu be yhkhel be ybat 
 yvsr be unccvarff: bayl cbjre, cher cbjre. Jung cher cbjre zrnaf lbh jvyy 
 haqrefgnaq cerfragyl. Jr ner qvssrerag sebz nyy gur byvtnepuvrf bs gur 
 cnfg, va gung jr xabj jung jr ner qbvat. Nyy gur bguref, rira gubfr jub 
 erfrzoyrq bhefryirf, jrer pbjneqf naq ulcbpevgrf. Gur Trezna Anmvf naq gur 
 Ehffvna Pbzzhavfgf pnzr irel pybfr gb hf va gurve zrgubqf, ohg gurl arire 
 unq gur pbhentr gb erpbtavmr gurve bja zbgvirf. Gurl cergraqrq, creuncf 
 gurl rira oryvrirq, gung gurl unq frvmrq cbjre hajvyyvatyl naq sbe n 
 yvzvgrq gvzr, naq gung whfg ebhaq gur pbeare gurer ynl n cnenqvfr jurer 
 uhzna orvatf jbhyq or serr naq rdhny. Jr ner abg yvxr gung. Jr xabj gung ab 
 bar rire frvmrf cbjre jvgu gur vagragvba bs eryvadhvfuvat vg. Cbjre vf abg 
 n zrnaf, vg vf na raq. Bar qbrf abg rfgnoyvfu n qvpgngbefuvc va beqre gb 
 fnsrthneq n eribyhgvba; bar znxrf gur eribyhgvba va beqre gb rfgnoyvfu gur 
 qvpgngbefuvc. Gur bowrpg bs crefrphgvba vf crefrphgvba. Gur bowrpg bs 
 gbegher vf gbegher. Gur bowrpg bs cbjre vf cbjre. Abj qb lbh ortva gb 
 haqrefgnaq zr?' 
 Jvafgba jnf fgehpx, nf ur unq orra fgehpx orsber, ol gur gverqarff bs 
 B'Oevra'f snpr. Vg jnf fgebat naq syrful naq oehgny, vg jnf shyy bs 
 vagryyvtrapr naq n fbeg bs pbagebyyrq cnffvba orsber juvpu ur sryg uvzfrys 
 urycyrff; ohg vg jnf gverq. Gurer jrer cbhpurf haqre gur rlrf, gur fxva 
 fnttrq sebz gur purrxobarf. B'Oevra yrnarq bire uvz, qryvorengryl oevatvat 
 gur jbea snpr arnere. 
 'Lbh ner guvaxvat,' ur fnvq, 'gung zl snpr vf byq naq gverq. Lbh ner 
 guvaxvat gung V gnyx bs cbjre, naq lrg V nz abg rira noyr gb cerirag gur 
 qrpnl bs zl bja obql. Pna lbh abg haqrefgnaq, Jvafgba, gung gur vaqvivqhny 
 vf bayl n pryy? Gur jrnevarff bs gur pryy vf gur ivtbhe bs gur betnavfz. Qb 
 lbh qvr jura lbh phg lbhe svatreanvyf?' 
 Ur ghearq njnl sebz gur orq naq ortna fgebyyvat hc naq qbja ntnva, bar 
 unaq va uvf cbpxrg. 
 'Jr ner gur cevrfgf bs cbjre,' ur fnvq. 'Tbq vf cbjre. Ohg ng cerfrag 
 cbjre vf bayl n jbeq fb sne nf lbh ner pbaprearq. Vg vf gvzr sbe lbh gb 
 tngure fbzr vqrn bs jung cbjre zrnaf. Gur svefg guvat lbh zhfg ernyvmr vf 
 gung cbjre vf pbyyrpgvir. Gur vaqvivqhny bayl unf cbjre va fb sne nf ur 
 prnfrf gb or na vaqvivqhny. Lbh xabj gur Cnegl fybtna: "Serrqbz vf 
 Fynirel". Unf vg rire bppheerq gb lbh gung vg vf erirefvoyr? Fynirel vf 
 serrqbz. Nybar -- serr -- gur uhzna orvat vf nyjnlf qrsrngrq. Vg zhfg or 
 fb, orpnhfr rirel uhzna orvat vf qbbzrq gb qvr, juvpu vf gur terngrfg bs 
 nyy snvyherf. Ohg vs ur pna znxr pbzcyrgr, hggre fhozvffvba, vs ur pna 
 rfpncr sebz uvf vqragvgl, vs ur pna zretr uvzfrys va gur Cnegl fb gung ur 
 vf gur Cnegl, gura ur vf nyy-cbjreshy naq vzzbegny. Gur frpbaq guvat sbe 
 lbh gb ernyvmr vf gung cbjre vf cbjre bire uhzna orvatf. Bire gur obql ohg, 
 nobir nyy, bire gur zvaq. Cbjre bire znggre -- rkgreany ernyvgl, nf lbh 
 jbhyq pnyy vg -- vf abg vzcbegnag. Nyernql bhe pbageby bire znggre vf 
 nofbyhgr.' 
 Sbe n zbzrag Jvafgba vtaberq gur qvny. Ur znqr n ivbyrag rssbeg gb 
 envfr uvzfrys vagb n fvggvat cbfvgvba, naq zreryl fhpprrqrq va jerapuvat 
 uvf obql cnvashyyl. 
 'Ohg ubj pna lbh pbageby znggre?' ur ohefg bhg. 'Lbh qba'g rira 
 pbageby gur pyvzngr be gur ynj bs tenivgl. Naq gurer ner qvfrnfr, cnva, 
 qrngu--' 
 B'Oevra fvyraprq uvz ol n zbirzrag bs uvf unaq. 'Jr pbageby znggre 
 orpnhfr jr pbageby gur zvaq. Ernyvgl vf vafvqr gur fxhyy. Lbh jvyy yrnea ol 
 qrterrf, Jvafgba. Gurer vf abguvat gung jr pbhyq abg qb. Vaivfvovyvgl, 
 yrivgngvba -- nalguvat. V pbhyq sybng bss guvf sybbe yvxr n fbnc ohooyr vs 
 V jvfu gb. V qb abg jvfu gb, orpnhfr gur Cnegl qbrf abg jvfu vg. Lbh zhfg 
 trg evq bs gubfr avargrragu-praghel vqrnf nobhg gur ynjf bs Angher. Jr znxr 
 gur ynjf bs Angher.' 
 'Ohg lbh qb abg! Lbh ner abg rira znfgref bs guvf cynarg. Jung nobhg 
 Rhenfvn naq Rnfgnfvn? Lbh unir abg pbadhrerq gurz lrg.' 
 'Havzcbegnag. Jr funyy pbadhre gurz jura vg fhvgf hf. Naq vs jr qvq 
 abg, jung qvssrerapr jbhyq vg znxr? Jr pna fuhg gurz bhg bs rkvfgrapr. 
 Bprnavn vf gur jbeyq.' 
 'Ohg gur jbeyq vgfrys vf bayl n fcrpx bs qhfg. Naq zna vf gval 
 urycyrff! Ubj ybat unf ur orra va rkvfgrapr? Sbe zvyyvbaf bs lrnef gur 
 rnegu jnf havaunovgrq.' 
 'Abafrafr. Gur rnegu vf nf byq nf jr ner, ab byqre. Ubj pbhyq vg or 
 byqre? Abguvat rkvfgf rkprcg guebhtu uhzna pbafpvbhfarff.' 
 'Ohg gur ebpxf ner shyy bs gur obarf bs rkgvapg navznyf -- znzzbguf 
 naq znfgbqbaf naq rabezbhf ercgvyrf juvpu yvirq urer ybat orsber zna jnf 
 rire urneq bs.' 
 'Unir lbh rire frra gubfr obarf, Jvafgba? Bs pbhefr abg. Avargrragu- 
 praghel ovbybtvfgf vairagrq gurz. Orsber zna gurer jnf abguvat. Nsgre zna, 
 vs ur pbhyq pbzr gb na raq, gurer jbhyq or abguvat. Bhgfvqr zna gurer vf 
 abguvat.' 
 'Ohg gur jubyr havirefr vf bhgfvqr hf. Ybbx ng gur fgnef! Fbzr bs gurz 
 ner n zvyyvba yvtug-lrnef njnl. Gurl ner bhg bs bhe ernpu sbe rire.' 
 'Jung ner gur fgnef?' fnvq B'Oevra vaqvssreragyl. 'Gurl ner ovgf bs 
 sver n srj xvybzrgerf njnl. Jr pbhyq ernpu gurz vs jr jnagrq gb. Be jr 
 pbhyq oybg gurz bhg. Gur rnegu vf gur prager bs gur havirefr. Gur fha naq 
 gur fgnef tb ebhaq vg.' 
 Jvafgba znqr nabgure pbaihyfvir zbirzrag. Guvf gvzr ur qvq abg fnl 
 nalguvat. B'Oevra pbagvahrq nf gubhtu nafjrevat n fcbxra bowrpgvba: 
 'Sbe pregnva checbfrf, bs pbhefr, gung vf abg gehr. Jura jr anivtngr 
 gur bprna, be jura jr cerqvpg na rpyvcfr, jr bsgra svaq vg pbairavrag gb 
 nffhzr gung gur rnegu tbrf ebhaq gur fha naq gung gur fgnef ner zvyyvbaf 
 hcba zvyyvbaf bs xvybzrgerf njnl. Ohg jung bs vg? Qb lbh fhccbfr vg vf 
 orlbaq hf gb cebqhpr n qhny flfgrz bs nfgebabzl? Gur fgnef pna or arne be 
 qvfgnag, nppbeqvat nf jr arrq gurz. Qb lbh fhccbfr bhe zngurzngvpvnaf ner 
 hardhny gb gung? Unir lbh sbetbggra qbhoyrguvax?' 
 Jvafgba fuenax onpx hcba gur orq. Jungrire ur fnvq, gur fjvsg nafjre 
 pehfurq uvz yvxr n oyhqtrba. Naq lrg ur xarj, ur xarj, gung ur jnf va gur 
 evtug. Gur oryvrs gung abguvat rkvfgf bhgfvqr lbhe bja zvaq -- fheryl gurer 
 zhfg or fbzr jnl bs qrzbafgengvat gung vg jnf snyfr? Unq vg abg orra 
 rkcbfrq ybat ntb nf n snyynpl? Gurer jnf rira n anzr sbe vg, juvpu ur unq 
 sbetbggra. N snvag fzvyr gjvgpurq gur pbearef bs B'Oevra'f zbhgu nf ur 
 ybbxrq qbja ng uvz. 
 'V gbyq lbh, Jvafgba,' ur fnvq, 'gung zrgnculfvpf vf abg lbhe fgebat 
 cbvag. Gur jbeq lbh ner gelvat gb guvax bs vf fbyvcfvfz. Ohg lbh ner 
 zvfgnxra. Guvf vf abg fbyvcfvfz. Pbyyrpgvir fbyvcfvfz, vs lbh yvxr. Ohg 
 gung vf n qvssrerag guvat: va snpg, gur bccbfvgr guvat. Nyy guvf vf n 
 qvterffvba,' ur nqqrq va n qvssrerag gbar. 'Gur erny cbjre, gur cbjre jr 
 unir gb svtug sbe avtug naq qnl, vf abg cbjre bire guvatf, ohg bire zra.' 
 Ur cnhfrq, naq sbe n zbzrag nffhzrq ntnva uvf nve bs n fpubbyznfgre 
 dhrfgvbavat n cebzvfvat chcvy: 'Ubj qbrf bar zna nffreg uvf cbjre bire 
 nabgure, Jvafgba?' 
 Jvafgba gubhtug. 'Ol znxvat uvz fhssre,' ur fnvq. 
 'Rknpgyl. Ol znxvat uvz fhssre. Borqvrapr vf abg rabhtu. Hayrff ur vf 
 fhssrevat, ubj pna lbh or fher gung ur vf borlvat lbhe jvyy naq abg uvf 
 bja? Cbjre vf va vasyvpgvat cnva naq uhzvyvngvba. Cbjre vf va grnevat uhzna 
 zvaqf gb cvrprf naq chggvat gurz gbtrgure ntnva va arj funcrf bs lbhe bja 
 pubbfvat. Qb lbh ortva gb frr, gura, jung xvaq bs jbeyq jr ner perngvat? Vg 
 vf gur rknpg bccbfvgr bs gur fghcvq urqbavfgvp Hgbcvnf gung gur byq 
 ersbezref vzntvarq. N jbeyq bs srne naq gernpurel vf gbezrag, n jbeyq bs 
 genzcyvat naq orvat genzcyrq hcba, n jbeyq juvpu jvyy tebj abg yrff ohg 
 ZBER zrepvyrff nf vg ersvarf vgfrys. Cebterff va bhe jbeyq jvyy or cebterff 
 gbjneqf zber cnva. Gur byq pvivyvmngvbaf pynvzrq gung gurl jrer sbhaqrq ba 
 ybir be whfgvpr. Bhef vf sbhaqrq hcba ungerq. Va bhe jbeyq gurer jvyy or ab 
 rzbgvbaf rkprcg srne, entr, gevhzcu, naq frys-nonfrzrag. Rirelguvat ryfr jr 
 funyy qrfgebl -- rirelguvat. Nyernql jr ner oernxvat qbja gur unovgf bs 
 gubhtug juvpu unir fheivirq sebz orsber gur Eribyhgvba. Jr unir phg gur 
 yvaxf orgjrra puvyq naq cnerag, naq orgjrra zna naq zna, naq orgjrra zna 
 naq jbzna. Ab bar qnerf gehfg n jvsr be n puvyq be n sevraq nal ybatre. Ohg 
 va gur shgher gurer jvyy or ab jvirf naq ab sevraqf. Puvyqera jvyy or gnxra 
 sebz gurve zbguref ng ovegu, nf bar gnxrf rttf sebz n ura. Gur frk vafgvapg 
 jvyy or renqvpngrq. Cebperngvba jvyy or na naahny sbeznyvgl yvxr gur 
 erarjny bs n engvba pneq. Jr funyy nobyvfu gur betnfz. Bhe arhebybtvfgf ner 
 ng jbex hcba vg abj. Gurer jvyy or ab yblnygl, rkprcg yblnygl gbjneqf gur 
 Cnegl. Gurer jvyy or ab ybir, rkprcg gur ybir bs Ovt Oebgure. Gurer jvyy or 
 ab ynhtugre, rkprcg gur ynhtu bs gevhzcu bire n qrsrngrq rarzl. Gurer jvyy 
 or ab neg, ab yvgrengher, ab fpvrapr. Jura jr ner bzavcbgrag jr funyy unir 
 ab zber arrq bs fpvrapr. Gurer jvyy or ab qvfgvapgvba orgjrra ornhgl naq 
 htyvarff. Gurer jvyy or ab phevbfvgl, ab rawblzrag bs gur cebprff bs yvsr. 
 Nyy pbzcrgvat cyrnfherf jvyy or qrfgeblrq. Ohg nyjnlf -- qb abg sbetrg 
 guvf, Jvafgba -- nyjnlf gurer jvyy or gur vagbkvpngvba bs cbjre, pbafgnagyl 
 vapernfvat naq pbafgnagyl tebjvat fhogyre. Nyjnlf, ng rirel zbzrag, gurer 
 jvyy or gur guevyy bs ivpgbel, gur frafngvba bs genzcyvat ba na rarzl jub 
 vf urycyrff. Vs lbh jnag n cvpgher bs gur shgher, vzntvar n obbg fgnzcvat 
 ba n uhzna snpr -- sbe rire.' 
 Ur cnhfrq nf gubhtu ur rkcrpgrq Jvafgba gb fcrnx. Jvafgba unq gevrq gb 
 fuevax onpx vagb gur fhesnpr bs gur orq ntnva. Ur pbhyq abg fnl nalguvat. 
 Uvf urneg frrzrq gb or sebmra. B'Oevra jrag ba: 
 'Naq erzrzore gung vg vf sbe rire. Gur snpr jvyy nyjnlf or gurer gb or 
 fgnzcrq hcba. Gur urergvp, gur rarzl bs fbpvrgl, jvyy nyjnlf or gurer, fb 
 gung ur pna or qrsrngrq naq uhzvyvngrq bire ntnva. Rirelguvat gung lbh unir 
 haqretbar fvapr lbh unir orra va bhe unaqf -- nyy gung jvyy pbagvahr, naq 
 jbefr. Gur rfcvbantr, gur orgenlnyf, gur neerfgf, gur gbegherf, gur 
 rkrphgvbaf, gur qvfnccrnenaprf jvyy arire prnfr. Vg jvyy or n jbeyq bs 
 greebe nf zhpu nf n jbeyq bs gevhzcu. Gur zber gur Cnegl vf cbjreshy, gur 
 yrff vg jvyy or gbyrenag: gur jrnxre gur bccbfvgvba, gur gvtugre gur 
 qrfcbgvfz. Tbyqfgrva naq uvf urerfvrf jvyy yvir sbe rire. Rirel qnl, ng 
 rirel zbzrag, gurl jvyy or qrsrngrq, qvfperqvgrq, evqvphyrq, fcng hcba naq 
 lrg gurl jvyy nyjnlf fheivir. Guvf qenzn gung V unir cynlrq bhg jvgu lbh 
 qhevat frira lrnef jvyy or cynlrq bhg bire naq bire ntnva trarengvba nsgre 
 trarengvba, nyjnlf va fhogyre sbezf. Nyjnlf jr funyy unir gur urergvp urer 
 ng bhe zrepl, fpernzvat jvgu cnva, oebxra hc, pbagrzcgvoyr -- naq va gur 
 raq hggreyl cravgrag, fnirq sebz uvzfrys, penjyvat gb bhe srrg bs uvf bja 
 nppbeq. Gung vf gur jbeyq gung jr ner cercnevat, Jvafgba. N jbeyq bs 
 ivpgbel nsgre ivpgbel, gevhzcu nsgre gevhzcu nsgre gevhzcu: na raqyrff 
 cerffvat, cerffvat, cerffvat hcba gur areir bs cbjre. Lbh ner ortvaavat, V 
 pna frr, gb ernyvmr jung gung jbeyq jvyy or yvxr. Ohg va gur raq lbh jvyy 
 qb zber guna haqrefgnaq vg. Lbh jvyy npprcg vg, jrypbzr vg, orpbzr cneg bs 
 vg.' 
 Jvafgba unq erpbirerq uvzfrys fhssvpvragyl gb fcrnx. 'Lbh pna'g!' ur 
 fnvq jrnxyl. 
 'Jung qb lbh zrna ol gung erznex, Jvafgba?' 
 'Lbh pbhyq abg perngr fhpu n jbeyq nf lbh unir whfg qrfpevorq. Vg vf n 
 qernz. Vg vf vzcbffvoyr.' 
 'Jul?' 
 'Vg vf vzcbffvoyr gb sbhaq n pvivyvmngvba ba srne naq ungerq naq 
 pehrygl. Vg jbhyq arire raqher.' 
 'Jul abg?' 
 'Vg jbhyq unir ab ivgnyvgl. Vg jbhyq qvfvagrtengr. Vg jbhyq pbzzvg 
 fhvpvqr.' 
 'Abafrafr. Lbh ner haqre gur vzcerffvba gung ungerq vf zber rkunhfgvat 
 guna ybir. Jul fubhyq vg or? Naq vs vg jrer, jung qvssrerapr jbhyq gung 
 znxr? Fhccbfr gung jr pubbfr gb jrne bhefryirf bhg snfgre. Fhccbfr gung jr 
 dhvpxra gur grzcb bs uhzna yvsr gvyy zra ner fravyr ng guvegl. Fgvyy jung 
 qvssrerapr jbhyq vg znxr? Pna lbh abg haqrefgnaq gung gur qrngu bs gur 
 vaqvivqhny vf abg qrngu? Gur cnegl vf vzzbegny.' 
 Nf hfhny, gur ibvpr unq onggrerq Jvafgba vagb urycyrffarff. Zberbire 
 ur jnf va qernq gung vs ur crefvfgrq va uvf qvfnterrzrag B'Oevra jbhyq 
 gjvfg gur qvny ntnva. Naq lrg ur pbhyq abg xrrc fvyrag. Srroyl, jvgubhg 
 nethzragf, jvgu abguvat gb fhccbeg uvz rkprcg uvf vanegvphyngr ubeebe bs 
 jung B'Oevra unq fnvq, ur erghearq gb gur nggnpx. 
 'V qba'g xabj -- V qba'g pner. Fbzrubj lbh jvyy snvy. Fbzrguvat jvyy 
 qrsrng lbh. Yvsr jvyy qrsrng lbh.' 
 'Jr pbageby yvsr, Jvafgba, ng nyy vgf yriryf. Lbh ner vzntvavat gung 
 gurer vf fbzrguvat pnyyrq uhzna angher juvpu jvyy or bhgentrq ol jung jr qb 
 naq jvyy ghea ntnvafg hf. Ohg jr perngr uhzna angher. Zra ner vasvavgryl 
 znyyrnoyr. Be creuncf lbh unir erghearq gb lbhe byq vqrn gung gur 
 cebyrgnevnaf be gur fynirf jvyy nevfr naq bireguebj hf. Chg vg bhg bs lbhe 
 zvaq. Gurl ner urycyrff, yvxr gur navznyf. Uhznavgl vf gur Cnegl. Gur 
 bguref ner bhgfvqr -- veeryrinag.' 
 'V qba'g pner. Va gur raq gurl jvyy orng lbh. Fbbare be yngre gurl 
 jvyy frr lbh sbe jung lbh ner, naq gura gurl jvyy grne lbh gb cvrprf.' 
 'Qb lbh frr nal rivqrapr gung gung vf unccravat? Be nal ernfba jul vg 
 fubhyq?' 
 'Ab. V oryvrir vg. V xabj gung lbh jvyy snvy. Gurer vf fbzrguvat va 
 gur havirefr -- V qba'g xabj, fbzr fcvevg, fbzr cevapvcyr -- gung lbh jvyy 
 arire birepbzr.' 
 'Qb lbh oryvrir va Tbq, Jvafgba?' 
 'Ab.' 
 'Gura jung vf vg, guvf cevapvcyr gung jvyy qrsrng hf?' 
 'V qba'g xabj. Gur fcvevg bs Zna.' 
 'Naq qb lbh pbafvqre lbhefrys n zna?.' 
 'Lrf.' 
 'Vs lbh ner n zna, Jvafgba, lbh ner gur ynfg zna. Lbhe xvaq vf 
 rkgvapg; jr ner gur vaurevgbef. Qb lbh haqrefgnaq gung lbh ner nybar? Lbh 
 ner bhgfvqr uvfgbel, lbh ner aba-rkvfgrag.' Uvf znaare punatrq naq ur fnvq 
 zber unefuyl: 'Naq lbh pbafvqre lbhefrys zbenyyl fhcrevbe gb hf, jvgu bhe 
 yvrf naq bhe pehrygl?' 
 'Lrf, V pbafvqre zlfrys fhcrevbe.' 
 B'Oevra qvq abg fcrnx. Gjb bgure ibvprf jrer fcrnxvat. Nsgre n zbzrag 
 Jvafgba erpbtavmrq bar bs gurz nf uvf bja. Vg jnf n fbhaq-genpx bs gur 
 pbairefngvba ur unq unq jvgu B'Oevra, ba gur avtug jura ur unq raebyyrq 
 uvzfrys va gur Oebgureubbq. Ur urneq uvzfrys cebzvfvat gb yvr, gb fgrny, gb 
 sbetr, gb zheqre, gb rapbhentr qeht-gnxvat naq cebfgvghgvba, gb qvffrzvangr 
 irarerny qvfrnfrf, gb guebj ivgevby va n puvyq'f snpr. B'Oevra znqr n fznyy 
 vzcngvrag trfgher, nf gubhtu gb fnl gung gur qrzbafgengvba jnf uneqyl jbegu 
 znxvat. Gura ur ghearq n fjvgpu naq gur ibvprf fgbccrq. 
 'Trg hc sebz gung orq,' ur fnvq. 
 Gur obaqf unq ybbfrarq gurzfryirf. Jvafgba ybjrerq uvzfrys gb gur 
 sybbe naq fgbbq hc hafgrnqvyl. 
 'Lbh ner gur ynfg zna,' fnvq B'Oevra. 'Lbh ner gur thneqvna bs gur 
 uhzna fcvevg. Lbh funyy frr lbhefrys nf lbh ner. Gnxr bss lbhe pybgurf.' 
 Jvafgba haqvq gur ovg bs fgevat gung uryq uvf birenyyf gbtrgure. Gur 
 mvc snfgrare unq ybat fvapr orra jerapurq bhg bs gurz. Ur pbhyq abg 
 erzrzore jurgure ng nal gvzr fvapr uvf neerfg ur unq gnxra bss nyy uvf 
 pybgurf ng bar gvzr. Orarngu gur birenyyf uvf obql jnf ybbcrq jvgu svygul 
 lryybjvfu entf, whfg erpbtavmnoyr nf gur erzanagf bs haqrepybgurf. Nf ur 
 fyvq gurz gb gur tebhaq ur fnj gung gurer jnf n guerr-fvqrq zveebe ng gur 
 sne raq bs gur ebbz. Ur nccebnpurq vg, gura fgbccrq fubeg. Na vaibyhagnel 
 pel unq oebxra bhg bs uvz. 
 'Tb ba,' fnvq B'Oevra. 'Fgnaq orgjrra gur jvatf bs gur zveebe. Lbh 
 funyy frr gur fvqr ivrj nf jryy.' 
 Ur unq fgbccrq orpnhfr ur jnf sevtugrarq. N objrq, terl-pbybherq, 
 fxryrgba-yvxr guvat jnf pbzvat gbjneqf uvz. Vgf npghny nccrnenapr jnf 
 sevtugravat, naq abg zreryl gur snpg gung ur xarj vg gb or uvzfrys. Ur 
 zbirq pybfre gb gur tynff. Gur perngher'f snpr frrzrq gb or cebgehqrq, 
 orpnhfr bs vgf orag pneevntr. N sbeybea, wnvyoveq'f snpr jvgu n abool 
 sberurnq ehaavat onpx vagb n onyq fpnyc, n pebbxrq abfr, naq onggrerq- 
 ybbxvat purrxobarf nobir juvpu uvf rlrf jrer svrepr naq jngpushy. Gur 
 purrxf jrer frnzrq, gur zbhgu unq n qenja-va ybbx. Pregnvayl vg jnf uvf bja 
 snpr, ohg vg frrzrq gb uvz gung vg unq punatrq zber guna ur unq punatrq 
 vafvqr. Gur rzbgvbaf vg ertvfgrerq jbhyq or qvssrerag sebz gur barf ur 
 sryg. Ur unq tbar cnegvnyyl onyq. Sbe gur svefg zbzrag ur unq gubhtug gung 
 ur unq tbar terl nf jryy, ohg vg jnf bayl gur fpnyc gung jnf terl. Rkprcg 
 sbe uvf unaqf naq n pvepyr bs uvf snpr, uvf obql jnf terl nyy bire jvgu 
 napvrag, vatenvarq qveg. Urer naq gurer haqre gur qveg gurer jrer gur erq 
 fpnef bs jbhaqf, naq arne gur naxyr gur inevpbfr hypre jnf na vasynzrq znff 
 jvgu synxrf bs fxva crryvat bss vg. Ohg gur gehyl sevtugravat guvat jnf gur 
 rznpvngvba bs uvf obql. Gur oneery bs gur evof jnf nf aneebj nf gung bs n 
 fxryrgba: gur yrtf unq fuehax fb gung gur xarrf jrer guvpxre guna gur 
 guvtuf. Ur fnj abj jung B'Oevra unq zrnag nobhg frrvat gur fvqr ivrj. Gur 
 pheingher bs gur fcvar jnf nfgbavfuvat. Gur guva fubhyqref jrer uhapurq 
 sbejneq fb nf gb znxr n pnivgl bs gur purfg, gur fpenttl arpx frrzrq gb or 
 oraqvat qbhoyr haqre gur jrvtug bs gur fxhyy. Ng n thrff ur jbhyq unir fnvq 
 gung vg jnf gur obql bs n zna bs fvkgl, fhssrevat sebz fbzr znyvtanag 
 qvfrnfr. 
 'Lbh unir gubhtug fbzrgvzrf,' fnvq B'Oevra, 'gung zl snpr -- gur snpr 
 bs n zrzore bs gur Vaare Cnegl -- ybbxf byq naq jbea. Jung qb lbh guvax bs 
 lbhe bja snpr?' 
 Ur frvmrq Jvafgba'f fubhyqre naq fcha uvz ebhaq fb gung ur jnf snpvat 
 uvz. 
 'Ybbx ng gur pbaqvgvba lbh ner va!' ur fnvq. 'Ybbx ng guvf svygul 
 tevzr nyy bire lbhe obql. Ybbx ng gur qveg orgjrra lbhe gbrf. Ybbx ng gung 
 qvfthfgvat ehaavat fber ba lbhe yrt. Qb lbh xabj gung lbh fgvax yvxr n 
 tbng? Cebonoyl lbh unir prnfrq gb abgvpr vg. Ybbx ng lbhe rznpvngvba. Qb 
 lbh frr? V pna znxr zl guhzo naq sbersvatre zrrg ebhaq lbhe ovprc. V pbhyq 
 fanc lbhe arpx yvxr n pneebg. Qb lbh xabj gung lbh unir ybfg gjragl-svir 
 xvybtenzf fvapr lbh unir orra va bhe unaqf? Rira lbhe unve vf pbzvat bhg va 
 unaqshyf. Ybbx!' Ur cyhpxrq ng Jvafgba'f urnq naq oebhtug njnl n ghsg bs 
 unve. 'Bcra lbhe zbhgu. Avar, gra, ryrira grrgu yrsg. Ubj znal unq lbh jura 
 lbh pnzr gb hf? Naq gur srj lbh unir yrsg ner qebccvat bhg bs lbhe urnq. 
 Ybbx urer!' 
 Ur frvmrq bar bs Jvafgba'f erznvavat sebag grrgu orgjrra uvf cbjreshy 
 guhzo naq sbersvatre. N gjvatr bs cnva fubg guebhtu Jvafgba'f wnj. B'Oevra 
 unq jerapurq gur ybbfr gbbgu bhg ol gur ebbgf. Ur gbffrq vg npebff gur 
 pryy. 
 'Lbh ner ebggvat njnl,' ur fnvq; 'lbh ner snyyvat gb cvrprf. Jung ner 
 lbh? N ont bs svygu. Abj ghea nebhaq naq ybbx vagb gung zveebe ntnva. Qb 
 lbh frr gung guvat snpvat lbh? Gung vf gur ynfg zna. Vs lbh ner uhzna, gung 
 vf uhznavgl. Abj chg lbhe pybgurf ba ntnva.' 
 Jvafgba ortna gb qerff uvzfrys jvgu fybj fgvss zbirzragf. Hagvy abj ur 
 unq abg frrzrq gb abgvpr ubj guva naq jrnx ur jnf. Bayl bar gubhtug fgveerq 
 va uvf zvaq: gung ur zhfg unir orra va guvf cynpr ybatre guna ur unq 
 vzntvarq. Gura fhqqrayl nf ur svkrq gur zvfrenoyr entf ebhaq uvzfrys n 
 srryvat bs cvgl sbe uvf ehvarq obql birepnzr uvz. Orsber ur xarj jung ur 
 jnf qbvat ur unq pbyyncfrq ba gb n fznyy fgbby gung fgbbq orfvqr gur orq 
 naq ohefg vagb grnef. Ur jnf njner bs uvf htyvarff, uvf tenpryrffarff, n 
 ohaqyr bs obarf va svygul haqrepybgurf fvggvat jrrcvat va gur unefu juvgr 
 yvtug: ohg ur pbhyq abg fgbc uvzfrys. B'Oevra ynvq n unaq ba uvf fubhyqre, 
 nyzbfg xvaqyl. 
 'Vg jvyy abg ynfg sbe rire,' ur fnvq. 'Lbh pna rfpncr sebz vg jurarire 
 lbh pubbfr. Rirelguvat qrcraqf ba lbhefrys.' 
 'Lbh qvq vg!' fboorq Jvafgba. 'Lbh erqhprq zr gb guvf fgngr.' 
 'Ab, Jvafgba, lbh erqhprq lbhefrys gb vg. Guvf vf jung lbh npprcgrq 
 jura lbh frg lbhefrys hc ntnvafg gur Cnegl. Vg jnf nyy pbagnvarq va gung 
 svefg npg. Abguvat unf unccrarq gung lbh qvq abg sberfrr.' 
 Ur cnhfrq, naq gura jrag ba: 
 'Jr unir orngra lbh, Jvafgba. Jr unir oebxra lbh hc. Lbh unir frra 
 jung lbhe obql vf yvxr. Lbhe zvaq vf va gur fnzr fgngr. V qb abg guvax 
 gurer pna or zhpu cevqr yrsg va lbh. Lbh unir orra xvpxrq naq sybttrq naq 
 vafhygrq, lbh unir fpernzrq jvgu cnva, lbh unir ebyyrq ba gur sybbe va lbhe 
 bja oybbq naq ibzvg. Lbh unir juvzcrerq sbe zrepl, lbh unir orgenlrq 
 rirelobql naq rirelguvat. Pna lbh guvax bs n fvatyr qrtenqngvba gung unf 
 abg unccrarq gb lbh?' 
 Jvafgba unq fgbccrq jrrcvat, gubhtu gur grnef jrer fgvyy bbmvat bhg bs 
 uvf rlrf. Ur ybbxrq hc ng B'Oevra. 
 'V unir abg orgenlrq Whyvn,' ur fnvq. 
 B'Oevra ybbxrq qbja ng uvz gubhtugshyyl. 'Ab,' ur fnvq; 'ab; gung vf 
 cresrpgyl gehr. Lbh unir abg orgenlrq Whyvn.' 
 Gur crphyvne erirerapr sbe B'Oevra, juvpu abguvat frrzrq noyr gb 
 qrfgebl, sybbqrq Jvafgba'f urneg ntnva. Ubj vagryyvtrag, ur gubhtug, ubj 
 vagryyvtrag! Arire qvq B'Oevra snvy gb haqrefgnaq jung jnf fnvq gb uvz. 
 Nalbar ryfr ba rnegu jbhyq unir nafjrerq cebzcgyl gung ur unq orgenlrq 
 Whyvn. Sbe jung jnf gurer gung gurl unq abg fperjrq bhg bs uvz haqre gur 
 gbegher? Ur unq gbyq gurz rirelguvat ur xarj nobhg ure, ure unovgf, ure 
 punenpgre, ure cnfg yvsr; ur unq pbasrffrq va gur zbfg gevivny qrgnvy 
 rirelguvat gung unq unccrarq ng gurve zrrgvatf, nyy gung ur unq fnvq gb ure 
 naq fur gb uvz, gurve oynpx-znexrg zrnyf, gurve nqhygrevrf, gurve inthr 
 cybggvatf ntnvafg gur Cnegl -- rirelguvat. Naq lrg, va gur frafr va juvpu 
 ur vagraqrq gur jbeq, ur unq abg orgenlrq ure. Ur unq abg fgbccrq ybivat 
 ure; uvf srryvatf gbjneqf ure unq erznvarq gur fnzr. B'Oevra unq frra jung 
 ur zrnag jvgubhg gur arrq sbe rkcynangvba. 
 'Gryy zr,' ur fnvq, 'ubj fbba jvyy gurl fubbg zr?' 
 'Vg zvtug or n ybat gvzr,' fnvq B'Oevra. 'Lbh ner n qvssvphyg pnfr. 
 Ohg qba'g tvir hc ubcr. Rirelbar vf pherq fbbare be yngre. Va gur raq jr 
 funyy fubbg lbh.' 
 
 VI 
 
 Ur jnf zhpu orggre. Ur jnf tebjvat snggre naq fgebatre rirel qnl, vs 
 vg jnf cebcre gb fcrnx bs qnlf. 
 Gur juvgr yvtug naq gur uhzzvat fbhaq jrer gur fnzr nf rire, ohg gur 
 pryy jnf n yvggyr zber pbzsbegnoyr guna gur bguref ur unq orra va. Gurer 
 jnf n cvyybj naq n znggerff ba gur cynax orq, naq n fgbby gb fvg ba. Gurl 
 unq tvira uvz n ongu, naq gurl nyybjrq uvz gb jnfu uvzfrys snveyl 
 serdhragyl va n gva onfva. Gurl rira tnir uvz jnez jngre gb jnfu jvgu. Gurl 
 unq tvira uvz arj haqrepybgurf naq n pyrna fhvg bs birenyyf. Gurl unq 
 qerffrq uvf inevpbfr hypre jvgu fbbguvat bvagzrag. Gurl unq chyyrq bhg gur 
 erzanagf bs uvf grrgu naq tvira uvz n arj frg bs qragherf. 
 Jrrxf be zbaguf zhfg unir cnffrq. Vg jbhyq unir orra cbffvoyr abj gb 
 xrrc pbhag bs gur cnffntr bs gvzr, vs ur unq sryg nal vagrerfg va qbvat fb, 
 fvapr ur jnf orvat srq ng jung nccrnerq gb or erthyne vagreinyf. Ur jnf 
 trggvat, ur whqtrq, guerr zrnyf va gur gjragl-sbhe ubhef; fbzrgvzrf ur 
 jbaqrerq qvzyl jurgure ur jnf trggvat gurz ol avtug be ol qnl. Gur sbbq jnf 
 fhecevfvatyl tbbq, jvgu zrng ng rirel guveq zrny. Bapr gurer jnf rira n 
 cnpxrg bs pvtnerggrf. Ur unq ab zngpurf, ohg gur arire-fcrnxvat thneq jub 
 oebhtug uvf sbbq jbhyq tvir uvz n yvtug. Gur svefg gvzr ur gevrq gb fzbxr 
 vg znqr uvz fvpx, ohg ur crefrirerq, naq fcha gur cnpxrg bhg sbe n ybat 
 gvzr, fzbxvat unys n pvtnerggr nsgre rnpu zrny. 
 Gurl unq tvira uvz n juvgr fyngr jvgu n fghzc bs crapvy gvrq gb gur 
 pbeare. Ng svefg ur znqr ab hfr bs vg. Rira jura ur jnf njnxr ur jnf 
 pbzcyrgryl gbecvq. Bsgra ur jbhyq yvr sebz bar zrny gb gur arkg nyzbfg 
 jvgubhg fgveevat, fbzrgvzrf nfyrrc, fbzrgvzrf jnxvat vagb inthr erirevrf va 
 juvpu vg jnf gbb zhpu gebhoyr gb bcra uvf rlrf. Ur unq ybat tebja hfrq gb 
 fyrrcvat jvgu n fgebat yvtug ba uvf snpr. Vg frrzrq gb znxr ab qvssrerapr, 
 rkprcg gung bar'f qernzf jrer zber pburerag. Ur qernzrq n terng qrny nyy 
 guebhtu guvf gvzr, naq gurl jrer nyjnlf unccl qernzf. Ur jnf va gur Tbyqra 
 Pbhagel, be ur jnf fvggvat nzbat rabezbhf tybevbhf, fhayvg ehvaf, jvgu uvf 
 zbgure, jvgu Whyvn, jvgu B'Oevra -- abg qbvat nalguvat, zreryl fvggvat va 
 gur fha, gnyxvat bs crnprshy guvatf. Fhpu gubhtugf nf ur unq jura ur jnf 
 njnxr jrer zbfgyl nobhg uvf qernzf. Ur frrzrq gb unir ybfg gur cbjre bs 
 vagryyrpghny rssbeg, abj gung gur fgvzhyhf bs cnva unq orra erzbirq. Ur jnf 
 abg oberq, ur unq ab qrfver sbe pbairefngvba be qvfgenpgvba. Zreryl gb or 
 nybar, abg gb or orngra be dhrfgvbarq, gb unir rabhtu gb rng, naq gb or 
 pyrna nyy bire, jnf pbzcyrgryl fngvfslvat. 
 Ol qrterrf ur pnzr gb fcraq yrff gvzr va fyrrc, ohg ur fgvyy sryg ab 
 vzchyfr gb trg bss gur orq. Nyy ur pnerq sbe jnf gb yvr dhvrg naq srry gur 
 fgeratgu tngurevat va uvf obql. Ur jbhyq svatre uvzfrys urer naq gurer, 
 gelvat gb znxr fher gung vg jnf abg na vyyhfvba gung uvf zhfpyrf jrer 
 tebjvat ebhaqre naq uvf fxva gnhgre. Svanyyl vg jnf rfgnoyvfurq orlbaq n 
 qbhog gung ur jnf tebjvat snggre; uvf guvtuf jrer abj qrsvavgryl guvpxre 
 guna uvf xarrf. Nsgre gung, eryhpgnagyl ng svefg, ur ortna rkrepvfvat 
 uvzfrys erthyneyl. Va n yvggyr juvyr ur pbhyq jnyx guerr xvybzrgerf, 
 zrnfherq ol cnpvat gur pryy, naq uvf objrq fubhyqref jrer tebjvat 
 fgenvtugre. Ur nggrzcgrq zber rynobengr rkrepvfrf, naq jnf nfgbavfurq naq 
 uhzvyvngrq gb svaq jung guvatf ur pbhyq abg qb. Ur pbhyq abg zbir bhg bs n 
 jnyx, ur pbhyq abg ubyq uvf fgbby bhg ng nez'f yratgu, ur pbhyq abg fgnaq 
 ba bar yrt jvgubhg snyyvat bire. Ur fdhnggrq qbja ba uvf urryf, naq sbhaq 
 gung jvgu ntbavmvat cnvaf va guvtu naq pnys ur pbhyq whfg yvsg uvzfrys gb n 
 fgnaqvat cbfvgvba. Ur ynl syng ba uvf oryyl naq gevrq gb yvsg uvf jrvtug ol 
 uvf unaqf. Vg jnf ubcryrff, ur pbhyq abg envfr uvzfrys n pragvzrger. Ohg 
 nsgre n srj zber qnlf -- n srj zber zrnygvzrf -- rira gung srng jnf 
 nppbzcyvfurq. N gvzr pnzr jura ur pbhyq qb vg fvk gvzrf ehaavat. Ur ortna 
 gb tebj npghnyyl cebhq bs uvf obql, naq gb purevfu na vagrezvggrag oryvrs 
 gung uvf snpr nyfb jnf tebjvat onpx gb abezny. Bayl jura ur punaprq gb chg 
 uvf unaq ba uvf onyq fpnyc qvq ur erzrzore gur frnzrq, ehvarq snpr gung unq 
 ybbxrq onpx ng uvz bhg bs gur zveebe. 
 Uvf zvaq terj zber npgvir. Ur fng qbja ba gur cynax orq, uvf onpx 
 ntnvafg gur jnyy naq gur fyngr ba uvf xarrf, naq frg gb jbex qryvorengryl 
 ng gur gnfx bs er-rqhpngvat uvzfrys. 
 Ur unq pncvghyngrq, gung jnf nterrq. Va ernyvgl, nf ur fnj abj, ur unq 
 orra ernql gb pncvghyngr ybat orsber ur unq gnxra gur qrpvfvba. Sebz gur 
 zbzrag jura ur jnf vafvqr gur Zvavfgel bs Ybir -- naq lrf, rira qhevat 
 gubfr zvahgrf jura ur naq Whyvn unq fgbbq urycyrff juvyr gur veba ibvpr 
 sebz gur gryrfperra gbyq gurz jung gb qb -- ur unq tenfcrq gur sevibyvgl, 
 gur funyybjarff bs uvf nggrzcg gb frg uvzfrys hc ntnvafg gur cbjre bs gur 
 Cnegl. Ur xarj abj gung sbe frira lrnef gur Gubhtug cbyvpr unq jngpurq uvz 
 yvxr n orrgyr haqre n zntavslvat tynff. Gurer jnf ab culfvpny npg, ab jbeq 
 fcbxra nybhq, gung gurl unq abg abgvprq, ab genva bs gubhtug gung gurl unq 
 abg orra noyr gb vasre. Rira gur fcrpx bs juvgvfu qhfg ba gur pbire bs uvf 
 qvnel gurl unq pnershyyl ercynprq. Gurl unq cynlrq fbhaq-genpxf gb uvz, 
 fubja uvz cubgbtencuf. Fbzr bs gurz jrer cubgbtencuf bs Whyvn naq uvzfrys. 
 Lrf, rira... Ur pbhyq abg svtug ntnvafg gur Cnegl nal ybatre. Orfvqrf, gur 
 Cnegl jnf va gur evtug. Vg zhfg or fb; ubj pbhyq gur vzzbegny, pbyyrpgvir 
 oenva or zvfgnxra? Ol jung rkgreany fgnaqneq pbhyq lbh purpx vgf 
 whqtrzragf? Fnavgl jnf fgngvfgvpny. Vg jnf zreryl n dhrfgvba bs yrneavat gb 
 guvax nf gurl gubhtug. Bayl--! 
 Gur crapvy sryg guvpx naq njxjneq va uvf svatref. Ur ortna gb jevgr 
 qbja gur gubhtugf gung pnzr vagb uvf urnq. Ur jebgr svefg va ynetr pyhzfl 
 pncvgnyf: 
 
 SERRQBZ VF FYNIREL 
 
 Gura nyzbfg jvgubhg n cnhfr ur jebgr orarngu vg: 
 
 GJB NAQ GJB ZNXR SVIR 
 
 Ohg gura gurer pnzr n fbeg bs purpx. Uvf zvaq, nf gubhtu fulvat njnl 
 sebz fbzrguvat, frrzrq hanoyr gb pbapragengr. Ur xarj gung ur xarj jung 
 pnzr arkg, ohg sbe gur zbzrag ur pbhyq abg erpnyy vg. Jura ur qvq erpnyy 
 vg, vg jnf bayl ol pbafpvbhfyl ernfbavat bhg jung vg zhfg or: vg qvq abg 
 pbzr bs vgf bja nppbeq. Ur jebgr: 
 
 TBQ VF CBJRE 
 
 Ur npprcgrq rirelguvat. Gur cnfg jnf nygrenoyr. Gur cnfg arire unq 
 orra nygrerq. Bprnavn jnf ng jne jvgu Rnfgnfvn. Bprnavn unq nyjnlf orra ng 
 jne jvgu Rnfgnfvn. Wbarf, Nnebafba, naq Ehguresbeq jrer thvygl bs gur 
 pevzrf gurl jrer punetrq jvgu. Ur unq arire frra gur cubgbtencu gung 
 qvfcebirq gurve thvyg. Vg unq arire rkvfgrq, ur unq vairagrq vg. Ur 
 erzrzorerq erzrzorevat pbagenel guvatf, ohg gubfr jrer snyfr zrzbevrf, 
 cebqhpgf bs frys-qrprcgvba. Ubj rnfl vg nyy jnf! Bayl fheeraqre, naq 
 rirelguvat ryfr sbyybjrq. Vg jnf yvxr fjvzzvat ntnvafg n pheerag gung fjrcg 
 lbh onpxjneqf ubjrire uneq lbh fgehttyrq, naq gura fhqqrayl qrpvqvat gb 
 ghea ebhaq naq tb jvgu gur pheerag vafgrnq bs bccbfvat vg. Abguvat unq 
 punatrq rkprcg lbhe bja nggvghqr: gur cerqrfgvarq guvat unccrarq va nal 
 pnfr. Ur uneqyl xarj jul ur unq rire eroryyrq. Rirelguvat jnf rnfl, 
 rkprcg--! 
 Nalguvat pbhyq or gehr. Gur fb-pnyyrq ynjf bs Angher jrer abafrafr. 
 Gur ynj bs tenivgl jnf abafrafr. 'Vs V jvfurq,' B'Oevra unq fnvq, 'V pbhyq 
 sybng bss guvf sybbe yvxr n fbnc ohooyr.' Jvafgba jbexrq vg bhg. 'Vs ur 
 guvaxf ur sybngf bss gur sybbe, naq vs V fvzhygnarbhfyl guvax V frr uvz qb 
 vg, gura gur guvat unccraf.' Fhqqrayl, yvxr n yhzc bs fhozretrq jerpxntr 
 oernxvat gur fhesnpr bs jngre, gur gubhtug ohefg vagb uvf zvaq: 'Vg qbrfa'g 
 ernyyl unccra. Jr vzntvar vg. Vg vf unyyhpvangvba.' Ur chfurq gur gubhtug 
 haqre vafgnagyl. Gur snyynpl jnf boivbhf. Vg cerfhccbfrq gung fbzrjurer be 
 bgure, bhgfvqr barfrys, gurer jnf n 'erny' jbeyq jurer 'erny' guvatf 
 unccrarq. Ohg ubj pbhyq gurer or fhpu n jbeyq? Jung xabjyrqtr unir jr bs 
 nalguvat, fnir guebhtu bhe bja zvaqf? Nyy unccravatf ner va gur zvaq. 
 Jungrire unccraf va nyy zvaqf, gehyl unccraf. 
 Ur unq ab qvssvphygl va qvfcbfvat bs gur snyynpl, naq ur jnf va ab 
 qnatre bs fhpphzovat gb vg. Ur ernyvmrq, arireguryrff, gung vg bhtug arire 
 gb unir bppheerq gb uvz. Gur zvaq fubhyq qrirybc n oyvaq fcbg jurarire n 
 qnatrebhf gubhtug cerfragrq vgfrys. Gur cebprff fubhyq or nhgbzngvp, 
 vafgvapgvir. Pevzrfgbc, gurl pnyyrq vg va Arjfcrnx. 
 Ur frg gb jbex gb rkrepvfr uvzfrys va pevzrfgbc. Ur cerfragrq uvzfrys 
 jvgu cebcbfvgvbaf -- 'gur Cnegl fnlf gur rnegu vf syng', 'gur cnegl fnlf 
 gung vpr vf urnivre guna jngre' -- naq genvarq uvzfrys va abg frrvat be abg 
 haqrefgnaqvat gur nethzragf gung pbagenqvpgrq gurz. Vg jnf abg rnfl. Vg 
 arrqrq terng cbjref bs ernfbavat naq vzcebivfngvba. Gur nevguzrgvpny 
 ceboyrzf envfrq, sbe vafgnapr, ol fhpu n fgngrzrag nf 'gjb naq gjb znxr 
 svir' jrer orlbaq uvf vagryyrpghny tenfc. Vg arrqrq nyfb n fbeg bs 
 nguyrgvpvfz bs zvaq, na novyvgl ng bar zbzrag gb znxr gur zbfg qryvpngr hfr 
 bs ybtvp naq ng gur arkg gb or hapbafpvbhf bs gur pehqrfg ybtvpny reebef. 
 Fghcvqvgl jnf nf arprffnel nf vagryyvtrapr, naq nf qvssvphyg gb nggnva. 
 Nyy gur juvyr, jvgu bar cneg bs uvf zvaq, ur jbaqrerq ubj fbba gurl 
 jbhyq fubbg uvz. 'Rirelguvat qrcraqf ba lbhefrys,' B'Oevra unq fnvq; ohg ur 
 xarj gung gurer jnf ab pbafpvbhf npg ol juvpu ur pbhyq oevat vg arnere. Vg 
 zvtug or gra zvahgrf urapr, be gra lrnef. Gurl zvtug xrrc uvz sbe lrnef va 
 fbyvgnel pbasvarzrag, gurl zvtug fraq uvz gb n ynobhe-pnzc, gurl zvtug 
 eryrnfr uvz sbe n juvyr, nf gurl fbzrgvzrf qvq. Vg jnf cresrpgyl cbffvoyr 
 gung orsber ur jnf fubg gur jubyr qenzn bs uvf neerfg naq vagreebtngvba 
 jbhyq or ranpgrq nyy bire ntnva. Gur bar pregnva guvat jnf gung qrngu arire 
 pnzr ng na rkcrpgrq zbzrag. Gur genqvgvba -- gur hafcbxra genqvgvba: 
 fbzrubj lbh xarj vg, gubhtu lbh arire urneq vg fnvq -- jnf gung gurl fubg 
 lbh sebz oruvaq; nyjnlf va gur onpx bs gur urnq, jvgubhg jneavat, nf lbh 
 jnyxrq qbja n pbeevqbe sebz pryy gb pryy. 
 Bar qnl -- ohg 'bar qnl' jnf abg gur evtug rkcerffvba; whfg nf 
 cebonoyl vg jnf va gur zvqqyr bs gur avtug: bapr -- ur sryy vagb n fgenatr, 
 oyvffshy erirevr. Ur jnf jnyxvat qbja gur pbeevqbe, jnvgvat sbe gur ohyyrg. 
 Ur xarj gung vg jnf pbzvat va nabgure zbzrag. Rirelguvat jnf frggyrq, 
 fzbbgurq bhg, erpbapvyrq. Gurer jrer ab zber qbhogf, ab zber nethzragf, ab 
 zber cnva, ab zber srne. Uvf obql jnf urnygul naq fgebat. Ur jnyxrq rnfvyl, 
 jvgu n wbl bs zbirzrag naq jvgu n srryvat bs jnyxvat va fhayvtug. Ur jnf 
 abg nal ybatre va gur aneebj juvgr pbeevqbef va gur Zvavfgel bs Ybir, ur 
 jnf va gur rabezbhf fhayvg cnffntr, n xvybzrger jvqr, qbja juvpu ur unq 
 frrzrq gb jnyx va gur qryvevhz vaqhprq ol qehtf. Ur jnf va gur Tbyqra 
 Pbhagel, sbyybjvat gur sbbg-genpx npebff gur byq enoovg-pebccrq cnfgher. Ur 
 pbhyq srry gur fubeg fcevatl ghes haqre uvf srrg naq gur tragyr fhafuvar ba 
 uvf snpr. Ng gur rqtr bs gur svryq jrer gur ryz gerrf, snvagyl fgveevat, 
 naq fbzrjurer orlbaq gung jnf gur fgernz jurer gur qnpr ynl va gur terra 
 cbbyf haqre gur jvyybjf. 
 Fhqqrayl ur fgnegrq hc jvgu n fubpx bs ubeebe. Gur fjrng oebxr bhg ba 
 uvf onpxobar. Ur unq urneq uvzfrys pel nybhq: 
 'Whyvn! Whyvn! Whyvn, zl ybir! Whyvn!' 
 Sbe n zbzrag ur unq unq na birejuryzvat unyyhpvangvba bs ure cerfrapr. 
 Fur unq frrzrq gb or abg zreryl jvgu uvz, ohg vafvqr uvz. Vg jnf nf gubhtu 
 fur unq tbg vagb gur grkgher bs uvf fxva. Va gung zbzrag ur unq ybirq ure 
 sne zber guna ur unq rire qbar jura gurl jrer gbtrgure naq serr. Nyfb ur 
 xarj gung fbzrjurer be bgure fur jnf fgvyy nyvir naq arrqrq uvf uryc. 
 Ur ynl onpx ba gur orq naq gevrq gb pbzcbfr uvzfrys. Jung unq ur qbar? 
 Ubj znal lrnef unq ur nqqrq gb uvf freivghqr ol gung zbzrag bs jrnxarff? 
 Va nabgure zbzrag ur jbhyq urne gur genzc bs obbgf bhgfvqr. Gurl pbhyq 
 abg yrg fhpu na bhgohefg tb hachavfurq. Gurl jbhyq xabj abj, vs gurl unq 
 abg xabja orsber, gung ur jnf oernxvat gur nterrzrag ur unq znqr jvgu gurz. 
 Ur borlrq gur Cnegl, ohg ur fgvyy ungrq gur Cnegl. Va gur byq qnlf ur unq 
 uvqqra n urergvpny zvaq orarngu na nccrnenapr bs pbasbezvgl. Abj ur unq 
 ergerngrq n fgrc shegure: va gur zvaq ur unq fheeraqrerq, ohg ur unq ubcrq 
 gb xrrc gur vaare urneg vaivbyngr. Ur xarj gung ur jnf va gur jebat, ohg ur 
 cersreerq gb or va gur jebat. Gurl jbhyq haqrefgnaq gung -- B'Oevra jbhyq 
 haqrefgnaq vg. Vg jnf nyy pbasrffrq va gung fvatyr sbbyvfu pel. 
 Ur jbhyq unir gb fgneg nyy bire ntnva. Vg zvtug gnxr lrnef. Ur ena n 
 unaq bire uvf snpr, gelvat gb snzvyvnevmr uvzfrys jvgu gur arj funcr. Gurer 
 jrer qrrc sheebjf va gur purrxf, gur purrxobarf sryg funec, gur abfr 
 synggrarq. Orfvqrf, fvapr ynfg frrvat uvzfrys va gur tynff ur unq orra 
 tvira n pbzcyrgr arj frg bs grrgu. Vg jnf abg rnfl gb cerfreir 
 vafpehgnovyvgl jura lbh qvq abg xabj jung lbhe snpr ybbxrq yvxr. Va nal 
 pnfr, zrer pbageby bs gur srngherf jnf abg rabhtu. Sbe gur svefg gvzr ur 
 creprvirq gung vs lbh jnag gb xrrc n frperg lbh zhfg nyfb uvqr vg sebz 
 lbhefrys. Lbh zhfg xabj nyy gur juvyr gung vg vf gurer, ohg hagvy vg vf 
 arrqrq lbh zhfg arire yrg vg rzretr vagb lbhe pbafpvbhfarff va nal funcr 
 gung pbhyq or tvira n anzr. Sebz abj bajneqf ur zhfg abg bayl guvax evtug; 
 ur zhfg srry evtug, qernz evtug. Naq nyy gur juvyr ur zhfg xrrc uvf ungerq 
 ybpxrq hc vafvqr uvz yvxr n onyy bs znggre juvpu jnf cneg bs uvzfrys naq 
 lrg hapbaarpgrq jvgu gur erfg bs uvz, n xvaq bs plfg. 
 Bar qnl gurl jbhyq qrpvqr gb fubbg uvz. Lbh pbhyq abg gryy jura vg 
 jbhyq unccra, ohg n srj frpbaqf orsberunaq vg fubhyq or cbffvoyr gb thrff. 
 Vg jnf nyjnlf sebz oruvaq, jnyxvat qbja n pbeevqbe. Gra frpbaqf jbhyq or 
 rabhtu. Va gung gvzr gur jbeyq vafvqr uvz pbhyq ghea bire. Naq gura 
 fhqqrayl, jvgubhg n jbeq hggrerq, jvgubhg n purpx va uvf fgrc, jvgubhg gur 
 punatvat bs n yvar va uvf snpr -- fhqqrayl gur pnzbhsyntr jbhyq or qbja naq 
 onat! jbhyq tb gur onggrevrf bs uvf ungerq. Ungerq jbhyq svyy uvz yvxr na 
 rabezbhf ebnevat synzr. Naq nyzbfg va gur fnzr vafgnag onat! jbhyq tb gur 
 ohyyrg, gbb yngr, be gbb rneyl. Gurl jbhyq unir oybja uvf oenva gb cvrprf 
 orsber gurl pbhyq erpynvz vg. Gur urergvpny gubhtug jbhyq or hachavfurq, 
 haercragrq, bhg bs gurve ernpu sbe rire. Gurl jbhyq unir oybja n ubyr va 
 gurve bja cresrpgvba. Gb qvr ungvat gurz, gung jnf serrqbz. 
 Ur fuhg uvf rlrf. Vg jnf zber qvssvphyg guna npprcgvat na vagryyrpghny 
 qvfpvcyvar. Vg jnf n dhrfgvba bs qrtenqvat uvzfrys, zhgvyngvat uvzfrys. Ur 
 unq tbg gb cyhatr vagb gur svyguvrfg bs svygu. Jung jnf gur zbfg ubeevoyr, 
 fvpxravat guvat bs nyy? Ur gubhtug bs Ovt Oebgure. Gur rabezbhf snpr 
 (orpnhfr bs pbafgnagyl frrvat vg ba cbfgref ur nyjnlf gubhtug bs vg nf 
 orvat n zrger jvqr), jvgu vgf urnil oynpx zbhfgnpur naq gur rlrf gung 
 sbyybjrq lbh gb naq seb, frrzrq gb sybng vagb uvf zvaq bs vgf bja nppbeq. 
 Jung jrer uvf gehr srryvatf gbjneqf Ovt Oebgure? 
 Gurer jnf n urnil genzc bs obbgf va gur cnffntr. Gur fgrry qbbe fjhat 
 bcra jvgu n pynat. B'Oevra jnyxrq vagb gur pryy. Oruvaq uvz jrer gur jnkra- 
 snprq bssvpre naq gur oynpx-havsbezrq thneqf. 
 'Trg hc,' fnvq B'Oevra. 'Pbzr urer.' 
 Jvafgba fgbbq bccbfvgr uvz. B'Oevra gbbx Jvafgba'f fubhyqref orgjrra 
 uvf fgebat unaqf naq ybbxrq ng uvz pybfryl. 
 'Lbh unir unq gubhtugf bs qrprvivat zr,' ur fnvq. 'Gung jnf fghcvq. 
 Fgnaq hc fgenvtugre. Ybbx zr va gur snpr.' 
 Ur cnhfrq, naq jrag ba va n tragyre gbar: 
 'Lbh ner vzcebivat. Vagryyrpghnyyl gurer vf irel yvggyr jebat jvgu 
 lbh. Vg vf bayl rzbgvbanyyl gung lbh unir snvyrq gb znxr cebterff. Gryy zr, 
 Jvafgba -- naq erzrzore, ab yvrf: lbh xabj gung V nz nyjnlf noyr gb qrgrpg 
 n yvr -- gryy zr, jung ner lbhe gehr srryvatf gbjneqf Ovt Oebgure?' 
 'V ungr uvz.' 
 'Lbh ungr uvz. Tbbq. Gura gur gvzr unf pbzr sbe lbh gb gnxr gur ynfg 
 fgrc. Lbh zhfg ybir Ovt Oebgure. Vg vf abg rabhtu gb borl uvz: lbh zhfg 
 ybir uvz.' 
 Ur eryrnfrq Jvafgba jvgu n yvggyr chfu gbjneqf gur thneqf. 
 'Ebbz 101,' ur fnvq. 
 
 I 
 
 Ng rnpu fgntr bs uvf vzcevfbazrag ur unq xabja, be frrzrq gb xabj, 
 jurernobhgf ur jnf va gur jvaqbjyrff ohvyqvat. Cbffvoyl gurer jrer fyvtug 
 qvssreraprf va gur nve cerffher. Gur pryyf jurer gur thneqf unq orngra uvz 
 jrer orybj tebhaq yriry. Gur ebbz jurer ur unq orra vagreebtngrq ol B'Oevra 
 jnf uvtu hc arne gur ebbs. Guvf cynpr jnf znal zrgerf haqretebhaq, nf qrrc 
 qbja nf vg jnf cbffvoyr gb tb. 
 Vg jnf ovttre guna zbfg bs gur pryyf ur unq orra va. Ohg ur uneqyl 
 abgvprq uvf fheebhaqvatf. Nyy ur abgvprq jnf gung gurer jrer gjb fznyy 
 gnoyrf fgenvtug va sebag bs uvz, rnpu pbirerq jvgu terra onvmr. Bar jnf 
 bayl n zrger be gjb sebz uvz, gur bgure jnf shegure njnl, arne gur qbbe. Ur 
 jnf fgenccrq hcevtug va n punve, fb gvtugyl gung ur pbhyq zbir abguvat, abg 
 rira uvf urnq. N fbeg bs cnq tevccrq uvf urnq sebz oruvaq, sbepvat uvz gb 
 ybbx fgenvtug va sebag bs uvz. 
 Sbe n zbzrag ur jnf nybar, gura gur qbbe bcrarq naq B'Oevra pnzr va. 
 'Lbh nfxrq zr bapr,' fnvq B'Oevra, 'jung jnf va Ebbz 101. V gbyq lbh 
 gung lbh xarj gur nafjre nyernql. Rirelbar xabjf vg. Gur guvat gung vf va 
 Ebbz 101 vf gur jbefg guvat va gur jbeyq.' 
 Gur qbbe bcrarq ntnva. N thneq pnzr va, pneelvat fbzrguvat znqr bs 
 jver, n obk be onfxrg bs fbzr xvaq. Ur frg vg qbja ba gur shegure gnoyr. 
 Orpnhfr bs gur cbfvgvba va juvpu B'Oevra jnf fgnaqvat. Jvafgba pbhyq abg 
 frr jung gur guvat jnf. 
 'Gur jbefg guvat va gur jbeyq,' fnvq B'Oevra, 'inevrf sebz vaqvivqhny 
 gb vaqvivqhny. Vg znl or ohevny nyvir, be qrngu ol sver, be ol qebjavat, be 
 ol vzcnyrzrag, be svsgl bgure qrnguf. Gurer ner pnfrf jurer vg vf fbzr 
 dhvgr gevivny guvat, abg rira sngny.' 
 Ur unq zbirq n yvggyr gb bar fvqr, fb gung Jvafgba unq n orggre ivrj 
 bs gur guvat ba gur gnoyr. Vg jnf na boybat jver pntr jvgu n unaqyr ba gbc 
 sbe pneelvat vg ol. Svkrq gb gur sebag bs vg jnf fbzrguvat gung ybbxrq yvxr 
 n srapvat znfx, jvgu gur pbapnir fvqr bhgjneqf. Nygubhtu vg jnf guerr be 
 sbhe zrgerf njnl sebz uvz, ur pbhyq frr gung gur pntr jnf qvivqrq 
 yratgujnlf vagb gjb pbzcnegzragf, naq gung gurer jnf fbzr xvaq bs perngher 
 va rnpu. Gurl jrer engf. 
 'Va lbhe pnfr,' fnvq B'Oevra, 'gur jbefg guvat va gur jbeyq unccraf gb 
 or engf.' 
 N fbeg bs cerzbavgbel gerzbe, n srne bs ur jnf abg pregnva jung, unq 
 cnffrq guebhtu Jvafgba nf fbba nf ur pnhtug uvf svefg tyvzcfr bs gur pntr. 
 Ohg ng guvf zbzrag gur zrnavat bs gur znfx-yvxr nggnpuzrag va sebag bs vg 
 fhqqrayl fnax vagb uvz. Uvf objryf frrzrq gb ghea gb jngre. 
 'Lbh pna'g qb gung!' ur pevrq bhg va n uvtu penpxrq ibvpr. 'Lbh 
 pbhyqa'g, lbh pbhyqa'g! Vg'f vzcbffvoyr.' 
 'Qb lbh erzrzore,' fnvq B'Oevra, 'gur zbzrag bs cnavp gung hfrq gb 
 bpphe va lbhe qernzf? Gurer jnf n jnyy bs oynpxarff va sebag bs lbh, naq n 
 ebnevat fbhaq va lbhe rnef. Gurer jnf fbzrguvat greevoyr ba gur bgure fvqr 
 bs gur jnyy. Lbh xarj gung lbh xarj jung vg jnf, ohg lbh qnerq abg qent vg 
 vagb gur bcra. Vg jnf gur engf gung jrer ba gur bgure fvqr bs gur jnyy.' 
 'B'Oevra!' fnvq Jvafgba, znxvat na rssbeg gb pbageby uvf ibvpr. 'Lbh 
 xabj guvf vf abg arprffnel. Jung vf vg gung lbh jnag zr gb qb?' 
 B'Oevra znqr ab qverpg nafjre. Jura ur fcbxr vg jnf va gur 
 fpubbyznfgrevfu znaare gung ur fbzrgvzrf nssrpgrq. Ur ybbxrq gubhtugshyyl 
 vagb gur qvfgnapr, nf gubhtu ur jrer nqqerffvat na nhqvrapr fbzrjurer 
 oruvaq Jvafgba'f onpx. 
 'Ol vgfrys,' ur fnvq, 'cnva vf abg nyjnlf rabhtu. Gurer ner bppnfvbaf 
 jura n uhzna orvat jvyy fgnaq bhg ntnvafg cnva, rira gb gur cbvag bs qrngu. 
 Ohg sbe rirelbar gurer vf fbzrguvat haraqhenoyr -- fbzrguvat gung pnaabg or 
 pbagrzcyngrq. Pbhentr naq pbjneqvpr ner abg vaibyirq. Vs lbh ner snyyvat 
 sebz n urvtug vg vf abg pbjneqyl gb pyhgpu ng n ebcr. Vs lbh unir pbzr hc 
 sebz qrrc jngre vg vf abg pbjneqyl gb svyy lbhe yhatf jvgu nve. Vg vf 
 zreryl na vafgvapg juvpu pnaabg or qrfgeblrq. Vg vf gur fnzr jvgu gur engf. 
 Sbe lbh, gurl ner haraqhenoyr. Gurl ner n sbez bs cerffher gung lbh pnaabg 
 jvgufgnaq. rira vs lbh jvfurq gb. Lbh jvyy qb jung vf erdhverq bs lbh. 
 'Ohg jung vf vg, jung vf vg? Ubj pna V qb vg vs V qba'g xabj jung vg 
 vf?' 
 B'Oevra cvpxrq hc gur pntr naq oebhtug vg npebff gb gur arnere gnoyr. 
 Ur frg vg qbja pnershyyl ba gur onvmr pybgu. Jvafgba pbhyq urne gur oybbq 
 fvatvat va uvf rnef. Ur unq gur srryvat bs fvggvat va hggre ybaryvarff. Ur 
 jnf va gur zvqqyr bs n terng rzcgl cynva, n syng qrfreg qerapurq jvgu 
 fhayvtug, npebff juvpu nyy fbhaqf pnzr gb uvz bhg bs vzzrafr qvfgnaprf. Lrg 
 gur pntr jvgu gur engf jnf abg gjb zrgerf njnl sebz uvz. Gurl jrer rabezbhf 
 engf. Gurl jrer ng gur ntr jura n eng'f zhmmyr tebjf oyhag naq svrepr naq 
 uvf she oebja vafgrnq bs terl. 
 'Gur eng,' fnvq B'Oevra, fgvyy nqqerffvat uvf vaivfvoyr nhqvrapr, 
 'nygubhtu n ebqrag, vf pneavibebhf. Lbh ner njner bs gung. Lbh jvyy unir 
 urneq bs gur guvatf gung unccra va gur cbbe dhnegref bs guvf gbja. Va fbzr 
 fgerrgf n jbzna qner abg yrnir ure onol nybar va gur ubhfr, rira sbe svir 
 zvahgrf. Gur engf ner pregnva gb nggnpx vg. Jvguva dhvgr n fznyy gvzr gurl 
 jvyy fgevc vg gb gur obarf. Gurl nyfb nggnpx fvpx be qlvat crbcyr. Gurl 
 fubj nfgbavfuvat vagryyvtrapr va xabjvat jura n uhzna orvat vf urycyrff.' 
 Gurer jnf na bhgohefg bs fdhrnyf sebz gur pntr. Vg frrzrq gb ernpu 
 Jvafgba sebz sne njnl. Gur engf jrer svtugvat; gurl jrer gelvat gb trg ng 
 rnpu bgure guebhtu gur cnegvgvba. Ur urneq nyfb n qrrc tebna bs qrfcnve. 
 Gung, gbb, frrzrq gb pbzr sebz bhgfvqr uvzfrys. 
 B'Oevra cvpxrq hc gur pntr, naq, nf ur qvq fb, cerffrq fbzrguvat va 
 vg. Gurer jnf n funec pyvpx. Jvafgba znqr n senagvp rssbeg gb grne uvzfrys 
 ybbfr sebz gur punve. Vg jnf ubcryrff; rirel cneg bs uvz, rira uvf urnq, 
 jnf uryq vzzbinoyl. B'Oevra zbirq gur pntr arnere. Vg jnf yrff guna n zrger 
 sebz Jvafgba'f snpr. 
 'V unir cerffrq gur svefg yrire,' fnvq B'Oevra. 'Lbh haqrefgnaq gur 
 pbafgehpgvba bs guvf pntr. Gur znfx jvyy svg bire lbhe urnq, yrnivat ab 
 rkvg. Jura V cerff guvf bgure yrire, gur qbbe bs gur pntr jvyy fyvqr hc. 
 Gurfr fgneivat oehgrf jvyy fubbg bhg bs vg yvxr ohyyrgf. Unir lbh rire frra 
 n eng yrnc guebhtu gur nve? Gurl jvyy yrnc ba gb lbhe snpr naq ober 
 fgenvtug vagb vg. Fbzrgvzrf gurl nggnpx gur rlrf svefg. Fbzrgvzrf gurl 
 oheebj guebhtu gur purrxf naq qribhe gur gbathr.' 
 Gur pntr jnf arnere; vg jnf pybfvat va. Jvafgba urneq n fhpprffvba bs 
 fuevyy pevrf juvpu nccrnerq gb or bppheevat va gur nve nobir uvf urnq. Ohg 
 ur sbhtug shevbhfyl ntnvafg uvf cnavp. Gb guvax, gb guvax, rira jvgu n 
 fcyvg frpbaq yrsg -- gb guvax jnf gur bayl ubcr. Fhqqrayl gur sbhy zhfgl 
 bqbhe bs gur oehgrf fgehpx uvf abfgevyf. Gurer jnf n ivbyrag pbaihyfvba bs 
 anhfrn vafvqr uvz, naq ur nyzbfg ybfg pbafpvbhfarff. Rirelguvat unq tbar 
 oynpx. Sbe na vafgnag ur jnf vafnar, n fpernzvat navzny. Lrg ur pnzr bhg bs 
 gur oynpxarff pyhgpuvat na vqrn. Gurer jnf bar naq bayl bar jnl gb fnir 
 uvzfrys. Ur zhfg vagrecbfr nabgure uhzna orvat, gur obql bs nabgure uhzna 
 orvat, orgjrra uvzfrys naq gur engf. 
 Gur pvepyr bs gur znfx jnf ynetr rabhtu abj gb fuhg bhg gur ivfvba bs 
 nalguvat ryfr. Gur jver qbbe jnf n pbhcyr bs unaq-fcnaf sebz uvf snpr. Gur 
 engf xarj jung jnf pbzvat abj. Bar bs gurz jnf yrncvat hc naq qbja, gur 
 bgure, na byq fpnyl tenaqsngure bs gur frjref, fgbbq hc, jvgu uvf cvax 
 unaqf ntnvafg gur onef, naq svrepryl favssrq gur nve. Jvafgba pbhyq frr gur 
 juvfxref naq gur lryybj grrgu. Ntnva gur oynpx cnavp gbbx ubyq bs uvz. Ur 
 jnf oyvaq, urycyrff, zvaqyrff. 
 'Vg jnf n pbzzba chavfuzrag va Vzcrevny Puvan,' fnvq B'Oevra nf 
 qvqnpgvpnyyl nf rire. 
 Gur znfx jnf pybfvat ba uvf snpr. Gur jver oehfurq uvf purrx. Naq gura 
 -- ab, vg jnf abg eryvrs, bayl ubcr, n gval sentzrag bs ubcr. Gbb yngr, 
 creuncf gbb yngr. Ohg ur unq fhqqrayl haqrefgbbq gung va gur jubyr jbeyq 
 gurer jnf whfg bar crefba gb jubz ur pbhyq genafsre uvf chavfuzrag -- bar 
 obql gung ur pbhyq guehfg orgjrra uvzfrys naq gur engf. Naq ur jnf fubhgvat 
 senagvpnyyl, bire naq bire. 
 'Qb vg gb Whyvn! Qb vg gb Whyvn! Abg zr! Whyvn! V qba'g pner jung lbh 
 qb gb ure. Grne ure snpr bss, fgevc ure gb gur obarf. Abg zr! Whyvn! Abg 
 zr!' 
 Ur jnf snyyvat onpxjneqf, vagb rabezbhf qrcguf, njnl sebz gur engf. Ur 
 jnf fgvyy fgenccrq va gur punve, ohg ur unq snyyra guebhtu gur sybbe, 
 guebhtu gur jnyyf bs gur ohvyqvat, guebhtu gur rnegu, guebhtu gur bprnaf, 
 guebhtu gur ngzbfcurer, vagb bhgre fcnpr, vagb gur thysf orgjrra gur fgnef 
 -- nyjnlf njnl, njnl, njnl sebz gur engf. Ur jnf yvtug lrnef qvfgnag, ohg 
 B'Oevra jnf fgvyy fgnaqvat ng uvf fvqr. Gurer jnf fgvyy gur pbyq gbhpu bs 
 jver ntnvafg uvf purrx. Ohg guebhtu gur qnexarff gung rairybcrq uvz ur 
 urneq nabgure zrgnyyvp pyvpx, naq xarj gung gur pntr qbbe unq pyvpxrq fuhg 
 naq abg bcra. 
 
 IV 
 
 Gur Purfgahg Gerr jnf nyzbfg rzcgl. N enl bs fhayvtug fynagvat guebhtu 
 n jvaqbj sryy ba qhfgl gnoyr-gbcf. Vg jnf gur ybaryl ubhe bs svsgrra. N 
 gvaal zhfvp gevpxyrq sebz gur gryrfperraf. 
 Jvafgba fng va uvf hfhny pbeare, tnmvat vagb na rzcgl tynff. Abj naq 
 ntnva ur tynaprq hc ng n infg snpr juvpu rlrq uvz sebz gur bccbfvgr jnyy. 
 OVT OEBGURE VF JNGPUVAT LBH gur pncgvba fnvq. Haovqqra, n jnvgre pnzr naq 
 svyyrq uvf tynff hc jvgu Ivpgbel Tva, funxvat vagb vg n srj qebcf sebz 
 nabgure obggyr jvgu n dhvyy guebhtu gur pbex. Vg jnf fnppunevar synibherq 
 jvgu pybirf, gur fcrpvnyvgl bs gur pnsr. 
 Jvafgba jnf yvfgravat gb gur gryrfperra. Ng cerfrag bayl zhfvp jnf 
 pbzvat bhg bs vg, ohg gurer jnf n cbffvovyvgl gung ng nal zbzrag gurer 
 zvtug or n fcrpvny ohyyrgva sebz gur Zvavfgel bs Crnpr. Gur arjf sebz gur 
 Nsevpna sebag jnf qvfdhvrgvat va gur rkgerzr. Ba naq bss ur unq orra 
 jbeelvat nobhg vg nyy qnl. N Rhenfvna nezl (Bprnavn jnf ng jne jvgu 
 Rhenfvn: Bprnavn unq nyjnlf orra ng jne jvgu Rhenfvn) jnf zbivat fbhgujneq 
 ng greevslvat fcrrq. Gur zvq-qnl ohyyrgva unq abg zragvbarq nal qrsvavgr 
 nern, ohg vg jnf cebonoyr gung nyernql gur zbhgu bs gur Pbatb jnf n 
 onggyrsvryq. Oenmmnivyyr naq Yrbcbyqivyyr jrer va qnatre. Bar qvq abg unir 
 gb ybbx ng gur znc gb frr jung vg zrnag. Vg jnf abg zreryl n dhrfgvba bs 
 ybfvat Prageny Nsevpn: sbe gur svefg gvzr va gur jubyr jne, gur greevgbel 
 bs Bprnavn vgfrys jnf zranprq. 
 N ivbyrag rzbgvba, abg srne rknpgyl ohg n fbeg bs haqvssreragvngrq 
 rkpvgrzrag, synerq hc va uvz, gura snqrq ntnva. Ur fgbccrq guvaxvat nobhg 
 gur jne. Va gurfr qnlf ur pbhyq arire svk uvf zvaq ba nal bar fhowrpg sbe 
 zber guna n srj zbzragf ng n gvzr. Ur cvpxrq hc uvf tynff naq qenvarq vg ng 
 n thyc. Nf nyjnlf, gur tva znqr uvz fuhqqre naq rira ergpu fyvtugyl. Gur 
 fghss jnf ubeevoyr. Gur pybirf naq fnppunevar, gurzfryirf qvfthfgvat rabhtu 
 va gurve fvpxyl jnl, pbhyq abg qvfthvfr gur syng bvyl fzryy; naq jung jnf 
 jbefg bs nyy jnf gung gur fzryy bs tva, juvpu qjryg jvgu uvz avtug naq qnl, 
 jnf varkgevpnoyl zvkrq hc va uvf zvaq jvgu gur fzryy bs gubfr-- 
 Ur arire anzrq gurz, rira va uvf gubhtugf, naq fb sne nf vg jnf 
 cbffvoyr ur arire ivfhnyvmrq gurz. Gurl jrer fbzrguvat gung ur jnf unys- 
 njner bs, ubirevat pybfr gb uvf snpr, n fzryy gung pyhat gb uvf abfgevyf. 
 Nf gur tva ebfr va uvz ur orypurq guebhtu checyr yvcf. Ur unq tebja snggre 
 fvapr gurl eryrnfrq uvz, naq unq ertnvarq uvf byq pbybhe -- vaqrrq, zber 
 guna ertnvarq vg. Uvf srngherf unq guvpxrarq, gur fxva ba abfr naq 
 purrxobarf jnf pbnefryl erq, rira gur onyq fpnyc jnf gbb qrrc n cvax. N 
 jnvgre, ntnva haovqqra, oebhtug gur purffobneq naq gur pheerag vffhr bs gur 
 Gvzrf, jvgu gur cntr ghearq qbja ng gur purff ceboyrz. Gura, frrvat gung 
 Jvafgba'f tynff jnf rzcgl, ur oebhtug gur tva obggyr naq svyyrq vg. Gurer 
 jnf ab arrq gb tvir beqref. Gurl xarj uvf unovgf. Gur purffobneq jnf nyjnlf 
 jnvgvat sbe uvz, uvf pbeare gnoyr jnf nyjnlf erfreirq; rira jura gur cynpr 
 jnf shyy ur unq vg gb uvzfrys, fvapr abobql pnerq gb or frra fvggvat gbb 
 pybfr gb uvz. Ur arire rira obgurerq gb pbhag uvf qevaxf. Ng veerthyne 
 vagreinyf gurl cerfragrq uvz jvgu n qvegl fyvc bs cncre juvpu gurl fnvq jnf 
 gur ovyy, ohg ur unq gur vzcerffvba gung gurl nyjnlf haqrepunetrq uvz. Vg 
 jbhyq unir znqr ab qvssrerapr vs vg unq orra gur bgure jnl nobhg. Ur unq 
 nyjnlf cyragl bs zbarl abjnqnlf. Ur rira unq n wbo, n fvarpher, zber 
 uvtuyl-cnvq guna uvf byq wbo unq orra. 
 Gur zhfvp sebz gur gryrfperra fgbccrq naq n ibvpr gbbx bire. Jvafgba 
 envfrq uvf urnq gb yvfgra. Ab ohyyrgvaf sebz gur sebag, ubjrire. Vg jnf 
 zreryl n oevrs naabhaprzrag sebz gur Zvavfgel bs Cyragl. Va gur cerprqvat 
 dhnegre, vg nccrnerq, gur Gragu Guerr-Lrne Cyna'f dhbgn sbe obbgynprf unq 
 orra bireshysvyyrq ol 98 cre prag. 
 Ur rknzvarq gur purff ceboyrz naq frg bhg gur cvrprf. Vg jnf n gevpxl 
 raqvat, vaibyivat n pbhcyr bs xavtugf. 'Juvgr gb cynl naq zngr va gjb 
 zbirf.' Jvafgba ybbxrq hc ng gur cbegenvg bs Ovt Oebgure. Juvgr nyjnlf 
 zngrf, ur gubhtug jvgu n fbeg bs pybhql zlfgvpvfz. Nyjnlf, jvgubhg 
 rkprcgvba, vg vf fb neenatrq. Va ab purff ceboyrz fvapr gur ortvaavat bs 
 gur jbeyq unf oynpx rire jba. Qvq vg abg flzobyvmr gur rgreany, hainelvat 
 gevhzcu bs Tbbq bire Rivy? Gur uhtr snpr tnmrq onpx ng uvz, shyy bs pnyz 
 cbjre. Juvgr nyjnlf zngrf. 
 Gur ibvpr sebz gur gryrfperra cnhfrq naq nqqrq va n qvssrerag naq zhpu 
 tenire gbar: 'Lbh ner jnearq gb fgnaq ol sbe na vzcbegnag naabhaprzrag ng 
 svsgrra-guvegl. Svsgrra-guvegl! Guvf vf arjf bs gur uvturfg vzcbegnapr. 
 Gnxr pner abg gb zvff vg. Svsgrra-guvegl!' Gur gvaxvat zhfvp fgehpx hc 
 ntnva. 
 Jvafgba'f urneg fgveerq. Gung jnf gur ohyyrgva sebz gur sebag; 
 vafgvapg gbyq uvz gung vg jnf onq arjf gung jnf pbzvat. Nyy qnl, jvgu 
 yvggyr fchegf bs rkpvgrzrag, gur gubhtug bs n fznfuvat qrsrng va Nsevpn unq 
 orra va naq bhg bs uvf zvaq. Ur frrzrq npghnyyl gb frr gur Rhenfvna nezl 
 fjnezvat npebff gur arire-oebxra sebagvre naq cbhevat qbja vagb gur gvc bs 
 Nsevpn yvxr n pbyhza bs nagf. Jul unq vg abg orra cbffvoyr gb bhgsynax gurz 
 va fbzr jnl? Gur bhgyvar bs gur Jrfg Nsevpna pbnfg fgbbq bhg ivivqyl va uvf 
 zvaq. Ur cvpxrq hc gur juvgr xavtug naq zbirq vg npebff gur obneq. Gurer 
 jnf gur cebcre fcbg. Rira juvyr ur fnj gur oynpx ubeqr enpvat fbhgujneq ur 
 fnj nabgure sbepr, zlfgrevbhfyl nffrzoyrq, fhqqrayl cynagrq va gurve erne, 
 phggvat gurve pbzhavpngvbaf ol ynaq naq frn. Ur sryg gung ol jvyyvat vg ur 
 jnf oevatvat gung bgure sbepr vagb rkvfgrapr. Ohg vg jnf arprffnel gb npg 
 dhvpxyl. Vs gurl pbhyq trg pbageby bs gur jubyr bs Nsevpn, vs gurl unq 
 nvesvryqf naq fhoznevar onfrf ng gur Pncr, vg jbhyq phg Bprnavn va gjb. Vg 
 zvtug zrna nalguvat: qrsrng, oernxqbja, gur erqvivfvba bs gur jbeyq, gur 
 qrfgehpgvba bs gur Cnegl! Ur qerj n qrrc oerngu. Na rkgenbeqvanel zrqyrl bs 
 srryvat -- ohg vg jnf abg n zrqyrl, rknpgyl; engure vg jnf fhpprffvir 
 ynlref bs srryvat, va juvpu bar pbhyq abg fnl juvpu ynlre jnf haqrezbfg -- 
 fgehttyrq vafvqr uvz. 
 Gur fcnfz cnffrq. Ur chg gur juvgr xavtug onpx va vgf cynpr, ohg sbe 
 gur zbzrag ur pbhyq abg frggyr qbja gb frevbhf fghql bs gur purff ceboyrz. 
 Uvf gubhtugf jnaqrerq ntnva. Nyzbfg hapbafpvbhfyl ur genprq jvgu uvf svatre 
 va gur qhfg ba gur gnoyr: 
 
 2 + 2 = 5 
 
 'Gurl pna'g trg vafvqr lbh,' fur unq fnvq. Ohg gurl pbhyq trg vafvqr 
 lbh. 'Jung unccraf gb lbh urer vf sbe rire,' B'Oevra unq fnvq. Gung jnf n 
 gehr jbeq. Gurer jrer guvatf, lbhe bja npgf, sebz juvpu lbh pbhyq arire 
 erpbire. Fbzrguvat jnf xvyyrq va lbhe oernfg: oheag bhg, pnhgrevmrq bhg. 
 Ur unq frra ure; ur unq rira fcbxra gb ure. Gurer jnf ab qnatre va vg. 
 Ur xarj nf gubhtu vafgvapgviryl gung gurl abj gbbx nyzbfg ab vagrerfg va 
 uvf qbvatf. Ur pbhyq unir neenatrq gb zrrg ure n frpbaq gvzr vs rvgure bs 
 gurz unq jnagrq gb. Npghnyyl vg jnf ol punapr gung gurl unq zrg. Vg jnf va 
 gur Cnex, ba n ivyr, ovgvat qnl va Znepu, jura gur rnegu jnf yvxr veba naq 
 nyy gur tenff frrzrq qrnq naq gurer jnf abg n ohq naljurer rkprcg n srj 
 pebphfrf juvpu unq chfurq gurzfryirf hc gb or qvfzrzorerq ol gur jvaq. Ur 
 jnf uheelvat nybat jvgu sebmra unaqf naq jngrevat rlrf jura ur fnj ure abg 
 gra zrgerf njnl sebz uvz. Vg fgehpx uvz ng bapr gung fur unq punatrq va 
 fbzr vyy-qrsvarq jnl. Gurl nyzbfg cnffrq bar nabgure jvgubhg n fvta, gura 
 ur ghearq naq sbyybjrq ure, abg irel rntreyl. Ur xarj gung gurer jnf ab 
 qnatre, abobql jbhyq gnxr nal vagrerfg va uvz. Fur qvq abg fcrnx. Fur 
 jnyxrq boyvdhryl njnl npebff gur tenff nf gubhtu gelvat gb trg evq bs uvz, 
 gura frrzrq gb erfvta urefrys gb univat uvz ng ure fvqr. Cerfragyl gurl 
 jrer va nzbat n pyhzc bs enttrq yrnsyrff fuehof, hfryrff rvgure sbe 
 pbaprnyzrag be nf cebgrpgvba sebz gur jvaq. Gurl unygrq. Vg jnf ivyryl 
 pbyq. Gur jvaq juvfgyrq guebhtu gur gjvtf naq serggrq gur bppnfvbany, 
 qvegl-ybbxvat pebphfrf. Ur chg uvf nez ebhaq ure jnvfg. 
 Gurer jnf ab gryrfperra, ohg gurer zhfg or uvqqra zvpebcubarf: 
 orfvqrf, gurl pbhyq or frra. Vg qvq abg znggre, abguvat znggrerq. Gurl 
 pbhyq unir ynva qbja ba gur tebhaq naq qbar gung vs gurl unq jnagrq gb. Uvf 
 syrfu sebmr jvgu ubeebe ng gur gubhtug bs vg. Fur znqr ab erfcbafr jungrire 
 gb gur pynfc bs uvf nez; fur qvq abg rira gel gb qvfratntr urefrys. Ur xarj 
 abj jung unq punatrq va ure. Ure snpr jnf fnyybjre, naq gurer jnf n ybat 
 fpne, cnegyl uvqqra ol gur unve, npebff ure sberurnq naq grzcyr; ohg gung 
 jnf abg gur punatr. Vg jnf gung ure jnvfg unq tebja guvpxre, naq, va n 
 fhecevfvat jnl, unq fgvssrarq. Ur erzrzorerq ubj bapr, nsgre gur rkcybfvba 
 bs n ebpxrg obzo, ur unq urycrq gb qent n pbecfr bhg bs fbzr ehvaf, naq unq 
 orra nfgbavfurq abg bayl ol gur vaperqvoyr jrvtug bs gur guvat, ohg ol vgf 
 evtvqvgl naq njxjneqarff gb unaqyr, juvpu znqr vg frrz zber yvxr fgbar guna 
 syrfu. Ure obql sryg yvxr gung. Vg bppheerq gb uvz gung gur grkgher bs ure 
 fxva jbhyq or dhvgr qvssrerag sebz jung vg unq bapr orra. 
 Ur qvq abg nggrzcg gb xvff ure, abe qvq gurl fcrnx. Nf gurl jnyxrq 
 onpx npebff gur tenff, fur ybbxrq qverpgyl ng uvz sbe gur svefg gvzr. Vg 
 jnf bayl n zbzragnel tynapr, shyy bs pbagrzcg naq qvfyvxr. Ur jbaqrerq 
 jurgure vg jnf n qvfyvxr gung pnzr cheryl bhg bs gur cnfg be jurgure vg jnf 
 vafcverq nyfb ol uvf oybngrq snpr naq gur jngre gung gur jvaq xrcg 
 fdhrrmvat sebz uvf rlrf. Gurl fng qbja ba gjb veba punvef, fvqr ol fvqr ohg 
 abg gbb pybfr gbtrgure. Ur fnj gung fur jnf nobhg gb fcrnx. Fur zbirq ure 
 pyhzfl fubr n srj pragvzrgerf naq qryvorengryl pehfurq n gjvt. Ure srrg 
 frrzrq gb unir tebja oebnqre, ur abgvprq. 
 'V orgenlrq lbh,' fur fnvq onyqyl. 
 'V orgenlrq lbh,' ur fnvq. 
 Fur tnir uvz nabgure dhvpx ybbx bs qvfyvxr. 
 'Fbzrgvzrf,' fur fnvq, 'gurl guerngra lbh jvgu fbzrguvat fbzrguvat lbh 
 pna'g fgnaq hc gb, pna'g rira guvax nobhg. Naq gura lbh fnl, "Qba'g qb vg 
 gb zr, qb vg gb fbzrobql ryfr, qb vg gb fb-naq-fb." Naq creuncf lbh zvtug 
 cergraq, nsgrejneqf, gung vg jnf bayl n gevpx naq gung lbh whfg fnvq vg gb 
 znxr gurz fgbc naq qvqa'g ernyyl zrna vg. Ohg gung vfa'g gehr. Ng gur gvzr 
 jura vg unccraf lbh qb zrna vg. Lbh guvax gurer'f ab bgure jnl bs fnivat 
 lbhefrys, naq lbh'er dhvgr ernql gb fnir lbhefrys gung jnl. Lbh jnag vg gb 
 unccra gb gur bgure crefba. Lbh qba'g tvir n qnza jung gurl fhssre. Nyy lbh 
 pner nobhg vf lbhefrys.' 
 'Nyy lbh pner nobhg vf lbhefrys,' ur rpubrq. 
 'Naq nsgre gung, lbh qba'g srry gur fnzr gbjneqf gur bgure crefba nal 
 ybatre.' 
 'Ab,' ur fnvq, 'lbh qba'g srry gur fnzr.' 
 Gurer qvq abg frrz gb or nalguvat zber gb fnl. Gur jvaq cynfgrerq 
 gurve guva birenyyf ntnvafg gurve obqvrf. Nyzbfg ng bapr vg orpnzr 
 rzoneenffvat gb fvg gurer va fvyrapr: orfvqrf, vg jnf gbb pbyq gb xrrc 
 fgvyy. Fur fnvq fbzrguvat nobhg pngpuvat ure Ghor naq fgbbq hc gb tb. 
 'Jr zhfg zrrg ntnva,' ur fnvq. 
 'Lrf,' fur fnvq, 'jr zhfg zrrg ntnva.' 
 Ur sbyybjrq veerfbyhgryl sbe n yvggyr qvfgnapr, unys n cnpr oruvaq 
 ure. Gurl qvq abg fcrnx ntnva. Fur qvq abg npghnyyl gel gb funxr uvz bss, 
 ohg jnyxrq ng whfg fhpu n fcrrq nf gb cerirag uvf xrrcvat noernfg bs ure. 
 Ur unq znqr hc uvf zvaq gung ur jbhyq nppbzcnal ure nf sne nf gur Ghor 
 fgngvba, ohg fhqqrayl guvf cebprff bs genvyvat nybat va gur pbyq frrzrq 
 cbvagyrff naq haornenoyr. Ur jnf birejuryzrq ol n qrfver abg fb zhpu gb trg 
 njnl sebz Whyvn nf gb trg onpx gb gur Purfgahg Gerr Pnsr, juvpu unq arire 
 frrzrq fb nggenpgvir nf ng guvf zbzrag. Ur unq n abfgnytvp ivfvba bs uvf 
 pbeare gnoyr, jvgu gur arjfcncre naq gur purffobneq naq gur rire-sybjvat 
 tva. Nobir nyy, vg jbhyq or jnez va gurer. Gur arkg zbzrag, abg nygbtrgure 
 ol nppvqrag, ur nyybjrq uvzfrys gb orpbzr frcnengrq sebz ure ol n fznyy 
 xabg bs crbcyr. Ur znqr n unysurnegrq nggrzcg gb pngpu hc, gura fybjrq 
 qbja, ghearq, naq znqr bss va gur bccbfvgr qverpgvba. Jura ur unq tbar 
 svsgl zrgerf ur ybbxrq onpx. Gur fgerrg jnf abg pebjqrq, ohg nyernql ur 
 pbhyq abg qvfgvathvfu ure. Nal bar bs n qbmra uheelvat svtherf zvtug unir 
 orra uref. Creuncf ure guvpxrarq, fgvssrarq obql jnf ab ybatre erpbtavmnoyr 
 sebz oruvaq. 
 'Ng gur gvzr jura vg unccraf,' fur unq fnvq, 'lbh qb zrna vg.' Ur unq 
 zrnag vg. Ur unq abg zreryl fnvq vg, ur unq jvfurq vg. Ur unq jvfurq gung 
 fur naq abg ur fubhyq or qryvirerq bire gb gur-- 
 Fbzrguvat punatrq va gur zhfvp gung gevpxyrq sebz gur gryrfperra. N 
 penpxrq naq wrrevat abgr, n lryybj abgr, pnzr vagb vg. Naq gura -- creuncf 
 vg jnf abg unccravat, creuncf vg jnf bayl n zrzbel gnxvat ba gur frzoynapr 
 bs fbhaq -- n ibvpr jnf fvatvat: 
 
 Haqre gur fcernqvat purfgahg gerr 
 V fbyq lbh naq lbh fbyq zr-- 
 
 Gur grnef jryyrq hc va uvf rlrf. N cnffvat jnvgre abgvprq gung uvf 
 tynff jnf rzcgl naq pnzr onpx jvgu gur tva obggyr. 
 Ur gbbx hc uvf tynff naq favssrq ng vg. Gur fghss terj abg yrff ohg 
 zber ubeevoyr jvgu rirel zbhgushy ur qenax. Ohg vg unq orpbzr gur ryrzrag 
 ur fjnz va. Vg jnf uvf yvsr, uvf qrngu, naq uvf erfheerpgvba. Vg jnf tva 
 gung fnax uvz vagb fghcbe rirel avtug, naq tva gung erivirq uvz rirel 
 zbeavat. Jura ur jbxr, fryqbz orsber ryrira uhaqerq, jvgu thzzrq-hc rlryvqf 
 naq svrel zbhgu naq n onpx gung frrzrq gb or oebxra, vg jbhyq unir orra 
 vzcbffvoyr rira gb evfr sebz gur ubevmbagny vs vg unq abg orra sbe gur 
 obggyr naq grnphc cynprq orfvqr gur orq bireavtug. Guebhtu gur zvqqnl ubhef 
 ur fng jvgu tynmrq snpr, gur obggyr unaql, yvfgravat gb gur gryrfperra. 
 Sebz svsgrra gb pybfvat-gvzr ur jnf n svkgher va gur Purfgahg Gerr. Ab bar 
 pnerq jung ur qvq nal ybatre, ab juvfgyr jbxr uvz, ab gryrfperra nqzbavfurq 
 uvz. Bppnfvbanyyl, creuncf gjvpr n jrrx, ur jrag gb n qhfgl, sbetbggra- 
 ybbxvat bssvpr va gur Zvavfgel bs Gehgu naq qvq n yvggyr jbex, be jung jnf 
 pnyyrq jbex. Ur unq orra nccbvagrq gb n fho-pbzzvggrr bs n fho-pbzzvggrr 
 juvpu unq fcebhgrq sebz bar bs gur vaahzrenoyr pbzzvggrrf qrnyvat jvgu 
 zvabe qvssvphygvrf gung nebfr va gur pbzcvyngvba bs gur Ryriragu Rqvgvba bs 
 gur Arjfcrnx Qvpgvbanel. Gurl jrer ratntrq va cebqhpvat fbzrguvat pnyyrq na 
 Vagrevz Ercbeg, ohg jung vg jnf gung gurl jrer ercbegvat ba ur unq arire 
 qrsvavgryl sbhaq bhg. Vg jnf fbzrguvat gb qb jvgu gur dhrfgvba bs jurgure 
 pbzznf fubhyq or cynprq vafvqr oenpxrgf, be bhgfvqr. Gurer jrer sbhe bguref 
 ba gur pbzzvggrr, nyy bs gurz crefbaf fvzvyne gb uvzfrys. Gurer jrer qnlf 
 jura gurl nffrzoyrq naq gura cebzcgyl qvfcrefrq ntnva, senaxyl nqzvggvat gb 
 bar nabgure gung gurer jnf abg ernyyl nalguvat gb or qbar. Ohg gurer jrer 
 bgure qnlf jura gurl frggyrq qbja gb gurve jbex nyzbfg rntreyl, znxvat n 
 gerzraqbhf fubj bs ragrevat hc gurve zvahgrf naq qensgvat ybat zrzbenaqn 
 juvpu jrer arire svavfurq -- jura gur nethzrag nf gb jung gurl jrer 
 fhccbfrqyl nethvat nobhg terj rkgenbeqvanevyl vaibyirq naq nofgehfr, jvgu 
 fhogyr unttyvat bire qrsvavgvbaf, rabezbhf qvterffvbaf, dhneeryf -- 
 guerngf, rira, gb nccrny gb uvture nhgubevgl. Naq gura fhqqrayl gur yvsr 
 jbhyq tb bhg bs gurz naq gurl jbhyq fvg ebhaq gur gnoyr ybbxvat ng bar 
 nabgure jvgu rkgvapg rlrf, yvxr tubfgf snqvat ng pbpx-pebj. 
 Gur gryrfperra jnf fvyrag sbe n zbzrag. Jvafgba envfrq uvf urnq ntnva. 
 Gur ohyyrgva! Ohg ab, gurl jrer zreryl punatvat gur zhfvp. Ur unq gur znc 
 bs Nsevpn oruvaq uvf rlryvqf. Gur zbirzrag bs gur nezvrf jnf n qvntenz: n 
 oynpx neebj grnevat iregvpnyyl fbhgujneq, naq n juvgr neebj ubevmbagnyyl 
 rnfgjneq, npebff gur gnvy bs gur svefg. Nf gubhtu sbe ernffhenapr ur ybbxrq 
 hc ng gur vzcregheonoyr snpr va gur cbegenvg. Jnf vg pbaprvinoyr gung gur 
 frpbaq neebj qvq abg rira rkvfg? 
 Uvf vagrerfg synttrq ntnva. Ur qenax nabgure zbhgushy bs tva, cvpxrq 
 hc gur juvgr xavtug naq znqr n gragngvir zbir. Purpx. Ohg vg jnf rivqragyl 
 abg gur evtug zbir, orpnhfr-- 
 Hapnyyrq, n zrzbel sybngrq vagb uvf zvaq. Ur fnj n pnaqyr-yvg ebbz 
 jvgu n infg juvgr-pbhagrecnarq orq, naq uvzfrys, n obl bs avar be gra, 
 fvggvat ba gur sybbe, funxvat n qvpr-obk, naq ynhtuvat rkpvgrqyl. Uvf 
 zbgure jnf fvggvat bccbfvgr uvz naq nyfb ynhtuvat. 
 Vg zhfg unir orra nobhg n zbagu orsber fur qvfnccrnerq. Vg jnf n 
 zbzrag bs erpbapvyvngvba, jura gur anttvat uhatre va uvf oryyl jnf 
 sbetbggra naq uvf rneyvre nssrpgvba sbe ure unq grzcbenevyl erivirq. Ur 
 erzrzorerq gur qnl jryy, n crygvat, qerapuvat qnl jura gur jngre fgernzrq 
 qbja gur jvaqbj-cnar naq gur yvtug vaqbbef jnf gbb qhyy gb ernq ol. Gur 
 oberqbz bs gur gjb puvyqera va gur qnex, penzcrq orqebbz orpnzr haornenoyr. 
 Jvafgba juvarq naq tevmmyrq, znqr shgvyr qrznaqf sbe sbbq, serggrq nobhg 
 gur ebbz chyyvat rirelguvat bhg bs cynpr naq xvpxvat gur jnvafpbgvat hagvy 
 gur arvtuobhef onatrq ba gur jnyy, juvyr gur lbhatre puvyq jnvyrq 
 vagrezvggragyl. Va gur raq uvf zbgure fnvq, 'Abj or tbbq, naq V'Vy ohl lbh 
 n gbl. N ybiryl gbl -- lbh'yy ybir vg'; naq gura fur unq tbar bhg va gur 
 enva, gb n yvggyr trareny fubc juvpu jnf fgvyy fcbenqvpnyyl bcra arneol, 
 naq pnzr onpx jvgu n pneqobneq obk pbagnvavat na bhgsvg bs Fanxrf naq 
 Ynqqref. Ur pbhyq fgvyy erzrzore gur fzryy bs gur qnzc pneqobneq. Vg jnf n 
 zvfrenoyr bhgsvg. Gur obneq jnf penpxrq naq gur gval jbbqra qvpr jrer fb 
 vyy-phg gung gurl jbhyq uneqyl yvr ba gurve fvqrf. Jvafgba ybbxrq ng gur 
 guvat fhyxvyl naq jvgubhg vagrerfg. Ohg gura uvf zbgure yvg n cvrpr bs 
 pnaqyr naq gurl fng qbja ba gur sybbe gb cynl. Fbba ur jnf jvyqyl rkpvgrq 
 naq fubhgvat jvgu ynhtugre nf gur gvqqyl-jvaxf pyvzorq ubcrshyyl hc gur 
 ynqqref naq gura pnzr fyvgurevat qbja gur fanxrf ntnva, nyzbfg gb gur 
 fgnegvat-cbvag. Gurl cynlrq rvtug tnzrf, jvaavat sbhe rnpu. Uvf gval 
 fvfgre, gbb lbhat gb haqrefgnaq jung gur tnzr jnf nobhg, unq fng cebccrq hc 
 ntnvafg n obyfgre, ynhtuvat orpnhfr gur bguref jrer ynhtuvat. Sbe n jubyr 
 nsgreabba gurl unq nyy orra unccl gbtrgure, nf va uvf rneyvre puvyqubbq. 
 Ur chfurq gur cvpgher bhg bs uvf zvaq. Vg jnf n snyfr zrzbel. Ur jnf 
 gebhoyrq ol snyfr zrzbevrf bppnfvbanyyl. Gurl qvq abg znggre fb ybat nf bar 
 xarj gurz sbe jung gurl jrer. Fbzr guvatf unq unccrarq, bguref unq abg 
 unccrarq. Ur ghearq onpx gb gur purffobneq naq cvpxrq hc gur juvgr xavtug 
 ntnva. Nyzbfg va gur fnzr vafgnag vg qebccrq ba gb gur obneq jvgu n 
 pynggre. Ur unq fgnegrq nf gubhtu n cva unq eha vagb uvz. 
 N fuevyy gehzcrg-pnyy unq cvreprq gur nve. Vg jnf gur ohyyrgva! 
 Ivpgbel! Vg nyjnlf zrnag ivpgbel jura n gehzcrg-pnyy cerprqrq gur arjf. N 
 fbeg bs ryrpgevp qevyy ena guebhtu gur pnsr. Rira gur jnvgref unq fgnegrq 
 naq cevpxrq hc gurve rnef. 
 Gur gehzcrg-pnyy unq yrg ybbfr na rabezbhf ibyhzr bs abvfr. Nyernql na 
 rkpvgrq ibvpr jnf tnooyvat sebz gur gryrfperra, ohg rira nf vg fgnegrq vg 
 jnf nyzbfg qebjarq ol n ebne bs purrevat sebz bhgfvqr. Gur arjf unq eha 
 ebhaq gur fgerrgf yvxr zntvp. Ur pbhyq urne whfg rabhtu bs jung jnf vffhvat 
 sebz gur gryrfperra gb ernyvmr gung vg unq nyy unccrarq, nf ur unq 
 sberfrra; n infg frnobear neznqn unq frpergyl nffrzoyrq n fhqqra oybj va 
 gur rarzl'f erne, gur juvgr neebj grnevat npebff gur gnvy bs gur oynpx. 
 Sentzragf bs gevhzcunag cuenfrf chfurq gurzfryirf guebhtu gur qva: 'Infg 
 fgengrtvp znabrhier -- cresrpg pb-beqvangvba -- hggre ebhg -- unys n 
 zvyyvba cevfbaref -- pbzcyrgr qrzbenyvmngvba -- pbageby bs gur jubyr bs 
 Nsevpn -- oevat gur jne jvguva zrnfhenoyr qvfgnapr bs vgf raq ivpgbel -- 
 terngrfg ivpgbel va uhzna uvfgbel -- ivpgbel, ivpgbel, ivpgbel!' 
 Haqre gur gnoyr Jvafgba'f srrg znqr pbaihyfvir zbirzragf. Ur unq abg 
 fgveerq sebz uvf frng, ohg va uvf zvaq ur jnf ehaavat, fjvsgyl ehaavat, ur 
 jnf jvgu gur pebjqf bhgfvqr, purrevat uvzfrys qrns. Ur ybbxrq hc ntnva ng 
 gur cbegenvg bs Ovt Oebgure. Gur pbybffhf gung orfgebqr gur jbeyq! Gur ebpx 
 ntnvafg juvpu gur ubeqrf bs Nfvn qnfurq gurzfryirf va inva! Ur gubhtug ubj 
 gra zvahgrf ntb -- lrf, bayl gra zvahgrf -- gurer unq fgvyy orra 
 rdhvibpngvba va uvf urneg nf ur jbaqrerq jurgure gur arjf sebz gur sebag 
 jbhyq or bs ivpgbel be qrsrng. Nu, vg jnf zber guna n Rhenfvna nezl gung 
 unq crevfurq! Zhpu unq punatrq va uvz fvapr gung svefg qnl va gur Zvavfgel 
 bs Ybir, ohg gur svany, vaqvfcrafnoyr, urnyvat punatr unq arire unccrarq, 
 hagvy guvf zbzrag. 
 Gur ibvpr sebz gur gryrfperra jnf fgvyy cbhevat sbegu vgf gnyr bs 
 cevfbaref naq obbgl naq fynhtugre, ohg gur fubhgvat bhgfvqr unq qvrq qbja n 
 yvggyr. Gur jnvgref jrer gheavat onpx gb gurve jbex. Bar bs gurz nccebnpurq 
 jvgu gur tva obggyr. Jvafgba, fvggvat va n oyvffshy qernz, cnvq ab 
 nggragvba nf uvf tynff jnf svyyrq hc. Ur jnf abg ehaavat be purrevat nal 
 ybatre. Ur jnf onpx va gur Zvavfgel bs Ybir, jvgu rirelguvat sbetvira, uvf 
 fbhy juvgr nf fabj. Ur jnf va gur choyvp qbpx, pbasrffvat rirelguvat, 
 vzcyvpngvat rirelobql. Ur jnf jnyxvat qbja gur juvgr-gvyrq pbeevqbe, jvgu 
 gur srryvat bs jnyxvat va fhayvtug, naq na nezrq thneq ng uvf onpx. Gur 
 ybatubcrq-sbe ohyyrg jnf ragrevat uvf oenva. 
 Ur tnmrq hc ng gur rabezbhf snpr. Sbegl lrnef vg unq gnxra uvz gb 
 yrnea jung xvaq bs fzvyr jnf uvqqra orarngu gur qnex zbhfgnpur. B pehry, 
 arrqyrff zvfhaqrefgnaqvat! B fghoobea, frys-jvyyrq rkvyr sebz gur ybivat 
 oernfg! Gjb tva-fpragrq grnef gevpxyrq qbja gur fvqrf bs uvf abfr. Ohg vg 
 jnf nyy evtug, rirelguvat jnf nyy evtug, gur fgehttyr jnf svavfurq. Ur unq 
 jba gur ivpgbel bire uvzfrys. Ur ybirq Ovt Oebgure. 
 
 1949 
 
 GUR RAQ 
 

